Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER I
GENERAL INTRODUCTION
NDENIABLY the first half of the seventeenth century in Europe (or
for that matter in China and to a lesser extent India) was an eventful
period, full of conflicts. In China a dynasty collapsed amidst pea-
sant revolts and for the last time nomadic invaders conquered the settled
lands. In Europe there were more widespread and prolonged wars than
ever before, the assassination of one king and the execution of another,
while revolts of whole kingdoms and provinces against their rulers took
place from Ireland to the Ukraine, from Muscovy to Naples and from
Portugal to Anatolia. But has this period in Europe any distinctive charac-
ter or significance for those who feel a need to find such things in history ?
Recent fashions would cause many historians to answer No for a variety
of reasons. The most general one would be that to make Europe the centre
of a general history is at once anachronistic and parochial, a quaint
attempt to prolong nostalgic memories of the domination of the world by
western European culture and power, which ended in 1942, if not before.
As Europe's place in the world has changed, so has our perspective of
history. Still obsessed by the view which tacitly dominated so many earlier
European historians that power is the essential subject of history and that
only success and never failure deserve study, some historians were so dis-
orientated by Europe's loss of power and so beguiled by the rhetoric of
the new leaders of Afro-Asian states and by counting the heads of the big
battalions that they became prophets, unmaking the past in order to
gratify an imaginary present and an improbable future. This first intoxi-
cation has scarcely survived the demise of those first leaders. But one
curious result has been the proliferation of posts and courses for teaching
African history to a much greater extent that those dealing with Asian
civilizations which really do have long recorded histories. All states feel
a need to supply or invent a history for themselves and this need is now
partly met for African ones, as a kind of penitential exercise by their
former rulers. This may be politically or morally edifying, the develop-
ment of techniques for using oral tradition even advances genuine know-
ledge, but as far as the seventeenth century is concerned, it cannot substan-
tially alter the perspectives of European or world history.
U
More persuasively and presumably democratically it can be argued that
it is arrogant and inappropriate to concentrate on 100,000,000 Europeans
to the exclusion of two or three times as many Asians. As yet, despite their
trans-Atlantic conquests and command of oceanic routes, Europeans
were not decisively superior in political organization, in military or other
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
technology to Asiatic societies and empires, by whom they were generally
treated as dubious parasites. The answer must be that while knowledge of
the economies and societies of Europe is still very imperfect, it is far worse
for those of Asia, but also that it was to be European powers which con-
quered and transformed Asia. This is something which will always be a
major episode of world history, whatever changes in political power and
academic fashions the future may hold. Transformations in the organiza-
tion of war, especially war by sea, began to make European powers
decisively stronger in the seventeenth century. The development of science
was to have even greater long-term effects in providing Europeans with
greater power, but the seventeenth century was more decisive in changing
educated Europeans' ways of viewing the world than in giving them im-
mediate command of new means to change it.
Even if these reasons for concentrating on Europe are acceptable, the
first half of the seventeenth century may not make an intelligible or
profitable period of study. Men of the time, Galileo, Bacon, Descartes,
Gassendi, saw themselves as apostles or discoverers of new systems of
knowledge which broke with past traditions. Historians of science may
dispute some of 'the new philosophy's' claims, but not that there was con-
tinuity of development before and after the middle of the century. How-
ever, searchers for landmarks might note that in 1609 Kepler's New
Astronomy broke with the tradition of treating the planets' motions as
circular and presented the universe as a machine, while in 1659 Huygens
constructed his perfected pendulum clock: 'the first apparatus that em-
bodies in its construction the laws of the new dynamics... not of empirical
trial and error' (Koyre). The facade of Maderna's Santa Susanna in Rome
(finished in 1603) is generally considered the first fully typical baroque
composition. Again there was no neat break in mid-century; while the
years from around 1640 to 1670 might be considered the apogee of high
baroque in Italy, its influence outside Italy continued to be strong, though
not without new rivals. But in economic history the early or middle
decades of the century have often been seen as the decisive turning point
of a secular trend from expansion to depression. More recently many
historians have seen the seventeenth century and more especially the years
before 1660 as a period of economic and political crisis, without agreeing
as to its causes or even its most important symptoms. This again requires
a longer perspective within which to put the fate of a mere two genera-
tions. The limitations of the period are both arbitrary and a matter of con-
venience, but within them are important problems which can be identified,
even if we cannot adequately explain them.
To consider such a period mainly through the history of individual
states is also open to serious objection. This again is partly a matter of
convenience, since in fact individual historians generally study particular
societies in depth. The unevenness of information as between different
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
countries and its total quantity for all Europe make effective synthesis
unlikely. There are also other reasons. The view that the central process
in European history was the building of nation-states is now unfashion-
able among historians, though its political influence has never been
stronger outside Europe and remains powerful in Europe itself. Every-
where in former colonial territories men are attempting to create states
with national identities. Such an approach could distort the past when
dominated by a teleological drive to demonstrate that the European
states of the early twentieth century were both inevitable and morally
right. It can also mean that state and nation building, like the ultimate
withering away of the state after the dictatorship of the proletariat, can be
used to justify almost anything for the sake of national survival, future
glory or present welfare. Nevertheless this approach to the seventeenth
century does emphasize features of real importance. For it was then that
the multi-national monarchy of the Spanish Habsburgs collapsed as an
effective power, while the future belonged to states, France, England, the
United Netherlands and Sweden, which had achieved a degree of identity
and unity. Yet all these countries ruled or wished to rule over territories
with separate histories, languages or cultures. The seventeenth century
also saw the building up of another multi-lingual empire from a number of
territories with diverse historical traditions by the Austrian Habsburgs
and the growth of political fragmentation in Germany, despite ties of
common language and culture.
Because international relations were dominated by dynastic considera-
tions, because the rights of provinces, groups, or even individuals, to
renounce the suzerainty of particular monarchs were not yet entirely
fictional, because of the lack of both the concept and reality of modern
linear frontiers between states and because of the international character
of much of the culture of courts and ruling groups, the criteria of modern
nationalism (meaningless as these often are) were scarcely applicable. It
is easy for those of other nations to mock the anachronistic results of
projecting backwards the artificial constructs of Irish, Magyar, Rumanian,
German or English nationalism, but they are reminders of how much our
conceptions of the past are influenced by later, even recent, events.
This may be made more precise by a negative example. If the Ukraine
had emerged as an independent national state in the nineteenth or twen-
tieth centuries, our interpretation of the significance of events in eastern
Europe in the seventeenth might be considerably modified, as both
English and Irish views on their history have been modified by the exis-
tence of the Irish Republic. Perhaps ideally such events should not in-
fluence historians, but in real life they do. The variety of interpretations
which have been put on the career of Bohdan Khmelnytsky and the treaty
of Pereiaslavl of 1654 (the very use of the word treaty has been the subject
of prolonged controversies) by Polish, Russian and Ukrainian historians
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
in the last fifty years is an extreme illustration of this, and is not solely
due either to difficulties in interpreting the evidence or the deliberate
distortions of facts to serve current political purposes. 1
This also suggests that consideration of a relatively short period can be
useful in so far as it reminds us of the unforeseeable and unexpected
character of what now seem clear or inevitable general trends. In one very
general sense European history can be seen as a brutal history of the asser-
tion of power inside and outside Europe. Those nationalisms which appear
valid and real rather than quaint or romantic expressions of antiquarian-
ism are those which acquired sufficient power to assert themselves. If the
accumulation of power has seemed the primary object of European states
in modern times, it has also been argued that no ruler or state before
Napoleon claimed to justify aggression and conquest on grounds of
national and cultural superiority or destiny. Undoubtedly such claims
became much more clear cut in the nineteenth century, culminating in
those of Hitler, Mussolini and Stalin. But if the Habsburgs themselves
belonged to a supra-national dynastic tradition of imperialism, the
Spaniards who bore the main burden of imperial defence in the early
seventeenth century did not see things in the same way. The Castilians'
sense of their destiny to conquer and rule was resented by the other
Iberian peoples. The popular demand to enforce rules of limpieza (the
exclusion of those with Jewish and Moorish blood from honour and
office) was both a perversion of Christianity and a variant of the almost
universal belief that noble blood was superior to that of commoners, but
above all it shows a fierce sense of identity and exclusiveness. There was a
popular saying 'Let us acknowledge God's grace in making us men, not
beasts, Christians, not Moors, Spaniards not men of another nation' and
another among Castilian hidalgos 'I swear to God I am as noble as the
king and more so as he is half Flemish'. Quevedo saw the struggle with
the Dutch as one for domination of the world.
Again some nations claimed to be specially chosen by God; this con-
ception was propagated for England by Foxe's Book of Martyrs and
culminated in Milton's apologetics and historical projects. The Scots had
an older tradition which the Covenanters invoked. 2 The Swedes saw
themselves as heirs of the Goths, descendants of Japheth, the oldest nation
in the world, world conquerors and teachers of the ancient Greeks. These
myths were systematized by Johannes Magnus with further inspiration
from the prophecies by Paracelsus and Tycho Brahe of the Lion of the
North as the precursor of the second coming and universal peace. 3 Now
1
Cf. C. B. O'Brien, Muscovy and the Ukraine . . . 1654-1667 (Berkeley, 1963); S. Kot,
Georges Niemirycz (The Hague, i960); D. Doroshenko, History of the Ukraine (Edmonton,
1939); S. Quillitzsch, 'Der ukrainische Befreiungskampf im 17 Jahrhundert', Deutsch-
Slawischen Beziehungen, Vol. 1 (1956), pp. 1-38.
2
See below, Chapter xvm, p. 567.
s
M. Roberts, Gustavus Adolphus, Vol. 1 (1953), pp. 509-16, 523-6.
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
all these exaltations of chosen nations have millenarian and universalist
implications, just as Campanella chose first the Spanish and then the
French monarchy as the instrument to inaugurate his general Utopia. But
they also fed national pride and self-consciousness in a way that the
Ottomans' total identification with a mission of conquest for Islam failed to
do: they were so lacking in any pride in pure Turkish descent that the word
Turk was generally used in a derogatory sense of nomads and peasants. 1
If national failings were most often invoked by propaganda aiming to
serve dynastic and religious ends, the notion of Europe and agreed
boundaries for it had emerged by the early seventeenth century. This not
so much replaced as modified the old idea of Christendom. Europe and
Christendom became largely interchangeable terms; whereas once
Christendom had meant all Christians everywhere, Christians were now
essentially Europeans: 'Jesus Christ is their way, their truth, their life;
who hath long since given a Bill of Divorce to ingratefull Asia where he
was borne, and Africa the place of his flight . . . and is become almost
wholly and onely European', as Samuel Purchas put it in 1625. He went
on to claim a supremacy in Asian trade which was very far from being
established, and a power in technology which was at best only beginning. 2
If increasing knowledge of other lands led Europeans to define themselves
in terms of the differences between themselves and others, the comparisons
were not always favourable to Europe. In the sixteenth century Busbecq
and others had made comparisons which favoured the Ottomans. But in
the seventeenth century suggestions that Europeans were warlike bar-
barians, unworthy of their Christian heritage, when compared with the
natural innocence of Amerindians, or the civilized wisdom of the Chinese,
became more frequent. The first view was pioneered by Montaigne's
reflections on the Brazilians and the standard answer was provided by
Botero who argued there was no civilization without cities. The first full
accounts of the Chinese appeared in the late sixteenth century and stressed
their prosperity and unwarlike character. The Jesuit Ricci began a long
tradition which by the later seventeenth century had represented Chinese
culture and government as the product of enlightened despotism, but
already in the first decade of the century an Italian merchant, Francesco
Carletti, anticipated Voltaire in his praise of China. 3 By 1641 the libertin
and atheist, La Mothe Le Vayer, in his Les Vertus des paiens hailed the
Chinese as practising natural religion in its purest form, while benefiting
from the rule of the disciples of Confucius, another, but unmartyred,
Socrates.
If Purchas inflated naive pride into a premature anticipation of things
to come, Europe as a political entity was a conception increasingly in-
1
B. Lewis, The Emergence of Modern Turkey (1961), Chapter 1.
D. Hay, Europe, the Emergence of an Idea (Edinburgh, 1957), Chapters 6 and 7, p. n o .
" F. Chabod, Storia deWidea d'Europa (Bari, 1962), pp. 64-89.
!
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
voked in diplomatic propaganda. Richelieu claimed to be saving not only
German liberties from Habsburg hegemony but also Europe. Jurists were
still dominated by Roman or Old Testament precedents in their discourses
on the jus gentium, despite the inappropriateness of the circumstances of a
chosen people or of an empire with universalist claims to their contem-
porary situation of sovereign states without superiors. As full of classical
and biblical learning as any of his predecessors, Grotius turned from ius
gentium to jus inter gentes.
He seems to have been the first to adopt fully the basic axiom common to his
successors: that the State is sovereign, subject to no exterior controls and amenable
mainly to considerations of its own self-interest. He aimed to show that on those
terms it is in the interest of the State to accept the rule of law, since to preserve its
existence there must be some community of nations. 1
States had equal rights, even if they had not equal powers to assert
them, but over-assertion of power would in the long run be detrimental
to the interests of the powerful. This may have contributed to developing
some sense of a European community of nations. Grotius had been
counsel for the Dutch East India Company and had used the sovereignty
of Asiatic states as an argument to reject Portuguese claims based on papal
authority, but the recognition of a community of nations which included
European and Asiatic ones on genuinely equal terms was to be deferred
both by Europeans' assertion of their power 2 and by China's refusal to
recognize other states except as tributaries of her emperor.
If there came to be general agreement that the frontier of Europe itself
was on the Don, this was also a period in which what proved to be lasting
boundaries and divisions were achieved. White Russia and Smolensk,
Kiev and the Left Bank Ukraine went to Muscovy, Portugal became
independent of the Spanish Habsburgs and the religious geography of
Germany was substantially settled by the Thirty Years War until the
twentieth century. Outside Europe the frontiers between Persia and the
Ottoman Empire which Murad IV established are still substantially those
between Turkey, Iraq and Persia. Spain ceased to have a monopoly of
settlement in the Caribbean and was no longer able to control or limit the
settlement of North America by others. In the east Asian archipelago,
Spain's hold on the Philippines was finally consolidated, although by
1650 the Dutch had established themselves as the predominant European
power. By the mid-seventeenth century Russian traders and trappers had
reached the Pacific through Siberia and were in contact with the Chinese
on the River Amur.
There was some sense of a European culture, though as yet Russia was
regarded as largely alien to it. Religious and political controversies like
1
G. Mattingly, Renaissance Diplomacy (1955), p. 294; Vol. HI in this series, Chapter vi;
and below, Chapter m, pp. 111-12.
' See below, Chapter XXII, p. 671.
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
those between Bellarmine and James I had a European audience, as did
more narrowly academic ones, such as Casaubon's refutation of Baronius,
demonstrating that the Hermetic writings were post-Christian. All these
were in Latin, like most academic writings. French, Spanish and Italian
vernacular cultures were all international in the sense that their influence
was felt throughout Europe. Italian influence on painting and architecture
was stronger over a wider area of Europe than in the sixteenth century.
But it is as well to remember that those whom we now recognize as the
greatest writers, thinkers or artists were not necessarily widely influential
in Europe in their own times. While Rubens, Bernini and to a lesser extent
van Dyck had great European reputations, Vermeer and Velasquez did
not. While Tasso, Cervantes, Quevedo, even Marino, were read all over
Europe by 1650, neither Shakespeare nor Corneille had an international
readership. Descartes is still read and Bacon much mentioned, if less
studied, today, but in this period Justus Lipsius was probably more
widely read than either.
The literary and linguistic influences of French and Spanish, unlike
those of Italian, were ultimately more closely connected with exercise of
political power. The influence of Castilian language and culture was at its
height not only in the lands directly ruled from Madrid, but also in
Bohemia, Austria and Germany. 1 Direct influence of Spanish literature
went further still; over twenty Jacobean plays derive from Spanish
sources, some by way of French translations, but many directly. Fletcher
and Massinger both probably knew Spanish. Not only Cervantes' fiction,
but many picaresque novels were translated into English, French, Italian
and German. Aleman's Guzman de Alfarache (1599, 1604), 'the first full-
length realistic novel in European literature', was a best-seller outside
Spain and directly shaped the form of the German masterpiece, Grimmel-
shausen's Simplicissimus (1669). The direct influence of Spanish on French
and English literature was perhaps strongest in the first half of the seven-
teenth century, but the number and popularity of translations continued
to grow thereafter.
The tasks of the more general historian have become so complex that
he has little hope of accomplishing anything except the provision of easy
targets for criticism by his more specialized colleagues. Historians of art
often feel that such historians make extravagant and crude assertions
about the geographical and chronological range of baroque art, its con-
tent, style and social significance. Some historians of literature complain
of the useless proliferation of themes and categories borrowed from
historians of art and science. Other historians tend to feel that those who
specialize in cultural history use out-of-date analyses and crude concepts
1
H. Tiemann, Das Spanische Schrifttum in Deutschland von der Renaissance bis zur
Romantik (Hamburg, 1936).
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
when they refer to the social, political and economic background. Like-
wise many economic historians believe that understanding of the funda-
mental structure of history and society is only accessible to those trained
in statistical and analytical techniques, though they may disagree about
how to apply them in demography or price history. Thus the mere his-
torian, the man who tries to study events in some general way, was never
more at a discount. But general synthesis was almost equally difficult when
diplomatic, political, and constitutional history were thought to be the
fundamentals. All anyone can hope to do is to interest others in trying to
produce better answers or better questions, as well as more knowledge,
while resisting temptations to use particular concepts, such as 'conjonc-
ture', 'the great chain of being', 'Baroque sensibility', or modern myths
such a s ' dissociation of sensibility', or the' organic society', as keys to too
many, or in the last two cases to any, doors.
If the general economic and social conditions in which states were
trying to build up their power are now a major concern of historians, it is
only comparatively recently that they have thought in terms of phases of
general economic growth and depression. Political and cultural history
since the Middle Ages or earlier was usually seen as a progression, sub-
jected to temporary interruptions. States rose and declined, but this was
usually seen as a transference of power to new leaders, while the general
power of Europe in relation to other areas of the world clearly grew
between say 1400 and 1800, or 1700. Since economic factors were mainly
considered in relation to policies pursued by governments in order to build
up states and because economic historians were mainly concerned with
the evolution of economic institutions and organization, and of techniques
of production, such developments either implied or assumed over-all
long-term growth. Some areas were backward, such as Russia, some areas
admittedly declined, as did Spain, but this was compensated by growth
and advance elsewhere. As the study of economic history developed,
historians such as Pirenne rejected concepts of steady evolution in favour
of ones of a more cyclical character. Historians have become increasingly
interested in stressing disjunctions, price revolutions, or crises. Similar
interests have been pursued in political and cultural history. In recent
years the seventeenth century has been seen as above all a century of
revolution and crisis. Marxist interpretations still stress the older evolu-
tionary pattern in so far as they see the crisis as contributing to 'the
transition from feudalism to capitalism' and to the ultimate strengthening
of 'progressive forces', notably those favouring industrial capitalism. But
there tends to be general agreement that the disturbances of the seventeenth
century were to some appreciable extent reactions to economic crises and
depression, when growth of population and resources were often checked
with brutal suddenness, even though important intellectual and cultural
developments, especially in science and religion, took place.
8
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
Thus there is currently a general notion of an economic decline, or
depression, beginning in the first half of the seventeenth century, signalled
by exceptionally violent price fluctuations and intensified by prolonged
warfare, so that the century began 'and lived under the sign of depression,
contraction, deflation'. Baroque art has been seen as in part a manifesta-
tion, conditioned by this social and economic background; a highly
emotional escape from the miseries of the world which still reflects its
conflicts and suffering. It has also been claimed that late medieval pre-
occupation with death, the charnel house and the transitoriness of things
reappears as a leading motif of baroque. 1 However this may be, we should
at least note that stylistic analysis has always stressed the tensions, com-
plications and disjunctions of Mannerist art and architecture and con-
trasted them with the harmonious and integrated syntheses achieved by
baroque and its exuberance, or even self-confidence.
The most important general economic symptoms are held to be the
behaviour of prices; in comparison with the sixteenth century fluctuations
were more violent and the general trend ceased to rise, turning to stagna-
tion or decline. There has been considerable disagreement about when the
turning point, or reversal of trend, took place: 1619,1630,1640,1650 have
all been suggested, while some have preferred to see it as a cumulative
process, affecting different parts of Europe at different times and only
completed for all Europe after the mid-seventeenth century. There has
been even more disagreement about the nature and causes of the period's
political and social crises, 2 except that once again they are held to be
somehow related to economic difficulties and depression.
Many economic historians have come to believe that they can assess the
general trend of an economy by the study of prices. At one time the history
of prices seemed so fundamental and all-powerful a source of knowledge
that some historians were prepared to infer demographic trends from
them. Wiser counsels may now have prevailed, but there is still a belief,
mostly strongly held in France, that the study of prices can reveal a basic
structure whose long-term changes were largely independent of wars and
political events. Sometimes issues have been further confused by speaking
of price history as though it were quantitative. No doubt it aspires to be,
and a price series can be thought of as measuring something. The diffi-
culty may be to decide what it is measuring and what validity it has as
evidence. The accepted view is that a continuous rise in price is evidence
of economic growth. However, this depends upon a number of assump-
tions, not all of them verifiable, about the relationship of price movements
to growth in pre-industrial societies with large subsistence sectors. If we
1
J. Rousset, La Littirature de I'Age Baroque en France (1954), Chapter rv. For a sweeping
rejection see H. Peyre, 'Commonsense remarks on French Baroque', Studies in Seventeenth'
Century Literature, ed. J. J. Demarest (Ithaca, 1962), pp. 1-19.
1
E.g. T. H. Aston (ed.), Crisis in Europe 1560-1660 (1965).
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
say that in sixteenth-century Europe population and towns grew, along
with the volume of trade and shipping and the output of the textile
industries, more land was cultivated and so on; all these propositions
seem probable, but we cannot quantify them and produce continuous
series of statistics. Thus such innumerate propositions seem inferior in
value to price series, though these are often discontinuous, fail to cover
most products other than grain and only cover some areas. Price series,
especially when presented as index numbers, silver equivalents, or moving
averages, remain the basis for acts of faith, rather than quantitative
evidence about the development of the economy. Lack of other evidence
may force us to use them as a guide to the direction of economic change,
but we must recognize that radical criticism of such procedures is possible.
To take price series alone as revealing the fundamental pattern of economic
change and then fit other pieces of evidence into that pattern, or explain
them away, if they fail to fit into it, is a dangerous procedure which has
sometimes been a perhaps unconscious consequence of the first raptures
of the quest for une histoire tot ale.
It may be worth briefly categorizing some of the main economic inter-
pretations offered in recent years. This cannot do justice to the ingenuity
and learning of their authors, but may indicate their general characteris-
tics, even at the cost of over-simplification, (i) The explanations offered
by Chaunu 1 and Goubert 8 may be taken together since they both regard
detailed analyses of trends and cycles in prices as a fundamental guide.
Chaunu concentrates on international trade and Goubert on the economic
history of one region with particular attention to demographic factors;
both infer trends of production from indirect evidence, though to differing
extents, and both agree that the European economy had moved into
depression by about 1650. (2) Abel 8 and Slicher van Bath 4 regard price
trends as important, but are concerned with relating them to agricultural
production rather than with cyclical analysis and international trade.
They see the period from the mid-seventeenth century as the beginning of
a period of prolonged depression, contrasting with the expansion of the
sixteenth century, and characterized by depressed cereal prices, high real
wages, growth of pastoral farming and rural industry. (3) Romano 5 has
attempted a general explanation embracing prices, credit, monetary
factors, international trade, industrial and agricultural production, which
aims to show that a decisive break happened between 1619 and 1622,
1
P. Chaunu, Seville et VAtlantique, Vol. vm, 2, pt. ii; 'Le renversement de la tendance
majeure des prix et des activitfe au XVIIe siecle', Studi in Onore di A. Fanfani, vol. iv
(1962); 'Reflexions sur le tournant des annees 1630-50', Cahiersd'Histoire, vol. xn (1967).
* P. Goubert, Beauvais et le Beauvaisis de 1600 d 1730 (i960), pp. 493-512, 599-624.
• W. Abel, Agrarkrisen und Agrarkonjunktur in Mitteleuropa vom 13 bis zum 19 Jahr-
hundert (1935); Geschichte des deutschen Landwirtschaft (1962).
4
B. Slicher van Bath, The Agrarian History of Western Europe (1963).
e
R. Romano, 'Tra xvi e xvn secolo una Crisi Economics 1619-22', Rivista Storica
Italiana, Vol. LXXIV (1962), pp. 480-531.
10
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
turning the whole economy towards depression. (4) Baehrel 1 and Le Roy
Ladurie, 2 like Goubert, are concerned with particular regions, but have
produced more direct evidence of production and the movement of rents
and incomes and their relationship to prices. Both believe that their find-
ings have some validity beyond their particular regions and do not agree
with (1) and (3) that there was a decisive break before 1650.
Fifthly and finally there are various Marxist explanations. Some, while
still seeing the whole century as assisting structural changes from feudal-
ism to capitalism, allow that there were social and economic crises
especially in the first half of the century and that the whole period was
one of relative economic stagnation compared with the sixteenth century. 3
But some Polish historians, though agreeing that Poland and other coun-
tries declined economically, deny that this was true of the European
economy in general. 4 Topolski denies that there was 'a general economic
crisis in the sense of stagnation or recession caused by a slackening of
economic activity'. There was a diversity of developments in the various
European countries, so that the regression of the Polish economy was
partly due to its exploitation by more advanced countries such as the
Netherlands, England and Sweden. As Malowist puts it 'the border
regions became in some ways a kind of economic colony of the west',
which needed their grain, timber products and raw materials and found
them a valuable market for manufactured and colonial goods. This
exploitation was to the advantage of western mercantile and industrial
interests and of the Polish magnates at the expense of Polish towns,
artisans, merchants and peasants. Topolski explicitly denies that regres-
sion in Poland was due to war whose ravages after 1626 and still more
after 1648 only accelerated a process which had already begun and would
presumably have produced similar results eventually without the wars.
On the effects of war Topolski has the tacit or explicit support of almost
all the historians mentioned. Only Le Roy Ladurie allows considerable
importance to the fiscal pressures produced by war. Goubert considers
that war had only local and temporary effects on grain prices, always very
much less than those of bad harvests, so that it seems implied that war
had only relatively peripheral social and economic significance.
Chaunu's explanation has already had considerable influence. Because
of this and its great range in space, time and information, it is desirable to
give a fuller, though still highly schematic, account of it. He argues that
there was a chronic shortage of money in sixteenth- and seventeenth-
1
R. Baehrel, Une Croissance; La Basse-Provence Rurale (1961).
E. Le Roy Ladurie, Les Paysans de Languedoc (1966).
8
A. Klima and J. Macurek, 'La question de la transition du feudalisme au capitalisme',
xi Congres Int. des Sciences Historiques {i960), Rapports, Vol. rv, pp. 85-140; E.
Hobsbawm, "The General Crisis of the Seventeenth Centuiy', in Crisis in Europe, ed. Aston.
4
J. Topolski, 'La regression economique en Pologne XVIe-XVIIIe siecles', Acta
Poloniae Historica Vol. vn (1962); M. Malowist, "The development of the Baltic countries
in the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries', Econ. Hist. Rev. (1959).
2
II
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
2-2DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
century Europe which is a main reason for the progressive devaluation of
moneys of account (see Map i, below p. 87). Thus the silver arriving in
Seville eased the shortage of trading capital sufficiently to encourage
investment in trade and shipping. High prices encouraged economic
activity, but continuing inflation meant that a given quantity of silver
bought less, while expanding trade needed more working capital. For the
growth of trade to continue, the growth of the American mines' output
had to be faster than the rise in prices and the increase in the volume of
trade, since contemporary instruments of credit required bullion backing.
These conditions were met in the generation before 1600, but thereafter
silver shipments did not increase, they were roughly fifteen per cent lower
for the next two decades and fell increasingly steeply after 1625. The
volume of shipping used in Seville's trans-Atlantic trade reached its peak
1608-10, then, after a period of hesitations around a rather lower level,
turned decisively downwards after 1622 (see Fig. 3, below p. 90). Chaunu
considers that it is impossible to measure production directly so that
indices of the volume of activity on the great sea-routes are the best evi-
dence available. Seville's Atlantic trade was the motor of Europe's
economic expansion as it faltered and then lost power, so the trend of the
whole economy turned from expansion to stagnation or decline. The crisis
of the early 1620s was ultimately due to the failure to finance a growing
volume of trade. This in turn was due to failure to find new mines and new
populations to exploit. 'When the expansion of the Spanish Atlantic
economy ceased, Europe was plunged into a prolonged crisis from which
it did not emerge until the second great colonial expansion, that of the
Dutch, English and French colonial empires provided a new stimulus to
economic advance.'
Thus Chaunu is a theorist of the economic frontier, claiming that
' occupation of space appears to play the same role in the economies of the
fifteenth to eighteenth centuries which advances in technology play in
economies of the last hundred years'. The chronology of decline in Europe,
or of the change from growth to slower growth, differed by regions. In
Mediterranean Europe, Spain and Spanish America, it began around 1600,
but was later in the Netherlands, the Baltic, Brazil and the Indian Ocean.
Considering prices Chaunu finds, between the period of expansion and
that of contraction, an episode of varying length in different countries
when prices rise more slowly or move along a plateau. The decisive change
follows after two or three cyclical crises; it comes earlier in the west than
in the east and in the south than in the north, earlier on the coasts as
against the interior of the continent.
Although Chaunu's original assertion that international prices at
Amsterdam showed the direct and immediate effect of the decline of
Seville's trade has been accepted by some historians, it ought not to have
survived an actual inspection of the fragmentary price series cited from
12
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
Posthumus' History of Prices in Holland. The reversal of trend in Dutch
domestic prices came after 1650, or even 1660, thirty or forty years after
the decisive crisis at Seville. The causal connections between the two
remain obscure. Chaunu has rightly described the decline of Seville's
trade as the collapse of a monopoly, but he pays little attention to the
problem of whether the volume of Atlantic trade may not have increased
after 1620, or 1630, as it was redistributed to the benefit of the Dutch and
English. Estimates of Brazil's sugar production suggest that it doubled
between 1600 and 1650 and that most of the increase took place after
1630. Again Chaunu only pays attention to trade through the Sound in
order to accept Romano's view that its volume declined after the 1620s in
step with Seville's. As we shall see this view is mistaken and it is arguable
that the trade through the Sound was more important for Europe than
Seville's trade had ever been; it certainly employed an enormously greater
volume of shipping.
But before pursuing these questions, we should note that the interpreta-
tion of the seventeenth century as essentially a period of crisis and depres-
sion and that of long-term trends in grain prices as indices of economic
growth have both been challenged. Falling grain prices are not incom-
patible with growth, and the trends of the sixteenth and seventeenth cen-
turies could be explained by the bunching of good and bad harvests. 1
More generally Schoffer has suggested a different perspective for the
seventeenth century. 8 Until the eighteenth century a large proportion of
the population, more especially urban populations, were liable to suffer
severely as a result of comparatively slight dislocations. A bad harvest, an
epidemic, shortage of current coin, military looting and requisitioning
could have quite disproportionate effects. The purchasing power of the
population was so low that the prosperity of much trade and industry,
domestic and foreign, depended on the behaviour of a small elite. When
such precarious demands failed the whole economy might be shaken.
Fluctuation and instability were thus built into the structures of economic
and social life. Schoffer agrees that the seemingly limitless prospects of
expansion outside Europe of the sixteenth century were checked in the
seventeenth, and allows an agrarian recession after 1650. But he argues
that it is difficult to infer continuous economic crisis or severe depression
from the evidence of prices alone. He suggests that it is quite possible to
see the seventeenth century as one of growing economic stability and rising
real wages with declining silver imports contributing to that stability. As
population growth slackened there may have been not only more money
in circulation than in the sixteenth century, but also more per head of
population. Clearly there were tremendous shifts of economic and political
1
M. Morineau, 'D'Amsterdam a Seville, de quelle reality l'histoire des prix est-elle
le miroir?' Annales (1968).
1
I. Schoffer, 'Did Holland's Golden Age coincide with a period of Crisis?' Acta His-
toriae Neerlandica, Vol. 1 (1966).
13
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
power from southern to north-western Europe, but such shifts could also
make for greater stability, * . . . a period of solidifying and organizing.
Inside Europe prices, currency circulation became more settled and stable.
The state grew more than the economy.'
This is a reminder that the older conception of state-building as the
main subject of European history has not been entirely replaced by
studying economic and social structures and trends. The fragility of
demographic structures and those of international trade both suggest
that states had a limited amount of economic potential to exploit, quite
apart from limited means of influencing their economies in peacetime.
Thus bad harvests might have more serious or widespread direct effects
than war. Yet the indirect effects of war—prolonged fiscal pressures, the
prevalence of inducements to finance tax-farming and war rather than
trade, the persistent spread of disease and diversion of man-power—must
have had longer-term economic effects at least as important as those of
bad harvests and conceivably more important than those of the failure to
find new silver mines. A vigorously expanding economy could doubtless
afford more expensive and extensive wars than a declining one, but the
example of Spain suggests that the will to fight wars could multiply
economic difficulties. Again, countries whose wealth was based to a
greater extent on sea-power and maritime trade could profit by open or
undeclared wars. But it is difficult to see that Spain, allegedly the economi-
cally dominant country around 1600, was in a really strong position
in terms of wealth or growth of economic power between 1580 and
1620.
If we consider the impact of war on Europe in the sixteenth century,
Italy, Germany, the Netherlands, France, Spain, England and Scotland
were all seriously affected directly or indirectly between 1540 and 1559.
By 1559 the most serious results had been in the finances of all the states
concerned, but the most serious economic effects had probably been on
Italy. The Italian economy seems to have recovered and probably grew
after 1560, but from the 1560s wars, rebellions and civil wars increasingly
affected the Netherlands, France, Spain, Portugal, England and Ireland,
while Italy was less directly affected. From the 1590s the northern and
southern Netherlands and France recovered; trade and industry then
expanded to new levels. In France this ended in the 1630s and in the
Netherlands later. The economy which did not recover, but declined, was
that of Spain, or more particularly Castile, which had put most resources
into war. Although the economies of the Netherlands and England re-
covered from the crisis of the early 1620s, that of northern Italy did not:
there the Mantuan war at least assisted the demographic disaster of 1630. 1
It may seem superficial to suggest that the multiple effects of war were
enough to check economic expansion between the 1620s and 1660, but it is
1
See below, Chapter 11, p. 76.
14
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
worth noticing that the countries more protected from the full effects of
land war and more dependent on maritime trade, the northern Netherlands,
England and Portugal, did best. The exception here is Venice, but she
was involved in a crippling war for Crete, when her trade and sea-power
had already been declining for a generation.
For the moment economic hypotheses and analysis must be postponed
in order to consider some general social factors. One of the great virtues
of Abel, Slicher van Bath, Romano and Baehrel is that they emphasize the
primary importance of agriculture. Most historians would agree that both
population and agricultural production increased in Europe during the
sixteenth century and that probably the cultivated area increased,though
whether either substantially surpassed the peaks of the fourteenth century
is unclear.
This process of internal colonization slackened and in some areas prob-
ably ceased altogether in the seventeenth century. Abel and Slicher see this
check as happening after 1650, but Romano sees it as a product of the
crisis of the early 1620s, a view which is unpersuasive for Europe in
general. More plausibly he points to what was an almost universal
European phenomenon, the increasing pressures on rural populations by
owners of land and seigneurial rights. We may add that such pressures
were often increased and new burdens added as a result of the fiscal
necessities of states fighting wars.
Now the traditional elite of owners of land and seigneurial rights
had been the nobility, so it is worth attempting some crude approxima-
tions of their characteristics and behaviour as a social group. As a corol-
lary to the view that the building of nation-states was the essence of
European history, most historians in the first decades of this century saw
the emergence of 'new monarchies' allying themselves with the urban
middle classes, especially with lawyers and merchants, to attack the
traditional privileges of the nobles, discipline their unruliness and trans-
form them by introducing new men with a new tradition of serving the
state. What were the mercantilist policies which such monarchies pur-
sued, but basically those of medieval city-states adapted to the needs of
larger units, national states? Such concepts produced now-hackneyed
phrases about an apparently eternally rising middle class displacing an
effete and immemorial nobility and were later reinforced by the supposed
effects of the price revolution in promoting capitalism and eroding noble
incomes. Yet it is arguable that the monarchies of the sixteenth and
seventeenth centuries were more successful in eroding the privileges and
political power of their towns than those of their nobilities. The indepen-
dence and direct political power of towns declined everywhere in Europe,
except in the United Provinces and Switzerland.
The way in which men of the time regarded nobility reveals a number
15
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
of tensions and contradictions in their ways of thinking and acting. Their
conceptions also demand an effort of imagination from us. One great
modern assumption, or platitude, is that environment is all-important,
so that its dominance is often assumed by historians, sociologists and
journalists without troubling about evidence. The comparable concep-
tions of the past were often based on assumptions about heredity and
blood. Such conceptions now seem the more distasteful, because of their
associations with virulent racialism. Although there have been great
advances in knowledge of genetically determined factors in the history
of individuals, the possibility that such factors might have important
social consequences lacks the respectability and acceptability of environ-
mental assumptions. If we are uncomfortable with the notion of a nobility
of blood, so in fact were many people in the sixteenth and seventeenth
centuries. It conflicted obviously enough with Christian precepts and
there was a very strong medieval tradition, reinforced by much humanist
rhetoric, that the only true nobility was that conferred by virtue. Such
views had a certain practical convenience in so far as they justified the
ennoblement of new men and helped to explain what was already apparent
long before the sixteenth century: that many or most nobles were not the
direct heirs of Visigothic, Frankish, Norman, Sarmatian, or Trojan
nobles. The question as to what made a man noble also involved political
theory; there were sayings in many countries to the effect that a king
could make a lord or a knight, but not a gentleman. Before considering
views about the origin of nobility, we should notice that, though the word
noble was usually reserved for the peerage in England, and though in
Spain there was a distinction between nobles and hidalgos, in France,
Poland and other countries it included those without titles who in
England were called the gentry. Nobility will here be used in this com-
prehensive sense and it should also be remembered that the father's status
and privileges as a noble were inherited by all his sons, not only by the
eldest as in the English peerage.
Most jurists (and the continental treatises on nobility were almost
all by jurists or clergy) held that the effective origin of nobility was in
grants by public authority. This is put in its most extreme form by a com-
mentator on Louis XIV's commissions to verify noble titles: 'It is an
error to believe that Nature has anything to do with differences of status,
they are solely the work of the Prince and civil laws . . .' On the other
hand from 1578 the king of Poland could not make a commoner noble
without the assent of the Diet. Although Bartolus and his successors
accepted the general principle of origin in public authority, they also
acknowledged the theory of blood and what were still ideals and pre-
judices of social life in the seventeenth century, when they said that the
nobility of the newly ennobled was less perfect than that of older nobles
until four generations had passed and that the most perfect nobility was
16
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
that by immemorial prescription (a lineage without known origins
among commoners). Medieval tradition also defended the theory of blood
as well as that of virtue. The origin of gentility was in the blessing of
Noah; from Japheth, the blessed (incidentally the traditional ancestor of
Europeans), descended nobles and from Ham, the accursed, the base and
unfree. However there were those, like Raleigh, who held that nobles were
the descendants of those chosen by original popular compact and those,
like Bodin, who saw their origin in violence and oppression, while others
saw them as descendants of conquerors, such as the Franks. Moreno de
Vargas (Discursos de la Nobleza de Espaha, 1636) like many of his
predecessors quoted St Jerome—Nobilitates mundi nihil aliud esse quam
inveteratae divitiae. In their more realistic and historical moments
Spanish, French and Italian writers acknowledged that nobility was often
the result of wealth, rather than virtue or valour. Moreno remarked
(fo. 5iv) that those living in small places, where the other inhabitants
were poor, could use their power to escape taxes and thus become
accepted as nobles.
Before considering the legal privileges of nobles in more detail, it is
worth having some notion of their numbers. At the one extreme was
Biscaya where all the native-born were hidalgos, at the other the Grison
cantons where no noble privileges were recognized. The countries with
the highest proportion of nobles were probably Castile and Poland, each
with about 10% of the total population; Hungary may have approached
this proportion, it was certainly over 5%. In England taking a very wide
definition including lawyers, clergy, military and naval officers, Gregory
King's estimates suggest about 4% for c. 1688. A narrower definition
might perhaps give 2-3% c. 1660. In France c. 1700 it was perhaps 1%,
but must have been higher in 1650, though probably under 2%. In Pied-
mont c. 1700 it was some 1-5% and was almost certainly lower in the
early seventeenth century. It was probably under 1% in Lombardy, a
little over 1% in Verona and Naples, perhaps 4% in Imola; well under
1 % in Bohemia in 1618 and probably in Catalonia, it was 0-33 per cent in
Sweden around 1610. Thus a very numerous nobility was 5-10% of the
population. Countries with small nobilities had 1% or less, such as
Sweden, Bohemia, much of Italy and possibly much of Germany. France
and England occupy a middling position with somewhat under and over
2% respectively. 1 These percentages are very rough approximations, but
at least they indicate how numerically small this important element
was.
Another broad distinction is that between the mainly town-dwelling
nobilities of Castile and Italy and the mainly rural nobilities of England,
1
The Breton nobility is reckoned the most numerous of any French province and
numbered some 40,000 or more in 1668, about 2% of the estimated population. J. Meyer,
La Noblesse Bretonne au XVllle Siecle (1966), Vol. 1, pp. 55-6.
17
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
France, Germany and Poland. In Castile and Italy nobles dominated
most towns and through them the countryside, in Poland and Branden-
burg the nobles dominated the countryside and had reduced most of the
towns to economic and political insignificance. In France, England and
western Germany the towns retained a greater independent identity,
economically, socially and politically, though there was considerable
interaction between them and rural gentry. In all cases such relationships
were influenced by the character of royal authority and administration.
The numbers of nobles often varied considerably in different regions
of the same kingdom. In Castile they were more numerous in the north-
west than in Andalusia; in Poland they were 27 to 31 % of the population
in Masovia, in Little Poland 6 3 % and in Great Poland 76%. In Wales
the gentry were notoriously more numerous than anywhere in England
and Brittany had the same reputation in France. The more numerous the
nobles in a given region, the greater the number of poor ones, and the
fewer they were, the higher the proportion of rich ones.
This brings us to the other distinctive feature of nobilities as social
groups, their inclusion of many of the wealthiest and some of the poor in
their societies. The very poor nobles were a much smaller proportion of
those who were poor, than the rich nobles were of those who were wealthy
—the exception to the latter would be the United Provinces. While grada-
tions of wealth and status have seldom coincided exactly in any society,
the discrepancies in the seventeenth century could be very much greater
than in capitalist or communist societies today. There were many officials,
lawyers, merchants, even artisans and peasants who were wealthier than
appreciable numbers of nobles, except in countries like Bohemia and
Sicily where the number of nobles was small and where younger sons
could usually be provided for in the church. In all these societies there
was great emphasis on rights of precedence and many quarrels turned on
the order of seating in church, of receiving the sacraments, in leaving
church, in public processions and at banquets and so on. There were
hierarchies inside and outside the nobility. Within the nobility titles,
whether recently conferred or not, gave precedence, but among those with
the same title ancientness of lineage gave precedence and was generally
more esteemed than recently acquired titles.
All nobilities had to a greater or lesser extent a sense of common identity
and privileges which belonged to all their members, irrespective of titles
and wealth. Both were perhaps most strongly developed in Poland,
where there were no legal distinctions between higher and lower nobility
and there was insistence that legally all were equal (though even there the
wealthy came to be called nobiles and the poor generosi). The other
extreme is England where specific legal privileges were confined to peers
of parliament and descended only to the eldest male heir; the rest, how-
ever ancient their lineage or great their fortunes, were counted as gentry.
18
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
However they did still enjoy a measure of informally privileged treatment
in so far as the full rigour of the law was usually reserved for the poor and
humble. It was a common saying among French country gentlemen that
they were as noble as the king. The comparison seemed blasphemous to
Loyseau and other jurists, but it stressed a corporate pride and a desire for
equality within the nobility.
The most important privilege possessed by most nobilities, except the
English, was fiscal. The exemption of French nobles from the tattle and
the distinction between nobles and pecheros in Castile, the immunities
from taxation, or preferential rates of tax, belonging to nobles' fiefs and
demesnes in most countries, commemorated times when nobles were
supposed to have given personal military service. The fiscal privileges of
nobles were seriously eroded in France and Castile in our period, but the
general tendency for indirect taxes to grow was very marked all over
Europe. This was partly influenced by nobles' privileges, though also by
a general disinclination of the wealthy to see their incomes taxed and by
considerations of fiscal convenience. An important and long-lasting
attitude was transmitted beyond Europe by this conception of privilege.
Although the Council of the Indies had not favoured the creation of a
colonial nobility or sale of titles, the fact that the only pecheros, those
burdened with tributes and services, in Spanish America were Indians,
Negroes and mulattoes, meant that all white colonists were noble,
according to the definition of nobility in Castile. 1 It was altogether fitting
that Quevedo's El Buscdn, Pablo, whose consuming, but constantly
thwarted desire, was to be accepted as an hidalgo and obliterate his
tainted parentage, should end by sailing to the Indies.
In Poland nobles were subject to laws providing accusatory procedures
and milder penalties, instead of the inquisitorial procedures and severer
penalties of the law governing peasants and townspeople. Most nobilities
had special customs relating to the inheritance of property, especially
that in the form of fiefs: these varied between different regions, as did
customs of peasant or bourgeois inheritance. However there were special
legal devices creating unbarrable entails of land, such as the Spanish
mayorazgo, though by the seventeenth century this was not exclusively
used by nobles. In Sicily and the Roman lands such limitations by
fidei commissa had developed considerably by the sixteenth century,
though in most of Italy, France and the Habsburg lands the main growth
was after 1600, while in England the strict settlement developed after
1640. 2 Such devices were of most importance for comparatively large
landowners. But there were also older privileges belonging to all nobles.
1
R. Konetzke, 'La formaci6n de la nobleza en Indias', Estudios Americanos, Vol. ni
(1951), pp. 329-57-
• S. J. Woolf, Studi sulla Nobilita Piemontese neWepocd del'Assolutismo (Turin, 1963),
pp. 150-3 and below, p. 583.
19
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
In Spain and France and most other countries nobles were exempt from
billeting and could not be pressed as common soldiers, though they might
owe personal service to the prince. In most countries the habitual wearing
of swords was restricted to nobles and everywhere they claimed exemp-
tion from certain forms of punishment, particularly flogging and usually
hanging. In England there were no legal rules as elsewhere, but there
seems to have been strong conventional feeling that gentlemen ought to
be exempt from flogging. In Spain nobles were exempt from torture,
except when heresy and treason were involved; they could not be arrested
for debt, nor could execution be had on their houses, clothes, arms, or
horses. Spanish law, like that of most countries, granted these privileges
to foreign nobles who were residents.
In some ways the most remarkable privilege recognized almost every-
where, except in Germany and England, was that the bastard of a noble
was born noble, though he did not inherit his father's rank. After 1600 in
France his nobility required confirmation by letters patent which was
apparently never refused. This custom shows the strength of the notion
of blood transmitted in the male line. In France, the Netherlands, Italy,
Germany and Poland some religious houses and cathedral chapters
required entrants to prove noble descent for at least three or four genera-
tions. In theory in Spain places in the military orders could only be held
by nobles and in Castile in most towns half the places in the corporation
were reserved for nobles.
Two other general conventions with important, if contradictory, social
implications are the notion of derogation and its opposite, that certain
attainments or occupations automatically conferred nobility. All societies
accepted the general idea that there were some occupations whose nature
was so base and servile that they were incompatible with nobility, though,
unlike other countries, England did not have formal rules about this. This
idea goes back to Aristotle and the Greek notion of base and mechanical
occupations. The definitions varied, one of the crucial differences being
whether to trade as a merchant was incompatible with nobility, as it was in
France, Naples, Ferrara, Germany, the southern Netherlands, but not in
Spain, Venice, Genoa, Milan, Tuscany, Poland and England. Clearly
social conventions exerted pressure whatever rules the law laid down;
Spanish nobles were not famous as merchants, though in Seville many
were attracted into trade in the sixteenth century. The rules of derogation
again emphasize the notion of blood: children born before derogation
inherited nobility, a noble recovered his status when he ceased to practise
a degrading occupation. The ideal noble 'lived nobly' on the proceeds
of his land, not by gainful occupations. This ideal was acknowledged by
writers in Italy such as Alessandro Sardo (Discorsi, 1587). 1 Nearly every-
1
M. Berengo, Nobili e mercantt nella Lucca del Cinquecento (Turin, 1965), pp. 252-62,
gives a general sketch.
20
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
where it was agreed that retail trade and most handicrafts (with the famous
exception of glassmaking in France) were degrading.
This feeling about derogation was thought by contemporaries to be
strongest in France and more attempt was probably made to enforce the
rules there than in most countries, though the feeling was also very strong
in Germany and Naples. There are general complaints by Spanish writers
about the numbers of poor nobles in degrading occupations, though they
seem to have been more concerned about unworthy offices rather than
trades. But outside the Basque provinces the relaciones of 1575-80 show
that in New Castile the great majority of hidalgos did not 'plough or
traffic', though there were a few who worked on the land, and even fewer
as craftsmen, such as carpenters or cobblers. 1 Similar feelings existed in
England, but remained a social prejudice without legal sanctions: opinion
would have found the notion of a gentleman as a shopkeeper or craftsman
comically unacceptable, but not as a merchant or entrepreneur, though
they might be less esteemed in theory than landowners.
Agriculture presented difficulties in this context. There was a strong
classical tradition which extolled it as honourable, though in many
countries poor peasants were among the most exploited and least esteemed
members of society. In France and Spain it was allowed that a poor noble
might cultivate his own land, but not those of others. In Italy and Ger-
many this degree of tolerance seems to have been lacking, but in some
regions of Poland poor nobles were often working tenants or even
shepherds. Domestic service was another occupation where distinctions
were uneasy. By tradition waiting on a king or a great lord was honour-
able, but generally speaking by the seventeenth century such service
was coming to be more ceremonious than real, if it were still to be honour-
able. 2 In Poland foreigners were struck by the numbers of poor nobles
performing actual domestic services to magnates, while wearing their
hats and insisting on other marks of respect for their status. 3 German law
incorporated the conception of degrading occupations more strongly than
elsewhere: Unehrlichkeit and Anriichigkeit due to opprobrious trades,
including those of shepherds, millers, tailors, jailers, hangmen and
scavengers, excluded men from all judicial procedures and meant that
they, their children, or even grandchildren, were excluded from other
crafts.
If some writers, like Gutierrez de los Rios, 4 arrived at the somewhat
unexpected conclusion that agriculture was a liberal art, not everyone in
Spain accepted their seemingly more obvious contention that painting
1
N. Salomon, La Campagne de Nouvelle Castile d la Fin du XVIe Siecle (1964), pp. 290-1.
' E.g. C. Loyseau, Traite des Ordres . . . (1610), p. 50, para 34.
' A. Guagninus, Sauromatia Europea (1578) in Respublica . . . Regni Poloniae (Elzevir,
1628), pp. 263-4.
* Noticia General Para la Estimacidn des las Artes y de la Manera en que Se conocen las
liberates de las que son Mecdnicas y Serviles.. .. (Madrid, 1600), book rv, c. 3.
21
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
and sculpture belonged to the same category. In 1563 the statutes of the
Order of Santiago classified painters as 'vile and mechanical'. Architects,
helped by their connections with the science of fortification, gained
greater acceptance as an honourable profession beyond Italy in the
seventeenth century; this was so even in Germany, despite hostility to
their mechanical associations with masons, which Count Rochus von
Linar had experienced. 1 But much older and deeper tensions arose from
questions about the privileges that university degrees and legal offices
should confer. These seemed to go against the traditional conception that
the noble's true vocation was that of arms. However, Bartolus and his
successors had insisted that doctors of laws acquired nobility; the title-
page of Moreno's book has the slogan Las Letras y las armas dan
Nobleza Conservala el Valor y la Riqueza. Indeed Moreno says that all
doctors, masters and licentiates of the universities of Salamanca, Valla-
dolid, Alcala de Henares and Bologna enjoyed the full privileges of
nobility, while those of other universities had such privileges, except the
fiscal immunities. 2 There was some dispute as to the nobility of doctors in
France, but it was generally recognized in some form—in Provence it was
transmitted to their children, in Dauphine and Normandy it was only
personal. 3 Most cathedral chapters in Germany accepted doctorates as
the equivalent to proofs of nobility. The English accepted university
graduates as gentry. In many countries nobles enjoyed preferential treat-
ment at universities and were often excused part of the requirements for
degrees. Although a good many nobles in addition to those intending to
enter the church did attend universities and colleges, there was hostility
between letrados and robe, the nobilities of privilege and office in Spain
and France, on the one hand, and the nobles of lineage. This is equally
apparent in Moreno's diatribes and in Loyseau's 'the insolence of minor
country gentlemen is so great... that it is impossible to live in peace with
t h e m . . . they are birds of prey whose only occupation . . . is to live off
others and to persecute each other'. He includes graduates and officers of
justice and finance in the Third Estate, remarking that officers formerly
came from the nobility as in Rome, but that French nobles 'despise
letters and embrace idleness '.* This has yet to be confirmed by systematic
research, though some French nobles spoke as though knowledge of
Latin was almost a derogation. The French seem to have gone further than
most countries in providing special academies for nobles which concen-
trated on fencing, riding, dancing, writing and elementary mathematics
applied to surveying and fortification, without any Latin. Paradoxically
this owed something to a humanist tradition, supported by Vives and
1
E. Hempel, Baroque Art and Architecture in Central Europe (1965), pp. io, 28, 31.
Fo. 16. Fray Juan Benito Guardiola's Tratado de Nobleza . . . (Madrid, 1595) does not
seem to allow this to graduates of other universities.
» G.-A. de la Roque, Traite de la Noblesse . . . (Rouen, 1678), Chapter 42.
4
Loyseau, Traite'... pp. 57, 95-9.
22
1
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
others, which stressed the educational value of the mechanical arts. Most
nobles in Poland, Austria, Hungary and many parts of Germany must
have known Latin, since it was an officially spoken, as well as written
language, for many lay purposes. In general the more really poor nobles
there were, the more numerous ill-educated ones were likely to be.
Even in France the situation was more complex than Loyseau's re-
marks might imply. Some high robe families had genuine noble origins,
they all usually owned land and seigneurial rights so that they had com-
mon interests with the rural nobles. In Bavaria the lesser nobility became
more intermingled with the urban patriciates; many families became
office-holders in the court and administration of the dukes and electors
and some rose by this means into the ranks of the higher nobility. 1
Nevertheless there was a general tendency from the sixteenth century
onwards for the older nobility to try to close their ranks and enforce
distinctions between themselves and the newly ennobled. In France this
took the form of sweeping demands for abolition of sale of office and
reservation of certain offices, or a proportion of them, for nobles. These
were unsuccessful, but from 1600 onwards the crown did make increasing
efforts to check usurpation of noble status, though these were often
unpopular with the lesser nobles. In Spain there was a hardening of
attitudes against the newly privileged so that by the mid-seventeenth
century those without noble parents and grandparents were excluded
from the military orders and from the municipalities of Madrid and some
other cities where there was a monopoly of government by nobles. 2
In Westphalia the urban patriciate of the larger towns had been very little
behind the lesser nobility in social esteem and had intermarried with
them in the fifteenth century. By the later sixteenth century there was a
marked cleavage between them, with the nobles attempting to exclude the
patricians from the Landtag and the chapter of Munster. 3
While most of the pressure in these directions came from the poorer
nobles, it was the rich nobles, the magnates (not all of them from old
families), who were most successful in maintaining or increasing their
power and wealth in most countries during the seventeenth century. Rules
about derogation hurt poor nobles by restricting their choice of occupa-
tion, without inconveniencing rich ones, just as special laws of entail
were only of use to those with adequate lands to settle. The most impor-
tant and universal inheritance of poor nobles were the conceptions of
blood, lineage and honour. In practice their best means of enforcing some
sort of solidarity and equality among all nobles, whatever their rank or
wealth, was through notions of honour, enforced by the duel. A noble
1
F. W. Euler, in Deutscher Adel 1430-1555, ed. H. Rdssler (Darmstadt, 1965), pp. 91-2.
Dominguez Ortiz, La sociedad espaHola en el sigh XVII, Vol. 1 (Madrid, 1963), pp.
195. 258.
• G. Theuerkauf in Deutscher Adel, pp. 160-71.
8
23
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
could only refuse a challenge and still preserve his reputation, if the chal-
lenger was not noble. The rise of the duel accompanied the decline of the
tournament. In the thirteenth century the tournament had been realistic,
bloody and relatively cheap. A poor knight could compete and make his
name. Fifteenth- and sixteenth-century tournaments were so expensive
as to become largely the preserve of princes, their favourites and mag-
nates. The duel was cheap and deadly and put the poor noble on a
genuine equality with the rich. A man could make a reputation (however
dubious in the eyes of moralists and clerical or lay authority) with his
sword. Buckingham may have been the last practitioner of the tourna-
ment in England and it seems to have died out all over Europe in this
period. Manege, the management of great horses, was the fashionable
conspicuous expenditure of the rich, usually requiring indoor riding
schools; its relevance to warfare is dubious, but it has left its mark on
equestrian portraits.
The duel on the point of honour seems to have developed in France
from the early sixteenth century and produced a distinctive code which
had absolute force in controlling the behaviour and reputation of nobles.
It is generally thought to have originated in Italy and clearly owed much
to the rules about duels and challenges between soldiers which receive
so much attention in treatises on martial law. By the later sixteenth cen-
tury duelling was a distinctive feature of the behaviour of nobles all over
Europe. Francis I and Henri II had tried to control duels by reviving
judicial combat, Henri IV by prohibiting them, unless they had explicit
permission, while his successors tried to prohibit them absolutely, as did
James I in England and the Spanish Kings. A chorus of jurists and divines
supported such prohibitions, which were particularly ineffective in this
period, though duels became less frequent in Spain and France in the later
seventeenth century.
Yet Bodin had said 'the Prince can dispose of a subject's life and goods,
but has no power over his honour'. Here we have a code of conduct
which was in direct defiance of the rules laid down by church and state
and of course with the tradition which identified true nobility with virtue.
If there is an impression that more duels were fought in France than else-
where, the conception of honour was certainly of the greatest importance
in Spanish life and literature. It is convenient to concentrate on Spain,
because the conception has been much analysed there, but this does not
imply that it was unimportant elsewhere. '"Honour" and "dishonour"
depend upon the consciousness of the individual; "fame" and "infamy"
upon that of society.' Honour is equated with life and dishonour with
death, for infamy is a social death. Hence the essential proposition of the
code of honour is that honour is more valuable than life, or that life
without honour is impossible. Hence the obligation to accept any chal-
lenge from an appropriate challenger, to punish verbal insults, give the
24
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
lie. To refuse is to accept infamy or social death. Yet, as Caro Baroja
points out, there were Castilian proverbs which took a different line:
'most honour, most pain', 'honour alone is a poor inheritance', 'between
honour and wealth, the last is first'. 1 (We may add there were similar
English and French proverbs.) A further complication in the Spanish
situation was limpieza, the idea of being dishonoured by the possession
of Moorish or Jewish blood, or by an ancestor condemned by the In-
quisition. Although it is true that the imposition of the rules about
limpieza was popular, since many peckeros were 'pure', while many
noble families were 'tainted', it can also be seen as a move by poor
nobles against the rich ones whose blood was more likely to be 'tainted'.
The duty to kill to defend honour or avenge dishonour was a major
theme in Spanish plays, including those of the highly religious Calderon.
This and the fact that the plays as printed and performed were licensed
and approved by the church has led some to argue that the code expressed
in the plays was accepted in ordinary life and approved by casuists in
dealing with actual conduct. But it can be shown that the essential pro-
position that honour is more important than life was rejected by many
casuists, though they agreed that honour and reputation were more
valuable than property. The dramatists themselves may have used the
imperatives of this code as a convention of proven popularity with their
audiences rather than as a serious account of real life. 2 Most authorities
condemned duelling, but some Spanish and Italian casuists thought it
could be justifiable and at least one Spanish casuist accepted the right of
nobles to kill commoners who persisted in repeating insults to their
honour. 3 Loyseau savagely regarded the propensity of French nobles
towards duelling as an 'attribute of divine providence so that as in nature
the most dangerous animals exterminate each other so does our nobility
which is not only the most valiant, but also the most violent and insolent
in the world'.
Nobles had to be prepared to use force against each other in order to
live honourably and to some extent their living and status might depend
on the use of force against others. If their status and privileges were
generally acknowledged by the rest of society, poor nobles were more
likely to have to assert their claims to recognition and precedence per-
sonally, while rich ones could leave it to their clients or servants. To a
greater or lesser extent most societies connived at the revenging of sup-
posed insults to nobles by commoners, whether to the point of murder as
sometimes happened in Spain or Prague, or the beatings or mutilations
by noblemen's servants with which French writers might be threatened
1
J. Caro Baroja, 'A historical account of several conflicts', in Honour and Shame, ed.
J. Peristiany (1965), pp. 81-137.
* C. A. Jones, 'Honour in Spanish Golden Age Drama', Bull. Hispanic Studies, Vol. 35
(1958), pp. 199-210.
* Dominguez Ortiz, La sociedad espaHola . . . , p. 286.
25
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
and which occasionally happened. But the naked use of force in order to
secure power and livelihood were still part of the way of life of many
nobles in south-western France, whether in leading peasants against tax-
collectors, or maintaining possession of disputed lands and levying
illegal dues. 1 Alliances between bandits and nobles in order to exploit
peasants and travellers had been traditional in sixteenth-century Cata-
lonia, in the papal states, Naples and Sicily. Such habits died out in Cata-
lonia after about 1618 and among the Roman nobility in the late sixteenth
century, but they continued in Naples and Sicily. There it was not just a
matter of poor nobles sharing profits with bandits, but of the use of out-
laws and bandits to intimidate communes and their elected officials; if
need be, murdering those who resisted the illegal demands of a local
magnate.
Fynes Moryson, whose personal observations were made in the 1590s,
provides some comparative impressions of the incidence of violence in
the social life of nobles. He considered that among the Germans few were
killed or seriously hurt in combat, owing to their peaceable nature and
lack of taking offence. This he contrasted not only with France, but also
with England, where men 'being most impatient of reproaches and the
law giving ridiculous satisfactions for injuries by word and all wrongs,
excepting maimes, it hath been accounted a disgracefull course to seeke
remedy that way and most injuries have commonly been revenged by the
Sword in single combat. . . \ Because the law again gave no satisfaction
for words, quarrels and brawls were frequent in Holland. He found few
single combats in Italy, the original home of duelling, as premeditated
murder for revenge was more usual. In Prague' . . . manslaughters com-
mitted by Gentlemen against strangers and those of meaner condition
are much more frequent [than in Germany] because Gentlemen can only
be judged in Parliament [the Estates] which are not often called and are
then tried by Gentlemen who are partiall in the cause and commonly
acquit or delude Justice by delaies . . .'. The greatest contrast was in
Switzerland, where the law was severe against brawls and provided satis-
factions so that even among soldiers there were few murders;' all bystanders
are bound to keep the peace and a man who kills another can only escape
capital punishment if he can prove self-defence'. Nevertheless the wearing
of swords was more widespread than in most countries.
Another comparison which rightly interested Moryson was that
between enjoyment of hunting rights in different countries. He considered
that there was more hunting of deer and more hawking in England and
Scotland and that the English gentry had many more parks for keeping
deer than elsewhere in Europe. He rightly pointed out that in most parts
of Germany 'all Hunting is forbidden to any but absolute Princes in their
1
Y.-M. Bercd, 'La Noblesse rurale . . . sous Louis XIII', Annales du Midi (1964), pp.
44-59.
26
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
own territories', except hunting of 'hurtful beasts', such as foxes and
wolves, 'only in some parts the Hunting of Hares is permitted to Gentle-
men, as in Saxony... '.In Denmark nobles could only hunt 'in their own
grounds of inheritance', elsewhere only the king could hunt. The higher
nobility in Bohemia had full huntingrights over their lands. There, in Saxony
and other parts of Germany, the unauthorized killing of deer and wild
boar, even though they were spoiling crops, was punishable by death, while
he claimed that in Austria the lords' leave was needed to kill sparrows.
In Flanders nobles had the right to hunt hares, pheasants and partridges,
whereas in Holland and Friesland partridges and seafowl were taken by
the vulgar. Moryson thought Italy unsuited to hunting and saw very
little going on there and in Poland. Although there was a great deal in
France, they hunted in the open fields and had few parks, while only
great men could afford to keep hawks. Moryson only saw hawking once
in Poland and once in Bohemia 'never ells . . . I did in any place see any
exercise either of Hunting or Hawking which so frequently offers itself
to passengers neere the high wayes of England' which . . . 'hath more
fallow Deer than all Europe. No Kingdom in the World hath so many
Dovehouses.' Again the great exception is Switzerland where 'Hunting
. . . is free for all men, they having few gentlemen . . . In like manner all
sorts of men have freedom to fish in all rivers, brooks or lakes, being in
the Territories of their particular Cantons or Commonwealths. And like
freedom have they to hawke and take all kinds of birds by nets and like
Arts . . . u . In fact the rights of non-nobles to hunt in France had been
finally abolished in the sixteenth century, except in the case of wolves
and foxes. In England property qualifications for keeping dogs, ferrets
or nets and for using guns or bows for hunting were imposed in 1606 and
penalties on poaching were increased.
Moryson makes other observations which, though doubtless subjec-
tive, are of general interest. He found the 'French use great liberty of
conversation and small reverence to superiors', despising English gentle-
men for wearing great lords' liveries 'even for a festival day' and giving
them so much deference. French visitors in their turn were struck by the
ceremoniousness of the English court, compared with that of Henri IV.
Moryson remarked that in English inns gentlemen expected to eat in their
chambers or sit at table only with gentry, whereas in Germany commoners
sat at the same table, but lower down, receiving poorer service for the
same price. He thought the Germans used their wives as servants, but did
not 'exact respect from their children' who 'shake hands with them
instead of raising their hats and asking blessing on their knees as in
England'. He also marvelled that
1
Moiyson, An Itinerary (1617), pp. 85,148,151,169,200,221-2, 261, 287; Shakespeare's
Europe, ed. C. Hughes (1903), pp. 159, 354-5, 367, 387, 397, 468; Corpus Christi Coll.,
Oxford, MS 94, fos. 215, 538-9, 544, 646.
27
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
the Gentlemen howsoever sometimes learned yet proudly despise Graduates of the
University, no less or more than Merchants which I found not onely by common
practice, but also by my private experience. For conversing with a Gentleman, he
perceiving I spake Latin better than he thought became a Gentleman, asked me
how long I did study in the University... [and] did after esteem me as a Pedant...
Moryson wondered that, despite 'Gentlemen first rising by learning,
warfare and traffic, they only judge warfare worthy to raise and continue
Gentlemen . . . ' . We might guess that these were the prejudices of lesser
and poorer nobles. For it is certain that many Austrian and German
nobles were well educated and that they had a distinctive culture based
on knowledge not only of Latin, but also of modern Romance languages.
It has been said that the basic works of that culture were Cicero's De
Officiis, Petrarch's Canzoniere and Ariosto's Orlando Furioso and that the
dominant tone of European culture derived from the patronage and
tastes of nobles and courts, to which non-noble readers and writers
largely conformed, or aspired. 1
While there is much truth in this, yet proverbial wisdom and long-
standing ethical and religious traditions contradicted or were sceptical
of noble values. However, though literature, art and proverbial lore may
mostly reflect noble or peasant ways of life, the lack of much explicit
literary concern with the ways of life of bourgeois and artisans does not
show that these did not have distinctive values and cultures of their own.
The evangelists of both Protestantism and the Counter-Reformation dis-
approved of popular magical superstitions and of both popular and
noble tastes for bloody and adulterous chivalric romances. The first great
picaresque novel Guzman de Alfarache was a deliberate moralizing alter-
native to these romances, 'a "truthful" literature in response to the ex-
plicit demands of the Counter-Reformation'. 2 Yet if the moral intention
wore thin in Aleman's successors the success of the new genre did not in
fact transform popular taste: 'novels of chivalry... were reprinted in the
form of chap-books, until very near our own times and . . . especially in
the south of Spain . . . were the favourite reading of drovers and farm
hands . . .'. In France chap-books based on the Charlemagne romances
were also a staple of popular reading throughout the seventeenth and
eighteenth centuries. Such works presented a mythical medieval society
and were almost exclusively concerned with the deeds of kings and nobles
and a perpetual crusade against the infidel. French popular literature
presented a world of myth and miracles, of saints, giants and magic which
was alien not only to the general trend of intellectual development
among the learned, but also to the humanistic elements in the ideal and
actual education of nobles. Spanish popular literature seems to have been
1
O. Brunner, Adelines Landleben und Europaischer Ceist (Salzberg, 1949); Neue Wege
der Sozialgeschichte (GQttingen, 1956), 'Osterreichische Adelsbibliotheken'.
1
A. A. Parker, Literature and the Delinquent (Edinburgh, 1967), p. 22.
28
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
peculiar in that influence of oral tradition was much stronger on 'official
literature' than in France or England, particularly on verse plays. More
Spanish chap-books were probably in verse and they certainly included
more poems from well-known writers and more adaptations of their plays
and stories. 1
Thus, small as the numbers of nobles were in proportion to the rest of
the population, attitudes deriving from their culture not only influenced
the literature and art of the educated but also that accessible to the un-
educated. If Corneille's plays have heroes who embodied stoic and
chivalric virtues of ideal nobles, supported by pride and the quest for
glory, they also share with the chap-books' romances the justification of
noble rebellions against injustice and tyranny. But however widespread
its influence this culture, sympathetic to the ideals of the nobility, did not
enjoy an undisputed monopoly; the Christian, medieval and humanistic
traditions all had elements which were hostile to its assumptions and
which still survived in the writings of divines, jurists and moralists.
Moreover the economic interests and political aspirations of great and
poor nobles might differ considerably. The conventions and legal rules
about derogatory occupations, personal service, or living nobly, also
differed appreciably between different countries. The ideals of the nobility,
tacitly and explicitly expressed in their own behaviour and culture, might
conflict with many of the realities of everyday life, but they also strongly
influenced the cultural ideals of much of the rest of the population, espe-
cially through plays and chap-books. Such conflicts and contrasts grew
stronger as a result of royal policies and fiscal necessities. There was
pressure to reduce noble fiscal privileges and excesses of duelling, but
more important and more general were the sales of titles and privileges
of nobility and of royal rights of jurisdiction and taxation over local
communities. There was an almost universal tendency for great nobles,
who included some men or families recently risen to greatness, to con-
solidate or maintain their power as a group and for lesser ones to become
more dependent upon serving kings or magnates for their survival, less
able to pursue effectively and independently their own political and social
aims.
The European nobilities were economically heterogeneous groups of
diverse origins. Although all accepted ideologies which proclaimed that
they ought either to be closed groups, or at worst groups which co-opted
new members according to strict rules, reality was different. In most
countries many, perhaps most noble families had been recruited by
prescription, often in defiance of legal rules, and such recruitment con-
tinued. This produced paradoxical situations; perhaps the most extreme
1
Baroja, 'A historical account...', in Honour and Shame, pp. 113, 116; R. Mandrou,
De la culture populaire au rje et i8e siecles (1964); E. M. Wilson, Some Aspects 0/ Spanish
Literary History (Oxford, 1966).
29
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
was that in Poland, where the king could not create new nobles without
the consent of the Diet, yet the Diet made no serious attempt to control
or prevent recruitment by prescription so that by 1630 thousands of cases
of usurpation of nobility were alleged. 1 It was in absolutist France that the
strictest efforts were made to control the acquisition of nobility by pres-
cription. These were particularly vigorous from the late 1650s and
the lesser nobility of some regions attempted organized protest and
resistance. The state was always the most serious potential or actual
competitor of the nobles, whether in trying to assert its own monopoly
of violence and power, or in competing with them in exploiting rural
populations and in some cases urban ones. The divisions of the spoils
and power and their stability naturally varied in different countries. The
forces affecting policies and political arrangements also varied, but every-
where, except in Holland and Zeeland in the northern Netherlands, the
Swiss cantons and the duchy of Wurttemberg, the nobility remained an
important social and political group. In most of Europe, whether under
limited or absolute monarchies they still formed the most important group
in terms of prestige. But everywhere there were other self-consciously
organized social groupings, even in the aristocratic republics of Venice
and Poland.
By risking insecure generalizations and sweeping comparisons, we may
be able to see some of the distinctive common features of European
societies. In sixteenth- and seventeenth-century China there were also
considerable discrepancies between the legal rules and cultural conventions
concerning the status of occupations and reality; for instance mercantile
wealth and military success were in theory little esteemed, but in fact gave
access to power and prestige. The privileged elite, the shen-shih, with then-
wives and children, were perhaps two to three per cent of the population
in the seventeenth century and were recruited by examination, purchase
and success in military affairs. Their privileges were conferred because
they were actual or potential officials, but for the great majority they
were not hereditary, though the sons of the privileged and wealthy had a
much better chance of acquiring privileged status than those of com-
moners. Their variety of origins, great discrepancies in wealth and power
and the fact that many were landowners make the shen-shih roughly com-
parable as a privileged group with the European nobility in the inclusive
sense used here. Although social mobility measured in terms of access of
commoners to official positions was less in seventeenth-century China
than under the early Ming, it may well have been greater than in Europe
in the sense that there may have been more opportunities, though still
very limited ones, to rise from the peasantry. In fact there is no informa-
tion yet available either about rates at which commoners entered Europe's
1
J. Bardach, in Gouvernis et Gouvernants, Recueils de la Soc. J. Bodin, Vol. xxv (1965),
p. 281.
30
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
privileged groups, or about downward mobility, remotely comparable
to that for China. 1 But it is clear that there was considerable upward and
downward mobility among European nobilities, especially in the larger
ones such as Poland's. If downward mobility was facilitated by lack of
primogeniture in China (though clan custom did not always favour equal
partition), extinction in the male line was facilitated by lack of polygamy
in Europe. The most important differences seem to be in the relationships
of social groups to the state, the extent to which they could acquire power
and prestige independently of the state and the extent to which the state
apparatus could control the life of communities.
If access to the centre of power may have been more open in China, the
government exercised a more monolithic monopoly of power and pro-
pagated a more uniform officially approved culture. There may be dis-
tortion through concentrating on the intentions and working of govern-
ments of China, where 'history was written by officials for officials' so
that the sources concentrate on the workings of bureaucracy rather than
of society. Nevertheless there were many centres of power in Europe,
simply because there were many states, while within each state there were
groups corporately conscious of rights, either specifically conceded by or
customarily entrenched against it. Conflicting explanations were avail-
able; for some theorists of natural law, like Suarez, and for all defenders
of absolutism the authority of communities derived from the state, for
Althusius and his followers the state was a federation or even confedera-
tion of communities. In China, towns were primarily the seats of admini-
stration by officials of a central government which exercised more control
than the most absolute European monarchy. European towns usually
enjoyed a more indirect relationship with central authorities which recog-
nized their corporate privileges and identities. If their independence had
generally declined since the Middle Ages and if their militias were now
unable to defend them in serious warfare, they were still important for
preventing popular disturbances and the excesses which the passage of
friendly troops inflicted on the countryside. Even in absolute monarchies
towns were often still left with discretion as to the means by which they
raised some of the taxes imposed. In the Standestaat as it survived in the
Habsburg lands, most of Germany, Poland and the southern Netherlands,
administration was shared between officials some of whom were only
responsible to the ruler and others to the estates. The tutelage of more
centralized administrations over local communities was growing generally,
particularly in France, but it never entirely effaced their traditions and
in many ways local oligarchies grew stronger. The status of village com-
1
W. Eberhard, Social Mobility in Traditional China (Leiden, 1962); R. M. Marsh, The
Mandarins; The Circulation of Elites in China 1600-1900 (Glencoe, 1961); Ping-ti Ho, The
Ladder of Success in Imperial China (1962); J. M. Menzel (ed.), The Chinese Civil Service
(Boston, 1963).
31
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
munities varied, but they often did enjoy some corporate identity,
recognized by rulers and seigneurs, though usually much less effective
independence than towns, except in some mountainous regions. Some
were controlled and exploited by towns, especially in Spain, Italy and
Switzerland, though almost everywhere many more were controlled by
seigneurs. For fiscal reasons higher authorities found it convenient to
deal with village assemblies, or elected representatives, who could bind
the community by their acts. Village syndics and assemblies survived as
legal entities over much of Europe. (They existed in some English
villages, but not as a general pattern fostered by central authority as in
France, though they did become generalized in the township meetings
of New England.) Their recognition was due mainly to their serving
the convenience of others, but such institutions also served their mem-
bers' purposes in regulating use of commons, waste, fallows, disposal
of garbage and so on and, if need be, by collective litigation and
agreements.
Chinese local government was highly centralized and left little discre-
tion or initiative to officials: in theory the same was true of local finances,
though in fact the fees and perquisites of officials were not effectively con-
trolled. The non-official privileged elite were the spokesmen of local
interests, but they had no legally defined role. Indeed they were forbidden
to form associations, meddle in administration, petition on behalf of
commoners or to publish essays or choose personal names without
official approval. Despite sale of privileges, there were no checks on the
government's power to degrade men from privileged status and such
penalties were much more frequent in Chinese than in European law.
Urban gilds, clans, village headmen and meetings performed important
functions with direct or tacit official approval in regulating social life,
especially in arbitrating to settle all kinds of disputes and applying local
customs, helped by general reluctance to resort to official courts. Villages
and towns did not form collective legal entities, created by individuals
acting together and recognized by the administration, though they might
have informal arrangements for settling their affairs, as long as the
government did not choose to intervene. There were no procedures for
challenging official decisions within the rules of law acknowledged by the
government, as there were in European absolutist states, where litigation
about conflicts of jurisdiction, execution of decrees and the assessment
of taxes was frequent. In China the check on official action came from
within the administration through the censorate, not through litigation;
there '. . . the legal system was a system of control (though there were
gaps in this) and the distribution of rights was only secondary and
incidental'. European courts often performed administrative and police
functions in this period, but in China judicial functions were part of the
repressive duties of administrators; even for the privileged groups 'legal
32
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
involvement was something to be feared and avoided' and there was
extreme reluctance wholly to acquit a defendant. 1
From the sixteenth century Christianity became less plausible in its
universalist aspirations, more ambiguous and contradictory in its public
prescriptions, not only because Christians were becoming identified with
Europeans, but also because of the splits caused by the Reformation.
Protestants and Catholics shared a common and continuing theological
and intellectual inheritance, incorporating the old methods of Aristotelian
scholasticism, together with newer ones of humanistic rhetoric and of
critical or even comparative study of Roman law. Within the Catholicism
of the Counter-Reformation there were conflicting views of man's place
in the world; the Christian stoicism of Lipsius exalted human reason and
ancient wisdom which Berulle condemned as delusions and pride of
those naturally wretched, ignorant and sinful. The religious orders
themselves were divided by choices between hierarchical and missionary
conceptions of the church. The growth of scepticism, the ' new Pyrrhon-
ism', in the later sixteenth century did not involve any immediate breach
with religion, since it mainly provided another weapon in the apologetics
of relevation. Nevertheless in so far as it was used publicly to attack
rational theology and support fideism, or privately by libertins to put all
revealed religions on an equal footing, it did face even the most orthodox
with intellectual choices. Thus long before the 'new philosophy' had
provided a new cosmology, still less had much impact on education or the
universities, European scholars were forced to consider alternative ways
of interpreting their religion and legal and political institutions and had
to choose between alternative methods of organizing and interpreting
knowledge. If this was true within the major religious confessions or
within the officially approved universities of one country, within European
culture taken as a whole the available choices and possible conflicts were
naturally much greater.
The monolithic character of Chinese culture can doubtless be exag-
gerated and the Taoist tradition had enduring importance as an unofficial
alternative. Nevertheless the official culture and ideology appear to have
been much more successful in presenting universal and unambiguous
precepts and interpretations, public discussion and criticism of which was
more severely restricted and politically dangerous, though a private life
of religious contemplation or intellectual dissent might be possible. The
seventeenth century saw in the' School of Han Learning' the development
of 'a discipline of historical and textual criticism' which led to the rejec-
tion of large parts of the official canonical writings' as being interpolated,
1
E. Balazs, Chinese Civilization and Bureaucracy (1964); Ch'tt T'ung-Tsu, Local Govern-
ment in China under the CM ing (Harvard, 1962); Kung-Chuan Hsiao, Rural China; Imperial
Control in the Nineteenth Century (i960); S. van der Sprenkel, Legal Institutions in Manchu
China (1962), p. 128; D. Bodde and C. Morris, Law in Imperial China (Harvard, 1967),
p. 197.
33
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
altered, not genuine, or intentionally falsified'. There was also a great
deal of colloquial literature which was regarded officially and with
justification as subversive. The common denominator of these move-
ments of criticism and reform and of their immediate failure has been
seen as anti-absolutism. 1 The ideal of official Confucianism seemed to
see the state as indistinguishable from society.
This continued domination by a rigidly defined official ideology can be
seen partly as a response to the needs of controlling and colonizing a vast
area whose populations were originally ethnically and culturally distinct,
and whose speech and environments were still very different.
The desire to unite Europe in some similar fashion had not entirely
vanished by the seventeenth century. If after 1600 the greatest successes
eventually went to small states, the United Provinces, Sweden and ulti-
mately England, so that to us this seems a distinctive feature of the
century, it was not only Utopian advocates of universal monarchy, such
as Campanella, or those with millenarian expectations, such as Comenius,
who foresaw a very different future for Europe. At a less visionary level,
from the Battle of the White Mountain down to at least the Peace of
Prague (1635) the possibility of a refashioning of the empire under the
emperor's effective domination and of a Habsburg hegemony over
continental Europe seemed far greater than at any time since Charles V's
victories at Pavia or Miihlberg. There were still those like Guillen de la
Camera who believed that after Nordlingen the Spanish Empire would
endure for ever, or like Fray Benito de Pefialosa who rejoiced at the
depopulation of Spain, caused by her divine mission to defend and
propagate the faith. Fear and hatred of the Jews and Jewish blood
seemed to increase Spaniards' determination to see themselves as a
chosen race, characteristics they shared with militant Calvinists. A courtly
sonnet hailed Philip IV as the hero who would free Asia, destroy heresy,
inaugurate the universal rule of perfect law, un Solo Pastor y un solo
Imperio?
Our knowledge of what was to be tends to discount the reality of such
fears and hopes, encourages us to believe that all real prospects of Habs-
burg hegemony had died with Philip II. Similarly the undoubted progress
of Catholic restoration by 1600 can be too easily accepted as making the
religious settlements of 1648 and later inevitable. Yet from a more
immediate point of view the later sixteenth century was equally remarkable
for the fact that the rulers of Poland, Austria, Bohemia, Hungary and
France had been forced to abandon the enforcement of Catholic uni-
formity and to allow de facto or formal rights to dissidents. If the Counter-
1
E. Balazs, Political Theory and Administrative Reality in Traditional China (1965), pp.
5-29.
2
O. H. Green, Spain and the Western Tradition, Vol. rv (1966), pp. 5-9, 14-16.
34
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
Reformation had already made considerable progress in Germany and
Poland by 1600, it was the Habsburg victories after 1618 which made the
Bohemian lands, Austria and ultimately Hungary safe for Catholicism
and provided conditions which assisted the growth of Catholic intolerance
in Poland. The Rome of Urban VIII and Bernini was the cultural and
spiritual capital of those lands reconquered for Catholicism. Yet when
Santa Maria della Vittoria was built to commemorate the White Mountain
still greater conquests seemed possible, but by the time the culminating
splendour of the new Rome, Bernini's Piazza of St Peter's, was begun in
1656, such hopes had already gone. Nevertheless in 1635 when the Hall
of the Realms at the new Buen Retiro Palace at Madrid was first displayed,
its iconography celebrated more than the mere survival of the Spanish
monarchy under the leadership of Olivares, and catalogued what were to
have been definitive victories over heresy from Bahia to Switzerland. The
fears of then obscure provincials, such as Pym and Cromwell, were not
necessarily delusions of Protestant fervour, exploited by the propaganda
of Richelieu or the defeated Camerarius. Both Bernini's Rome and the
Hall of the Realms were built to celebrate triumphs which were not to be,
but which were not necessarily impossible.
This was a Europe where there were nations with God-given destinies,
though not nation-states. Everywhere men were told that all political
authority was sacred, that all rulers were responsible to God. If there was
dispute about the nature and amount of authority which God had given
them over their subjects, there was agreement that royal authority was
a kind of personal property. As legitimate kings, unlike tyrants, were
bound to respect the property rights of their subjects, so their subjects
must respect the rights of kings. With the exception of Poland and the
empire, the elective and explicitly contractual elements in European
monarchies had weakened during the sixteenth century and this trend
culminated in the conversion of conquered Bohemia to what now seemed
the normal and proper form of hereditary succession. Attempts by kings
to settle details of government by their last wills, as magnates might
settle the management of their estates, were often frustrated by assemblies,
courts or councils. This also happened in France where absolutist theories
interpreted fundamental law more and more narrowly until by the early
seventeenth century only the law regulating monarchial succession was
outside the scope of the king's sovereign power. But if the king's inheri-
tance of his crown was analogous to the subject's right to inherit property,
then the pursuit of dynastic interests and inheritances were as legitimate
as the subject's enjoyment of his property rights. Externally the concep-
tion of inalienable property rights possessed by kings or dynasties was
both a practical and legalistic stumbling block to universalist aspirations.
Internally kings' and subjects' property rights did conflict. Perhaps the
most serious conflicts arose in war, whether fought for dynastic interests
35
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
or merely defensively. Then all kings and states invoked emergency
powers, to over-ride normal customary or legal procedures which implied
some regulation of or consent to taxes, forced loans, or requisitions and
so encroached upon their subjects' property rights, which all agreed it
was a main purpose of society and government to protect.
Even after 1618 most kings spent more time in hunting than in leading
armies or directing wars, though state portraits might show the un-
military Philip IV and Charles I in equestrian postures of command.
James I, though devoted to hunting, was untypical in his wish to be
remembered as a peacemaker. The iconography of Rubens' Triumph of
Peace, planned in the early 1620s for the Banqueting House at Whitehall,
commemorates hopes and achievements more unfounded than, and as
ephemeral as those in the Hall of the Realms, but expected the union of
Christendom by very different means. 1 Rubens' ceiling symbolizes more
than James' failures in foreign policy, for his inability to pay for it
reminds us of the failure of most European states to reform their finances
and administrations effectively during the two decades of comparative
peace and prosperity before 1620. Those decades were not particularly
peaceful around the Baltic and were neither peaceful nor prosperous
in the Muscovy of the Time of Troubles. They were also a time of disaster
for the Ottomans; revolts in the Balkans and throughout Anatolia were
followed by defeats by the Persians. The major immediate cause of
Ottoman difficulties was the earlier Persian war which they had ended
victoriously in 1590. 2 Similarly war or civil war had strained the govern-
ments and resources of Spain, France, the Netherlands, England and the
Habsburg lands. By 1609 all these states were faced with the need to
revivify their ordinary means of peacetime administration and above all
to restore their finances.
Most governments wished to restore or increase their authority in
ecclesiastical affairs. This might mean trying to increase the effectiveness
of national churches by trying to settle disputes and grievances concerning
them, as in France or England. All states, with the exception of Transyl-
vania, aspired to religious uniformity, not diversity, as their ideal and
many were increasingly repressive towards dissenters. In the sixteenth
century secular encroachments on church property happened every-
where. Even in Spain, where there were no direct Protestant threats, the
crown sold and exploited church lands and rights. By contrast the
seventeenth century saw the church generally recovering or even increas-
ing its property. In most countries serious threats of secularization and
alienation, or resistance to paying tithes, diminished and had virtually
ceased by 1660. The main secular demands on the churches' wealth were
taxes and contributions to pay for wars. Governments certainly tried to
1
Per Palme, Triumph of Peace (1957), pp. 260-2.
• See Vol. m in this series, pp. 371-6 and below, Chapter xx, p. 626.
36
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
increase these, but in so far as they had become more explicitly committed
to defend ecclesiastical property and authority in its traditional forms
this limited the expedients available for dealing with debts and fiscal
problems.
By 1610 it might have seemed that France had solved and England was
about to solve their immediate financial problems and that Spain would
make some concerted attempt to deal with hers. By 1621 it was apparent
that they had not; in all three countries ordinary revenue did not cover
actual expenditure, governments' debts were large and their credit poor.
The countries which seemed to be stronger financially were the United
Provinces, Denmark and Sweden. Sweden's achievement was the more
remarkable since it took place during almost continuous and not always
successful war, but in the long run, though Sweden's administration and
power were effectively transformed, her pursuit of security and Baltic
interests proved beyond her financial resources. The country where there
was most discussion about the plight of the economy and the govern-
ment's finances and least done to remedy them was Spain. The only
problem which Philip III chose to tackle was the unreal, if highly emotive
one, of the Moriscos. Their expulsion (1609-14) was approved by the
church, the Inquisition and the mass of Castilians against the opposition
of the nobility and wealthier townsmen of the kingdoms of Valencia and
Aragon. This can be seen as a last stage in making Spain and its culture
closed and inward-looking, concerned above all to defend its purity and
honour, a process whose sixteenth-century landmarks had included the
rejection of Erasmian influences and the prohibition of studies abroad.
More immediately it may have been an attempt to conciliate Castilians
at the expense of Aragonese interests for the failure of the peace to lighten
their fiscal burdens. What is certain is that it ruined much of Valencia's
economy immediately, while ultimately stimulating even greater French
immigration into Aragon and exacerbating the general difficulties already
caused by rural depopulation and lack of man-power.
In 1615 Philip Ill's total expenditure was more than in 1608 and not
more than ten per cent below the highest years of the 1590s, when the
crown's receipts from American silver had been twice as great and the
yield of Castile's taxes much higher. Yet reforms comparable to Sully's
were possible in Philip Ill's dominions, as the count of Lemos showed in
Naples (1610-16). In 1612 there was a deficit of 1,600,000 ducats, over
half the average receipts. This was cut by reducing interest on debts, by
more efficient accounting and collection, by increasing rents of tax-farms
and by raising new customs duties and an extraordinary donativo.
Ordinary expenditure was reduced, revenues were reallocated, most of
them going to a new department the Cassa Militare, which, as assigned
annuities and rents fell in, should have an increasing surplus which would
pay off the 10,000,000 debt, whose interest was 800,000 ducats a year. By
37
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
1616 the deficit equalled the amount of interest, but Lemos' successor, the
aggressive Osuna, 1 rapidly undid his achievements. By 1621 the deficit
was nearly 4,000,000, the debt perhaps 20,000,000 ducats and the economy
had been severely shaken by devaluations in 1617, 1618 and 1620. 2
In England and France anticipations and assignments had eroded
ordinary revenues and ensured permanent deficits so that nominally
short-term debts were often left unpaid to the detriment of royal credit.
The Notables in 1627 were told that the French deficit had long averaged
some 5,000,000 to 6,000,000 livres a year, despite considerable increases in
indirect taxation, sales of offices and other expedients. This was due to
the expenses of civil war and of pensions and rewards to magnates.
Louis XIII, unlike Philip III, Philip IV, James I and Charles I, proved
capable of controlling and reducing the expenses of his court and house-
hold, though reforming statesmen, like Sully, Cranfield, Olivares, Riche-
lieu, or Strafford still expected substantial rewards for themselves and
their creatures. Not that more austerity and less magnificence by courts
and governments would necessarily have changed the course of inter-
national relations and of economic and commercial developments. But in
so far as there was a general failure by states to maintain or increase their
financial strength down to 1620, when international and economic cir-
cumstances were relatively favourable, of which the most extreme example
is the conduct of Philip III and Lerma, this restricted their freedom of
action in conducting war and foreign policy and so influenced the
character of the war. While the great debasements and manipulations of
coinage in Poland and Germany after 1616 may have economic causes,
they were also the result of the greed and financial difficulties of rulers
and towns. The governments involved in war after 1618 had less reali-
zable, or unmortgaged, fiscal resources than a hundred or even fifty years
before. They were more dependent on tax-farmers and financiers.
The financial failures of peacetime conditioned the conduct of war
most obviously in attempts to make it pay for itself. These were not new,
but the contribution systems of Wallenstein, the imperialists and the
Swedes were more systematic and longer lasting in their effects. War at
sea had always relied on such hopes, but again the activities of the Dutch
West India Company and the Dunkirkers were greater and lasted longer.
Statesmen, like Richelieu and Olivares, were well aware that to decide on
war was to precipitate financial, political and administrative crises, whose
outcome was unpredictable, though they hoped to control them. Rulers
invoked extraordinary powers to deal with the emergency and once
armies were raised, they could, if necessary, be maintained by applying
the contribution-system or something like it to their own subjects, over-
1
See below, Chapter DC, pp. 275-6.
* G. Galasso, Mezzogiomo medievale e moderno (Turin, 1965),' . . . le finanze napoletane
nella prima meta del Seicento'
38
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
riding local authorities and the traditional apparatus of fiscal administra-
tion. But once raised, armies and their commanders were not fully con-
trollable by their governments at home and still less abroad, arrears of pay
and promises of rewards to commanders often meant the failure or pro-
longation of peace negotiations, of which the most famous example is the
Swedish quest for satisfactio after 1636. If rulers claimed emergency powers
and often possessed greater means of asserting them, these threatened
both to transform and destroy their governments. Fiscal pressures could
produce popular revolts which might directly or indirectly involve the
ruling groups of whole provinces. At the same time that emergency
administrative and judicial commissions claimed greater power for the
state, rulers were often selling off or mortgaging their traditional authority
and powers. Sales of offices, jurisdictions, lands, rights, privileges, titles
and honours could change the character of ruling groups and their
political, economic and social relationships with governments and the rest
of the population. The actions of governments seemed to become identi-
fied with the interests of tax-farmers, financiers and armies and alien to
those of most of their subjects. The war became not so much one of attri-
tion, but a gamble as to which tottering conglomeration of alienated
local interests and exhausted taxpayers could avoid collapsing for longer
than its enemies. The counterpart to this in diplomacy was the general
use of that method of 'continual negotiation' which Richelieu made
famous. At any given moment one or more of the belligerents had more
than usually urgent reasons for making peace. But entering the war in
the first place had involved such dangers and losses that the longer it
lasted, the more it seemed that there was little more to be lost by gambling
on a change of fortune and the difficulties of opponents. As the stakes
spent on war grew higher, the more necessary it seemed for the tem-
porarily stronger party in the negotiations to secure some real gains,
hence the difficulty of reaching any settlement. Initially both Spain and
France made some attempt to solve their financial problems by traditional
methods of consultation, before turning to more desperate expedients.
In willingly accepting the renewal of war in 1621 Olivares was the heir
of the imperial past; to find means to fight the war, he had no choice but
also to try to be the heir of the arbitristas. The most important part of the
latter inheritance was the attempt to restore the economy and the crown's
credit by founding a national banking system. Plans for banks managed
by municipalities and the crown had been discussed under Philip II; in
1599 the Cortes approved such a scheme and granted taxes on condition
that it was implemented. Despite complaints, nothing was done, but after
1617 discussions revived; in 1621 a junta was appointed and at last in 1623
a decree was published. Banks and pawnshops were to be set up in 119
towns and financed by a forced loan of a twentieth from lay and clerical
estates over 2,000 ducats, converted into perpetual annuities at 3%. All
39
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
ecclesiastical and charitable foundations were to deposit their funds
and the banks would have a monopoly of loans, selling redeemable
annuities at 5% and lending at 7%. The Cortes opposed the forced loan
and finally only granted taxes on condition that the king financed the
banks and withdrew their monopoly of lending (1626). An attempt to set
up a Crown banking company in 1627, managed by Italian financiers and
chartered to conduct lotteries, deal in foreign exchange and have a mono-
poly of censos, was defeated in the same way in 1628 and 1629. 1
These schemes attempted to tackle fundamental problems, even if all
that they promised would have been unlikely to happen. Although they
would have strengthened the crown's bargaining power with the hated
foreign financiers, they offended clergy, nobles, letrados and the richer
townsmen. Apart from paying the forced loan, men of property would
suffer from the monopoly of lending and control of interest rates. One of
Spain's longstanding problems was the strong preference such men showed
for censos [redeemable rent charges] against other forms of investment;
men even sold land to buy them and the clergy used them extensively.
Thus the banks' monopoly would have reduced the income of all holders
of censos, because it would eventually become impossible to get a higher
return than 5% on any loan. This was expected to stimulate more pro-
ductive investments. But the banks were not necessarily attractive to
debtors who would have had to pay the normal 7%, while greater nobles
had often obtained royal privileges which forced their creditors to
accept rates well below this. 2 Thus the Cortes rejected the arbitristas,
expressed an explicit preference for increasing indirect taxes 3 and by
implication chose the way of debasements and arbitrary expedients. It
was also a warning that if the ruling groups of Castile would not accept
Olivares' plans, the prospects of the other Iberian kingdoms accepting
them were poor. In the long run no one trusted the monarchy to keep its
promises and the non-Castilians were unlikely to exchange their relative
immunity from the fiscal burdens of empire for promises of the de-
Castilianization of its rewards in the Union of Arms. 4
The plans for reforming the French monarchy put to the Assembly of
Notables of 1626 were as comprehensive as anything considered by the
councils of Castile, and some of them also had long histories. A favourite
expedient for improving French finances and credit was the redemption
of the alienated rights and lands of the royal demesne. This had been urged
by the States General in 1614 and earlier and had actually been begun
by Sully. Richelieu wished to raise a forced loan at low interest from the
towns and clergy to provide a fund to complete its redemption during the
1
E. J. Hamilton, 'Spanish Banking Schemes before 1700', Journal of Pol. Economy,
Vol. Lvn (1949).
2
B. Bennassar, Valladolidau siecle d'or (Paris, 1967), pp. 258-72, 557-67.
• Adas de las Cortes de Castillo, Vol. xxxix, pp. 5-20.
* See below, Chapter xv, p. 463.
40
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
next six years. The Notables doubted whether any loan would be used
for this purpose. Despite Richelieu's promises, they neither accepted his
plan nor offered any real remedies for the financial difficulties. However,
they did approve the plans for reviving commercial and maritime power,
which themselves were in part a reply to Olivares' attempts to achieve the
same results. For the time being Richelieu thought it possible to conduct
a war or expensive foreign policies, while simultaneously pursuing ad-
ministrative reforms and mercantilist plans at home. By 1629 he thought
a choice had to be made, and so seems to show better judgment than
Olivares, but for Olivares there was no alternative to attempting structural
reforms while fighting a war. The attitude of the Cortes of Castile made
such an attempt both essential to finance the war and unlikely to succeed.
Neither they nor other statesmen could overcome the difficulty that credi-
tors would never trust absolute rulers who claimed uncontrolled emer-
gency powers to keep long-term financial promises.
Before examining how the cost of war was met and its effects, it is worth
considering to what extent conditions outside Europe helped to make it
possible for so many European states to engage in prolonged warfare
and what turning points in the struggle were decisive for changing the
distribution of power in Europe. As the Ottomans continued to be
distracted by internal dissensions down to 1627 and after that were still
concentrating their resources on a renewed war with Persia (1623-39),
there was no serious threat to distract the Habsburgs in Hungary. Central
and eastern Europe and the Ottomans had turned their backs on each
other, apart from border skirmishes, as Spain and the Ottomans had done
in the last two decades of the sixteenth century. This also assisted the
Poles in expanding into White Russia and above all into the Ukraine,
without producing an immediate need for strengthening the military and
administrative power of the crown. However, the failure of the Polish
kings to defend their Baltic provinces and interests against the Swedes
gives a misleading impression of Polish power. Poland was still the
greatest military power in eastern Europe, when the nobles chose to unite
their forces behind the crown. The Diet refused to support Sigismund
Hi's and Ladislas IV's Baltic plans and by treating Ladislas' plans against
the Turks in the same way helped to precipitate the Cossack revolt of
1648. But to defend their Ukrainian colonization they raised 100,000
men for the Chocim campaign of 1621 against the Turks and Tartars, and
120,000 against Bohdan Khmelnytsky in 1651. Thus Ottoman weakness
after the death of Murad IV indirectly contributed to the eclipse of Poland
by encouraging Ladislas' plans. In western Europe power shifted as a
result of the renewal of direct conflict between France and Spain.
Olivares, looking back after the catastrophe of 1640, thought that
Spain's defeats had their origins in the Mantuan war (1628-31). Until
then the Habsburgs had been victorious, but viewed from Madrid the
3
41
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
MHrDECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
situation was unsatisfactory. Spanish money and sometimes Spanish
troops had made possible the reconquest of Bohemia and the victories
of the Catholic League and Wallenstein in Germany, yet it had proved
impossible to get any promise of a general league against the Dutch from
either the emperor or the princes, who resented Spain's occupation of the
Lower Palatinate. Olivares had also hoped to ruin the Dutch by closing
the Baltic to them; by 1628 these plans had been frustrated by the caution
of the Hansa towns and Wallenstein's refusal to act under Spain's direc-
tion. 1 Wallenstein had second thoughts as a result of his failure at
Stralsund, but Madrid had decided (September 1628) to concentrate its
resources securing the Mantuan territories. 2 Castile's finances were being
put in better order by the forced debt conversion of 1627 which gave
financiers juros [annuities] and freed the revenues pledged to them and
by the new banking company's devaluation of the inflated copper coinage.
The Mantuan territory of Montferrat and Casale's control of a pass to
Italy threatened the security of the Milanese and the land-route to the
Netherlands, hence Olivares' decision to deny the inheritance to the
French duke of Nevers to whom the last duke had willed it when he died
at the end of 1627. While there were grounds for disputing the legality of
the duke's will, Spain had not appealed to them but to the immediate
force of arms. In so doing Spain had flouted dynastic property rights,
challenged France and further disturbed her relations with the emperor,
since Montferrat was an imperial fief.
At the same time important decisions had to be taken about the
Netherlands. The Stadholder Frederick Henry was willing to negotiate
a renewal of the truce of 1609 which the infanta and Spinola urged should
be accepted. But Olivares argued that this would be disastrous to Spain,
as it had been before. The Dutch would capture her trade in both the
Indies; the cost of fighting the war prevented them from devoting all their
resources to increasing their sea-power. The only solution was to win the
war by buying the intervention of the emperor and the German princes.
Philip IV followed neither course; he allowed negotiations with the Dutch,
but set his terms impossibly high, while failing to send the funds necessary
for buying support in the empire. The result of Spain and Savoy's occupa-
tion of Montferrat and the siege of Casale was not direct French inter-
vention, but the sending of an ambassador to Madrid. Both sides wished
to avoid an immediate clash, but for different reasons. Time was not on
Spain's side. In October La Rochelle surrendered, leaving Richelieu free
to concentrate on intervention in Italy; at about the same time came
news of Piet Heyn's capture of the treasure-fleet in September. Faced with
a sudden lack of immediate resources, Olivares wished to accept the
1
See below, Chapter vn, p. 228.
R. Rodenas Vilar, La Politico Europea de Espana durante la Guerra de Treinta Anos
(1624-30) (Madrid, 1967), p. 146.
2
42
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
Dutch terms for a truce and concentrate on defeating France. A majority
of the Council of State supported him, but again Philip refused then-
advice and decided to try to meet the crisis by bluff. 1
The result was disaster in 1629. The French defeated Savoy, relieved
Casale and established themselves in Italy, while Frederick Henry, en-
couraged by French subsidies, besieged Bois-le-Duc and eventually took
it in September. Now it was Spain which had to appeal to the emperor
for assistance. The sending of an imperial army to Italy not only weakened
Ferdinand's position in Germany and so made still more remote any
hope of a German alliance to defeat the Dutch, but it also gave the
emperor the possibility of settling the Mantuan question unilaterally
with the French, without consulting Madrid. This the French envoys at
Ratisbon succeeded in doing in 1630 by playing on the emperor's hopes
that they would not incite opposition to the election of his son as king of
the Romans. The French over-reached themselves in denouncing the
agreement made at Ratisbon, but the final settlement at the Treaty of
Cherasco (1631) by giving France direct control of access to Italy by the
acquisition of Pinerolo and Casale was more dangerous to Spain than
the peaceful succession of Nevers to the Mantuan inheritance would have
been. This result cost Spain by Olivares' reckoning over 10,000,000
ducats. It had also severely strained French government and finances
and forced Louis XIII to choose between pursuing far-reaching reforms
and costly anti-Habsburg foreign policy, but Richelieu could still buy
time free from direct involvement in war. 2 Spain resumed the quest for a
truce with the United Provinces, only to find that they were now mainly
interested in the negotiations as a means of encouraging rebellion in the
south. Spain had lost opportunities for limiting her commitments and
had ensured that they would increase. By 1632 financing the war by
means involving a large measure of consultation with traditional assem-
blies and of respect for fueros had reached its limits. Henceforward
greater resort to force and extraordinary measures were essential and the
change is to some extent symbolized by the setting up of the Junta de
Ejecucion in 1634 which replaced the traditional Council of State as the
centre of decision-making. By 1636 these methods had apparently over-
come disaster in Germany and near-disaster in the Netherlands, were
raising large forces intended to expel the Dutch from northern Brazil,
and had forced Richelieu to declare open war on Spain and face defeat
and invasion in northern France. Although Richelieu and Olivares were
engaged almost continuously in secret peace negotiations from 1636,
these reversals of the disasters from 1628 to 1633 must have strengthened
Olivares' conviction that his will power, energy and gambler's nerve could
prevail over the deficiencies produced by exhaustion and dissension in
Spain's dominions for long enough to impose her terms abroad.
1
Ibid. pp. 166-70,180-1.
• See below, Chapter xvi, pp. 488-9.
43
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
3-aDECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Thus the declaration of war between France and Spain in 1635 did
prove a real turning point in international relations. Eventually Spain
had to accept the long-mooted peace with the United Provinces and yet
was unable to keep the emperor in the war against France. Even before
1648 this phase of the war had decisively affected the governments and
economies of the belligerents. As Spain was the country ultimately worst
affected it is worth attempting a rough analysis of its fiscal regime, and its
peculiarities. 1 By comparison with France one obvious contrast is that
the weight of indirect taxation was very much heavier in Castile. However
it should be remembered that since the sixteenth century there had been a
general tendency for states to increase the relative contribution of indirect
taxes and that if Spain was the most extreme example of this, the other
country where they were probably as important was the United Provinces.
Thanks to its long regalist tradition the Spanish crown certainly got
greater contributions from its clergy than the French, though it is impos-
sible to assess the relative proportions of clerical wealth taken by the two
crowns. Another and greater contrast with France is the profit made
from manipulating the coinage; there was no debasement in France,
though the money of account was devalued and changes in mint ratios
and the nominal values of coins were made. France's monetary system
was not as stable as that of the United Provinces or England, but it was
less violently disturbed than those of Castile or Germany or Poland,
while the manipulations of Castile's coinage continued for much longer
than in any other country, with the possible exception of the Ottoman
Empire. In both Spain and France customs duties on overseas trade
were a far less important part of revenue than in the United Provinces or
England, or Denmark. In both Spain and France contracts with and ad-
vances from financiers were important. Both states ruined their credit;
in the short run the French financiers seemed to have had the better
bargain and by the 1650s seemed to be in full control of financial admini-
stration, while Spain's were more frequently the victims of the crown's
necessities and of their unpopularity. Both countries' wars were financed
by repudiations of assignments of revenue, sales of annuities, offices and
privileges, forced loans, requisitions and billeting of troops. While
Spain's finances had been even more desperate for even longer than those
of France, it may be that her financial administration was better informed
about the true current state of her affairs than the French one. Spain's
troubles were certainly not due to her government's ignorance of what was
happening.
The importance of the manipulation of Castile's coinage is shown by the
fact that it provided 48,000,000 ducats for the crown 1621-58, against
34,000,000 from American silver. After 1640 America provided only
11,000,000 ducats and coinage 30,000,000. In the first twenty years of his
1
Based on A. Dominguez Ortiz, Politico y Hacienda de Felipe IV (Madrid, i960).
44
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
reign Philip IV's receipts averaged about 18,000,000 ducats a year, 1 but
some 6,000,000 were assigned to the payment of juros [annuities] which
already amounted to 5,600,000 in 1621. Of the remaining receipts,
perhaps 10% came from direct taxes, mostly clerical subsidies, supple-
mented by occasional donativos. The largest item, some 90,000,000
(averaging 4,500,000 a year) were the servicios voted by the Cortes
which mostly consisted of indirect taxes on foodstuffs [the millones]. There
was also from 1631 a royal tax on salt, while the old alcabalas [sales tax],
now assigned or alienated, amounted to nearly 3,000,000, so that by the
1630s taxes on consumption were about 10,000,000 ducats a year or more
on a population probably somewhat under 6,000,000. The next largest
item in the unassigned receipts, some 37,000,000, came from the Cruzada
[sale of bulls of indulgence], ordinary clerical subsidies and the revenues
of the military orders, followed by the coinage yielding nearly 18,000,000.
Then came 16,000,000 from Media anata of juros. In 1634 half the interest
due to foreigners owning juros was withheld, in 1635 and 1636 the whole,
while natives received a third and a half respectively; in 1637-40 half from
both, in 1641 the whole and from 1645 always a half and from 1648 more
than a half. Except in the most desperate crises widows, poor nobles,
hospitals, nunneries and endowments for festivals of the Blessed Sacra-
ment were exempt, those whose interest was withheld had to accept it in
the form of juros of the same face value. The crown got a secure and
regular revenue of some 2,500,000 ducats, ruined its credit and reduced
the market price of juros to half their face value which had usually
equalled their market price in the sixteenth century. 2 The crown had to
force purchase of juros in 1637,1640, 1646 and 1649, assigning a quota to
corporations, office-holders and individuals in each region.
The donativo had seemed to offer hope of escape from such expedients.
They were in theory benevolences from those best able to pay, but even
the successful ones of 1590 and 1624 were used by nobles as opportunities
for obtaining royal privileges to extend or convert censos on their lands at
lower rates of interest. That of 1629 was in large part a sale of privileges
and pardons to towns and individuals. The towns were allowed to sell
common lands, or break up pastures and above all to raise additional
excises or dues especially on their rural pecheros. In 1632 the attempt to
make the donativo more an appeal to individual patriotism led to resis-
tance and failure; it raised only 1,000,000 ducats against some 4,000,000
each from those of 1624 and 1629. In 1635 the crown tried to avoid
bargains with the towns, but individuals still obtained pardons and
privileges, in particular the nobles were exempted from personal military
1
These are receipts accounted for in Dominguez Ortiz, Politico y Hacienda, appendix 1,
but average receipts for the whole reign were probably about 20,000,000 ducats a year,
ibid. p . 182.
• A. Castillo Pintado, 'Los Juros de Castilla . . . " Hispania, Vol. xxni (1963), p . 63.
45
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
service. This again raised about 4,000,000, but was in fact the last donativo
to raise a large sum. In 1637 preparations for a 25% tax on censos were
made, but came to nothing in face of particularly strong opposition from
the clergy and the Basque provinces. In 1640 a plan for a graded capitation
tax also failed. The only regular direct tax paid by the titled nobility was
the lanzas instituted in 1631, by which they and the bishops agreed indivi-
dually to pay for contingents of troops. Its yield was supposed to be
400,000 ducats, but by 1660 was only 150,000. Presumably the yield was
better maintained under Olivares and in fact the magnates were forced to
contribute very heavily to the war in his last years. From 1635 to 1640 some
3,600,000 ducats was raised for the army. By 1643 the duke of Medi-
naceli had contributed half a million ducats. Such exactions were the main
cause of the magnates' growing hostility to the court and to Olivares whose
fall inaugurated a regime of comparative immunity for the greater nobles.
Traditionally the Cortes of Castile, like the French States General, had
always opposed sale of offices and the crown had repeatedly broken
promises to end the practice. But by the 1630s the Cortes hoped to reduce
the burdensomeness of the servicios by agreeing to the creation and sale of
new municipal offices and the sale of fiscal and legal offices. It is impos-
sible to estimate the yield from sale of offices; it must have been con-
siderable, though probably not as important as in France in the 1630s.
There sales of new offices, of increased wages of old ones, droit annuel and
so on averaged over a third of the cash receipts of the central treasury.
But the yield of the highest year, some 36,000,000 livres, was only just
over half the assessment of the taille and its military supplements in 1639
at 69,000,000. By 1640 creation of new offices and additional wages had
satiated demand and was lowering their price; 1 sale of new offices as a
major expedient was exhausted. The crown continued to force its officers
to buy increases in wages which it was then unable to pay, just as Philip IV
had to force his officers and subjects to buy juros. But the great contrast
was in the role of indirect taxes whose gross yield was about 38% of the
taille and its supplements as assessed in 1639, though the proportion rose
in the 1640s. The total taxation of the clergy averaged under 2,000,000 a
year 1615-66, but nearly half of this consisted of tenths which had already
been alienated to pay rentes. The dons gratuits voted by the clergy averaged
under half a million livres 1626-36 and from 1636 to 1645 900,000, while
in 1645-56 they declined to rather less than the first figure. 2 Spain certainly
got more from its clergy, especially in the 1630s, though it is impossible to
say precisely how much. The fact that French clergy's taxation averaged
over 3,500,000 livres a year from 1666 to 1715 and that the dons gratuits
alone averaged nearly 5,000,000 1690-1715 suggests that they had escaped
lightly in the earlier period.
1
8
See below, Chapter xvi, pp. 495-6.
P. Blet, Le Clerge de France et la Monarchie (Rome, 1959), Vol. n, pp. 391-4.
46
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
By comparison with 1626, the assessment of the taille had doubled by
1636 and, including the military supplements, more than trebled by 1639.
Its incidence is best illustrated by local examples, though there were con-
siderable regional variations. In the gtneralite of Caen the taille was
1,075,000 livres in 1631, just under 2,300,000 in 1635, 3,200,000 in 1638
and about the same in 1643, with additional military charges of 700,000,
an almost fourfold increase 1631-8. But by 1639 40% of the assessment
was in arrears, as against 19-6% in 1629. As with the office-holders,
the willingness and capacity of the taillables to pay increasing levies was
being exhausted. In Montpellier (in a pays d'etat) the taille was about
30,000 livres in 1600, had doubled by 1627 and was 100,000 in 1640. The
assessment of the small town of Espalion in Rouergue increased from
1,266 livres in 1618 to over 6,800 in 1643. In the giniralite of Bordeaux the
taille increased from a little over 1,000,000 between 1610 and 1632 to
2,000,000 in 1635, 3,000,000 in 1644 and almost 4,000,000 in 1648—
including military charges it was about 5,000,000. But this did not account
for all the charges; financial officials were entitled to fees, parishes had to
pay dues for garrisons, militia, billeting, so that their total expenses could
be twice the amount of the taille. Many towns, including important ones
such as Bordeaux, were exempt from the taille, but they were still liable to
provide subsistence for troops, raise forced loans and contributions for the
crown, which were levied by additional octrois or other indirect taxes.
Others were not directly assessed and could evade part of their quota by
overcharging neighbouring villages. All towns ran into debt and their
inability to meet further demands led to increasing intervention in their
affairs by intendants or governors, tax-farmers and royal officials. In 1647
the government doubled municipal octrois, but disposed of half or more
of them itself. By 1660 Amiens had a debt of 315,975 livres, four or five
times its average annual receipts in the 1650s. Admittedly Amiens was in a
frontier province, but everywhere the accumulation of municipal and
communal debts was one of the most important consequences of the war
and was responsible for the extension of the monarchy's administrative
tutelage. For as arrears and debts piled up, the legal expenses of village
communities grew as they had to pay the expenses of imprisoned collectors
of the taille, or of seizures and other legal processes.
Growing municipal and communal indebtedness were everywhere the
result of states' increasing fiscal demands and difficulties, though the social
and administrative consequences were not necessarily the same as in
France. The most spectacular example is perhaps that of Naples, which
of all the Spanish dominions was most open to fiscal pressure from
Madrid and contributed most to its war effort, especially after 1636. 1 By
then the debt had risen from about 30,000,000 ducats in 1626 (when the
deficit was already 6,800,000) to 40,000,000, but had doubled by 1648
1
R. Villari, La Rivolta Antispagnola a Napoli. Le Origini 1585-1647 (Ban, 1967).
47
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
to 80,000,000. Communal debts, mainly the result of the crown's exac-
tions, were 54,000,000 in 1637. The kingdom was sending abroad some
3,500,000 a year towards the war. Part of this was raised by new taxes
on export of oil and silk and on consumption of oil, flour, salt and grain
at Naples, which were immediately alienated to financiers. But much was
raised by in effect devaluing the obligations for which old direct and
indirect taxes had already been alienated and by selling titles, offices,
rights and jurisdiction over communes and lands of the royal demesne.
The chief beneficiary after 1636 was Bartolomeo Aquino, who with his
partners eventually established a near-monopoly of revenues and advances.
He had been a merchant and during his supremacy as a financier many
who continued as merchants went bankrupt. His first victims were foreign-
ers who held assignments of revenues from solvent communes and were
forced to exchange them for assignments on insolvent ones. The raising
of new direct and indirect taxes in a period of depression meant that the
yield of older taxes fell. Already by 1637 old investors had lost 50% of
their capital, but the crown's credit was only beginning its decline; by
1646-7 Aquino was paying only 10-15% of their nominal value for the
new obligations on its revenues. In the meantime he and others had also
bought up old assignments and pensions at give-away prices. Fiscal
officials, holders of assigned taxes, and the creditors of communes all
had the right to send commissari to collect their money as best they could.
Increasingly this was done by means of sequestrations which had to be
carried out by force, just as the tax farmers and intendants in France had
to raise special troops to enforce payment of taxes.
But in some of his contracts Aquino was acting as agent on a 10% com-
mission for nobles buying assignments of customs and direct taxes. He
was also a means to sales of titles and offices and above all of portions of
royal demesne declared inalienable in 1620. Aquino's monopoly was
destroyed by the revolution of 1648, but he had assisted the last phase of
social changes, which proved more enduring. The most obvious symbol
of these changes was the increase in the number of titled nobility: 133 in
1601,161 in 1613, 271 in 1631, 341 in 1640,434 in 1675, while the number
of untitled barons remained roughly constant at a little under 500. The
period of greatest growth was 1620 to 1650 and the greatest increase was
in the highest titles of prince and duke. Aquino himself became prince of
Caramanico and a number of Genoese and Tuscans acquired lands and
titles in Naples. Even in 1600 few of the holders of titles had held them
for as long as a century.
The most conspicuous new recruits in the later period were financiers,
merchants and lesser nobles who had made their fortunes as office-holders
and councillors. But many old-established baronial families also pros-
pered and were promoted; in 1600 many of the magnates were heavily in
debt and a good deal of land was sold on this account, but after about
48
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
1620 they seem generally to have been more successful in exploiting their
estates. Communes made optimistic leases of seigneurial rights at rents
which fell into arrears, as prices stagnated, or fell, and fiscal pressures
increased. Once in debt to a baron, they might be forced to surrender
administrative independence and valuable tolls or lands. Such bargains
could also be enforced by hiring bandits to threaten and murder. Both
new and old nobles were the chief gainers from the crown's increasing
financial difficulties, while merchants, townspeople, peasants and lesser
office-holders were the losers.
. Politically the nobles prevented the crown from lightening the weight of
taxation by successfully opposing the introduction of a tax on rent
charges and of stamp duties, which would have injured their interests.
They added to the viceroy's difficulties by denouncing the financiers in
Parliament, by encouraging smuggling and resistance to commissari and
royal officials in communes under their protection, while at the same
time buying up direct taxes and rights over royal demesne. In the pro-
vinces, despite their protests and appeals to the crown, more and more
communities were at the mercy of barons and cut off from effective help
by royal courts and officials. To get supply from Parliament in 1639 the
viceroy withdrew the edict of 1637 which subjected baronial jurisdiction
over offences involving firearms to royal control and so threatened to
control their strong-arm men. Increasing baronial exploitation of provin-
cial townspeople and peasants meant heavier taxes on the merchants,
artisans and labourers of Naples. The attempts to bring to justice a few
extremist nobles who were involved in plots with France, and the sum-
moning of representatives from all the communes in 1647 to discuss the
financial disorders which predictably led to a flood of complaints against
the barons might suggest that the crown wished to revive Osuna's policy
of seeking popular allies against the nobility. But if the crown had ever
been free to do so, this was no longer possible, its power was irrevocably
mortgaged to the nobility.
In 1647 towns and peasants rose against domination and exploitation
by the baronage. These had been intensified by the crown's fiscal neces-
sities, 1 which were the immediate occasion of the rising in Naples itself
provoked by a new tax on fruit. There Masaniello led the people not only
against the urban nobles, the financiers and tax collectors, but also against
the bandits belonging to the barons' retinues, and sought support from the
country. Neither in Naples nor the provinces did the rebels begin by
attacking Spanish rule. Indeed they appealed to a more or less mythical
paternalistic king for justice and redress. The leaders of communes
wanted to become the immediate subjects of the crown as a guarantee of
1
R. Villari, Mezzogiomo e contadini nelVeta moderna (Bari, 1961), pp. 118-42; G. Pepe,
n Mezzogiomo d'Italia sotto gli Spagnoli. La Tradizione Storiografico (Florence, 1952), pp.
137-41. 213-20.
49
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
local particularism. This appeal to legitimate authority against injustice
and usurpation gave the movement real power in the provinces by uniting
peasants and urban oligarchies, so that the barons were helpless and could
only flee or make concessions. Their only hope was in rallying to the
viceroy and awaiting the arrival of Spanish troops. This helped to ensure
that Naples would throw off Spanish allegiance and proclaim a republic.
Mazarin was unwilling to assist a republic, while few nobles were willing
to seek French intervention which would complete the victory of their
enemies. Mazarin's reluctance, and his determination to thwart the
ambitions of the duke of Guise, ensured the eventual submission of Naples.
Yet the very importance of the peasants in the revolt had made its
success doubtful. Apart from disliking destruction of property and
violence, the better-off townspeople were economically and socially the
rivals of the barons in exploiting peasants and artisans. Already by 1600
the ruling groups in the communes of Calabria had been shifting the
basis of taxation required to meet both donativi and communal debts
from hearth taxes to indirect and capitation taxes from which those
'living nobly' in occupations not involving manual labour were exempt. 1
The clergy claimed similar exemption, though some of them often
sympathized with popular grievances and sometimes joined the revolts.
They could not afford a renewal of peasant refusals to pay tithe which
had been frequent in the grain-producing areas in the late sixteenth cen-
tury. The clergy and urban leaders also wished to save their investments
in public and communal debts and offices. They needed a reformed
regime, the restoration of 'popular liberties' and an equal share with the
nobility in government which Genoino had been advocating since 1620,*
not a transformation of society. When Naples submitted in 1648, the
barons were free to reconquer their fiefs and repudiate any concessions
made in 1647. Some reforms of financial administration did take place in
the next twenty years, but the gains made by the baronage were not
seriously affected.
A comparison with Sicily underlines the importance of fiscal exploita-
tion and its results in Naples. It is generally agreed that Sicily suffered
much less from Spanish exactions than Naples. Although the parlia-
ment of Sicily never fought any major battles, Madrid recognized it as a
forum for hearing grievances and granting favours which still had some
potential for real resistance. The parliament of Naples did not meet again
after 1642, but the continued existence of that of Sicily safeguarded the
island's privileges. The viceroys, like the parliament, were anxious it
should be spared and regularly pleaded the country's poverty and exhaus-
tion. Much the same pleas came from Naples, but they were less heeded
1
F. Caracciolo, 'Fisco e contribuenti in Calabria . . . ' Nuovo Rivista Storica, Vol.
XLW (1963), pp. 504-38-
2
M. Schipa, Masaniello (Bari, 1925).
50
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
in Madrid, which was used to asking for what its subjects believed to be
impossible. Moreover, in the case of Catalonia over-estimation of its
resources through sheer ignorance was part of Olivares' miscalculations.
Perhaps the Sicilian barons' tradition of loyalty to Spain made Madrid
less exigent than towards the Neapolitans whose propensities towards
other allegiances had been greater.
For Sicilian men of property rent charges were of great importance:
everyone invested in the state's financial difficulties by buying assignments
of revenues and privileges. The crown sold its demesne and offices, while
creating titles at much the same rate as in Naples. The towns were ruled
by nobles who at Messina were exceptional in still having active mercantile
interests. They all sought privileges for themselves and their towns and
were likely to invest in offices. They also invested in rent charges and mort-
gages on baronial estates, as did the church. The barons always claimed
to be chronically in debt, but were able to raise money to buy titles,
privileges and rights to taxes. The most important privilege was that
granted in 1610 of buying merum et mixtum imperium [full criminal and
civil jurisdiction] over their fiefs. The crown also protected them from
their creditors and upset investors by forcing reductions of interest and
withholding interest payments on its obligations. The parliament was
prepared to grant special donativi to guarantee the interest payments. The
crown recognized the importance of investments in rent charges when in
1642 it refused the barons' request for a forced reduction of the interest
on their debts. 1
The universal complaints of ruin as a result of war and its costs were
probably more exaggerated in Sicily than in Naples. For certainly the
export trade of Sicily had grown in value. The export of corn though
subject to harvest fluctuations remained at the average level reached in the
later sixteenth century. 2 Messina's exports of silk rose by over a third
between the 1590s and 1620s and maintained this average level, though
with greater fluctuations in the 1650s and 1660s. Production may have
been growing between 1620 and 1650 and then reached a plateau. The
average value of the silk exported was at least a third greater than that of
corn. 8 While prosperity of exports does not demonstrate general pros-
perity, there was also considerable internal colonization. In the sixteenth
century twelve new communes were founded; in the seventeenth seventy-
six with a population of 63,000, of which fifty-eight were founded before
1653. There was a general tendency for peasants to migrate from the more
1
V. Titone, La Sicilia delta Dominazione Spagnola alPUnita (Bologna, 1955), pp. 23-4,
289-320; G. Tricoli, ' U n a battaglia parlamentare . . . del secolo XVII', Melanges
Marongiu (Brussels, 1968), pp. 213-45.
1
A.
F. Braudel, La Mediterrani et le Monde mediterraneen . . . (2nd ed. 1966), Vol. I, pp.
541, 545-8.
• M. Aymard, 'Commerce et production de la soie sicilienne au XVI et XVII siecles',
Melanges d'Archdologie et d'Histoire, Vol. Lxxvn (1965), pp. 609-40.
51
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
heavily taxed communes of the royal demesne to the baronial ones, and
the new communes were especially attractive to new settlers because of
initially very light dues and rents. 1 To some limited extent baronial debts
must have helped to finance this colonization. In the long run it may have
increased exhaustion and erosion of the soil and feudal abuses, but in our
period it provided at least some peasants with more attractive choices
than existed in Castile or Naples.
Possibly these circumstances may help to explain why the popular
risings of 1647, occasioned by bad harvests in 1646, were less bloody and
prolonged than those in Naples, though their first targets were the same—
high indirect taxes and noble privileges. In Palermo the mass uprising was
soon controlled by the maestranze [gilds], whose leader d'Alesio produced
a programme very similar to Genoino's: an equal share in government
for the people (by which was meant the better-off townspeople) with the
nobility and a more equal distribution of taxes. Concessions and pro-
crastination by the viceroy to d'Alesio undermined the support of the
maestranze. Although there were revolts in many other towns, Messina
maintained its traditional hostility to Palermo and the other towns made
no attempt to organize any kind of general authority, or to assist each
other, as was done to some extent in Naples. The capitulations granted to
d'Alesio were disregarded; the attempt to reform the fiscal system by
abolishing indirect taxes on food was abandoned, as after a short time
was the appointment of popular consuls to the senates of Palermo and
Catania. One lasting result of the revolt, apart from reminding everyone
from the gilds upwards of the delicate balance of interrelated interests
over which the viceroy presided, was a reduction in the exemptions to the
indirect taxes which were to be supervised by a new financial deputation
of nobles and clergy elected from the holders of obligations. This was
meant to ensure the regular payment of interest, though at a lower
rate.
In Milan, whither most of the money raised in Naples went, Spanish
fiscal exactions were probably less than in Naples, but greater than in
Sicily. But the direct effects of war were greater, above all in the continual
passage and quartering of troops. Once again the government was selling
its regalian rights, offices and titles, though there was no great increase
in the number of fiscal offices until after 1650. The urban patriciates were
relatively more important than in the south. 1 (Of 270 titled nobility and
433 feudatories in 1700, 157 and 207 had been granted since 1646 and 158
and 205 respectively came from Milan's patriciate.) They had ceased to be
directly involved in industry or trade, but ensured their monopoly of high
1
C. A. Garufi, 'Patti Agrari e Comuni Feudale di Nuova Fondazione in Sicilia', Pt n
Archivio Storico Siciliano, Third Series, Vol. n (1947).
2
Chiefly based on B. Caizzi, 'Le Classi Sociali', Storia di Milano, Vol. xi, Pt v (Fonda-
zione Treccani degli Alfieri, 1958) and // Comasco sotto il Dominio Spagnolo (Como, 1955).
52
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
municipal, administrative and judicial offices by requiring long and
expensive academic studies and proofs of nobility. From 1593 the college
of Jurisconsults in Milan decided to exclude anyone who was active in
mercantile trading. Such families invested in public debt, private lending
and foreign exchange transactions, as well as in land and feudal rights.
Investments in rent charges, mortgages and public debt meant as else-
where that men could 'live nobly' and they or their descendants would be
accepted as noble. The buying of jurisdictional and regalian rights over
communities from the crown in the form of fiefs held on a variety of
conditions was comparatively easy and required money, not proofs of
nobility. The purchasers included besides patricians, financiers, merchants
and traders but, given the decline of trade and industry, financiers pre-
dominated among the new men. Infeudation of lands and communities
took place on a large scale, despite the efforts of communes to buy
immunity. Some feudatories had very large possessions and others
very small ones. The nobles owned almost half the total land and the
church perhaps a quarter, though the proportions were higher in the
plain.
As returns from land were low, the older noble families who were not
patricians with offices needed more than their legal privileges of partial
exemption from taxes. They sought favours and additional sources of
income. Magnates piled up arrears of taxes and sought remissions, while
lesser nobles tended to suffer and go under. Thus there was a growth of
great estates as well as in recruitment to the nobility. Both land and money
became concentrated into fewer hands. There had been some growth of
small peasant proprietorship in the plains in the sixteenth century, but this
was checked and there were sales and temporary abandonment of holdings;
south of Como the worst period for sales of peasant property was 1620-50.
In the mountainous regions great estates were less dominant and conditions
were better for small owners. In Milan and the other cities wealth and
power had gone from merchants, traders and entrepreneurs to office-
holders and nobles, including new men who were financiers.
Declining industry and international trade and a preference for invest-
ing cash in rent charges and land were not peculiar to Spanish Italy.
Similar phenomena can be found in Genoa, Florence and Venice. Sharply
falling production of woollen and silk textiles in the old urban centres from
the early seventeenth century was compensated partly by growing produc-
tion in villages and other towns, but little of this was exported. By the
later seventeenth century Italy, like Spain or Poland, had become mainly
an exporter of primary products, such as silk, olive oil, wine, rice or
sulphur, in its trade with north-western Europe. Its earnings from
shipping and banking had declined, but its industrial self-sufficiency,
especially in textiles, was much greater than that of Spain or Poland. It
has been argued that the crucial period when the Venetian nobility
53
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
increasingly turned away from commercial activities to investment in
land was between about 1570 and 1630. 1 Milanese capitalists from about
the 1590s showed a radical change in business interests towards concen-
trating investment in financial affairs, accepting risks for the sake of quick
returns. Both in Venice and Milan urban trade and industry were increas-
ingly heavily burdened with taxes and high labour costs. Monetary dis-
order and debasement, which was also the product of financial difficulties,
encouraged concentration on foreign exchange transactions. The most
fully documented examples of this are the Lucini family partnerships,
whose profits were used to acquire 1,100,000 lire of real property and
800,000 in charges on public, communal and private revenues. After 1615
they largely withdrew from the foreign exchanges; this may be taken as a
symptom of the general malaise about the economic and political future,
anticipating the crisis of money and credit in 1619, which inaugurated
prolonged war and economic depression. 2
Thus it can be argued that already the patterns of economic behaviour
in northern Italy were changing decisively before the war could have had
any effect. Yet these changes and the growing sense of insecurity were
certainly influenced by the financial difficulties of Spain and other states
before 1618. Its coincidence with the outbreak of general war made the
monetary crisis of 1619-23 in Milan so serious. Its effects and the direct
impact of the Mantuan war were reinforced by the plague of 1630.
Returns from land also fell catastrophically. The accounts of a great estate
show a net return of about 3% before 1623, perhaps nearer 4% before
1610. After 1623 it was scarcely 1% and in some years showed a loss. By
the 1640s expenditure on repairs and improvements had fallen by nearly
a half, fiscal charges amounted to nearly half the gross receipts and there
was an average annual deficit of expenses over receipts of 2,330 lire com-
pared with an average surplus of 14,700 lire 1600-23.* To survive, nobles
had to depend on favours, borrowing, income from offices and obliga-
tions. The price of land fell very considerably, so that for those with cash
profitable purchases could be made, or usurious contracts. But the great
rush to buy land by moneyed men had been in the first three decades of
the century. Those who could consolidate their estates and wait saw their
incomes revive again after 1659 and still more after 1670, while economic
life in the towns still stagnated.
The Milanese differed from the south in the apparent absence of wide-
1
C. M. Cipolla, 'The Economic Decline of Italy'; S. J. Woolf, 'Venice and the Terra-
ferma' in Crisis and Change in the Venetian Economy, ed. B. Pullan (1968), pp. 127-45,
175-203.
8
A. de Maddalena, 'L'immobilizzazione della ricchezza nella Milano spagnola . . .',
Annale delVIstituto di Storia Ec. e Soc. delVUniversita di Napoli, Vol. VI (1965), pp. 39~72;
'Affaires et gens d'affaires LombardessurlesfoiresdeBiseiJzone',/4nntf/es(i967), pp. 939-90.
s
A. de Maddalena, 'I bilanci dal 1600 al 1647 di una azienda fondiaria lombarda',
Rivista Int. di Scienze Economiche e Commerciale, Vol. 11 (1955), pp. 510-25, 671-98.
54
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
spread popular revolts. To attribute this simply to the continuous pre-
sence of considerable garrisons and the fact that it was a more active
theatre of war, when it was the presence of troops and the nearness of war
which produced revolt in Catalonia, may seem superficial, but at least
emphasizes the different traditions of government in the two dominions.
Spanish power was weak in 1647-8, so the examples of Naples and Sicily
suggest that in most of Europe rebellions which failed to gain noble
support and probably some external assistance were doomed. England
comes nearest to being the exception, but there the Scots gave crucial aid
and even the Commonwealth had some leaders and support from impor-
tant families of landed gentry. The revolt of the Ukraine is perhaps the
nearest thing to a successful peasant rising, but most of its leaders had
ambitions very different from the mass of their followers and it ultimately
depended on foreign aid. In Portugal the widespread peasant rising against
taxes of 1637 failed, where a popular revolt with noble support in 1640
was successful and received French aid. Catalonia had both French
aid and a popular uprising which both compelled and rallied noble
support.
Equally noble conspiracies did not guarantee success of themselves,
even when there were considerable popular and noble grievances to
exploit, as those of Medina-Sidonia and Ayamonte in Andalusia in 1641,
van der Bergh in the southern Netherlands or the marquess of Acaya in
Naples. Pseudo-Marxist explanations that the Bohemian revolt mainly
failed because the nobles refused to seek peasant support seem unrealistic,
but do point to an obvious but important limitation. The Old English in
Ireland were uneasy in joining a rebellion against Protestant landlords,
even though their titles were based on confiscation. Plots by magnates in
France in the twenty years after 1629 failed to achieve much popular
support, during a period of widespread popular revolts. Condd and the
princely Frondeurs did get some popular support most notably in
Bordeaux and to some extent in Paris. Popular revolts were usually anti-
fiscal in origin, but war often increased dependence or identification of
interests in relationships between crowns and great nobles. They could
afford to buy for cash, or as rewards for loyalty and service, the crown's
regalian rights, and became defenders of a prerogative they held in pawn.
As communes or peasants fell into debt, or government obligations fell in
value, there were bargains to be snatched by those who had cash, or
power to borrow it. But, as we have seen, fiscal pressures meant that
peasants were less able to pay rents and seigneurial dues; quartering of
troops was particularly ruinous to both peasants and landlords.
Thus a noble's credit both in the literal sense of being able to go on
owing large sums to the state or individuals and in the sense of prestige
was more necessary than ever to maintain his status, and essential if he
wanted to increase his power and wealth. If in peacetime no king's
55
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
revenues were enough to satisfy all his magnates and their followers, the
pressures of war finance made royal favours more valuable and the
magnates' support more necessary. Too much pressure could impair
even the loyalty of Castilian grandees, as Olivares demonstrated. The
nobles of Portugal and Catalonia were nearer to the court than those of
Italy, yet seemed as cut off from its opportunities. Catalonia had little in
the way of royal demesne and regalian rights which could be auctioned
off as in Italy. By the 1640s most European nobilities had undergone an
inflation of titles, new men had bought their way in and more land and
wealth had been concentrated in great estates. Some broad resemblances
can be seen in Castile, Naples, Sicily, Bohemia, Austria, France and
Sweden, in so far as magnates were actively or passively allied with
governments, financiers, jurist councillors and military entrepreneurs in
exploiting war. The main victims at home or abroad were rural popula-
tions, but to varying degrees towns, office-holders and lesser nobles were
under increasing pressure.
War and war finance tended to destroy the plausibility of royal govern-
ments as dispensers of protection and justice to their subjects. A general
slogan of popular revolts was 'Long Live the king without the taxes'. The
sheer lack of protection was at its worst in Germany, where peasants'
attempts to defend and revenge themselves against troops led to savage
reprisals. Towns and communes might pay large sums to remain the direct
vassals of the crown, yet great nobles in Castile and Italy could often
protect their estates and vassals from the worst excesses of royal troops
and tax-farmers; flight from villages under royal jurisdiction to those
under private ones was not peculiar to Sicily. In France there was a con-
stant struggle by rural nobles, royal officers and town oligarchs to reduce
the burden of the taille on their own tenants and peasants at the expense
of others. Thus the intendants seemed to play an ambiguous part, they
were simultaneously the instruments of the tax-farmers imposing collec-
tion, contrainte solidaire, distraints by armed force and also of attempts to
ensure more equitable assessments. Both processes involved over-riding
the interests of local officers and nobles.
Peasants and the poor could be incited to rebel in the name of provincial
liberties against new taxes, or new royal officials by both urban oligarchies
(including royal officers) and nobles. This was the complement to services
of protection against distraints and billeting which seigneurs might
provide at other times and which might also unite taillables and privileged
even against the intendants' attempts at equitable assessment. Peasant
revolts in France were usually directed against tax-farmers and fiscal
officials. Unlike the rebels of 1647 in Naples, they seldom attacked nobles
or seigneurial dues. In the more peaceful conditions of 1614, villages in
Champagne had complained about hunting rights, abuses of seigneurial
justice, arbitrary raising of dues, and the abuses produced by clientage in
56
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
assessing the faille?- Perhaps pressure of war finance made such grievances
less dominant, but the areas which later saw peasant risings do not include
Champagne, which was a heavily garrisoned frontier province. In the
later sixteenth century provinces as far apart as Languedoc and Picardy
had seen effective resistance to paying tithes which apparently ceased
under Louis XIII. Tithes were not the first target of most peasant dis-
turbances, though they are put first in what seems the least negative and
most spontaneous programme, that of 'the peasant commune' of Poitou
in 1636.*
The peasants took most of the risks and were the chief victims of
repression, frequently conducted by provincial governors, or clients of
magnates, assisted by officers of the high robe from Paris. The intendants
were not usually regarded by provincial governors as rivals to their
authority; magnates, like Conde and Longueville, co-operated with and
protected them from the resentments of provincial nobles and officers.
Again what Parisian merchants, the Parlements, officers and the lesser
nobility had in common was resentment of taxation and financial mis-
management. All had selfish reasons for their violent attacks on the way
the royal finances had inflicted misery on the masses, but that does not
make the misery less real. They were unable to maintain any unity or
pursue common objectives together. Yet they had one dominating common
hatred, the financiers and tax-farmers, and all wanted a Chambre de
Justice to punish and mulct them. The lesser nobles' demands show their
jealousy of the magnates, as well as of the high robe. The nobles of
Champagne sought reductions of court expenses and pensions and that all
governors of provinces and towns should be resident, holding office for
three years only: followed by a year without office in which complaints
could be heard. 3 The noble assemblies of 1651-2 were particularly con-
cerned about ensuring protection from exactions and quartering of troops
and suggested raising companies of nobles to protect their provinces.
Mazarin's triumph meant the restoration of the financiers and most of the
magnates, even Cond6 was restored to his governorships in 1659. The
Chambre de Justice had to wait for the personal rule of Louis XIV.
The triumph of the financiers after the Fronde contrasts with their fate
in Spain in the 1650s even though Fouquet was later to be made a scape-
goat for their unpopularity. Although some French financiers were
foreigners, the greatest being Barthelemy d'Herwarth, in Spain native
Castilians were of very minor importance. Down to the suspension of
payments in 1627 Genoese bankers dominated the crown's affairs. There-
1
Y. Durand (ed.), Cahiers du Doliances des Paroisses du Bdilliage de Troves (1966), pp.
58-9,65-7.
s
R. Mousnier (ed.), Lettres . . . au Chancelier Seguier, Vol. n (1964), pp. 1105-6; cf.
p. 1164.
* R. Mousnier, J. Labaut, Y. Durand (eds.), Deux Cahiers de la Noblesse (1649-51)
(1963), pp. 142, 152-3, 82-3.
57
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
after some of them continued with more restricted operations, but they
were largely replaced by Portuguese financiers. This development owed
something to Olivares' desire to keep Spain's trade out of foreign hands,
but more to the zeal of the Portuguese inquisition under Philip II's rule.
Many of Castile's Jews had gone to Portugal and remained there. By
1600 the traditions of Jewish culture and religion were virtually dead in
Spain, while in Portugal common usage made Jew and businessman
synonymous. By 1620 the Inquisition's success in detecting alleged Judai-
zers and encouraging search for purity of blood had led them to complain
that a third of the population was Jewish. The pressure was such that the
descendants of families which had been driven out of Castile began to
return to it as a refuge and resume their medieval role in royal finance.
Philip III sold pardons and privileges to the conversos and in 1628-9 they
bought freedom to trade, marry and settle in Spain, the basis for their
preponderance in the crown's asientos. In 1640 there were 2,000 Portu-
guese merchants in Seville and some 4,000 at Madrid. Olivares protected
them from the Inquisition and even considered relaxing the laws about
purity; their favour and prosperity was a major reason for his unpopu-
larity. Even in the 1630s the Inquisition had tried and ruined at least two
prominent financiers; with the revolt of Portugal and Olivares' fall, the
Portuguese became more unpopular than ever and the Inquisition had
greater freedom. By the 1650s wholesale arrests and condemnations of
Portuguese were taking place. Many of the wealthy fled abroad, but a few
could still buy real immunity. The Cortizos family kept their fortunes,
bought titles, places in the Order of Calatrava and even offices in the
Inquisition. Some lesser men continued as farmers of revenues, despite
persecutions and confiscations. The crown gained from the confiscations,
but finally ruined its credit and any hope of keeping the bulk of overseas
trade out of foreign hands. However, the continual arrests and public
humiliations at autos of monopolists, financiers and tax-farmers by
identifying and punishing the authors of fiscal grievances may have given
both commoners and nobles satisfactions which elsewhere could only be
attempted by rebellions. In this idiosyncratic and distasteful way Castilian
government and society remained united in a hypocritical parody of its
former strength, while in the mid-seventeenth, as in the fifteenth century,
French absolutism was the product of disunion and deadlock between
rival groups, of public weakness, rather than of its own strength.
A special case of entry to the greater landed nobility by financiers is
that of military entrepreneurs which was particularly important in
Bohemia, 1 and to a lesser extent in Austria and Germany. Such entre-
preneurs advanced credit to princes (sometimes borrowing from bankers
and merchants as Hans de Witte did for Wallenstein) to raise and equip
troops. As war continued they accumulated larger credits in the form of
1
See below, Chapter xvn.
58
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
arrears. There were some 1,500 military entrepreneurs in the empire during
the Thirty Years War, most of them were originally noble and some had
also been wealthy. The physical risks might be greater than in ordinary
lending, but if a colonel or commander lived, he could hope to acquire
titles and land. The Bavarian Count von Sporck (1601-79) was the son of
a peasant, but left 3,000,000 thalers. By the late 1630s there was a high
proportion of commoners owning regiments in the imperial army. Over
the whole period they were outnumbered by those born noble, who were
often originally poor, but might acquire titles and landed estates. 1
In Bohemia and Austria the war caused a concentration of land into
greater estates at the expense of the lesser nobility. In Bohemia this pro-
cess was more the result of forfeitures and the endowment of great
military entrepreneurs, than in Austria where the old knightly class
declined and a newly created nobility of civil and military office-holders
increased. In Brandenburg the elector recovered control of his demesnes
which had been mortgaged to the Estates and extended them, while the
lesser nobility survived to a much greater extent to become a nobility of
service as army officers. In Sweden the war created a much more numerous
nobility, often of foreign origin, endowed with revenues alienated by the
crown; but also much concerned with office-holding. The lesser nobles
resented the patronage secured by the council families and their allies
among the new men, who had found fortunes and titles in the German
war. These poorer nobles were willing to support absolutism for the sake
of secure wages as military or civil officers. In Denmark, where the crown
had about half the land, there had been concentration of estates in the
hands of the high nobility whose indebtedness also grew. After 1643 war
and the disruption of foreign trade weakened them further and the price
of land fell. There absolutism after 1660 removed the legal restrictions on
commoners buying noble land, created many new nobles and changed the
old nobility into something much more like a nobility of service.
In England there were honours and titles to sell but little or nothing to
go with them in the way of privileges or jurisdiction. The kings nominated
judges and sometimes sold their places, but they did not sell jurisdiction.
What profits were to be made from sale of office in the central government
went mostly to other office-holders. Sales of crown land were an impor-
tant part of extraordinary finance down to the 1650s, but the crown lands
were an insignificant part of the country's land, compared with Denmark.
There were no permanent direct or indirect taxes to be alienated. Its
unpaid justices of the peace constituted a kind of nobility of service which
was not necessarily less responsive to royal commands than corporations
or holders of venal offices. As a result of the civil war new men and
families temporarily dominated local government. But the traditional
order which was restored, though more oligarchic, was not a closed
1
F. Redlich, The German Military Enterpriser (Wiesbaden, 1964), Vol. I.
59
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
oligarchy based either on claims to absolutist tutelage over local com-
munities or on the alienation of royal authority to holders of hereditary
fiefs.
One of the major themes of the period is certainly the transformation
and consolidation of noble power. But we lack detailed analyses of the
origins of even the greater nobility in most countries and means of com-
paring rates of change with other periods, let alone estimates of their
relative wealth and power. However, it is clear that almost everywhere
there was a great increase in the number of higher titles and that both old
and new families could profit from the financial difficulties of princes.
In many countries there was a growth of great estates partly at the expense
of the lesser nobles. The lesser nobles' best chance of survival seems to
have been by becoming a service nobility, as in Brandenburg and Sweden;
to some extent this must also have happened in France with maintenance
of a large standing army after 1659. In Italy and Spain there seems to
have been a sharing of state and economic power with the greater nobles,
who in a sense take over, or at least become the main beneficiaries of
absolutist monarchies, whereas in Poland though magnates were still the
main beneficiaries, the constitutional forms were a negation of absolutism.
Castile perhaps provides the other example of a state where a very
numerous nobility accepted magnate predominance with even less open
social disturbance. While the dominance of letrados in sixteenth-century
administration may sometimes be exaggerated, the growing importance
of councillors of 'cape and sword' after 1600 is undeniable. Perhaps this
led to an identification of interests between robe and sword such as took
place in eighteenth-century France. Another possibly important mechan-
ism was the way limpieza and the Inquisition operated. The purity laws
had certainly been used to embarrass the higher nobility and the town
oligarchies in the sixteenth century. Under Philip III the nobles com-
plained at length of the consequences of esteeming 'a common person
who is limpio more than a hidalgo who is n o t . . . ' . In 1624 crown decreed
restrictions of proofs and above all of disproofs of limpieza and ordered
the destruction of all writings purporting to show impure descent of
families (almost always important noble ones). The concentration of the
Inquisition's attention on the Portuguese provided a convenient and
popular diversion. By the 1650s it was said that nobles of mixed blood felt
safe enough to speak disdainfully of the Inquisition. A French observer
expressed astonishment at the urban character of the nobles and their
lack of hunting rights and the fact that artisans and tradesmen dressed
like nobles and wore swords. He exaggerated, but his comments point to
a victory for noble aspirations which unified Castilian society, when other
victories eluded it.
These trends among nobilities may be seen as one of the results of the
many attempts to reform states in this period. The demands of rebels for
60
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
the restoration of ancient privileges and levels of taxation had as little
success as the plans of lawyers for restoring constitutions, or of statesmen
and pamphleteers for reforming taxation, balancing budgets and increas-
ing national wealth. The conscious plans were swamped by the needs of
war which themselves produced expedients, with important and lasting
effects, such as the intendants in France, the introduction of the excise and
land tax in England. Even in Spanish Italy a certain amount of redress of
some of the worst fiscal abuses happened after 1660. Yet it can be argued
that the most successful of all the attempts to carry out general plans for
reforming states in a period full of such plans was the reform of the
Ottoman state.
By the mid-seventeenth century the Ottomans had produced a number
of treatises, as concerned with the diagnostics of decline and its remedies
as those of the much more prolific Spanish arbitristas} The Ottoman
reformers tended to be pessimistic and had all had direct experience of
government, unlike some of the arbitristas. Like the French they wanted
to abolish sale of office as the root of all evil, like the Scots and English
Puritans they wanted to restore the direct rigour of the Sacred Law. They
saw (less reluctantly than the leaders of the New Model Army) that this
could only be done by a man of the sword. What can easily be overlooked
is that in the short run they were much more successful than their western
counterparts. Murad IV and the Koprulii Vezirs really did produce effec-
tive reforms, as the revival of efficiently kept tax registers and records
shows. They were far more ruthless in dealing with tax-farmers and
usurpations of revenues, lands and rights than western governments. Their
immediate success was perhaps partly due to the fact that what they were
trying to restore was not a mythical past of Anglo-Saxon, or Frankish
liberties, of primitively pure Christianity, or a Christian imperium, but a
government which really had existed and flourished a couple of generations
ago and whose records and achievements were carefully studied.
This was also their undoing. They found themselves restoring a system
of government and above all a military machine which was inappropriate
to its tasks. In temporarily restoring something like the old order, they
also restored its contradictions which had already produced the near
collapse of the early seventeenth century. The Ottoman government was
remarkably successful in mobilizing resources; this remained true even
after the great defeats of the late seventeenth century. It was its increasing
inability to make effective use of those resources above all in war which
mattered. As always it could borrow the latest weapons, or experts in
engineering and artillery from western Europe. What it could not borrow
effectively were the tactics, drill and organization of European field armies
which could provide a defensive pattern which was virtually unbeatable
1
B. Lewis, 'Ottoman observers of Ottoman decline', Islamic Studies (Karachi), Vol. I
(1962), pp. 71-87.
61
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
by Ottoman formations, as Montecuccoli first demonstrated at St
Gotthard (1664).
Some Ottoman reformers saw the crucial importance of European sea-
power, but plans for promoting overseas trade and native industry do
not seem to have occupied them seriously. Traditional Ottoman policies
might almost be called the opposite of mercantilism in that it favoured
foreign merchants and taxed exports highly. However, in European states
fiscal necessity usually over-rode all other considerations in executing
policies, and realization of the desirability of promoting native industry,
trade and shipping was no guarantee that such results would happen, as
the examples of Spain and Poland show. Once the supreme example of a
state effectively organized for large-scale war, the Ottoman Empire was
in danger of becoming unable to deal with the new techniques and
organization of war which were emerging.
Clearly war had important effects on European societies, though even
here it can be argued that it merely accelerated trends already apparent
before 1618. This has been argued even more strongly concerning the
economic effects of war, where Germany provides a particularly important
problem. As we have seen, the worsening of the condition of peasants and
the growth of large noble estates were certainly not peculiar to Germany,
but equally Germany was not the only country affected by the pressures
of war, though they were certainly more direct and terrible there. The
Thirty Years War can also be seen as not having seriously affected the
obedience of German prices to the general behaviour and trends of
European ones. Slicher van Bath has argued that 'When the average
price level remains for a very long time below that of an equally long
period immediately preceding it, we can speak of a fundamental change.'
Measured in silver equivalents the price of rye behaves in this way in
Germany, falling by 40% or more, comparing 1650-99 with 1600-49,
and so indicating a prolonged agrarian depression in Europe especially
in arable farming. 1 Yet making the same comparison the international
price of rye at Amsterdam and Danzig fell by 7% and 1% respectively.
Domestic prices of grain in the Netherlands fell very little or even rose
slightly and the same is true of England. French prices in silver did not
fall nearly so far as German ones and nominal prices of wheat at Beau-
vais, Toulouse and Paris rose by about 30%. The only prices which seem
to follow the German pattern are Italian ones; wheat at Bassano, Pavia
and Siena fell by over 25%, as did rye at Milan. Germany and northern
Italy probably lost more population than other areas, 1620-40. A Euro-
pean model built on German prices may be deceptive.
However, this process has been taken a stage further by arguing that
German prices and economic trends 'are part of a general European
1
The Agrarian History of Western Europe, pp. 206-10.
62
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
crisis' and are 'completely in harmony with the long-term movement of
prices in Western E u r o p e . . . When the depression of the decade 1640-50
began in Germany, it was one that hit the whole European economy and
was not exclusively due to the Thirty Years War.' 1 By looking at prices
exclusively in silver the two decades after 1600 can be seen as a period of
falling grain prices, heralding depression or crisis. Clearly the wholesale
debasements preceding the war do indicate economic difficulties. Yet
quite apart from these, German grain prices 1600-50 show more violent
fluctuations than in the sixteenth century. This is not true of the southern
Netherlands and does not seem to be true of some French series. The
short- and long-term behaviour of German prices during and after the
war seems to have peculiar characteristics which may be due to the excep-
tionally strong impact of war.
TABLE
1590-9
1614-23
1624-31
1635-44
1646-53
1. Shipping through the Sound {index numbers)
Total no.
of passages Total of
Dutch and
Frieslanders Tonnage of
Dutch and
Frieslanders
100 100 100
90
53
65
62 97
51 132
56 107
136
62
75
Source; P. Jeannin, 'Les comptes du Sund . . .', Revue Historique, Vol. ccxxxi (1964),
p-75-
If the volume of maritime trade is any indication of production or
prosperity, Jeannin's work on the Sound tolls is of the greatest impor-
tance. The volume of shipping was commanded by the amount of grain
exported and over 80% consisted of Dutch ships. There was a slump in
the 1570s and 1580s, then, as Table 1 shows, a boom in the 1590s (fol-
lowed by a decline) then new growth until 1623. The slump 1624-31 was
caused first by bad harvests 1622-4 and then by the Swedish blockade of
the Vistula. Expansion was resumed in 1635 and the peak of the whole
series was reached in 1649-50. The lasting fall in volume came after 1653,
not after 1623. This was mainly because western Europe became more
self-sufficient in grain. However the value of exports from the Baltic may
have risen, since industrial materials, such as iron hemp and flax, in-
creased. Earlier exports of flax, hemp and potash had increased con-
siderably after 1618, remaining at a high level after 1624. Swedish exports
of bar iron were growing rapidly from the 1620s. From 1630 to 1650 the
amount exported from the Baltic and the volume of Dutch shipping were
1
H. Kamen, 'Economic and social consequences of the Thirty Years War', Past and
Present, no. 39 (1968), pp. 44-61.
63
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
all rising, while prices at Amsterdam were stable. There was clearly
expansion as well as recovery from the slump of the 1620s.
These exports of industrial materials point to industrial growth in
western Europe. The cloth industries of Reims and Amiens recovered
from the disasters of the late sixteenth century and then expanded until
about 1635, after which production fell. The textile industries of the
southern Netherlands recovered and the linen industry expanded down
to 1640. The woollen industries of Gand and Bruges probably reached
higher outputs than in the sixteenth century. In the north the growth of
Leiden's cloth output slackened 1620-33, but then went on to reach its
peak 1654-65. Despite the decline of the old draperies in England after
1618, the new draperies expanded until 1640 and a silk industry was
established. Some of this growth was no doubt at the expense of Italy, just
as some of the growth of shipping and trade was at her expense and that
of the Iberian Powers. The longer and cruder index of shipping through
the Sound in Table 2 suggests that there was no sudden fall after 1660 and
that the level remained appreciably greater than that of a hundred years
earlier.
TABLE
2. Dutch ships westwards through the Sound (annual averages)
(I) (2) (3)
No. of
ships Snapper* total
in 1,000s
lasts Jeanninf average
Dutch ships
in lasts
(4)
(1) x (3)
in 1,000s
lasts
1562-8
1574-80
1581-90 1,343
1,014
1,321 98-7
60-9
79-4 47
f70 /II2-0
1591-1600 I,6oi 102-6 I60 X 96-1
72 84
95 95-3
141 "5
99-8
no 110-4
1601-10
1611-20 1,337
1,684 967
139 "8
1621-30
1631-40J
1641-50
1651-7
1661-70 1,048
1,004
1,156
887
681 111-o
124-0
161-8
124-2
95-3
40
40
140*
140*
140*
53-7
40-6
636
—
—
—
* F. Snapper, Oorlogsinvloeden op de Overzeese Handel van Holland1$51-1719 (Amster-
dam, 1959), pp. 312-14.
t Jeannin, Le Navire et Veconomie maritime du Nord de VEurope; 3e Colloque Internal,
d'histoire maritime (Paris, i960), pp. 58-61; ships at Konigsberg.
J Eight years only.
The agrarian sector was doubtless more fundamental. Here again
there are indications of early depression east of the Elbe (see Fig. 5, below,
p. 93) and the amount of land reclaimed in the Netherlands fell sharply
after 1664 (see Fig. 4, below, p. 92). It has also been argued that grain
yields fell generally in the seventeenth century, but there is no convincing
64
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008GENERAL INTRODUCTION
evidence of this except for Poland. There are indications that yields
in England may have risen, but elsewhere it seems likely that yields
remained stationary. However, one new crop with higher yields, maize,
was spreading in northern Spain, Italy and southern France. Its use in
Italy has been regarded as an impoverishment of popular diet, but in the
long run it must have made subsistence easier.
Information about the movement of rent remains extremely patchy.
As we have seen in Lombardy the return from land fell after 1623. In
England rents rose considerably and probably faster than prices 1600-40.
They soon recovered from the Civil War, but probably failed to go on
rising in the 1660s. In the southern Netherlands a few leases show rents
rising much faster than prices from 1600 to the 1640s, then falling. French
experience was various. In Beauvaisis and Haut Poitou rents rose till
1650. In Picardy rents returned 1600-30 to levels reached before 1570,
were reduced again by war and then recovered temporarily to higher levels
in the 1660s. Rents of small parcels of land near Paris fell steeply in the
1590s; they then rose steadily 1600-70, but only passed their former
levels in the 1630s. In Languedoc and Provence rents also rose until
about 1670. In Languedoc they had risen no faster than grain prices in
the sixteenth century, but after 1600 they rose considerably faster; by
1650 measured in grain they had risen 50-100%, in money 100-150%.
Probably the main reason for increasing rents was competition for
holdings as population had increased. The farmer's margin of profit was
under twofold attack. Le Roy Ladurie considers that direct taxation had
not risen faster than prices down to 1610. From about 1625 this changed;
by 1650 taxes calculated in grain at constant prices had more than
doubled. The taille took 6-2% of gross revenue in the 1580s and 13% in
1650. It had become a heavier burden than tithe and apparently replaced
it as the main target of peasant unrest. It should be remembered that
indirect taxes had also risen considerably and that the taille in Languedoc
was less burdensome than in many other regions. In Languedoc seig-
neurial dues were of minor importance, but in other regions, such as
Burgundy, they were the means whereby landowners increased their share
of revenue from land at the peasants' expense. In such circumstances
individual peasants as well as village communities became indebted and
sales of peasant strips and communal lands and rights often followed.
Many purchasers were officers, not only from the high robe as at
Dijon, but also lesser ones who had largely replaced merchants as the
municipal oligarchs at Amiens. Some in Burgundy and elsewhere belonged
to old noble families or were village oligarchs [coqs de village]. But many
bought rent charges because they wanted a secure income. Historians
generally deplore such manifestations of rentier ambitions with their
avoidance of entrepreneurial risks, as a victory for attitudes hostile to
rational economic behaviour. Yet given the risk of trade and of direct
65
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
exploitation of land, especially in the 1640s and 1650s, was the preference
for security so irrational? The borrowers by means of rent charges were
probably mainly nobles and peasants, but at Amiens it was the peasants
who were most likely to end by losing their land. Although rent charges
were clearly an important form of investment in most of Europe, we are
still very ignorant of their real economic significance in different countries
and how interest rates really worked. Interest rates were falling every-
where in this period, though again the chronology and significance of this
remains obscure. But it would seem that large and long-term borrowers
were in a much better position than in the sixteenth century, while
peasants were usually the last to feel the benefit of falling interest rates.
They were the victims of war and peace throughout most of Europe west
and east of the Elbe. Upon their acceptance of their fate and upon the
interplay of other political and social groups which sometimes gave some
of them hopes of protection or even prosperity, the history of this as of
other periods is founded.
If peasants, apart from the coqs de village, were victims of society, even
poor ones might help to victimize local scapegoats as witches. Witchcraft
can be seen as a mechanism which by attributing misfortunes, especially
sickness, to ill will by others makes life endurable for those who lack
knowledge and means to control the hazards of living at the margins of
subsistence. From the fifteenth century churchmen distinguished between
natural and demoniac ('black') magic. This distinction might ensure
immunity for intellectuals reviving hermetic traditions but not for village
sorcerers, normally engaged in fortune telling, curative spells, or divining
for lost objects, though always liable to be suspected of interfering with
fertility in men, animals and plants. Witch hunts, led by evangelists of
Protestant or Catholic reform or by learned magistrates, meant wholesale
torture of suspects nominated by local resentments. This produced con-
fessions of the Satanic compacts and Sabbats prescribed by learned hand-
books, followed by executions of widening circles of alleged participants.
In this period there were probably more victims than ever, particularly
in Germany; yet James I, Spanish inquisitors, the German Jesuit Spee and
French parlementaires all became convinced that the standard procedures
and confessions were false. The same arguments had had no effect in the
sixteenth century, but now they gradually influenced judicial proceedings.
The machinery of witch-hunting had perhaps over-reached itself by suc-
cessfully establishing its beliefs at a really popular level. By 1650 libertins
blamed such beliefs on popular superstition, while in France and the
Basque lands popular demands for extirpation of witches were increasingly
thwarted by higher judicial authorities. If some economic historians think
of this period as 'the end of the long sixteenth century', it was also the
beginning of a long seventeenth century in which the cultural traditions
and social and political structures of Europe's ancien regime matured.
66
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER II
THE EUROPEAN ECONOMY 1609-50
T
HE structures and activity of the international economy probably
changed more substantially in the sixteenth century than in the
century which followed. In the earlier period the opportunitities
offered by a series of remarkable explorations and maritime discoveries
progressively altered the volume of commerce and industry, and indeed
the general perspectives of the world as then known. Vasco da Gama,
during his notable voyage in 1497-8, managed to turn the southern cape
of Africa and open a new way to the old riches of the Indies, to the pepper
and spices, the silks, cottons and pearls, the perfumes, drugs and other
merchandise which through the centuries had largely coloured the con-
spicuous consumption of Europe. In another direction the frail expedition
of Christopher Columbus, touching land in the West Indies in October
1492, led the way for fleets of successors to a fresh continent across the
Atlantic. This held forth immense stocks of precious metals and tropical
produce, which Europe did not have but was eager to exploit. However,
the arrival of these resources—sometimes new, often in abundance—did
not find its full explanation in the wavering fortunes of discovery, con-
quest and plunder. As the new territories grew in stature, they disgorged
materials which found their place as commodities in a highly developed
market system. Europe received them, not free but at the cost of increased
output from her economy. These international outlets came in the wake
of territorial conquest and implied expanding export sectors beyond the
natural growth of European trade. They helped to widen the outlook on a
world of apparently unknown possibilities, encouraging a penchant for
intrepid adventure, to which the only limit seemed to be the capacity for
enterprise and endeavour. All this contributed collectively a massive
human achievement.
But in the seventeenth century the panorama had clearly changed.
Although the scale of economic enterprise in real terms was considerably
greater than a century before, the rate of growth was less significant.
Although Europe had grown more populous, more skilful and more
wealthy, its activity had also become relatively less flexible, albeit more
lethargic. It is possible that as economic development progressed,
marginal returns from new resources fell. Indeed, the volume of trans-
actions seemed to have risen beyond the capacities of those resolute,
tight-mouthed and calculating merchant magnates, the Fuggers and
Welsers of Augsburg, the Spinolas and Grimaldis of Genoa, the Stroga-
novs in Russia, to name a few, who in spite of all their outstanding
67
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
achievements were relayed by great corporative undertakings, companies
under joint management, which took the lead. The East India Company
in England and the famous Vereenigde Oostindische Compagnie of the
United Provinces, for example, asserted monopoly rights and acted under
the shadow and protection of their respective states. In time these
commercial organizations became more diversified, with objectives often
indistinguishable from the policies of government. They embodied mer-
cantile theories and advice emanating from such men as Laffemas and
Montchretien, Thomas Mun and Gerald Malynes, Johann Risingh,
Duarte Gomes Solis and other advisers in Europe. State protection,
whether effective or presumptive, had the disadvantage that commercial
and industrial activity came to bear a mounting burden of impositions
inseparable from political aggrandizement. Royal regulations, navigation
acts and attitudes, which have been conveniently lumped together under
the title of Mercantilism, were the price to pay for changing structures of
power and initiative in the different economies. As in many other spheres
of life Europe faced a surfeit of government. Only more successful times,
turned to advantage by the convinced champions of free trade, could
prune the exigencies of Leviathan, embodiment of state power.
Such concepts nevertheless take us beyond the period of this chapter
which within the limits of 1609 and 1650 admittedly has a certain unity
by the norms of traditional history. It opens on the one hand with the
Twelve Years Truce (9 April 1609) signed by the deputies of Philip III of
Spain and of the Estates of the insurgent United Provinces; and closes on
the other hand with the Peace of Westphalia (24 October 1648), which
combined both the Treaty of Osnabruck and the separate Treaty of
Miinster. The Peace of 1648 was destined to settle many of the outstanding
power problems so ferociously disputed in the Thirty Years War, but
left Spain and France to fight on until the settlement in the Treaty of the
Pyrenees (1659). Can the international economy claim an equally valid
compartment in the history of Europe?
It would be simple enough indeed to find economic analogies to the
limits of this period. Did not, after all, the Spanish monarchy again declare
itself bankrupt in 1607, unpapering another crack in this dominant
economy on the high tide of its affairs, at the beginning of a century filled
with rebuffs and bitterness? Was not 1609 also the founding year for the
great Wisselbank of Amsterdam, that unmistakable sign of the financial
ascendancy of the astute and nimble Dutch Republic? And again, at the
close of the period, we find the whole or almost the whole of Europe in
1648-52 shaken by a cycle of violent price fluctuations, a severe crisis of
subsistence typical of the seventeenth century, and perhaps of all econo-
mies before the Industrial Revolution.
Yet such events, whether haphazard, isolated or linked together, do
not make the setting of this chapter. It is necessary to establish the unity
68
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN ECONOMY I6OO.-5O
of the first half of the seventeenth century as a phase in the economic
development of Europe justifiable in itself. Between 1609 and 1650 or
perhaps more precisely between 1590 and 1650, a culminating point and
watershed was reached in that long phase of prosperity—the long
sixteenth century as Fernand Braudel has aptly called it—which had sus-
tained the economic evolution of Europe since the mid-fifteenth century.
The final surge, already filled with hesitations and uncertainties, covered
the first half of the seventeenth century. It was a double phenomenon.
In the first place, the turning point of this long development was spread
over a fairly wide period of time, commensurately long we should say
with the phase which preceded it. It would indeed be difficult, when deal-
ing with such long secular movements, to fix a precise year, an exact crisis
valid for the entire international economy. The movement was similar to
the turn of a high tide, when some time must pass at slack water before
the observer can say for certain that the ebb has set in. This chapter covers
a similar reversal in the economic history of Europe. It probably lasted
half a century.
The second aspect: the economic down-turn was not of the same nature
for all the countries of the continent of Europe. The evolution of this
polyvalent economy followed a complex pattern, and long-term growth
and recession did not necessarily affect all the regions of Europe in the
same way. For some, as in the case of Spain and many Mediterranean
countries, the turn of the sixteenth century proved to be a major crisis
affecting their position at the head of European affairs and foreshadowed
decline. This was an absolute upset, unseating a dominant economy and
its dependants. For other economies, as the later developments in Holland
and England were to show, the series of setbacks in the early seventeenth
century were only stages in a march to economic pre-eminence, a series of
difficult crises, which the whole of Europe shared in varying degrees.
Being less directly absorbed in the concentration of power characterized
by the rise of Spain, they resisted longer than the others. Such a difference
in economic temperament serves to emphasize the inherent disparity of
Europe, which the prosperity of the sixteenth century had confronted,
accentuated but failed entirely to resolve.
This dramatic period covered in large measure by the years 1609 to
1650 constitutes a part of what has been aptly described as the crisis of
the seventeenth century. This was a huge movement, much wider than the
material civilization of Europe itself, which was obliged to hesitate,
pause and re-form. Such a crisis was not confined to one year alone, to
one place, to one catastrophe. It took form slowly in the context of the
whole of Europe in half a century of slumps, bankruptcies and shocks of
war, and in effect prepared for a new phase in the long continuity of
economic history. The problem in its full complexity still remains relatively
new. The empirical data for the discussion often leave much to be desired
69
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
and the tentative conclusions presented here must wait for future studies
to clear up the many obscure aspects of changes in this period. In this
chapter, the varying crisis in different sectors—population; money, prices
and wages; trade and production—must claim our attention in turn,
through at least some thirty years of European war, with its inevitable
wastages and destruction.
The problems of population growth in the early seventeenth century,
perhaps typically of pre-industrial economies, remained fundamental to
economic activity. The level of human population indeed implied at once
the available supply of labour—the working force and intelligence to
husband the land and ply the crafts—and at the same time constituted the
potential aggregate consumption of the different communities. Since
population growth was in the nature of a cumulative process, sustained
quantitative changes or even retardation in the rate of increase may be
understood to have had wide repercussions which are difficult to estimate
not only in absolute terms but also in the risks and uncertainties en-
countered by economic enterprise.
Through the long growth of the sixteenth century, the inhabitants
experienced increases in numbers, relatively of considerable significance.
In 1600, according to Joseph Kulischer, Europe—that is the larger Europe
west of the Urals—could claim some 95,000,000. By 1650, another
estimate by Carr-Saunders sets this population at some 100,000,000.
These figures, however, are extremely uncertain and others can be sug-
gested in their place. The still valid data and methods of Julius Beloch
propose, for a smaller-sized Europe however, an overall figure in the
region of 80,000,000 about which the population fluctuated.
The Europe from the Atlantic to the Urals of some 100,000,000 held a
position in the world roughly the same as today, about one-fifth of the
earth's population. According to the same estimates, Asia added some
330,000,000; Africa stood at about the same level as Europe, although
this is no doubt hasty and over-generous; America, 13,000,000; and
Oceania, 1,000,000. Total: 545,000,000. In my opinion a lower figure,
perhaps even as low as some 450-460,000,000, would be more acceptable.
The margin of error in these estimates remains significantly high. The
whole question indeed is largely undecided and open to conjecture.
The distribution of the different regional populations also probably
altered during the period under survey. It would be difficult to follow
such changes in a period as brief as the first half of the seventeenth cen-
tury, but estimates by A. P. Usher and Julius Beloch exist for the whole
century. Some countries, important at the beginning, had declined in
numbers by the end of the century. Germany passed from about 20,000,000
to 15,500,000 and the Low Countries from 3,000,000 to 2,700,000.
70
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN ECONOMY 1 6 0 9 - 5 0
France, however, with the territories solidly acquired by Mazarin and
Louis XIV in 1648 and 1659, probably rose from about 16,000,000 to
20,000,000. These three groups together registered a slight decrease from
39,000,000 in 1600 to 38,200,000 in 1700. Spain and Italy also may have
declined from 8,000,000 and 13,000,000 to 7,300,000 and 11,300,000
respectively in 1700. But can we accept all these assessments as correct?
By the middle of the seventeenth century it is possible that the total
population of Europe had suffered a notable recession. In some areas
this was apparently severe. The inhabitants of Italy may have declined by
twenty per cent; of Germany in general by a third, of Bohemia by half, of
Moravia by a third. A recent estimate for northern France suggests that
a fall in population levels set in after 1640. On the outer fringe of Europe,
there were signs of depopulation in Anatolia. All this tends to corroborate
the hypothesis of an over-all decline by the middle of the century. But the
data are still based on regional estimates and it is often difficult to assess
fully the aggregate effects of inter-regional migrations. By the end of the
century, however, this temporary depression had probably been overcome
and declines in some areas were compensated by advances in others.
Germany in particular had managed in all probability by about 1700 to
repair its great losses and return to the population level of 1600.
There is a further indicator of internal population changes in the density
of inhabitants. About 1600, the three most densely populated countries
were: Italy (with 114 to the square mile); the Netherlands (with 104); and
France (with 88). By 1700 the Austrian Netherlands showed a remarkable
human concentration (137 per square mile compared with 98 for the
United Provinces): Italy had 102; France, 95. Again such estimates are
tentative, but the conclusions tend to coincide with the general knowledge
of the period. At least to some extent, losses in the south of Europe were
adjusted by gains in the north—in the Low Countries, the British Isles
and Scandinavia, which went ahead by comparison with the Mediter-
ranean countries and the Iberian Peninsula.
The general readjustment in Europe's population was also apparent in
the relative positions of the great cities. In the first half of the seventeenth
century some of the notable centres of the 'Mediterranean' economy
tended to lag or even decline—such as Messina, Palermo, Seville and
Antwerp, the financial hub of Spanish affairs in the north. Others such as
Amsterdam, Madrid and Vienna advanced—the two latter, both con-
tinental capitals and administrative centres for vast empires, may be
considered as important signs of structural change. During the seventeenth
century two other great capitals of Europe—Paris and London—
managed to pass the mark of 400,000 inhabitants. Paris, wealthy, brilliant but
dangerous as the Fronde revealed, was soon to drive the grand monarque
to the magnificence of Versailles; London, thriving and looking to the
prosperity ahead, was destined to surpass in size all the other cities of Europe.
71
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
London, indeed, was an example of exceptional urban success. When
John Stow first published his Survey (1598), it had a well-established
position as port, capital and economic focus of the country. It absorbed
citizens in search of work or amusement. It offered asylum from persecu-
tion in other parts of Europe, as the Flemings crowding into Billingsgate
indicated. By 1603, with perhaps as many as 170,000 inhabitants, it was
already disproportionately large for England, standing out, as James I
disdainfully remarked, 'like a head of a rickety child'. And there were
protests. In 1596 the council had complained to the Middlesex magistrates
of' the multitudes of base tenements and houses of unlawful and disorderly
resort in the suburbs'. But the city continued to grow majestically through
the seventeenth century, sprawling beyond the medieval walls and moats,
often still in place, out into the liberties and still again into the outparishes.
At the end of the century, Gregory King proposed a likely population of
550,000 inhabitants. The deaths recorded in the bills of mortality also give
some idea of this expansion.
TABLE 3
Period City (97 parishes) Liberties Outparishi
1604-23
1624-43
1644-63
1664-83
1684-1703 48,000
58,000
59,000
61,000
56,000 74,000
98,000
109,000
120,000
134,000 31,000
55,000
70,000
189,000
145,000
While the recorded deaths in the City remained almost stationary, they
doubled in the liberties and quintupled in the outparishes. By the 1660s
the outparishes returned the greatest number, although this superiority
over the combined totals from the City and the liberties became per-
manent only after the 1680s. London in the seventeenth century, indeed,
bore the mark of success, surviving the Great Plague (1665) and the Fire
(1666). On all sides, as F. J. Fisher has observed, the capital displayed
itself as a notable centre of conspicuous consumption.
If in all probability the total population of Europe stagnated or even
receded in the middle of the seventeenth century, there were some very
good reasons. The inhabitants faced the severe setbacks which most
societies have experienced when pushed to the limits of their resources.
The perennial scourges of mankind—famine, pestilence and war—struck
the communities of Europe perhaps more insistently, more disastrously
during this period.
The famines of the type suffered by the Ancien Regime were more often
due to a series of bad harvests which exhausted the meagre reserves in
hand. Their severity in the early seventeenth century has been linked to
the deterioration in climatic conditions, to that long spell of cold and
72
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN ECONOMY 1 6 0 9 - 5 0
unfavourable weather experienced in Europe after 1600. The evidence of
larch trees at Berchtesgaden suggests that growth was twice as great
before 1600 as after. In Switzerland and Iceland, glaciers probably
reached their first maximum limits in the middle of the seventeenth
century. The existence of this long-term climatic fluctuation, however, in
the present state of our empirical knowledge, must remain an open
question.
Certainly, there were cases of exceptional harvest failures and famines.
In Russia, in 1601, a catastrophic dearth lasted three years, which caused,
so it was reported, some 120,000 deaths in Moscow alone, and brought
the starving peasants crowding into the city for alms. When this finally
was refused, they left to die by the roadside in great numbers. Western
Europe, notwithstanding its relative commercial sophistication, suffered
two severe bouts of dearth: in 1628-30 and in 1648-52.
The first cycle probably reached its peak in the spring of 1629. In
Udine, between May 1627 and May 1629, the price of wheat quadrupled,
and the cheaper grains, such as rye and maize, the staple diet of the poor
and the greatest sufferers, rose even more steeply. In England in 1630, the
price of wheat rose above sixty shillings the quarter. But these grim years
in Europe have little to compare with the disasters which tightened condi-
tions in other parts of the world at this time. In India, in the Gujerat, a
Dutch observer records a terrible series of years
an excessive drought, so that the crops withered and the cattle starved in the fields,
then in 1631 such continuous and unusual heavy rains that the rivers overflowed
and covered the land, destroying whole stretches of country, towns and many
villages, and ruining the standing crops, which were most promising. The result was
a great famine and horrible mortality both of men and cattle . . .
Grain prices rose twenty times; cannibalism was rife
but a still more horrible sight was seen: the village named Susuntra, where human
flesh was sold openly in the market... in the years which followed, these calamities
began to cease and food began to grow at the former price, but still the present days
and abundance of provisions are not to be compared with former times. May God
Almighty preserve all Christian countries from such plagues . . .
The second cycle of high food prices was exceptionally acute in
1649-50. Cloudbursts in 1649 and consequent harvest failures prepared
the way for winter and early spring months of extreme difficulty. The
phenomenon was present over large areas of Europe, in Italy and England,
in France and Poland. Between 1645-6 and 1649-50, the price of wheat
more or less doubled in England and France, and trebled in Italy. In Lwow
in Poland the price of oats between 1643 and 1651 rose eight times (see
Fig. 1).
The direct effects of famines on the total size of Europe's population,
however, are difficult to measure with certainty. Crop failures, or even a
series of crop failures, wrought their disastrous effects not so much
4
73
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
M H FDECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
MAX.
Min.
MAX.
Min.
Exeter
Beauvais Rozay en Brie Siena
Fig. i. A wheat crisis in Europe, 1639-60 [reference: F. Braudel and F. C. Spooner,
Cambridge Economic History of Europe, Vol. iv, ed. E. E. Rich and C. H. Wilson (1967)].
The movement of prices is shown as an index, based on the period from the fourth quarter
1639 to the first quarter 1640 (= 100).
directly through famine deaths as indirectly through the diseases asso-
ciated with pernicious undernourishment. Any question of food shortages
turned inevitably on the not less important question of the adequacy of
food consumption.
The standards of nutrition probably deteriorated in the seventeenth
century. This has been suggested in the case of Poland. In Italy after
74
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN ECONOMY 1 6 0 9 - 5 0
the difficult years of the 1620s and 1630s there were signs of inferior diets.
In Udine the cheaper maize, destined to become the staple food of the
poor, appeared in the official market lists from September 1622. There
also from 1668, mixtures of grains and pulses were officially quoted—
wheat and rye; wheat, rye and lentils; maize, sorghum and buckwheat;
and others—substitutes and signs of distress, which disappeared only after
the middle of the eighteenth century. In Sweden, the food budgets for the
manor of Gripsholm show a decline in the daily intake of calories:
TABLE 4
Year Daily consumption of calories
1555
1638
1653
1661 4.166
2,480
2,883
2,920
It would be very convenient to accept this example of Gripsholm as
evidence of growing malnutrition and exposure to disease in the general
crisis of the seventeenth century. But can these food estimates in Scandi-
navia prove the case?
It is within the realm of possibility that other biological factors also
played a part in the changing structure of Europe's population, including
overcrowding, insecurity and general stress. Certainly, severe epidemics
struck Europe in the seventeenth century. The housing problems of the
cities faced town authorities with the dangers of filth and poor hygiene.
London was no exception. Piped water was a rarity, and households even
after the opening of the new river in 1613 were largely supplied by water
carriers from the public conduits. The crowded suburbs, with buildings
quickly thrown up to meet the pressure for housing, became breeding
grounds for disease and particularly for rat-borne plague. The plagues of
1603, 1625, 1636 and later the great plague of 1665, according to Charles
Creighton, appeared first and made their greatest ravages in the suburbs.
The plague of 1636, to cite another notable instance, was severe in
Newcastle (Northumberland), growing rapidly to meet the expanding
coal trade.
Scarcely a year passed without a serious outbreak of some sort or
other. There were bouts of fever, cholera, the 'sweating sickness', as well
as the plague which made its last serious appearances as an epidemic
sickness in the seventeenth century. The form of war typhus associated
with Europe reached a peak in the Thirty Years War with the inevitable
sieges, pitched battles and pillaging of marauding armies. England came
to know its gravity in 1643 in the Civil War. And heavy plague years were
often bad years for deaths from other diseases: in London typhus fever in
75
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
«"•DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
1625 and 1636, and smallpox in 1641, claimed many victims. Dysentery—
the 'griping of the guts' as the mortality bills described it after 1658—
appeared more frequently in the records of the seventeenth century.
Although plague did not strike alone, it was the great killer. In Italy
in the wake of the dearths of 1628-9 the plague of 1630 made terrible
inroads on the population. In that year alone, according to Julius Beloch,
a million and a half died in the peninsula, of whom two-thirds perished
in the plain of Lombardy. Bologna, the city and district taken together,
lost 29,698; Venice, Chioggia and Malamocco 46,490 (about 35% of the
inhabitants); Padua about 17,000 (44%); Verona, city and suburbs
together, 31,000 (59%); Parma about 20,000 (50%); Cremona about 25,000
(60%). The plague of 1656 was less severe but nevertheless was notable in
Liguria and the kingdom of Naples. The cities of Genoa and Naples
probably lost as many as half of their inhabitants. These figures, clearly,
can be accepted only after allowing for some measure of exaggeration and
margins of error in counting.
Such losses sometimes halved the urban populations and left scars
which were difficult to efface. Milan, which had had a population of
180,216 in the time of Borromeo, after 1630 claimed about 100,000. After
the great plague in 1630, Bologna had fallen from 65,000 to 46,747 in
1631. Venice with a population of 142,804 in 1624, held 98,244 in 1633.
There the pestilence made its greatest inroads on the poor, as can be seen
from the changing percentages between the main social groups:
TABLE 5
Year Nobles
(nobiles)
1624
1633 %
39
4-0
Burgesses
(cittadini)
0/
Inhabitants
(popolani)
0/
/o /o
7-4
io-6 887
854
Genoa with 68,000 inhabitants in 1608 was reduced to 38,360 in 1660.
The Netherlands also suffered heavy losses. Haarlem lost 5,723 in the
plague of 1655. Leiden, with 44,745 inhabitants in 1622, lost 9,897 in
1624-5, 14,582 in 1635, and 10,529 in 1655. Amsterdam sustained nine
noteworthy attacks between 1617 and 1664, of which four were particularly
grave: 11,795 deaths in 1624 (or 1 in 9); 17,193 in 1636 (1 in 7); 16,727 in
1655 (1 in 8); and 24,148 in 1664 (1 in 6). This great financial centre paid
heavily indeed for the prosperous expansion of its affairs.
And in London, the same terrible record. In 1603 some 30,000 are said
to have died from the plague. The same disease claimed 35,417 in the
period from May to November 1625. In the year of the Great Plague of
1665, the deaths recorded were as follows:
76
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN ECONOMY 1 6 0 9 - 5 0
TABLE 6
Year Plague Fever Smallpox Total deaths
1665 68,596 5,257 655 97,306
These were clearly greater than in 1630, 1636, and 1647, when the losses
could represent perhaps as many as a quarter of the inhabitants.
The third great setback to the population of Europe was the destruction
of war. For thirty years this misfortune coursed across the battle-grounds
of Germany, and although most countries on the continent felt its effects,
the empire was the greatest sufferer. Here and there according to the
estimates of Giinther Franz the losses were immense, but not all the
regions were affected in the same way. Some areas—the north-west
fringe, Austria and the cantons of Switzerland—came through the trials
almost unscathed. Others were less gravely tested: Moravia, Saxony
and Silesia had losses of 15 to 20%. The rest of Germany, however,
bore the brunt of the conflict. Some regions lost 40%; Bohemia, Branden-
burg, Magdeburg, Thuringia, Bavaria and Franconia were reduced by
half. Some estimates for Mecklenburg, Pomerania, Coburg and Hesse,
the Palatinate and Wurtemberg put the losses at 60 to 70%, while in
pockets between Augsburg, Nuremburg and Stuttgart the losses in some
rural districts could have risen as high as four-fifths, towns being reduced
to the level of villages. With the direct losses of war came disease and
starvation, heaping disaster on disaster. Much still remains to be known
about these dark and sorry years in German history.
TABLE 7
Origin
Low Countries
Belgium
France
Germany
Others
In percentages
1655-9
Destination 1590-4
Amsterdam
Leiden
Middelburg
Amsterdam
Leiden
Middelburg
Amsterdam
Leiden
Middelburg
Amsterdam
Leiden
Middelburg
Amsterdam
Leiden
Middelburg 50-4
155
180
34-3
53-3
721
1-8
26-8
58
II-2
30
1-9
1-8
1-3
2-2
53-6
41-2
439
50
152
30-5
37
182
136
28-8
216
3-3
69
32
8-7
77
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Yet the absolute level of such losses still remains open to conjecture.
It is difficult to dissociate deaths from the redistribution of population
through emigration. There were open cities, places of refuge, such as
Amsterdam, London, Constantinople and many others, ready to absorb
migrants. Something of the scale of such movements can be seen from the
origins of newcomers to Amsterdam, Leiden and Middelburg, between
1590-4 and 1655-9 (see Table 7).
After some sixty years the majority of the newcomers to these cities arrived
from the drift to the cities in the Netherlands, or from Germany rather
than, as at the end of the sixteenth century, from the Low Countries
under Spanish control. Both these areas in turn had been trouble-spots
and so the exodus from theatres of war thus contributed to the general
redistribution of population.
n
The link between population problems and the waning prosperity of the
sixteenth century is by no means easy to measure from the tentative
estimates of population: redistribution and migrations, as we have seen,
cloud the issues. The sectors of money and prices, however, fix more precisely
both the turning points and the changing relationships between the different
regions of the international economy in the early seventeenth century.
Monetary problems received a good deal of publicity in the writings of
contemporary bullionists and mercantilists. Bullion served ultimately to
adjust trading balances and underwrite a credit system, which was rarely
able to venture very far from final settlements in coin. The prosperity of
the long sixteenth century had been marked by an astonishing increase in
the precious metals at the disposal of Europe, from Africa, from Europe
itself, and finally from the extraordinary mines of Mexico and Peru. By
far the greater part had been counted through the House of Trade—the
Casa de la Contratacion—in Seville. Spain became the pressure point for
the monetary circulations of Europe.
This state of affairs underwent radical changes in the early seventeenth
century, even though at first sight little seemed to have altered. The fleets
of galleons arrived irregularly under heavy convoy from the New World.
Only once did they fail to make port and this was a day indeed for jubila-
tion among the enemies of Spain. In 1628 Admiral Pieter Pieterzoon Heyn
(1578-1629), commanding the squadrons of the Dutch West India Com-
pany, waylaid and captured the larger part of the treasure-fleet, taking it
in triumph to Amsterdam to provide the company shareholders with a
50% dividend. But this was a rare event. Spain did not easily relinquish
her position as the centre for bullion in Europe. All the documents bear
witness to this reality. After 1685, when Cadiz assumed the place of
Seville, the centre of high pressure had hardly shifted.
78
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN ECONOMY I 6 O 9 - 5 O
The real crisis came when that pressure began to fade. The shipments
of bullion reached their peak point in the decade of the 1590s and declined
through the seventeenth century (see Fig. 2). By the 1640s the cargoes of
gold were 8% of those in the 1590s and silver had fallen to 39%.
TABLE
8. Average annual imports of gold and silver in Seville
from the New World, in kilograms
Period Gold Silver
1591-1600
1641-50 1,945
155 270,763
105,643
Various explanations have been proposed for this failure to maintain
the position of the sixteenth century: difficulties of labour, mining and
extraction; of obtaining cheap mercury for the amalgamation process.
In addition, it must be observed that in the eighteenth century (see
Fig. 6) when the New World again experienced expanding production of
precious metals, it was Mexico not Peru which led the way. To all appear-
ances, Peru was the greatest loser in the early seventeenth century. The
drain of silver to the East directly across the Pacific has also been sug-
gested as a possible factor. The recent study of Pierre Chaunu, however,
rejects this hypothesis and shows that the movement of Spanish trade
between Acapulco and Manila followed the general trend of trade in the
Atlantic: it was in decline from the decade 1606-15. The problem was
probably more general. The production of gold and silver like other
industrial sectors fell victim to the relentless law of diminishing marginal
returns and declining profits. From the monetary point of view an
important turning point was taken. The sixteenth century had passed its
prime.
Yet, while the additions to the stocks of gold and silver money declined,
the requirements for circulating medium continued to grow with advanc-
ing prosperity, expanding transactions and rising price-levels in some
cases prolonged through the Thirty Years War. Silver was particularly
required for settling debtor trading balances. Bullion flowed from Spain,
where it was relatively abundant, to the less well-endowed areas of
Europe's economy: to Poland, eastern Europe and Russia, whose com-
mercial systems grew more and more accustomed to a money economy;
to the Levant, India, the East Indies and China, where silver coins espe-
cially the famous Spanish piece of eight reals gave merchants the advan-
tage of a buyer's market. From Venice alone in 1610-14, the silver
Spanish reals officially exported to the Levant amounted to six per cent
of the silver being imported at Seville. Although this was an important
trading centre, it was not the only outlet. We must also take into account
79
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
1450
1500
1550
I \\ i r r i
i r T T
Ratio scale for
|
nortiinal wheat prices
1600
1650
1700
1750
10 q
8 -
7 -
6 "
5 "
4 -
3 -
2-
In thousands of pesos
-35,000
-30,000 35,000
30,000
-20,000 20,000
-10,000 10,000
I
No. of units of silver
per unit of gold
16 -
-15
10
10"
xli.
1450
I
I
I
1500
I
I
I
I
1550
I
I
i i i r
I I I I
1600
1650
1700
I
1750
Fig. 2. (a) Average nominal prices of wheat in Europe; (b) average prices of wheat in
grams of silver per hectolitre; (c) the value of imports of gold and silver at Seville [reference:
E. J. Hamilton, American Treasure and the Price Revolution in Spain 1501-1650 (Cambridge,
Mass., 1934)]; (<0 the bimetallic ratios in Europe (ten-yearly averages).
80
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN ECONOMY
1609-50
the trade from ports such as Genoa, the financial dependency of Spain,
from Leghorn, Naples, Marseilles, Barcelona . . . And in the north, the
great East India Companies of Holland and England, the expeditions
from France and Denmark commandeered silver for export with official
permission. These were some indications of the demands on the declining
supplies, and of the potential monetary difficulties, which characterized
the early seventeenth century.
In effect, a whole mercantile system was placed in jeopardy. Spain had
attracted the attention of the great financial entrepreneurs, who found
through Spain the required opening into both the bullion markets of
Europe and the trade with the New World. The Fuggers and Welsers of
Germany, the Spinolas of Genoa had not hesitated to throw themselves
into the Spanish venture, forming liaisons which often, officially at least,
lasted until the failures of the first half of the seventeenth century. This
commercial activity enlivened the whole economic system, with its relays
of fairs and bourses to adjust balances and settle international accounts.
If this system had enjoyed smooth continuity, any change would at once
have been more easily evident. In reality, however, the monetary and
financial systems tended to respond to the irregular cadence of the treasure
fleets arriving in Seville. Before these galleons made port, the money
markets were tight, as merchants in their letters all over Europe testified.
After the unloading of the treasure fleet, the markets one after another
reported easier monetary conditions. For the early seventeenth century,
the periods of tight money appeared longer and more persistently,
precipitating shortages and even failures. These uncertainties acted as a
restraining force on the interaction and expansion of the international
economy at large.
Such shortages naturally did not pass unheeded. The first serious effects,
paradoxically enough, were felt in Spain, unsettled by the expenses of
grandiose politics, increasingly unstable, as though the system was rotting
at the core. There, too, the government intervened in the conscious effort
to expand the monetary circulation and cull profits and revenue for
itself. It ordered the minting of large quantities of copper maravedis. These
were small coins which had their most severe repercussions on the daily
life of the country. The estimates by Earl J. Hamilton of the quantities of
this coin put into circulation are:
TABLE 9
Value of copper coins issued, in
Period
1599-1606
1617-19
1621-6
ducados (each worth 375 maravedis)
22 millions
5 millions
14 millions
8l
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
The nominal value of these masses of copper coin was further increased
by restamping at higher currency rates in 1603, 1636, 1641 and 1651. In
addition, the situation was aggravated by vast quantities of counterfeit
copper money smuggled into the country. In this coinage the monarchy
found only a stop-gap relief measure in a fevered effort to fill the coffers.
Later the repercussions became all too evident and prepared the royal
bankruptcies of 1607 and 1627.
The economic consequences were indeed disastrous. Inevitably, the
copper currency clogged the circulation, and true to the so-called Gres-
ham's Law, drove out the more valuable silver and gold coins. At first,
during the Twelve Years Truce, the effects were not painfully apparent.
The premium on silver was about 1% in 1603, and rose slowly to 3% in
1619. But with the outbreak of the Thirty Years War and the renewed
conflict with the United Provinces (1621), this premium rose unchecked,
with peaks during the silver difficulties of 1626-8 and 1641-2. It reached
50% by the mid-seventeenth century. Such unstable monetary conditions
constituted in reality a progressive devaluation, and were not mastered
in Spain until the 1680s. The pernicious effects impressed observers
abroad, as well as statesmen in Spain. They were pointed out as a lesson
to all.
Other governments used this expedient but with greater caution.
France, although it had already used copper currency since 1578, intro-
duced moderate quantities after 1609. In Sweden, copper currency
assumed a more important role. There the mining and production of
copper was under the close control of the Swedish monarchy and had at
first prospered from the demand of the mints in Spain. Gustavus Adol-
phus, himself hard pressed to finance his military campaigns in Europe,
turned to this expedient in 1624. Copper coinage assumed a particular
importance after 1626 when the foreign demand for Swedish copper fell
after the stop on minting in Spain. The Swedish daler, veritable plates of
copper, became so cumbersome that later in the eighteenth century they
were carried on special sleds. This sort of difficulty later assured the suc-
cess of the credit facilities offered by the Bank of Sweden, founded in
1656, which issued the first bank-notes of Europe. Copper currency
flowed abroad. Further east in Moscow, copper provoked a further inci-
dent, when the coinage, begun in 1656, culminated in a runaway inflation
after 1661 and the famous 'copper riots' in 1663.
In Germany, the governments also tampered with the currency during
the Kipper- und Wipperzeit, a spell of monetary debasements and coin-
clipping which shook the country at the outbreak of the Thirty Years War.
These debasements were examples of hyperinflation even when measured
by the official valuations. In Munich and Augsburg between 1617 and
1622 the silver equivalent of the Rechnungsgulden fell 88%; in Frankfurt
between 1612 and 1622 the devaluation was 72%; in Leipzig between
82
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN ECONOMY 1 6 0 9 - 5 0
1619 and 1622, 82%; in Vienna between 1619 and 1622, 74%; in Stras-
bourg between 1619 and 1622, 66%. These brusque movements formed
relatively short interludes, but the different economies were shaken and
trade disrupted at a particularly delicate moment in the history of the
empire. Only in the last decade of the seventeenth century was Europe
able to overcome these difficulties, all too often provoked by government
interference.
A second aspect of the monetary crisis, which cannot be dissociated
from the general insufficiency of monetary resources, was the rapid
appreciation of gold. This resulted partly from the preponderance of
silver over gold brought from the New World, which was particularly
apparent in the first half of the seventeenth century. More silver was
imported in 1601-60 than in 1503-1600, but far less gold. In 1503-1600
the ratio of silver to gold by weight was about 48 to i; in 1601-60, this
ratio had risen to about 340 to 1.
TABLE
10. Total gold and silver imported in Seville
from the New World, in kilograms
Period Gold Silver Ratio by weight
1503-1600
1601-60 153,564
27,769 7.439,142
9,447,673 1 : 48.44
1 :340.22
The value of gold in terms of silver consequently tended to increase.
This was further augmented as gold was preferred for hoarding, since it
tended to retain its value more easily than silver. About 1550, the average
value of gold to silver in Europe was at an average ratio of about 1 to 11;
by 1600 this had almost reached 1 to 12. By 1650 it had advanced to 1 to
I4i, and by 1700 to about 1 to 15 or 15^ (see Fig. 2). It remained roughly
at this level until after the 'Great Crisis' of 1873. The period of greatest
change in the ratio of gold to silver was in the first half of the seventeenth
century.
This rapid transformation in the structures of gold values was most
apparent in the highly advanced economies and particularly in the upper
levels of the monetary system of Europe concerned with international
trade and finance. The economic growth of the sixteenth century had been
accompanied by a growing volume of bills of exchange passing through
the great fairs and exchanges—the fairs of Medina del Campo, of Lyons
and of Piacenza; through the exchanges of Venice, Paris, London or
Amsterdam . . . These exchanges were often adjusted to a fictitious gold
currency which thus assumed the role of an international accounting
system, even though the actual payments may have been made in silver.
83
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
For Spain there was the gold escudo ox pistole; for France the icu d'or au
soleil; for the fairs of Piacenza the scudi d'oro; and many others. The
relative appreciation of gold threatened to disrupt the established rela-
tionship between contracts and payments in real coin.
The first was part of a complex change in the international economy
itself. As the balance of economic affairs tended to shift away from the
older centres of southern Europe to the smaller but more progressive
economies of the north, the customary markets, fairs and commercial
centres became less involved in trading bulk merchandise, but neverthe-
less retained a primacy in exchange and financial dealings. It is not sur-
prising, therefore, in the face of the changes in gold values, that here and
there a double monetary system evolved, which on the one hand left the
domestic system of accounts flexible to devaluations and freely conver-
tible into gold and silver, but on the other hand stabilized the system of
international payments by retaining customary values. The difference
between the two levels of monetary circulation in effect showed that the
international network of exchanges tended to diverge from the uncer-
tainties of some of the domestic currency systems which were susceptible
to devaluation and government manipulation. This was evident in the
case of Spain and France. About 1600, in Spain the gold escudo (valued at
400 maravedis) and in France the gold icu au soleil (at 60 sols) were both
real gold coins and standards of value for bills of exchange. The gold
devaluation in Spain of 23 November 1609 and in France of September
1602 raised the escudo to 440 maravedis and the ecu to 65 sols in specie; but
left the values of the escudo and the icu in bills of exchange at their old
values, that is 400 maravedis and 60 sols respectively. Did this retention
of the old system of exchange rates show that the international accounting
had reached such an advanced level of homogeneity that merchants were
little inclined to disrupt their habitual methods in dealings with countries
of such major importance ?
A second aspect of these changes was the establishment of the public
banks. Some were already in existence such as the Banco dello Spirito
Santo in Naples, or the venerable Banco di San Giorgio in Genoa. The
latter, at the heart of the powerful mercantile republic in league with
Spain, showed renewed vitality and reflected the changing needs: in 1606
it opened a new cartulario in scudi di cambi and later in 1625 another in
moneta di Reali. Other banks were created to suit the needs of government
finance. Venice had its Banco della Piazza, di Rialto (founded in 1587 and
dissolved in 1637) and its Banco Giro (founded in 1619). In Amsterdam
the famous Wisselbank was established by the ordinance of 31 January
1609. This was followed by similar banks in Middelburg in 1616, in Delft
in 1621 and in Rotterdam in 1635. The Girobank was set up in Hamburg
in 1619. Nuremberg had its bank from 1621. There were unsuccessful
attempts to set up public banks in Spain in 1603 (by the Pragmatic of
84
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN ECONOMY I6O9.-5O
Valladolid) and in France in 1607. Ostensibly they had the limited purpose
of easing government finance, as well as of avoiding the dangers of
defective currency and the risks entailed in shifting bullion and specie.
But gradually they formed a means of facilitating international payments.
In the Banco della Piazza of Venice (by the decree of the Senate of 1593),
and in the Wisselbank (by the foundation charter of 1609), bills of
exchange were ordered to be settled in the bank ledgers. In Venice this
system was underwritten by the huge state reserves of gold and silver
kept in the Deposito Grande (in 1609 these amounted to 9,173,170 ducats
worth 204,290 kilograms of silver). In Amsterdam the average deposits
(officially at 100%) in the vaults of the bank between 1650 and 1654
amounted to 8,520,211 florins, which (allowing for the premium on bank
money), was equivalent to some 89,770 kilograms of silver. The massive
position of Venice is thus demonstrated. These public banks formed
relay points in the financial circuits and added stability to a network of
exchanges distinct from the domestic monetary systems prone to devalua-
tion. In the Banco Giro of Venice at least by 1621 there was a premium of
20% on converting bank money into current money. In Amsterdam, the
premium was lower, reaching the level of about 4% in the 1670s.
In the face of changing monetary conditions it is probable that the
volume of credit also expanded in the first two decades of the seventeenth
century. Merchants and financiers made increased use of endorsing bills
of exchange and of the patto di ricorsa (which offered a brief period of
credit during the time the bill circulated before being returned). In the
Banco dello Spirito Santo in Naples, the balance of credits rose from
46,210 ducats in 1600 to 841,285 ducats on 10 June 1622. But such com-
mercial confidence was relatively short-lived. The uncertainties imposed
by the renewal of war and the pressures of government finance served
only to emphasize the inflexibilities of the credit potential of Europe,
where the monetary system remained largely tied to the restrictions of gold
and silver.
In the last resort, the gap between bullion supplies and the expansion
of the different monetary systems inevitably resulted in devaluations.
These in turn classified the relative positions of the various regional
economies, where some more than others succeeded in maintaining then-
standing. The more important national moneys of account, when reduced
to their equivalents in silver, show the following changes between 1580-9
and 1650-4 (see Map 1).
From these percentages, it can readily be seen that the economies of
north-western Europe offered strong resistance. On the other hand,
Poland, underdeveloped and largely dependent on agricultural products
to sustain her position in the international markets, suffered most of all.
At the outbreak of the Thirty Years War she shared in the wave of debase-
ments of Germany, but did not recover to the same extent as her German
85
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
and Austrian neighbours. In a decade between 1617 and 1627 the grosz
lost more than half its equivalent in silver. Again in the devaluations of
1663, it lost another half, although on this occasion Danzig avoided the
collapse, refusing no doubt to pay its share of the war and leaving the
continental cities, such as Krakow, Warsaw, Poznan, Lublin, Lwow and
others to carry the burden. In this respect there was also an economic
partition of Poland.
TABLE II
Country
England
HoUand
Augsburg
Spanish
Netherlands
Austria
Frankfurt
Venice
France
Spain
Genoa
Poland
Name of money
of account
Index of silver values
in 1650-4 (1580-9 = 100)
Pound sterling 9677
Guilder
Rechnungsgulden 84-23
8368
Florin 80-39
79-43
79-21
76-51
68-47
Rechengulden
Rechnungsgulden
Lira
Livre toumois
Maravedi
Lira
Grosz
6641
5541
3891
Finally, the writings of the mercantilists in the early seventeenth century
underlined the effect of these monetary difficulties on contemporaries.
The economy of the sixteenth century had grown accustomed to relatively
large additions of bullion to smooth the working of international trade,
to encourage the relays of merchants and substantiate their forecasts.
The sagging conditions which obtained in the early seventeenth century
often provoked confused explanations. 'We live', said Montchr6tien in
1615, 'not so much from trade in raw materials as from gold and silver.'
The importance of money supplies held the attention of Malynes in the
Lex Mercatoria, 'for if Money be wanting, trade doth decrease although
commodities be abundant and good cheap'. And again in his Treatise of
the Canker of England's Commonwealth (1601): 'the more ready money,
either in specie or by exchange that our merchants should make their
return by, the more employment would they make upon our home
commodities advancing the price thereof which price would augment the
quantity by setting more people on work'. The bullionists did not shrink
from linking the quantity of specie with prices and full employment.
Swelling reserves of bullion, rising prices and a mounting level of employ-
ment were the outward signs of inner economic well-being: their derange-
ment had causal links with depression. Their theories, even if discredited,
form a pungent comment on the contemporary monetary difficulties and
general economic conditions.
86
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN ECONOMY 1 6 0 9 - 5 0
Holland
I M
Spanish Netherlands
Poland
Map 1. Index of silver devaluation in Europe, 1650-4. The segment in white shows the
proportion of devaluation; the full circle represents the base-period 1580-9 (= 100).
The study of the movements and structures of prices has, like that of
money, added greatly to our knowledge of the international economy,
for both the phases of development and the regional differences which
were fundamental to the early seventeenth century.
The first problem is one of general chronology. The transition from the
prolonged inflation of the sixteenth century to the stable and then falling
prices more characteristic of the seventeenth century is not a simple
question. It presupposes that the prices of goods circulating in regional
or international markets can be expressed in common monetary terms,
usually in silver. In reality, the economic activity over large areas of
Europe was mainly destined to satisfy home or local needs. It is therefore
difficult to find a commodity widely served by international trade. Grain
prices have firstly the advantage of being most abundantly recorded but
secondly the disadvantage of relating to a bulky commodity, difficult to
transport and store—two factors which loomed large in the final price.
The silver prices of wheat show relatively clearly the down-turns in the
different regions of Europe. The most highly advanced regions of Europe,
which had been flooded with silver currency during the sixteenth century,
were the first to experience a change in price trends. In Spain, the dominant
economy, the inflation of silver prices apparently ended about 1600, and
it is probable that the defeat of the Invincible Armada and the ensuing
material difficulties coincided with a profound change in the economic
87
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
development of Spain. Italy also shared this experience. In Udine, Siena
and Naples, the last decade of the sixteenth century was probably the
high-tide mark to a long-term rise in prices. In south-east France, in
Grenoble and Dauphine, the level for the 1590s was higher than any
decade in the preceding or succeeding quarter-century, although the
evidence is confused by the wars of the League. In general, it is probable
that grain prices in silver for the towns in the western basin of the Medi-
terranean reached their culminating point at the turn of the century, and
consequently for them the first half of the seventeenth century meant
recession in the levels of silver prices (see Fig. 2). 1
Further north the conditions were somewhat different. In Germany
and Austria, the prolonged rise in price levels continued through the
sixteenth century until the eve or the outbreak of the Thirty Years War
and the monetary debasements of the Kipperjahre. The evidence, however,
is very confused through the disturbances of war, but it is probable that
from this peak point and at least by the 1630s a serious recession in price
levels developed in the towns of Germany and Austria. In Speyer, Leipzig
and Frankfurt this falling trend continued in the prices of all or almost all
commodities until 1656-60; in Wiirzburg, Augsburg and Munich it
lasted until 1671. There were brief crises en route due to Imperial or
Swedish occupations, as in the case of Augsburg in 1626 and 1633-5, in
Wiirzburg in 1631 and 1634, in Munich in 1632 and 1648-9. After 1656-60
and 1671, prices began to rise again in Germany and Central Europe, thus
ending the serious recession which had marked the Thirty Years War and
its immediate consequences. Some economic historians, and notably
Maurice Elsas, have not hesitated to attribute this phenomenon to the
loss of population and the heavy destruction of war. In general, we may
assume that the price recession during the Thirty Years War and pro-
gressive rise after 1656 and 1671 were different from the long-term
experience of Europe and indicate that the price systems of Germany and
Austria tended to detach themselves and form a particular case.
Again in the north, Holland and England, enjoying relatively stable
monetary conditions in the first half of the seventeenth century, offered
a longer resistance to the downward pressures on prices. The inflation in
almost all sectors continued until the 1640s. Only in the final stages of the
Thirty Years War did the level of prices begin to fall, following a down-
ward trend which continued until the first quarter of the eighteenth
century. The down-turn in these small progressive economies of the north
in effect set the closing limit to the long inflation of silver prices in the
sixteenth century, inaugurated with the crumbling of the dominant econ-
omy of Spain. Spread over almost half a century, it emphasizes the funda-
mental disparity of the international economy.
1
For a more extensive demonstration of this, see Cambridge Economic History of Europe,
Vol. iv, pp. 470-5.
88
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN ECONOMY 1 6 0 9 - 5 0
The relative size and importance of this economy is certainly shown by
the differences in price levels from region to region. The price range
between those areas with high silver prices, such as Spain and Italy, and
those with low silver prices as in Poland, had hardly advanced closer than
a ratio of i to 6, or at most i to 5 in the first half of the seventeenth cen-
tury. This gap was the natural mainspring of the grain trade, even when
high transport costs were involved. Risks were considerable and the rates
of marine insurance were high. In Amsterdam the rates during the Thirty
Years War for Constantinople were as high as 18% in 1626; for Danzig
5% in 1630, although these fell to 5% and 2% respectively in November
1648 after the signing of peace. The dangers and losses of war, high freight
costs and a low level of capital investment all combined to maintain con-
siderable differentials between regional prices.
The third discrepancy which the growth of the sixteenth century had
emphasized was the gap between the sectors of agriculture and industry.
The long inflation, furthered by the pressure of a hungry population,
culminated in the astonishing rise in the prices of farm products, parti-
cularly of grain. The agricultural sector probably enjoyed, as wheat prices
show, a privileged position until the end of the Thirty Years War,
attracting investment and bringing marginal lands into cultivation. This
was accompanied no doubt by an increase, in the Ricardian sense, in the
rents of the better lands. Hans-Helmut Wachter has shown the fall in
marginal profits in the case of east Prussia after 1620 and during the
Thirty Years War. There the position was reversed in favour of a general
contraction of the area under cultivation (see Fig. 5). In general the down-
turn in the price of grain implied also a reversed relationship between
very sensitive agricultural and industrial sectors.
However, the inflation of the long sixteenth century meant also relative
stability and closer integration of the international economy in com-
mercial prosperity. Economic growth naturally experienced its ups and
downs but these tended to be submerged in the progressive upward
movement. When this pressure began to wane, the equilibrium in the
international economy was impaired. The downturns in the economy,
at least as far as the available evidence from grain prices suggests, were
followed by phases of violent cyclic fluctuations. In the case of Spain after
1600 H. T. Davis, using the data of Earl Hamilton, has shown that the
amplitude of fluctuations tended to increase. In Udine a phase of clearly
defined major cycles of greater range than before appeared after 1627
(1627-36, 1636-40, 1640-6, 1646-50, 1650-3, 1653-9); and in Beauvais
in France, after 1640 (1639-45, 1645-50, 1650-7, 1657-8). The cyclic
nature of price movements especially during periods of crop failures was
probably a European phenomenon. In the two decades 1640-60, cul-
minating in the crisis of subsistence in 1649-50, the chronology of price
cycles was valid with slight variations in Exeter, Paris, Lyons, Beauvais,
89
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008D E C L I N E OF S P A I N A N D THE T H I R T Y YEARS W A R
1450 1500 1550 1600 1650 1700 1750
1450 1500 1550 1600 1650 1700 1750
Fig. 3. (a) Maritime trade between Seville and America, combined tonnage inward and out-
ward bound [reference: H. and P. Chaunu, Seville et VAtlantique 1504 a 16so (8 vols. and
annexe graphique, Paris, 1955-60)]; (6) Baltic trade (five-yearly averages)—wheat, rye,
kersies [reference: N. Bang, Tabeller over Skibsfart og Varetransport gennem Oresund
1497-1660 (2 parts in 3 vols. Copenhagen, 1906-22)]; (c) builders' wage-rates in England
(five-yearly averages) [reference: S. Hopkins and E. H. Phelps Brown, 'Seven centuries of
prices of consumables, compared with builders' wage-rates', Economica (1956)].
90
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN ECONOMY 1 6 0 9 - 5 0
Udine, Siena and Lwow. The violence of these cycles was a sign of pro-
found economic disturbances. In the space of a decade, grain prices rose
as much as five times in the case of Udine and ten times in the exceptional
case of the price of oats in Lwow.
A final aspect of the structure of prices: the question of wages and the
price of labour. The growth of the sixteenth century, according to some
economic historians, implied also a fall in the living standards of labour.
The cost of living and especially of food rose and the money wages of
labour tended to lag behind. Hence the real equivalents of those money
wages tended to fall. This has been established in the majority of cases.
In Valencia the real wages of building craftsmen fell until about 1600.
The available evidence for Germany and Austria tends to confirm this
conclusion, although in these cases real wages tended to rise during the
Thirty Years War until 1660-70. In England real wages of building
craftsmen fell throughout the sixteenth century but reached a turning
point about 1610-14 (see Fig. 3). From this reversal, the rising trend
implied that builders were receiving better remuneration.
Although this evidence for wage history gives little indication of the
level of employment or of the labour force available, the important
feature remains: wage trends changed at the beginning of the seventeenth
century. For the period covered by this chapter, the international economy
in general faced both the easing of price inflation and the rising levels of
real wages and, by implication, rising production costs with their in-
evitable problems and difficulties.
in
Yet the first call on human endeavour was to produce food. Agriculture
largely dominated the structures of production. The farms, harnessed to
natural productive forces, were the foremost industries of Europe, and the
crafts with their capital requirements and uncertain outlets were at a
disadvantage against this entrenched position. Agriculture continued to
thrive in the early seventeenth century. In the Netherlands, B. H. Slicher
van Bath has shown that the draining of the polders progressed during
the early seventeenth century, in step with the rising grain prices in the
market of Amsterdam (see Fig. 4). This land reclamation increased in the
years 1590-1614; further progress was made in the next quarter of a
century 1615-39. Then decline set in, and the average for 1640-64 was
well below that for the previous half-century. In east Prussia, as we have
already mentioned, the expansion in agriculture changed fundamentally
after 1620 when the war disturbances had their full effect (see Fig. 5).
The grain cargoes passing through the Sound from the Baltic confirm
this impression of thriving agriculture. The tolls show that the exports of
rye rose from 473,714 lasts in 1600-9 to 578,415 lasts in 1640-9; and
wheat from 51,496 lasts to 160,551 lasts in the same period. Thus rye was
91
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008D E C L I N E OF S P A I N A N D THE T H I R T Y YEARS W A R
l
i
l
1
t
t
1
1
500
500-
J
Ti
ln< ex: 1715^*0=1 00
Price of
wheat
>
•
--
|
100
1
—
Maximum
l
Internatio nal price of whc ;at
• SO
1500
; Index: 17! 1-45 = 100
1550 1600
Minimum
1650
1700
1750
Fig. 4. Index of areas drained and wheat prices in the Netherlands (1721-45 = 100)
[reference: B. H. Slicher van Bath, De agrarische Geschiedenis van West-Europa (500-1850)
(Utrecht, i960)].
nine times more important than wheat in the first decade, and only four
and a half times in the 1640s (see Fig. 3). Yet what justification can the
Sound tolls offer for such affirmations? The quantitative evidence is not
to be taken at its face value and deservedly has been subjected to con-
siderable criticism from scholars, in particular Aksel Christensen, Astrid
Friis, Alfred Huhnhauser, Pierre Jeannin and Walther Vogel. The extent
of smuggling remains a large and perhaps unknown factor. This would
modify the absolute totals of tonnage and merchandise reported passing
in and out of the Baltic. It could also adjust the relative quantities of
goods: for example, before the reform of 1618, rye carried less duty than
wheat and as a result, in passing the customs, wheat was often declared as
rye. Such considerations qualify the conclusions drawn from the appa-
rently increasing shipments of wheat.
In view of this, the expansion of the grain trade is difficult to explain.
Ostensibly, it revealed a growing taste for luxury, wheat being destined for
white bread and the tables of the well-to-do. Could it have been merely a
further sign of the increasing wealth of the economies of the north? Or
was it another indication of the difficult conditions in the grainlands of
the Baltic countries, obliged to export their cereals?
This grain trade in effect emphasized the outstanding real advantages
maintained by the economies of northern and eastern Europe. Such a
bulky trade required transport, warehouses and barges. It needed mer-
chants prepared to carry the risks of commodity markets during good and
bad years. Amsterdam was able to provide these advantages. And the
producing areas of Poland, concentrated in the great estates, offered
92
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE E U R O P E A N ECONOMY
1609-50
-150
-100
150 -
V \A•• "'""••A
Index of
wheat yields
-
r~
r-
1550-1696 - 1 0 0 -
-
' • - V | r dex of area
culti cated in wheat
- 50
-
50 -
0 -
0
1500
1550
1650
1600
1700
1750
Fig. 5. Index of trends of grain production in eastern Prussia (1550-1696 =100) [reference:
H.-H. Wachter, Ostpreussische Domanenvorwerke im 16. und 17. Jahrhundert (Wurzburg,
1958)].
natural resources of fertile lands and abundant labour, both tied and ser-
vile, symbols of her agrarian economy.
However, the grain markets did not all continue to enjoy prosperity,
as can be inferred from the changing secular trends in grain prices. The
'agricultural crisis', which marked the later seventeenth century and
reached a serious situation in the 1730s and 1740s, later received vociferous
attention in the writings and theories of the Physiocrats. It had one
notable effect in the shift away from grain to livestock raising.
Conditions were different in the manufacturing sectors of the inter-
national economy. The crafts distributed here and there in cities and in
the surrounding countryside were all too often held together by the com-
mercial capital of merchants who provided the raw materials and carried
away the finished goods. As Adam Smith astutely observed, small advan-
tages in production could create a considerable competitive position in
foreign markets. The manufacturing sectors were far more fragile in the
face of the market demand in Europe. The textile and metallurgical
sectors in particular experienced dramatic changes in the early seventeenth
century.
Textiles were especially susceptible. Some centres in the Mediterranean
producing cloth for export began to lose ground from the end of the
century. In Spain the prosperity of cloth workers in some areas lasted
until the 1590s. In Italy, the early seventeenth century, and not least the
difficulties of the 1620s and the consequences of the plague of 1630,
reserved hard times for the cloth industries. In Venice, the output of the
great Arte della Lana had reached peak years in 1601 and 1602 (28,601
93
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
and 28,729 pieces respectively), and then declined throughout the seven-
teenth century, the falling production following a parabolic curve (see
Fig. 6). By 1650, about 10,000 pieces were produced. In Como in the
early seventeenth century there were 60 workshops producing 8,000-
10,000 pieces annually; by 1650 there were 4 manufactories with an out-
put of 400 pieces. Florence in the 1590s produced 13,000-14,000 pieces
of woollen cloth a year, but by the mid-century it claimed only some
5,000 pieces. Italian cloth production fell away before declining demand
and aggressive competition in the Levant mainly from Dutch and English
traders.
The competition offered by England did not conceal the very serious
difficulties she herself suffered. Her export economy depended largely on
wool and wool products, amounting to as much as 75%, perhaps even
90% of the total value exported. Changes in markets for her cloth abroad
therefore had profound repercussions on the economic activity and
material life of the country as a whole. A further potential weakness in
England's position was the imbalance in the destination of the exports; at
the beginning of the seventeenth century about three-quarters of the cloth
export went to Germany and the United Provinces, less than one-eighth
to the Baltic, almost one-sixteenth to each of France and the Levant, and
the rest to Italy, Barbary and Russia. And a third weakness: England did
not control the complete processing of her cloth. The greater part
exported was undressed—for example, 72% from London in 1606—for
finishing abroad in the more advanced cloth centres, mainly in the Nether-
lands for the markets in eastern and central Europe, but also in Paris and
Venice, where the cloths were dyed and given the 'Italian' finish appre-
ciated in the Levant. The combination of these potential weaknesses
covered in prosperous years was particularly susceptible to shocks. In
1614, a good year, 127,215 shortcloths were exported; but the position
of the industry worsened at the end of the second decade of the seventeenth
century.
At this point Alderman Cockayne proposed to set up a consortium—
the famous Project—for finishing the cloth in England, with the monopoly
of the export trade thus taken out of the hands of the Merchant Adven-
turers. By October 1617 this scheme had clearly failed and the former
conditions were re-established. This restoration was the prelude to a de-
pression beginning with the commercial slump of 1619-20, which coin-
cided with the difficult years at the outbreak of the Thirty Years War, the
monetary debasements in Germany and Austria, and the devaluations in
Poland of 1619-23—all important markets for English cloth. Exports
dropped. Shortcloths fell from 102,332 pieces in 1618 to 75,631 pieces in
1622. This crisis eventually marked a distinct break in the position of the
older English draperies, henceforth to decline. The industries sought
newer lines and the production improved in the lighter cloths—bays,
94
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN ECONOMY I6O9-5O
1450
1450
1500
1500
1550
1550
1600
1600
1650
1650
1700-
1750
1700
1750
Fig. 6. (a) The production of cloth in Leiden [reference: N. Posthumus, De Geschiedenis van
de Leidsche Lakenindustrie (3 vols. The Hague, 1908-39)], Hondschoote [reference: E.Coor-
naert, La draperie-sayetterie d'Hondschoote (XlVe-XVIIe slides) (Paris, 1930)], and Venice
[reference: D. Sella, 'Les mouvements longs de Pindustrie lainiere', Aimales; Economies,
Societes, Civilisations (1957)]; (b) of silver in Potosi, Peru [reference: M. Moreyra y Paz-
Soldan, En torno a dos valiosos documentos sobre Potosi]; and (c) of copper in Sweden (five-
yearly average) [reference: F. R. Tegengren, Sveriges Sdlare malmer och bergwerk (Stock-
holm, 1924)].
95
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Spanish cloths, and perpetuanos—destined for warmer countries. English
cloth had some outlets in the Levant: in 1634 the Levant Company
exported some 17,000 pieces, although the average for the 1620s and
1630s may have been more in the region of 6,000 pieces yearly, in addition
to the quantities sent indirectly, for example, via Leghorn. In 1628 3,346
'Spanish' cloths were sent to northern Europe; this figure rose to 13,517
in 1640. On the other hand, whilst in 1606 75*9% of the shortcloths were
shipped from London by English merchants to Germany and the United
Provinces, this percentage had fallen to 51-9 by 1640.
These crisis years of 1620-3 in effect passed more control of cloth
exports in English hands. The proportion of undressed shortcloths
exported from London fell from about 72% in 1606 to 34*8% in 1640.
The cloth industries were obliged to reform, the older lines falling away to
make room for lighter cloths and alternative outlets.
The powerful cloth industries of the Low Countries during these years
also faced a series of difficulties and transformations. At first sight these
appeared to be similar to those in England, since the manufactures of
quality cloths for export and long-distance trade were apparently the
most seriously involved. In detail, however, there were evidently impor-
tant variations in type of product and of markets served which future
research will no doubt differentiate more clearly. Hondschoote, recovering
from the deep slump of the 1580s, enjoyed increasing production until
about 1638, when 27,466 pieces were exported. Many of her weavers,
however, left to swell the population and production of Leiden in the
United Provinces. There, cloth working continued to grow. The total of
cloth of all sorts reached 144,723 pieces in 1664, before a general decline
set in. These figures, however, conceal a radical transformation of the
industry. The manufacture of some of the older types of cloth declined:
says after 1617 (53,568 pieces); fustians after 1624 (33,986 pieces); bays
after 1633 (23,785 pieces); velvets after 1637-8 (13,454 pieces). But other
lines prospered: lakens forged ahead, enjoying a spectacular rise in the
1630s and 1640s (1630: 1,780 pieces; 1640: 10,805 pieces; 1651: 22,069
pieces), thus reaching a level of production which it maintained until the
1720s. In addition, the production of camlets and warp was introduced,
which reached peaks in 1669 (67,335 pieces) and 1664 (19,350 pieces)
respectively (see Fig. 6). The modification of the Leiden cloth industry
during the Thirty Years War, in general, also evolved new patterns of
supplying long-distance markets.
The mining and metallurgical sectors also prospered during the Thirty
Years War. This was the great opportunity for Sweden with her rich
mines of iron and copper under close royal patronage and control. The
famous copper company—the Kopparkompaniet founded in 1619—
benefited at first from the demand for copper money in Spain. The stop
on this, in 1626, pushed Gustavus Adolphus to find other outlets, partly
96
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN ECONOMY I6O9-5O
in copper coinage for Sweden. The production of copper, however,
doubled during the war, reaching a peak in 1650 with 2,941 metric tons
(see Fig. 6). This was the highest point in the seventeenth century; peace
meant recession. At the beginning of the eighteenth century, however, her
copper surpassed that of central Europe, and in spite of the Dutch
promotion of production in Japan for use in the Far East, held a foremost
place in world markets.
Iron was another contribution from Sweden. During the sixteenth
century its production had grown under direct crown encouragement
especially from Gustavus I (1523-60), who brought in German technicians.
Malleable bar iron became increasingly important from 1540, and after
1600, although twice as expensive, exceeded the older osmund iron in
export value. This trend became typical of the seventeenth century:
between 1600 and 1720 Swedish iron production increased five times. The
exports rose during the Thirty Years War, and most spectacularly after
1627. The average annual exports of bar iron from the Baltic, if we turn
once more to the uncertain evidence of the Sound tolls, increased seven-
fold in a quarter-century:
TABLE
12
Period Average annual exports from the Baltic in metric tons
1620-4
1645-9
1650-4 1,179
7.747
5,362
Estimates from other sources propose the following annual figures for
exports from Sweden:
TABLE 13
Year Estimated annual exports from Sweden in metric tons
c. 1620
c. 1640
c. 1650 6,650 (bar iron and osmund)
10,600 (bar iron)
17,300 (bar iron)
The conclusion of the peace faced Sweden with recession but by then her
position in the metal markets had been firmly established. Eli Heckscher
estimated that Sweden supplied about a third of the requirements of
Europe in 1720. England was an important customer, and on the eve of
the Civil War her forges worked between 14,000 and 32,000 metric tons
of iron bar. About 1720, some 40% of her requirements of iron probably
came from Sweden.
Finally, another growth sector: the coal industry of England. Between
the 1550s and the 1680s, according to John U. Nef, the production of
97
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
coal increased 14 times, a relative development far greater than in the
following centuries:
TABLE 14
Period
Total coal produced in metric tons
1551-60
1681-90
1781-90
206,681
2,934,874
10,132,302
The shipments of coal from Newcastle, in consequence, followed this
trend, particularly noticeable in the first half of the seventeenth century:
TABLE 15
Year
Quantity of coal shipped in metric tons
Michaelmas 1591-Michaelmas 1592
Michaelmas 1608-Michaelmas 1609
Christmas 1633-Christmas 1634
June 1658-June 1659
110,356
235,490
445.472
520,671
And the consumption increased in London. There the imports passed
from 34,208 in 1591-2 to 260,037 metric tons in 1667-8. Thus by the
middle of the seventeenth century one of the pillars of England's future
economy was firmly established.
IV
How then to conclude a resume all too brief for the problems involved ?
The central feature has been the pause in the long economic development
of Europe. Although it is probable that over large areas of the continent
per capita incomes could change only within relatively confined limits, it
may be assumed that there was a check and even reduction in particular
aggregate national incomes during this period. The economic crisis was
noticeable above all in the growth of the commercial system which had
sustained Europe, and indeed the world, during the sixteenth century.
Spain held a central and dominant position in that commercial pros-
perity, and the turn of the sixteenth century was indeed her crisis. The
defeat of the Invincible Armada, the declining cargoes of bullion from
America after 1600, the long recession in the transatlantic trade of Seville
after the peak years of 1607-9 (see Fig. 3), the royal bankruptcies of 1596,
1607, 1627 and 1645—all these foreshadowed her experience of growing
debility and frustration in the seventeenth century. The financial tensions
of the far-stretched politics of Spain, reprieved with the Truce of 1609,
mounted again with the renewal of the war against the Dutch in 1621 (see
Map 2). The royal bankruptcy of 1627 dragged down above all the
98
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN ECONOMY 1 6 0 9 - 5 0
Genoese merchants and financiers, who had long been her persistent
though not disinterested supporters. Their discomfiture proved the
moment for the Portuguese, profiting by their difficulties and forecasting
the revolt of 1640, in their case successful, leading to independence, but
for the rebel Catalans to defeat and repression. Later the bankruptcy of
1647 finally published the incapacity of Spain, and prepared the way for
the peace settlements of Westphalia in the following year, and eventually
of the Pyrenees (1659).
Yet the long and progressive abdication of Spain was reprieved during
the Twelve Years Truce, when the international economy gained a brief
respite. Then, in 1618, the outbreak of war in Germany and the great
commercial crisis of 1619-20, which although neither the deciding
moments for Europe, nor the sole turning points to end the sixteenth
century, were nevertheless huge catastrophes. This moment of truth
unmasked the unsubstantiated bravado of Spain, and inevitably also the
confusion and weakness of the trading communities of southern Europe,
already in difficulties.
The failure of Spain to dominate in the struggle against Holland,
renewed with the end of the Truce in 1621, resolved itself into a general
European conflict. This confirmed the ascendancy of the thriving econo-
mies of the north, above all of the Netherlands. In the seventeenth
century the Dutch achieved their 'golden age', almost against the pre-
vailing trends in the international economy. This in itself was a con-
siderable achievement.
Yet fortune smiled on the Dutch traders and investors, and with good
reason. In an age of difficult transport Holland was naturally endowed
with a commanding geographical position, with thrifty merchants
recruited from the four corners of Europe, with an integrated transport
system of canals and waterways, of warehouses, barges and a mercantile
marine equipped with the successful and economical 'fluit', manned by a
dozen hands, the cargo ship par excellence. Towards the end of the cen-
tury, the yearly trading fleets were astonishingly large: 800 fluits to the
Baltic and 400 to St Ubes in Portugal for salt; 200 to 250 whalers, 300 to
350 herring boats . . . Little wonder that Holland was able to expand and
capture the profits which went with scale of enterprise.
The great trading companies outlined this range of commerce: the
Russia Grain Company (1608); the Northern Company (1614) for whaling
and based on Spitzbergen; the New Netherlands Company (1614) for
North America between the 40th and 45th parallels; and the West India
Company (1621). By the Treaty of The Hague of 1669, the Dutch con-
trolled the timber trade of Norway. And not least there was the trade to
the East Indies. Almost symbolically, Cornelius Houtman, a Dutch
merchant resident in Lisbon, sailed in 1595 with a fleet for the Indies and
returned in 1597 richly furnished. The United East India Company (1602)
99
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
in league with the sultan of Bantam, found footing from 1619 in Batavia
in Java. From this vantage point, with factories along the coast from
Persia and India to China and Japan, established in the key port of
Malacca captured from the Portuguese in 1641, they scooped up profits
to raise the concentration of capital in Holland. By 1650, the governor
general in Batavia reported that the cumulative profits to date exceeded
75,000,000 florins with a capital of more than 12,500,000 resting in the
, Indies. It had been accomplished in half a century.
The Dutch, however, did not have an open field. The competition was
severe from the Portuguese (from whom they seized Elmina in 1637), and
not least from England. The conflict was joined in all fields of lucrative
profit. Their Northern Company of 1614 had the aim of rebutting English
attacks. In the Far East, the aggressive situation was such that a treaty
of partnership was made in 1619 between the English and Dutch Com-
panies. This entente ended in the massacre of Amboyna (1623), when the
Dutch violently asserted their ascendancy, beheaded the small colony, and
effectively cleared out the competition of their English rivals. Their pre-
dominancy on the seven seas found a block in the English Navigation Act
(1651), and finally in war, the Anglo-Dutch War of 1652-3, first of these
open hostilities to mark the seventeenth century.
Although the economic development of Europe apparently underwent a
sharp relapse in commercial prosperity, there were compensations. The
initiative in the north of Europe showed that fundamentally the inter-
national economy was endowed with strength and continuity. The trans-
formations, which were evident in the case of the textile industries, were
symptoms of the versatility of a mercantile system responsive to new
conditions. This element of continuity was most apparent in the character
and direction of capital investment.
In the face of difficult times ahead, the commercial fortunes sought
alternative outlets and sources of profit. De la Vega in his Confusion de
Confusiones (1688) acutely describes the speculation among the merchants
of Amsterdam. Although in February 1610 the Estates had forbidden the
selling of shares in bianco, the proclivity to speculate was amply testified
in the boom and crash of the Tulip Mania in 1636-7. Indeed, the diversion
of funds into other fields prolonged and consolidated the capital gains
established in the commercial prosperity of the sixteenth century.
These funds no doubt turned more substantially to land and real estate.
This was traditionally common to the commercial centres of Europe:
merchants were accustomed to lay out wealth in land. But after the com-
mercial difficulties of the 1620s it probably became more important. Aldo de
Maddalena in the case of Lombardy has shown the growing investment in
land from the 1620s. In Lyons, it is not surprising to find a young notary
such as Le Grangier in the early 1620s leaving aside his father's business
100
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN ECONOMY 1 6 0 9 - 5 0
in the fairs to deal extensively in property and marriage contracts.
According to W. Hoskins, the surge in rebuilding rural England was at its
height in the years 1590 to 1640. But these agrarian and land problems
are complex and scholars have not yet agreed on the explanations to offer.
Certainly they were set in sharp relief in the mid-seventeenth century.
The outbreak and spread of the war in Germany after 1618 offered a
second reprieve from economic stagnation. The Thirty Years War grew
more serious with the deepening animosity between Spain and France, in
open conflict after 1635. The building and commissioning of fleets, the
manufacture of arms and munitions, the fortifications, the raising of
armies, were all fresh opportunities. The Dutch financiers, notably from
Amsterdam, were not slow to respond. A company of Amsterdam
merchants in 1619 financed a gun foundry in Thuringia. Louis de Geer
(1587-1652) invested heavily in the mines and production of Sweden. In
1627 the Swedish crown granted him the monopoly of founding iron
canon, which he held until 1648. These Swedish iron cannon led the
market, being preferred to those offered from England at the same price.
Elias Trip, his partner, also deeply involved in the metal trade, had
cannon foundries, gun shops and powder factories in Amsterdam, supply-
ing armies and attracting buyers from all over Europe, among them the
French agents of Richelieu. The boom in Swedish iron and copper helped
to prolong the prosperity of the sixteenth century, but these easy market
conditions did not survive the peace.
Thirdly, a major outlet for investment in the seventeenth century was
found in the state. As the opportunities for trading in the private sector
grew more intractable, merchants became more willing to take up govern-
ment loans which offered hopes of monopolies and protection. Alvaro
Castillo has shown how the asientos (or loans to the Spanish monarchy)
increased after 1610, as the trans-Atlantic trade of Seville declined. Yet,
this sector apparently did not survive after 1640-2, and collapsed in the
final exhaustion of Spain (see Map 2). The syndicates for raising royal
revenues in England, and the tax-farmers in France were further signs of
investment in the state, hungry for funds and ready to grant privileges in
return for the means to buttress power or sustain grandiose policies.
The capital assets threatened by difficult conditions again found relief
in the great companies, armed to seize the initiative and win outstanding
profits. The English East India Company in the first half-century offered,
for example, an average return on capital of 82%. Indeed the great
companies, such as in England and Holland, became so large that in time
their interests combined with those of government. The Dutch West India
Company (1621) was a direct instrument of war, plundering the trade
routes to bring a stream of Spanish and Portuguese prize cargoes to
Holland, making landings and annexing territories in the West Indies and
in Brazil. In Holland itself, the Thirty Years War was a saga of intrigue
101
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008D E C L I N E OF S P A I N A N D THE T H I R T Y YEARS W A R
Netherlands 2,528,405
Germany 82,742
France 31,242 *
Spain 2,197.975
Seville
11,304,043: Equivalent, in kg of silver, of tola!
** imports of gold and silver in Seville,•<)
Map 2. Payments of Spanish asientos, 1580-1626 (converted into
kilograms of silver) [reference: A. Castillo].
between on the one hand the war party buttressed by the great companies,
on occasion bribed by France, and on the other hand the peace party aiming
for truce with Spain. Inevitably, in such an uneasy alliance with mercantile
interests, the state, ready with monopolies for trade and manufactures, was
obliged to enter more deeply into economic affairs. The policies of the great
statesmen—Richelieu in France, Olivares in Spain, Oxenstierna in Sweden,
Straff ord and Cromwell in England—all bore witness to the way in which
economic difficulties flowed to swell the power of state. This is perhaps the
most eloquent lesson of the early seventeenth century, unnerved before an
unpromising future, but at the same time gifted with a propensity to
create or rather to consolidate the gains achieved.
Lastly, in a much larger context, capital flows faced new technological
horizons through changes in the level of knowledge. Between Galileo
Galilei (1564-1642) and Sir Isaac Newton (1642-1727) complex advances
in the understanding of the natural world brought wider perspectives,
although clearly these transformations—the scientific revolution—pass the
period of this chapter. In the field of mathematics and engineering, for
example, considerable contributions were made in the second quarter of
the seventeenth century by Galileo, Torricelli, Pascal and Descartes.
102
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN ECONOMY 1 6 0 9 - 5 0
Among the later mercantilists, Sir William Petty set out with computa-
tions and Political Arithmetic to measure the scale of aggregate economic
activity. Nor did concepts suggesting a closed society pass unchallenged,
as the debate in France in the 1680s of the Ancients against the Moderns
revealed. These are only brief references to a prodigious movement but
it is evident that over a wide range of techniques and knowledge the seven-
teenth century did not constitute a retrograde movement.
Yet all this looked to the future. At the time, there seemed to be little
more than a repetition of difficulties and a deepening of human misery,
accompanied relentlessly by the increasing power of governments and
behind them of aristocracies and ruling minorities. The state swallowed
up loyalties and obligations, organized conflicts, and became the funnel
for expenditures. In the outward manoeuvres and realities of war it set
the targets, its own targets, refusing to allow commercial and industrial
financiers to press ahead unhampered by national restrictions. It sub-
mitted entrepreneurs to its own wilful behests and almost at once left them
stranded. In the final analysis this aspect of the destiny of Europe is
inseparable from the movement of the international economy which this
chapter has all too briefly outlined.
103
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER III
THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF
ABSOLUTISM
1610 and 1659 absolutism triumphed almost everywhere
in Europe. Although in England monarchical absolutism failed,
' parliamentary absolutism was victorious. States were threatened by
great wars and by the disruptions of wars of religion. Men's minds were
challenged by theories of popular sovereignty, of contract and tyran-
nicide, and by new mechanistic views of the universe. There were econo-
mic crises, some caused by the falling volume of silver arriving from
America, others by bad harvests, famines and epidemics, which were
perhaps more frequent than in the sixteenth century. The remedy for
these troubles seemed to be a political power less shackled by laws,
customs and privileges, and better able to impose a common purpose
upon the members of the body politic. At the centre of all the theoretical
conflicts were the two principles of sovereignty and of raison d'e'tat,
developed by Jean Bodin and Machiavelli respectively. Sovereignty was
denned by Bodin as 'the supreme power in the State not bound by the
laws . . . not recognising any superior'; its attributes are to legislate, to
raise armies, make war and peace, pass final judgements on cases, raise
taxes, coin money, etc. Raison d'etat covered whatever actions the prince
might have to take in order to secure the safety and growth of the state.
Bodin and Machiavelli were criticized, but almost all their critics bor-
rowed their fundamental ideas while attempting to Christianize or adapt
them. Our study of political concepts cannot be restricted to the ideas of
theorists. We must try to consider what statesmen, administrators and
members of different social groups thought of absolutism, what ideas and
slogans moved men to act—and their relationship to their whole environ-
ment. Such a history of political ideas has scarcely begun to be attempted.
The conflict of political ideas in Europe did not contradict the unity of
European civilization. Europe began as Christendom and it was from
Christianity that all the theoreticians began. A small number of essential
ideas circulated, originating from two principal centres, Spain and the
Netherlands. For the Catholics these centres were the universities of
Salamanca and Louvain and for the Protestants those of the United
Provinces, especially Leiden. The political teaching of Justus Lipsius,
professor at the University of Leiden until 1592, then, after his conversion,
at Louvain, was spread by Bernegger. He was professor of history and
political science at the University of Strasbourg from 1613 to 1640 and
attracted students from Germany, Hungary, Denmark and Switzerland.
B
ETWEEN
104
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM
Buckler continued the work of Bernegger at Strasbourg and a pupil of
Buckler, Bosius, taught the doctrines of Lipsius at Jena from 1656 to
1676. Bernegger's son-in-law, Heim Freins, became chancellor of the
University of Uppsala in 1642 and spread the theories of Lipsius in
Sweden. Gustavus Adolphus learnt them from another pupil of Ber-
negger, Skytte, his historiographer. There were many French students at
the University of Leiden; Guez de Balzac studied there in 1615, writing a
Discours Politique against absolutism, though in 1631 he became a
defender of absolute monarchy. The University of Salamanca, where the
disciples of Vittoria had revived the teaching of Thomism, trained the
great Spanish Jesuit Suarez and many others, who went to the Roman
colleges, to the universities of Louvain, Alcala, and Coimbra, spreading
the political teachings of neo-Thomism among Jesuits and other eccle-
siastics and thence to lay circles.
Books were important in spreading political ideas. The multiplication
of editions and translations of political works testified to the profound
interest in them. Bodin's Republique appeared in 1576 and had nine Latin
editions between 1586 and 1650, seventeen French editions between 1576
and 1753, while there were Italian, English and German translations. The
Politica of Althusius had eight editions between 1603 and 1654. Justus
Lipsius' Politica had an edition a year until 1618, thirty-one Latin
editions in the seventeenth century, besides Dutch, French, English,
German and Polish translations. Even lesser works had success: Balzac's
Prince had four editions between 1631 and 1662, Philippe de Bethune's
Conseiller d'etat had five between 1632 and 1665. Battles of the books
aroused public attention; such as those of James I with Cardinal Bellar-
mine and Cardinal du Perron. James sent his apologia against Bellarmine
to all the princes, who received it coolly. However, James was much read
by Italian jurists, who considered him the ideal prince. Bellarmine in 1619
dedicated his De Officio Principis to Ladislas, son of Sigismund III of
Poland. The monk Paolo Sarpi fought from 1605 to 1607 on behalf of
the Republic of Venice against the Roman Curia and against Bellarmine;
their polemics found echoes in many pulpits.
Theorists and polemicists corresponded with each other and with
princes. Paolo Sarpi corresponded with the French jurists Jacques
Leschassier, with Jacques Gillot and with de L'Isle-Groslot, and obtained
a profound knowledge of Gallican doctrines for his struggle against the
pope. Campanella corresponded with Pere Joseph after 1628 and advised
Richelieu upon Italian affairs in order to further his plans for national
independence, a prerequisite for absolutism. Political refugees were
important. Grotius, exiled from Holland, wrote the De Jure Belli Ac
Pads, in France in 1623 and 1624, before publishing it at Frankfurt in 1625
and becoming Swedish ambassador in France from 1635 to 1645. Hobbes
published the De Cive in Paris in 1642 and wrote the Leviathan there.
5
105
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
MHFDECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
The essential condition of absolutism was sovereignty which recognized
no superior. But the European sovereigns, whether kings or republics,
had to face the pretensions of the pope. On several occasions there were
controversies which grouped together English, French, and Italian theor-
ists against the pope and led to attempts at union between them and the
German Protestants. From 1605 to 1607 there was the papal interdict
against Venice whose legislation had limited the acquisition of real
property by the church. In 1606 the pope forbade English Catholics to
take the oath demanded by James I after the Gunpowder Plot. Under
Henri IV the Parlement of Paris refused to accept the decrees of the
Council of Trent which had confirmed the church's rights to fiscal
immunity and to jurisdiction over the laity in marriages, wills, contracts
and offences concerning the faith. Finally there was the murder of
Henri IV (1610) by a maniac, inspired by the doctrines of the Monarcho-
machs and by the Jesuit Mariana's views on tyrannicide. These conflicts
produced an important European literature. The Spanish Jesuits sup-
ported papal claims. Mariana's De Rege et Regis Institutione, which first
appeared in 1598 was reprinted in 1610 on this occasion. It revived the
old theory expressed by Boniface VII in the Bull Unam Sanctam. By
divine right the pope has two swords, the temporal and the spiritual; he
entrusts the temporal to the princes, but they remain responsible to him
for its use and are his vicars. The pope institutes them, supervises them
and, if necessary, judges and deposes them. When he releases subjects
from their oath of allegiance, it becomes lawful for anyone to kill the
tyrant. Except for the defence of tyrannicide, this was the favorite theory
of the Roman Curia. More important was the work of the theologian
Suarez who dominated Catholic thought in the seventeenth century. His
De Legibus (1612) and his Defensio Fidei (1613), directed against the
apology of James I, were approved by the pope and by Philip III of
Spain. For Suarez, church and state were two societies, each natural
and perfect in its own fashion, but differing in their origin and structure.
All things spiritual and their jurisdiction belonged to the church, while all
temporal matters belonged to the state. It was inconceivable that one
head, the king, should control both spiritual and temporal jurisdictions,
as James I claimed. The king ought not to usurp the functions of the
church, while the pope had no direct authority over states, though he had
an indirect power. The spiritual was superior to the temporal because it
had God for its end and the pope's authority came directly from God,
while that of the princes came indirectly through the people. The pope
was spiritually superior to temporal princes; he had the right and duty to
advise princes for the spiritual advantage to the church. He could con-
strain them by ecclesiastical censures, in cases of immorality, of flagrant
tyranny, or of scandals to the faith. If a prince became a heretic he could
be deposed and his subjects released from their allegiance. Thus the pope
106
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM
could legitimately forbid Catholics to take the oath demanded by
James I. This theory of potestas indirecta was, apart from some nuances,
held by Cardinal Bellarmine in De Potestate Summi Pontificis (1610);
De Officio Principis Christiani (1619), and expounded by Cardinal du
Perron to the French Estates General (1615).
These theories were opposed by James I, who summarized part of the
Protestant political tradition. For Luther, the authority of the state, like
all authority, came from God and the people ought to submit to it, even
if it were tyrannical, though the prince ought to respect the two tables of
the law. Calvin held that magistrates were the vicars of God and were
owed absolute obedience by the people even in cases of tyranny. James I's
principal works were The Trew Law of Free Monarchies (1598), the
Basilikon Down (1599), An Apologiefor the Oath ofAllegience (1607) and
A Defence of the Right of Kings against Cardinal Perron (1615). James
claimed that he was personally chosen by God to govern his people, was
invested directly by God with his sovereignty and was accountable to God
alone. The pope had no concern in this and this was why James demanded
from his Catholic subjects an oath that the pope had no right to depose
the king, nor to dispose of his dominions, nor to authorize any foreign
prince to invade them, nor to discharge any of his subjects from their
allegiance, nor to authorize anyone to bear arms against the king, or
threaten his person and that they would defend the king and his heirs if
the pope excommunicated them. Paul V forbade the taking of this oath
because it wounded the Catholic faith and jeopardized the safety and
salvation of souls. Bellarmine declared that it denied the primacy of the
Apostolic See and transferred authority over the English church from the
successor of St Peter to the successor of Henry VIII.
But the opinions of the Curia, of Suarez and of Bellarmine were only
theologically probable. A Catholic who did not profess them did not
cease to be a Catholic, as the affair of the Interdict against Venice showed.
The Venetians considered that their laws were of long standing and similar
to those of other states, while the pope was only seeking a pretext to
extend his jurisdiction and to attack in Venice the right of all princes.
Venice declared herself resolved to continue Catholic, while defending
herself. The magistrates ensured that the churches remained open, despite
the interdict, and were supported by the great majority. The republic
consulted jurists in Padua, Milan, France, and Spain, and took the monk
Paolo Sarpi as their adviser. He, together with several theologians,
published the Trattato dell'Interdetto. God had ordained two forms of
government, one spiritual, the other temporal. Each of these is supreme
in its own sphere and independent of the other, having no right to inter-
fere with the other. Thus the pope has no power to annul the laws of
princes on temporal matters, or to dethrone them, or to release their
subjects from allegiance. Ecclesiastics have no sanction by divine law to
107
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
5-aDECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
be exempt from secular authority. If the prince has conceded any exemp-
tion, he still has full power over their persons and goods in case of public
necessity. The pope is only infallible in things necessary for the faith, his
censures against princes ought to be examined by theologians. If they
certify that the censures are invalid, the prince can forbid their execution.
The pope's pretensions extended beyond primacy towards a totalitarian
power, while the Jesuits made it a supra divinitas. The Venetian theolo-
gians were strongly influenced by James I, whom Paolo Sarpi described
as 'a most wise king', but they perhaps owed even more to the French
Gallicans. Sarpi admired the Gallicans as defenders of the universal
church who, in fighting for princely power, fought also for the glory of
Christ and the liberty of Italy.
Gallicanism was more vigorous than ever thanks to the opposition of
the Parlement of Paris to the reception of the decrees of the Council of
Trent and to horror at doctrines of tyrannicide. According to the Galli-
cans, Christ had distinguished between what was God's and what was
Caesar's. The temporal power which belonged to Caesar was as divine
as the spiritual power. Like the spiritual power, it came immediately from
God and was of equal authority within its independent sphere. The pope's
power was purely spiritual; he might excommunicate and lay interdicts,
but he could not depose princes nor release their subjects from their
allegiance. The king of France was not subordinate to the pope in
temporal matters because of his spiritual primacy. Nor was he the vassal
of the pope in virtue of the donation of Constantine to which the French
people had never consented. After the assassination of Henri IV the
Parlement of Paris condemned Mariana's and suppressed Bellarmine's
books on papal power, they asked Richer, syndic of the faculty of
theology of Paris (the Sorbonne), to provide a statement of Gallican
views. In December 1611 they required Jesuits resident in France to sub-
scribe to four principal doctrines from the faculty: the superiority of
councils over the pope, the absolute independence of temporal power
belonging to sovereign princes by immediate divine right, the con-
fessor's obligation to reveal to the magistrates plots against the sovereign,
the submission of ecclesiastics to secular power. In 1614 the Defensio
Fidei of Suarez was condemned to be burnt by the hangman, but the
king's council suspended the execution of the decree. In the Estates
General of 1614 the third Estate asked the king to make Gallican doctrine
on the power of kings a fundamental law of the kingdom. As Du Perron
had shown that these doctrines were only theologically probable, the
king's council was unwilling to make them an article of faith and so cause
a schism. It forbade further discussion of them, while affirming that they
were the views of the kingdom. In 1626 the Parlement and the Sorbonne
condemned the Jesuit Santarelli's book (1624) on the pope's absolute
power to depose kings. Richelieu ordered the publication of a treatise on
108
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM
the liberties of the Gallican church by Pierre and Jacques Dupuy in 1638,
and in 1641 the De Concordia Sacerdotii et Imperii by the conseiller d'etat
Pierre de Marca, which was condemned and placed on the Index in 1642.
Thus the Curia and its theoreticians did not abate their claims. How-
ever the kings found good arguments for rejecting the pope's supremacy
in temporal affairs and often in spiritual affairs in varying degrees. There
were no effective obstacles to absolutist doctrines here.
The authority of the emperor might have provided another limitation
on princely sovereignty, but only in the German part of the empire was
this still a practical problem. The Italian states and princes, although they
were nominally within the empire, claimed to be and effectively were
sovereign states. But the emperor did not renounce any of his claims.
They were defended by Reinking, a professor at the Lutheran University
of Giessen, in the Tractatus de Regimine Saeculari et Ecclesiastico (1619).
This insisted upon the continuity of the Roman and the Holy Roman
Empires. The Lex Regia, restated in the Institutes of Justinian and re-
maining the law of the Holy Roman Empire, stated quod principi placuit
legis habet vigorem, since the people had transferred to the prince its
imperium and potestas. Thus the emperor was the summus magistratus
christiani orbis and a truly absolute monarch. As a disciple of Bodin,
Reinking declared the emperor was legibus solutus, but bound to respect
the commandments of God, natural law and the laws which he had sworn
to observe. The emperor ought to have an unlimited supremacy and be
able to abrogate or modify laws decreed by other princes. The book
became the bible of the imperialists and Ferdinand II in 1630 said that
he completely accepted it. The theologian Witzendorff restated its con-
clusions in his Discursus de Status et Administrationis Imperii Romanii
in 1641.
But most people denied imperial absolutism, while the princes claimed
to be absolute in their own estates. Jurists and politicians invoked the
fundamental laws of the empire, the Golden Bull of 1356, the ordinances
of the Diets, imperial capitulations, which were supposed to assure to
each prince Landeshoheit, territorial superiority, equivalent to sovereignty.
Bodin has already Republique, n, vi, described it as 'an aristocratic state
where sovereignty resides in the seven electors and some three hundred
princes'. Althusius elaborated a theory based upon an idealization of the
political realities of the empire in his Politico, first published in 1603,
greatly enlarged in 1610, and frequently reprinted until 1654. According
to him the empire was a true state, formed by the drawing together of
provinces. It was an organic union for the spiritual and bodily health of
its members. Only this state could fulfil the vital needs of its citizens and
so its sovereign magistrate, the emperor, had to have supreme spiritual
and temporal powers. But he was only the steward of this supreme power
which belonged to the community. He was elected in the name of the
109
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
community by the College of Electors who 'represented absolutely' the
will of the empire. He subscribed to the fundamental laws of the com-
munity and to any explanations added by the electors; he pledged himself
to administer the state according to the laws prescribed by God which
were the laws of reason and the state itself. Purely an executive agent, he
was watched over by the Electoral College who kept him within the
proper bounds and could resist him if he became a tyrant. The con-
federated provinces retained their autonomy.
Protestantism inspired many to go further. Theologians following
Calvin, and still more Beza, had declared resistance to the emperor in the
defence of religion lawful and thus denied the Roman Catholic affiliation
of the Holy Roman Empire. In 1609 the Protestant princes told Rudolf II
'his majesty well knows that a great difference exists and ought to exist
between the German Empire, its state, members and subjects and the
former Roman Empire'. The Lex Regia did not apply to the empire, as
the jurist Conring undertook to show. The law of Lothar was a fable, for
Roman law had only been introduced into Germany in the thirteenth
century. German law was customary law and the true Lex Regia was the
emperor's capitulation at his election, while his coronation oath was an
oath of allegiance to the empire. Thus the empire was above the emperor
and if he broke his oath the state ought to protect the empire if necessary
by force. This was the view of the rector of the University of Jena, Hort-
leder, in 1608 and he imparted it to his pupil, Duke John Ernest of Saxe-
Weimar and to his brother and successor, William, who both fought
against the emperor.
Moreover, the court of Saxe-Weimar also encouraged at the University
of Jena, the school of Arumaeus, the great adversary of Reinking, a
Calvinist and professor at Jena from 1602 to 1637. In his Discursus Acade-
mid ad Auream Bullam (1617) and in his Commentarius de Comitiis
Romano-Germanici imperii (1630), Arumaeus distinguished within the
Empire a double sovereignty {majestas), the majestas realis, which was the
highest and belonged to the stande and the majestas personalis, which
belonged to the emperor and was subordinate to the majestas realis. The
empire was a limited monarchy with aristocratic government. Limnaeus
belonged to the school of Arumaeus and in Juris Publici Imperii Romano-
germanici Libri IX (1629-32), maintained that the electoral capitulation
was the juridical basis of imperial power, that the laws of the empire were
not the work of the emperor alone, but of all the states of the empire, while
the emperor was the steward of the empire which was an aristocracy.
Limnaus was a counsellor of William, Duke of Saxe-Weimar, and in
1631 became a counsellor of the margrave of Ansbach and tutor to his
son.
But even more influential was the Dissertatio de Ratione Status in
Imperio Romano Germanico (1640), written by the Swedish German
110
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM
P. Chemnitz under the pseudonym of Hippolitus a Lapide. It showed
that in the empire it was no longer a question de religione but de regione
and called upon the states to fight for their liberties against the power of
Austria. Sovereignty belonged to the empire and the estates grouped in
the Diet, not to the emperor. The Diet had the summa et absoluta seu
legibus soluta potestas, not the emperor. The empire was above the laws
and the emperor and could modify the fundamental laws, change the
emperor. If the emperor threatened sovereignty and liberty of the empire,
it was a duty to fight the emperor as an enemy of the empire. The emperor
had no right to make war or peace, to raise taxes or troops, without the
consent of the electors. He did not possess supreme jurisdiction and was
only the agent and executant to the empire's decisions. Each member of
the empire had the right to raise troops and make alliances, even with
foreigners, without the emperor's consent. The emperor's power ought
to be no greater than that of a doge of Venice, while the House of Austria
ought to be completely removed from the empire. Although the emperor
had the book burnt its main points were incorporated, thanks to France,
in the Treaties of Westphalia.
The French insisted that the Diet should take part in the negotiations
and its sovereignty was guaranteed in those treaties. Article eight of the
Treaty of Osnabruck confirmed the electors, princes and states of the
empire in their ancient rights, privileges and liberties, both in temporal
and spiritual matters, including the right to make alliances among them-
selves and with foreign powers. It thus recognized the sovereignty of the
members of the empire and provided for their free assembly to conduct
all imperial affairs, to make laws, to make war or peace or alliances and to
raise taxes and soldiers. The Treaty of Miinster contained the same provi-
sions and the Diet which met for the execution of these treaties became
permanent, presiding over the division of the empire into a multitude of
petty sovereign states. The emperor's pretensions to absolutism had been
finally defeated.
The existence of an international community of states which observed
certain rules in their relationships might imply some limitation upon the
absolute prince's sovereign power. Suarez maintained that mankind was
everywhere bound together by the natural precepts of love and mutual
pity. It consisted of an association of states bound together by the need
which they had for each other. Relationships between states ought to be
regulated by obligations accepted by common agreement, the law of
nations. While Suarez suggested principles for public international law,
Grotius developed and applied them in the De Jure Belli ac Pads (1625).
He recognized the existence of a human society whose members had
common interests, notably in enjoying free and peaceful relationships.
This society consists of sovereign states: the law of nations is 'that which
has gained the force of law by the will of all nations, or of several of them
in
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
in relationship to each other', demonstrated by 'the constant usage and
witness of those having knowledge thereof. Thus the law of nations
arose from the free consent of states, legally equal, to laws inspired by
God's will and by natural law, the product of reason. Some of these
rules were open to dispute; Grotius, as a good Dutchman, defended the
freedom of the seas and was opposed by the Englishman Selden, who
argued that the sea could be appropriated and occupied and that British
dominion over it extended to the opposite coast {Mare Clausum, 1635).
But whatever rules were allowed, such as the right to make war in self-
defence, or to preserve the necessities of life, or rights to free passage of
persons and goods, or to free intercourse with distant nations, etc., such
rules arose from a consensus and did not limit sovereignty or princely
absolutism.
Absolutism seemed the answer to a deeply felt want in most European
states. Theologians of the post-Tridentine Thomist revival had to try to
assimilate absolutism and the principles of Bodin and Machiavelli.
Suarez founded his work upon Thomist philosophical realism and on the
decrees of the Council of Trent, in accordance with which he interpreted
the political circumstances of his own time. From realism he took the
fundamental idea of unchanging natural essences persisting beneath
changing appearances. Society, the family, the city and the state corres-
pond to unchanging necessities of human nature.' Man is a social animal
whose true nature inclines to a communal life.' The family alone is in-
sufficient to satisfy all man's needs, hence families are joined together in
cities and cities in principalities and monarchies, since the state is the
necessary condition for man's full development. Suarez, like Aristotle,
saw the state as a moral organism, corpus politicum mysticum, uniting
wills, not by a contract, but by a consensus among men who freely
decide to found a society. Although men are free to decide to found this
society, they cannot change either its ends or its structure, for society has
an unalterable nature, willed by God. And since man, according to the
Council of Trent, is free to choose between good and evil, but needs
guidance in order to strive for greater virtue and glory, society is charac-
terized by a subordination of each to superior authority. Public power
derives from natural law and is sovereign and so has power to make laws.
Men are born free and sovereignty in the first instance is in the whole
body of men forming a society. But after their voluntary agreement to
adhere to the political structure ordained by God as the author of nature,
public authority is embodied in a supreme magistrate who may be a
popular assembly, a college of aristocrats, or a monarch. Monarchy is the
best form, since it most nearly resembles the order of the universe. But
men's choice, their agreement on the first principles, fixes irrevocably the
form of government. The people have no further rights over the state, since
it is only a state when it possesses full sovereign power. Public authority is
112
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM
of divine origin: the king as a sovereign rules as the viceregent of God so
that obedience is due to him according to natural law, as the quasi-
proprietor of public power, he is absolute. But he becomes a tyrant
if he uses his power against the common good which is the end of the
state.
This powerful theological construct was propagated by the Jesuits, but
was excluded from the Protestant states where philosophical nominalism
and belief in predestination triumphed. Even in Catholic states it was
accepted, to a greater or lesser extent, according to circumstances, as the
pages which follow will show.
But Muscovy is an exception to the rest of Europe, though the Musco-
vites regarded themselves as Europeans because they were Christians.
They even claimed to be the only truly orthodox Christians. Moscow was
the third and last Rome; the czar, the only Christian emperor. He recog-
nized no superior and was an autocrat. The patriarchs of Moscow taught
that the Holy Ghost was in him to govern man and the Czar Alexis said
'God has blest us, the Czar, and has given us to govern and judge faith-
fully our people in the East, West, South and North'. This notion of the
sovereign as the direct agent of God is a principle common to absolutism
throughout Europe. But Russian absolutism had another basis; Muscovy
was the private property of the Kalita family. The state was the hereditary
property of a dynasty, but after the death of Feydor Ivanovitch in 1598
the Kalita family became extinct. The problem of the time of troubles
from 1598 to 1613 was to discover a czar by birth. When the Zemsky
Sobor of 1613 declared Mikhail Romanof, czar, it was because he was the
nephew of the last Kalita and was said to be 'elected by God before his
birth'. But the fact remained that the state had survived without a czar
during the time of troubles. Thus the state began to be distinguished
from the person of the sovereign. There was also some temporary
weakening of the old ideas of autocracy, but they ended by reasserting
themselves.
The word absolutism was also to be found in Polish documents. The
Kings Sigismund III and Ladislas IV, were accused of claiming absolute
power when they asked the Diet to provide permanent taxes for the crown
and a standing army in order to preserve the state. Although the Polish
Diet had greatly reduced the king's powers, Poland was not a Standestaat,
for although the Diet comprised three estates—the King, the Senate and
Chamber of Deputies—only nobles were represented. Poland was a
republic of nobles, with an elective king of very limited powers. The con-
stitution was based on the unbridled individualism of the nobles, guaran-
teed by the 'fundamental laws'. The rights of the individual noble were
respected to such an extent that all nobles were regarded as equal, thus
excluding the use of distinguishing titles; all decisions had to be unani-
mous, while each deputy in the Diet had a limited and specific mandate.
"3
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
In Poland absolutism only existed in the power that each noble had over
the inhabitants of his domain. Over-mighty subjects were kings and the
state was a mirage.
The rule of unanimity paralysed the Diets and even endangered the
country's defence. In March 1606 Sigismund III convoked a Diet in
order to reform the constitution by establishing majority rule, a per-
manent tax and a standing army. The bishops and some of the laymen
supported majority rule, which would have removed sovereignty from the
individual nobles and restored it to the Diet. But the opposition accused
the king of aspiring to absolutum dominium. Some of the nobles, led by
Zebrodowsky, claimed that the king had broken the fundamental law,
and rebelled. They were defeated, but the Diet of 1609 guaranteed the
inviolability of the constitution. Subsequent attempts at reform were
equally unsuccessful. State sovereignty was not only shattered by the
principle of unanimity, but individual sovereignty was still further rein-
forced and guaranteed by the progressive establishment of the liberum
veto which was permanently established by the Diet of 1652. At the end
of the statutory six weeks the Diet had not reached agreement and the
king demanded a prolongation; the deputy Ladislas Sicinski announced
his veto and left. As it seemed impossible to constrain individual members,
the Diet was declared dissolved. Henceforward such interrupted Diets
became more frequent. Attempts to abolish the liberum veto and to adopt
majority rule failed. Neither the king nor the Diet possessed full sover-
eignty; Poland's unreformed and irreformable constitution brought its
defeats, loss of territories and ultimate extinction.
In the Holy Roman Empire the Standestaat prevailed. Such a state was
based upon the sacred rights of corporations, communities and indivi-
duals, guaranteed by fundamental laws. There was also a dualism between
the prince and 'the estates', the nobility, the clergy and towns, whose
deputies met in Diets. These had to be consulted about everything con-
cerning the country's welfare. They had to give their consent to war,
peace, and alliances, and to levying taxes which were often collected under
the supervision of their own officials. Their committees and officials might
also supervise the whole administration of the state. Althusius was the
theorist of this kind of state; man is a social animal who needs society in
order to live a truly human life. In every society authority is needed to
allocate common resources, organize work, and arrange co-operation.
The family, the village, the province and the state, has each an organic
form, the grouping together of whose successive units produces a larger
organism. The province was the natural unit of the Standestaat. There
each order, the church, the nobles, the craftsmen and peasants had its
own deputies to consider its own affairs and to join with the other orders
in considering more general matters. The head of the province, whether
count, duke or prince, had the attributes of sovereignty, but on important
114
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM
matters convoked the Estates and gave their decisions the force of law
by agreeing to execute them.
The Diets generally controlled the princes because they controlled
finance, but there were often conflicts. In East Friesland, for example,
both the count and the Estates claimed to be sovereign so that there were
two financial administrations, two armies and two sets of diplomats. The
Estates, led by the town of Emden, negotiated with the Dutch, and the
count with the English. Elsewhere there were even more extreme ideas;
about 1610 Von Tschernembl told the Estates of Upper Austria that the
people, i.e. the nobility, were really sovereign: 'the people choose their
prince and can also reject him . . . the territory decides for itself whether
its ruler shall be hereditary . . .'.
This type of state persisted most strongly in the early seventeenth
century in small countries. In the larger ones, such as Bohemia, Bavaria,
or France, transformation into absolute monarchy had begun. The
principal political cause of this was the Thirty Years War which showed
that the Standestaat was incapable of the rapid and energetic actions
necessary for defence and so facilitated the growth of military despotism.
In Brandenburg after 1631 the Swedish army provided the example of
raising taxes by requisitioning without the consent of the Estates which
was later followed by the Elector George William. The development of
absolutism in Brandenburg-Prussia had special characteristics, owing to
economic and social circumstances: the decline of the towns and the
growth of demesne fanning dependent upon serf labour. This resulted in
the preponderance of the landed nobility, Junkers, who eventually
recognized the prince's absolutism, while obtaining their own monopoly
of social privileges. Such developments owed much to theories which
justified the claims of princes while undermining those of their opponents.
Suarez and Bellarmine greatly helped Maximilian of Bavaria and the
Emperors Ferdinand II and Ferdinand III. Lutheranism always extolled
the omnipotence of princes; while Calvinism did so when the prince was
a Calvinist. The electors of Brandenburg found Calvinist councillors their
best helpers in promoting absolutism. This can be seen in the religiosity
of the Confessio Sigismundi (1614)—which was perhaps not written by
the Elector John Sigismund but by his spiritual adviser—and also in the
Great Elector's political testament, where the king owes homage to God
who protects him and will bless his enterprises, if he does not suffer his
household to be polluted with mistresses, operas, comedies, masques,
etc.; such pietistic attitudes went very well with ideas of sovereignty and
raison d'etat.
For these political theorists, jurists and statesmen, whether Protestant
or Catholic, were strongly influenced by Bodin's conception of sovereignty
and by Machiavelli's of raison d'etat. According to Hippolitus a Lapide,
raison d'itat was 'a certain political consideration towards which all
115
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
councils and all actions in the state are directed . . . so that by it was
attained more speedily and successfully the supreme end, the safety and
growth of the state'. Sovereignty and raison d'etat were the active prin-
ciples which enabled the modern state to break the resistance of provincial
estates, of privileged orders, corporations and individuals. Through them
princes were able to develop new ideas of law in the course of their quest
for absolutism. The salus publica allowed the over-riding of old ideas of
sacrosanct rights and constant changes of laws and customs so that the
law was a perpetually fluctuating response to the maxim salus publica,
suprema lex. The literature of raison d'etat flourished in the Holy Roman
Empire and was profoundly influenced by the Italians, Botero and Am-
mirato, who were much admired at Ferdinand II's court. Raison d'etat
was expounded in the books of Christopher Besold, professor of law at
Tubingen {Politicorum libri duo, 1618), in those of Reinking, Coming,
Hippolitus a Lapide and in the Manuale Politicum de Ratione Status, seu
Idole Principum by the imperial councillor Von Efferen (1630). Conring
produced a dissertation on ratio status under the name of Heinrich Voss-
ging and dedicated it to the Great Elector in 1651. By then raison d'etat
was a common subject of conversation and jurists had made it into a
special category of law. Clapmarius' De arcanis rerum publicarum libri sex
(1605, reprinted 1644), identified arcana dominationis and reason of
state, understanding it as jus dominationis which gave the sovereign the
right to over-ride common law, jus commune seu ordinarium, in the name
of bonum publicum. J. A. Struve {Syntagma Juris Civilis, 1658) wrote:
'Law is a disposition, a rule prescribed according to some principle by a
superior, according to which men's actions are guided in such a way that
they may be just.' Thus the prince's will and the state's power become the
foundation of positive law. Such conceptions encouraged princes to act
and influenced their actions. This can be seen when Ferdinand II altered
the constitution and privileges of the towns and estates of Bohemia in the
ordinance of 10 May 1627, or still more clearly in the execution of
Wallenstein (1634) where the necessity of the state over-rode positive law
and customary forms of trial.
Italy, apart from Venice and Savoy, was a province of Spain, dominated
by the thought of Suarez and Bellarmine. Bodin and Machiavelli were
also influential there and the humanist notion of the hero persisted, while
Tacitus, the historian of the empire, became more popular than Livy, the
historian of the republic. Political writers were associated with the courts of
Italian princes, themselves seeking absolute power, though often clients
of Spain. Ideas such as those of Botero were current: the mainspring of
any state is the obedience of its subjects, this depends upon the prince's
virtue; he is a hero of superhuman intelligence who leads a perfect life
and deserves absolute power. Thus quicquid principi placuit legis habet
vigorem, the prince is legibus solutus, superiorem non recognoscens.
116
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM
Gamberti developed the same theme in his Idea di un Principe et Eroe
Christiano (1659). The Italians also claimed that the prince was the vicar
of God. G. Gucci in // Principe Christiano Politico (1630) held that his
omnipotence came immediately from God, while the majority held it
came indirectly through the consent of man, as did Canonieri in L'lntro-
ductione alia Politico (1640), but by this transfer the subjects renounced
all their power. The Lex Regia was considered the foundation of princely
absolutism. The prince himself possessed all sovereign power and,
although Bodin was officially proscribed, he influenced Zuccolo (// Secolo
delVOro, 1629), and R. Delia Torre (Astrolobio di Stato, 1647), etc. Every
sovereign prince had the same power within his state as that possessed by
the Roman emperors. They all agreed that the prince ought to respect
natural law, the law of nations and, in ordinary circumstances, any just
and reasonable laws. Italians inclined to limit the prince's absolute power
to a greater extent than Bodin.
Naturally the adaptations of Machiavelli to the Council of Trent by
distinctions between bad raison d'etat and good raison d'etat, serving
Christian ends, made by the Jesuit Botero (Ragion di Stato, 1589) and
Ammirato {Discorsi supra Cornelio Tacito, 1598) were influential.
According to Zuccolo (La Ragion di Stato, 1621): 'Not only councillors
in the courts and doctors in the schools, but barbers and the most humble
craftsmen in the shops . . . discussed and disputed about raison d'etat and
persuaded themselves that they knew what things are done by raison d'etat
and what not.' Many others admitted that raison d'etat justified depar-
tures from equity when the state's existence was at stake. Although Paolo
Sarpi, as a convinced anti-Jesuit, was opposed to Botero, he believed that
the state's integrity and sovereignty should be preserved at any price.
In his letter to the Doge Antonio Priuli of 26 November 1628, he de-
scribes a conversation with the Prince of Conde in which he maintained
that Christ's Kingdom was not of this world, and that religion was con-
cerned with heavenly things, while government was of this world and
that therefore religion and government could neither meet nor conflict.
This amounted to making the safety or preservation of the state the only
moral imperative of government. Even an anti-Machiavellian like Cam-
panella was obliged to acknowledge that the Jews had been defeated
when they refused to fight on the Sabbath so that the Maccabees had held
that 'in times of necessity, men must always fight', thus showing there
was a raison d'etat. That kingdom which he nominated to realize his City
of the Sun (1602) (first Spain, Monarchia Hispanica, 1620, then France,
Monarchie de He Nationi, 1635) was to be allowed raison d'etat.
In Spain Suarez' and Bellarmine's ideas triumphed with the crown's
approval. They were adapted to the particular circumstances of Spain by
some fifty political writers, including Jesuits, lawyers, judges, councillors,
soldiers and ambassadors. They wrote mostly in Spanish, but a still
117
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
wider audience could be reached by translating political maxims into
visual emblems. Thus the clock became the symbol of the king keeping
the various wheels in unison, while a river divided into many branches
illustrated the maxim that division of forces weakens. Besides books of
emblems such as F. D. Saavedra's Political Idea of a Christian Prince
Expressed in a Hundred and One Symbols (Paris, 1660), there were pro-
cessions with tableaux and epigrams of political import at all the chief
festivals in Spain and the Spanish possessions. Their significance was
further expounded by books such as Martinez de Herrera's The Wise
Prince followed by an explanation of the epigrams produced at Naples
for the feast of St John (1631).
Nearly all Spanish writers used Bodin's idea of sovereignty, especially
D. Tovar Valderrama (Instituciones Politicas, 1645). Nearly all allowed
the king full authority over the lives and goods of his subjects, to break
laws and customs, to dispense with them and to change them according
to the necessities of government. Nearly all agreed that the king was the
vicar of God, a god on earth, that he ought to be an example to his
subjects and govern according to God's will for the glory of God and
the common weal, respecting natural laws and the law of nations and
ordinarily acting according to the laws which he had made. A royal
officer ought not to execute a king's orders if they were against conscience,
against God's commands and the teachings of the church. But they did
not conceive of organs for limiting princely power, since sovereignty
could not be limited. The limits came from the very structure of princely
power and the natural order in which it was exercised; 'the crown's
circumference was drawn with justice as its centre' (Saavedra Fajardo,
Idea of a Politic Christian Prince, 1640). Thus the prince's education was a
major political matter. He should be instructed always to make use of his
council. If he was inadequate to the crushing tasks demanded of an
absolute prince so that he had to make use of a favourite as his deputy, at
least he should guard against favouritism. His subjects owed him obe-
dience and love, whatever his personal merit, for he was the mystical
symbol through whom the citizens had communion and through whom
the individual thought and wills of society were harmonized.
The Spaniards sought in Tacitus natural rules for the governments of
states and interpreted them in the light of Thomism. They distinguished
between Machiavelli's false raison d'e~tat and the true one, agreeable to
divine law. By prayers and virtuous actions the king protected himself
from political evil as from sin, but raison d'etat allowed him to crush
revolts without recourse to judicial process, since all means were justified
in order to preserve order and authority. If the king became a tyrant he
must be endured, as God's punishment for the people's sins, and not
resisted: 'to kill the King is an execrable crime' (Quevedo, Politica de
Dios, 1626). On these points all the authors agreed. Spanish political
118
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM
books were commonly read in France; many were printed at Rouen, or
Paris, either in Spanish, or in Latin and French translations.
France was the kingdom where the king was most absolute and the
doctrine of absolutism reached its height, while neothomist influence
was more circumspect. Men of the robe, counsellors in the Conseil du Roi,
like Cardin le Bret (De la Souverainete du Roi, 1632), courtiers like the
royal historiographer Andre du Chesne (Les antiquites et recherches de la
grandeur et majeste des Rois de France, 1610), royal or seigneurial
officers like Charles Loyseau (Oeuvres, 1610), agreed with Suarez and
Bellarmine in seeing the state as a moral organism, a mystical body, part
of the order and hierarchy of the universe, created by God. They were
all disciples of Bodin and emphasized sovereignty more strongly than
authors from other countries:
Sovereignty cannot be separated from the state; should this happen, there would no
longer be a state. Sovereignty is the form which gives being to the state, the state
and sovereignty, taken in concrete are synonyms and the state is so called, because
sovereignty is the fulfilment and expression of that power whereby the state is
necessarily ordained and established... [Sovereignty] consists of absolute power...
perfect, complete in every respect... and just as the crown cannot exist unless it is
an unbroken circle, so sovereignty would not exist, if it lacks anything.
Thus the state and the sovereign who personifies it has absolute power.
The king alone has power to legislate, to give privileges, to create offices,
render justice, coin moneys,' levy taxes without the consent of the Estates',
since the prince's authority covers goods as well as persons and he can
use them for the 'rightful service and needs of the people'. Thus wrote
Loyseau in his Traite des Seigneuries and le Bret repeated it in different
terms. These writers also insisted upon the divine and sacerdotal character
of the king of France, especially at moments of crisis, such as the Day of
Dupes, or the Fronde.
The Kings of France are Kings, elected and chosen by God, Kings after His own
heart, who, thanks to the divinity that His finger has printed on their face, have the
honour of being at the head of the kings of all Christendom. Kings are the living
images of God ... like earthly divinities . . . our great kings have never been con-
sidered simply as laymen, but as endowed both with priesthood and royalty
(du Chesne).
They recalled the episcopal function at the coronation with 'the heavenly
liquid brought by an Angel in the Sainte-Ampoule at the baptism of
Clovis' as well as the French kings' power to perform miracles, or to heal
scrofula by their touch. Their healing powers brought thousands of sick
from all over France as well as from all parts of Europe, to the jealousy
of other kings. On 13 November 1625 the bishop of Chartres in the name
of the assembly of the clergy declared 'That kings are ordained by God
and that furthermore they themselves are gods'. No hand should be laid
on the king and he must not even be criticized. Moreover raison d'etat
..
"9
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
allowed them to demand an almost passive obedience in most cases. As
le Bret put it:
To know whether obedience is due to commands which, although they seem unjust,
have the welfare of the state as their constant object, as if the prince should com-
mand the killing of someone who was notoriously rebellious, factious and seditious.
My opinion is that on such occasions one should obey without reservation . . . all
such orders should be judged just, or unjust, according to the advantage or disadvan-
tage that the state might receive from their execution... Is a man, whose conscience
tells him that what the king orders him to do is unjust bound to obey ? . . . He ought
to follow the king's will not his o w n . . . If it is an occasion when urgent assistance is
required for the common weal, resistance . . . would be pure disobedience. Neces-
sitas omnem legem frangit. ..
Thus the French went much further in the direction of absolutism than
the Spaniards.
However, these Frenchmen distinguished between absolutism and
despotism and considered themselves free men protected by guarantees.
There were the fundamental laws, of which the first was the Salic law
'written upon the hearts of Frenchmen . . . born with us . . . arising from
nature itself (Bignon). This ensured hereditary succession by male primo-
geniture, prevented elections, or the nomination of his successor by the
king, and so avoided murders, vengeance and civil wars. This law bound
the king who could not change it; without it there would have been no
king. Next the king ought to respect natural law, especially property
rights, personal liberty and the sacredness of contracts. But imprisonment
by royal lettres de cachet did not seem to them to violate individual liberty,
since the king was the supreme judge. Finally the king ought to respect
God's commandments and to treat his subjects with the goodness and
justice of God on pain of calamities in this world and of punishment in
the next.
Most, but not all, Frenchmen accepted these views. In 1611 Turquet de
Mayerne, a Protestant from a family of merchants and doctors who had
become landowners and been ennobled, published the Monarchic Aristo-
Democratique, dedicated to the States General of the United Netherlands.
He advocated the disappearance of the ancient military nobility and that
merchants and members of the liberal professions, agripossesseurs, should
have the first place in the state, provide its officials and have sovereign
powers. They would make a contract with the king who would swear to
maintain each in his rank and possessions. Estates General, whose mem-
bers were agripossesseurs, indirectly elected, would meet regularly, legis-
late, vote taxes and control their expenditure, make war, peace and
alliances, appoint commissioners to supervise the administration, control
the membership of the king's council, which would be reduced to a
purely executive role, and finally would control the militia of armed
bourgeois. The state would thus be the agent of the bourgeois class. The
120
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM
book was well received by Parisian bourgeoisie, but was suppressed by the
king's council, though it was remembered again on the eve of the Fronde.
Other anti-absolutist views, stressing the fundamental laws, reappeared
periodically during the minorities of Louis XIII and Louis XIV, especially
during the Fronde (1648-53). The princes of the blood were prepared to
accept sovereignty and raison d'etat, provided they shared power with the
king. They invoked 'the ancient constitution' and demanded a council
composed of princes of the blood, the other princes and of the great
officers of state, instead of one freely chosen by the king. Above all, they
wanted the subordination of the robe and the exclusion of favourites,
such as Richelieu or Mazarin, men devoted to the king and apt instru-
ments of absolutism. During minorities they demanded that a council of
magnates should exercise absolute power to the exclusion of women
(Marie de Medici, Anne of Austria) and foreigners (Concini, Mazarin).
The nobility as a whole was opposed to any conception of sovereignty
and raison d'etat and only demanded the summoning of the Estates
General according to their petition of 28 February 1651, in order to
preserve' the franchises, honours, rights and immunities of our order and
to re-establish ourselves in our former lustre'. They wanted to preserve
feudal relics and to prevent the fulfilment of the state.
The Parlement of Paris, although merely a court of justice, in its decree
of 21 May 1615, in the Arret d'Union of 13 May 1648, and in pamphlets
during the Fronde, declared itself the king's true council, his 'throne', as
heir of the old curia regis and of the Frankish assemblies. Thus the king
needed its assent for all important acts of government; it claimed legis-
lative power, the right to consider, amend, reject, and vote freely upon
royal edicts and ordinances, without having their registration enforced
by /// de justice. The Parlement even wished to have immediate knowledge
of all state affairs, to summon at will the princes of the blood, the lay and
ecclesiastical peers, the great officers of state, and the councillors of state
to form the curia regis and a substitute for the Estates General. In 1652,
during the civil war, the Parlement, as a substitute for the Estates General
and as heir of the general assembly of the Franks which had conferred
sovereignty on Pharamond (!), went so far as to claim the right to entrust
the royal authority to whomsoever it wished and to make final decisions
on all matters, since it was 'the depository and as it were the perpetual
guardian of sovereign authority'. The Parlement aimed at judicial
absolutism with the courts exercising sovereign power.
Others dreamed of transforming the kingdom into a Standestaat.
Claude Joly was the most celebrated of these. He was a canon of Notre
Dame who had seen the German states for himself when attending the
Congress of Munster. He used history and the fundamental laws to argue
that the monarchy was contractual in his Recueil de Maximes veritables et
importants in 1652. The peoples had set up kings, had made contracts
121
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
with them and had granted them full power on condition that kings pro-
tected them and gave them justice. God ratified this contract and the
prince's authority derived immediately from this. But it follows that royal
power was 'limited and restricted', while the form of government should
be aristocratic. The Estates General watched over the maintenance of the
'ancient customs, laws and ordinances' thus guaranteeing each man's
intangible rights. The Estates would vote taxes and appoint commis-
sioners and receivers to raise them, exclude evil councillors, and together
with the king they would decide on war and peace. They would meet at
regular intervals and between sessions their deputies would supervise the
carrying out of their decisions. Judicial officers would no longer be royal
nominees; existing officers would choose three candidates for each vacant
place from whom the king would select one. Joly seems to have foreseen
that the other royal officials would be accountable for their actions to the
courts. Finally the Parlement would still verify all royal acts and with the
other sovereign courts would form a commission to judge any breaches
of the Estates General's acts by royal officials. Thus the executive power
would be under the control of the judiciary. The king must govern
without favourites and be his own first minister. He should do nothing
without a council of wise men from which cardinals, bishops, and
foreigners would be excluded; while foreigners would be excluded from
all employment and benefices. The realization of these ideas was pre-
vented by the anarchy of the Fronde, which emphasized the need for
order and security and so assisted the triumph of absolutism.
Absolutism was also a problem in Sweden, where the Charter of 1612
had consolidated the Stiindestaat, but Gustavus Adolphus was deeply
influenced by the Lutheran conception of princely power. He also learnt
the neo-Stoic ideas of Justus Lipsius from Daniel Heinsius, a professor
at Leiden, who in 1618 became his councillor and historiographer, and
from Johann Skytte. Lipsius was a Deist and does not mention Christ;
for him religion consists of acting according to the will of God. Man
functions in a community devised for the common good, the state.
Monarchy is the most natural and reasonable form of state. The prince
is above the people and ought to have an absolute power which should be
patriarchal, having the welfare and prosperity of his subjects as its
object. The prince should observe the law, and Lipsius protested against
Bodin's formula rex legibus solutus. The prince ought always to listen to
the advice of his council, but should make decisions himself. Lipsius
agreed with Seneca that necessitas omnem legem frangit. Such prudent
and moderate views suited Gustavus Adolphus. He respected constitu-
tional forms and was ready to share sovereignty with the Estates, but also
knew how to impose his policy on the four Estates of the Riksdag by
presenting himself as the champion of Lutheranism and the fatherland
against Poland and the emperor, and so achieved a patriarchal absolutism.
122
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM
After 1625 he was much influenced by Grotius, who maintained that
sovereignty belonged to the prince and that the people had no right to
check or punish him, if he misused his authority (De Jure Belli ac Pads,
i,3).
Queen Christina also surrounded herself with Netherlanders and Ger-
mans and was deeply influenced by neo-Stoicism, but she adopted the
French theory of absolutism and tried to introduce it in practice. She was
always convinced that an absolute sovereign was responsible to God
alone, while the example of Richelieu and Mazarin convinced her that
royal sovereign power needed to be joined with absolute spiritual authority
to function effectively. In her act of abdication she reserved absolute
sovereignty to herself over all the members of her court. She used this
power when she herself accused and tried Monaldeschi and had him
executed. But like Descartes, Corneille, Retz, and Louis XIV, she under-
stood that to claim such sovereignty implied taking the ideal hero as a
model. His freedom came from strict control of passions; acting on clear
and distinct ideas he takes decisions from which he never retreats, what-
ever their consequences. The conquest of power by being perfect mistress
of herself and an unswerving pursuit of her goal was her ideal. Probably
she thought of her abdication as a means to this end, since freedom and
victory over self provided authority of a higher order than did possession
of a crown.
In the northern Netherlands problems of absolutism occurred in each
province, for the provincial Estates were not truly sovereign in view of the
conflicting privileges of towns and nobles. The union between the pro-
vinces was only a loose federation; any decision of the Estates General
implied unanimity from deputies of the provincial Estates who were
bound by strict mandate. In practice, any decision seemed to require a
referendum involving some 1,200 persons. Many thought that the pro-
vincial Estates ought to be sovereign and such people, usually members
of the urban oligarchies, found the theories of Althusius satisfactory.
Many wanted a centralized sovereignty. The stadtholder, whose office was
hereditary in the House of Orange, retained some of the attributes of
sovereignty; Maurice of Nassau hoped to increase his power and so was
led to ally with the Gomarists, who were strict Calvinists, against the
Arminians, supporters of free will and toleration. Strict Calvinism
favoured absolutism in a prince who was a good Calvinist and the
existence of a sovereign power above the provincial estates in order to
impose religious uniformity. The Arminians such as Oldenbarnevelt, the
Grand Pensionary of Holland, asserted the sovereignty of the provincial
Estates, since in practice this ensured Holland's preponderance in the
States General. After the triumph of the Gomarists at the Synod of
Dordrecht (1619), the execution of Oldenbarnevelt and the flight of
Grotius, Maurice of Nassau named regents and chose the pensionary
123
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
from a list of three candidates. His power was much greater, but he was
very far from being an absolute prince. The problems of sovereignty and
absolutism remained continuing issues within this federative republic.
In the southern Netherlands neo-Stoic and neo-Thomist views were
dominant, despite Jansenism, thanks to the University of Louvain.
In England between 1600 and 1640 the predominant notion was still
that of a body of rights, possessed by corporations and individuals,
according to their social function. The king possessed rights, guaranteed
by 'fundamental laws' which were part of the common law. The king's
power appeared to be primarily judicial, as did that of Parliament, the
supreme court of the kingdom, whose role was to declare and apply
already existing law rather than to make laws. Everyone spoke of these
fundamental laws and took them for granted without explaining precisely
what they were. James I recognized their existence and told Parliament
in 1610 that the law had placed the crown on his head and that he was
king by the common law of the realm. In The Trew Law of Free Monar-
chies he had written that the first and most fundamental law was the
coronation oath which obliged the king to maintain the established
religion, cherish good laws, preserve each man's privileges and liberties,
and to seek the common weal. This he said yi 1609 was primarily con-
cerned with private property, meum ac tuum. Seneca's phrase, ad reges
potestas omnium pertinet, ad singulos proprietas, was often cited. Sir
Dudley Digges said at a conference of the Lords and Commons in 1628
concerning resistance to forced loans:
It is an undoubted and fundamental point of this so ancient a Law of England, that
the subjects have a true property in their goods, lands and possessions. The law
preserves as sacred this Meum and Tuum which is the Nurse of Industry and
Mother of Courage; for, if no Property, no Care of defence. Without this Meum
and Tuum, there can be neither Law nor Justice in a Kingdom; for this is the proper
object of both.
This individual right of property extends to a man's own body and so
produces personal freedom. Thus, 'Every free subject of this realm hath a
fundamental propriety in his goods and a fundamental liberty of his per-
son. ' The fundamental laws naturally included those rights which were
necessary to enable the king to govern: his absolute power, his preroga-
tive, in certain matters. These were matters of state, cases of urgency or
involving the being, welfare, or property of the state, thus including
everything essentially concerned with foreign policy, war and peace, the
army and navy, coinage, regulation of industry and supplies necessary for
defence, public order and in case of necessity, any matter. Parliament had
a duty to watch over the fundamental laws. It consisted of three Estates;
traditionally these were the Lords spiritual and temporal and the Com-
mons, though some already held the view, preponderant after 1642,
that they were King, Lords and Commons. Parliament could not infringe
124
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM
the king's rights guaranteed by fundamental law for 'no Act of Parliament
can bar a King of his Regality' (Sir John Finch).
Neither James I nor Charles I directly challenged these fundamental
laws. In levying ship money Charles I claimed to be driven by necessity
and thus had not violated the ordinary sacred rights of property. But they
did seek to extend the scope of their absolute power and stressed funda-
mental principles of monarchy. James I said that 'Kings are justly called
gods, they are God's lieutenants sitting upon his throne on earth'. In
the sphere of their prerogative their powers are unlimited; as Samuel
told the Jews, 'the king could take their sons as soldiers or servants and
give away their fields and vineyards'. The people should obey the king's
demands
in all things, except directly against God, as the commands of God's Minister,
acknowledging him a Judge set by God over them, having power to judge them, but
to be judged only by God to whom only he must give account of his judgement...
praying to him as their protector, for his continuance if he be good; for his amendment
if he be wicked; following and obeying his lawful commands, eschewing and flying his
fury in his unlawful commands, without resistance, but by sobs and tears to God . . .
The Anglican clergy, including many Puritans, preached that monarchy
was the best form of government, that the king's power came immediately
from God, that the king was responsible for the safety of his kingdoms
and was furnished with a discretionary power to this end which was
absolute. Down to 1640, nearly everyone accepted such views, including
leaders of the Parliamentary opposition: Pym in 1621 and Coryton in
1628 said, 'the King hath the power of God'. But men resisted any
extension of absolute power, whether inspired by social changes in England,
or by continental examples, or by any ideas of the school of natural law,
or those of Bodin who was much read in England, or by those invoking
raison d'etat.
The boundaries between the king's rights and those of the subject were
extremely vague. The opposition leaders could find nothing in the
common law in 1610 which clearly forbade the king to take the property
of his subjects by means of impositions on trade and nothing in 1628
which forbade him to imprison their persons. The law could be adapted
to suit any case. Opposition became embittered in so far as the individual's
rights no longer came to be considered as privileges arising from a parti-
cular situation, but as absolute rights, derived from general principles.
On the king's side some of the clergy brought out the plenitude of the
king's sovereign power, as did Dickinson in his sermon The King's Right
(1619), Manwaring in two sermons in July 1627 told Charles I his
sovereign will gave binding legal force to 'Royal Edicts concluded out of
Reasons of State' and in 1614 W. Goodwin had declared that the king was
Ipse solutus legibus. Some royal judges (Sir Thomas Fleming in Bate's
Case, 1606; Sir John Da vies in his treatise on impositions; Sir Robert
125
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Heath in Darnel's Case, 1627; Sir John Banks, the Case of Ship Money,
1637) tried to extend the royal prerogative, especially in the direction of
giving the king autonomous power to impose taxes. They wished to
show that the common law was equivalent to divine law, to natural law
and to the law of reason, which laid down the principles of monarchical
rule, so that according to the common law 'Rex is Lex', and that the
king could rule like an emperor, since salus populi suprema lex. Davies
even argued that by natural law all things were common and that the
king, by limiting the absolute power given him by the law of nations, had
as an act of grace created private property, which remained fundamental,
but was under positive law and subject to raison d'etat.
The theorists and lawyers of the opposition followed the same proce-
dure in an opposite direction, identifying the fundamental laws with
natural law and the law of reason. Sir Edward Coke, in Bonham's Case,
said: '. . . in many cases the common law will control acts of parliament
and sometimes adjudge them to be utterly void: for when an act of parlia-
ment is against common right and reason, or repugnant, or impossible
to be performed, the common law will control it and adjudge such an
act to be void'. Natural law, reason and the common law agree that a
man cannot be judge in his own case. Thus the College of Physicians was
not competent to condemn Bonham. Chief Justice Hobart (Day v.
Savadge) and Sir John Davies {Le premier report des cases et matters en
ley, 1615) argued that the laws of nature are immutable and sacred, the
touchstone of laws, identical with reason and the foundation of the
common law, so that any Act of Parliament, or still more of the king
alone, contrary to them, is void. For Coke the essence of the common
law, as of all law, was reason, showing itself constantly in the life of a
nation. The judges declared the law according to the dictates of reason.
Coke also created a historical myth that the pure law of the Saxons,
corrupted by the Norman Conquest, had begun to revive with Magna
Carta and was now to be made the basis of the state by Parliament. Coke
had been dismissed from the chief justiceship by James I in 1616, but
became a member of the parliaments of the 1620s and a principal author
of the Petition of Right. He wrote the Institutes of the Laws of England of
which the first part appeared in 1628, the rest only being published in
June 1642 by Parliament.
The opponents of Charles I constantly invoked fundamental law in this
wide sense to show that property and liberty were absolute and inviolable
rights. The difficulty was that the rival theorists pitted one set of absolute
rights against another. Their impeachments accused Strafford, Laud, and
Sir Robert Berkeley of having 'endeavoured to subvert the fundamental
laws and established government of the realm of England'. In 1641 the
Grand Remonstrance claimed all mischiefs were due to a ' . . . pernicious
design of subverting the fundamental laws and principles of government
126
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM
upon which the religion and justice of this kingdom are firmly established'.
Charles I was condemned to death in 1649 for his 'wicked design to
subvert the ancient and fundamental laws and liberties of this nation and
in their place to introduce an arbitrary and tyrannical government'.
Puritanism played a large part in resistance to the crown, although until
1640 Puritan preachers expressed no very distinctive political views. But
to many Puritans the king was not a hero, a living god, exalted above the
subject masses. He was depraved, like all men, and might be inferior to
those roused directly by God's grace to struggle against sin. God's elect
were not necessarily the great of this world; the sign of election was
experience of spiritual conflict, not worldly learning. They were saints,
made kings and priests by justification, whose characteristic was to
follow their consciences whatever the cost. A king who was not one of the
saints was in a weak position. Some Puritans while maintaining the
supremacy of faith and revelation gave great weight to reason and nature,
claiming that the principles of the common law supported the doctrine of
predestination (J. Preston, The New Covenant, 1629; Life Eternal, 1631);
they insisted that obedience was due to God rather than the king, that
God was the true king of England. As they were not free to follow then-
ideas of church order within the Anglican church, they were opposed to
the bishops and so to the king. Puritan feeling helped to rouse opposition
and was the motive force in the Long Parliament, when preaching was
freed and many public fasts, accompanied by sermons, were ordained.
The preachers applied to Charles I what the Bible said of wicked kings,
repeated that human laws did not bind conscience and told members of
Parliament that they were agents of God, replacing the king as his
lieutenant. They recalled that government according to divine and natural
law rested on a compact made by the people for satisfaction of their
natural needs and was to be obeyed only as long as it observed that com-
pact and God's commands.
After 1640 Parliament exercised an arbitrary, absolute and truly
sovereign power of which the kings had only dreamed, helped by ideas
of using sovereignty and raison d'etat in the name of the people. Unable
to condemn Strafford by due process of law, Parliament had invoked
necessity and public safety. Similarly, in justifying their ordinance taking
control of the militia from the king, they declared that Parliament was
not only a court of judicature, but also ' a counsel to provide for the
necessities, prevent the imminent dangers and preserve the public peace
and safety of the kingdom and to declare the king's pleasure in those
things that are requisite thereunto'. Parliament ruled absolutely, but
refused to proclaim its sovereignty; though Henry Parker, secretary to the
Parliamentary army, in his Animadversions (1642) asserted 'the sovereign
power resides in both houses of Parliament, the king having no negative
voice'; while William Prynne in The Sovereign Power of Parliaments and
127
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Kingdoms (1643) saw kings as 'but servants to, not absolute lords over
their kingdoms in whom the legislative power and authority resides'. An
anonymous pamphleteer {Touching the Fundamental Laws) found the court
of Parliament'... fundamental and paramount, comprehending law and
equity, and being entrusted by the whole for the whole, is not therefore to
be circumscribed by any other laws which have their being from it, nor
it from them, but only by that law which at first gave it its being . . . salus
populV. Charles, in answering the declaration of 19 May 1642, was justi-
fied in complaining that the will of the majority at Westminster had dis-
placed the law and was asserting an absolute and arbitrary power.
Puritans saw the history of the world as a struggle between Christ and
anti-Christ for men's souls and identified the victory of Parliament with
that of Christ. In setting up a presbyterian system of church government
(1646), Parliament found its sovereignty challenged by Puritan dissidents.
Puritan preachers had appealed to the claims of the individual conscience;
some now held that any man could be saved if he would accept God's
grace; others that as long as a man believed in God and the Bible, errors
must be tolerated. The dissidents claimed liberty for tender consciences
to group themselves freely in congregations and under ministers outside
the presbyterian system. They were numerous in the New Model Army,
where there were groups denying predestination, believing in the immedi-
ate and absolute effects of grace, in the religion of the Holy Spirit,
rejecting the laws of all former dispensations, or expecting the second
coming. The most extreme denied the magistrate any power in religion
and demanded complete freedom of preaching and printing. All the dis-
sidents feared that Parliament would impose religious uniformity and
were ready to resist its claims to absolute authority. From 1646 a group
whose revolutionary demands led their enemies to call them Levellers
formed round Lilburne, Walwyn and Overton in London. Lilburne
rebuked Parliament for refusing the people freedom in religion, the press
and trade and so tyrannically violating the natural rights of Englishmen.
He appealed once more to the fundamental laws, identified with the laws
of God, nature and reason. Overton in 1646 declared all men equal.
Nature revealed to each man's reason what was necessary for his good.
Each had a natural right to property and liberty and was king, priest and
prophet according to the order of nature. Members of Parliament were
deputies of the people and could not violate individual rights, the just
prerogatives of all mankind. Walwyn equated king and parliament, saying
that for the Levellers 'it is all one to them who oppressed them'. Their
political programme {The Agreement of the People) included biennial
parliaments, equality before the law, the vote for all who were not
paupers or servants, redistribution of seats in proportion to density of
population, freedom to meet, speak, publish, and to petition Parliament
upon any subject.
128
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM
When Parliament attempted to rid itself of the New Model Army, the
agitators elected by the troops adopted the Leveller programme, although
Cromwell and Ireton considered that it threatened property rights. At the
Putney Debates in 1647 Ireton said that if all men had the vote by 'the
right of nature', then' you must deny all property too'; for if' a man hath
an equal right with another to the choosing him that shall govern him—
by the same right of nature he hath the same right in any goods he sees . . . '
'Here is the most fundamental part of the constitution of the kingdom,
which if you take away, you take away all.' Ireton wished to limit the
parliamentary franchise to those with 'a local, a permanent interest in the
kingdom', freeholders, freemen of towns and gentry. Ireton and Cromwell
did not believe that complete toleration, if this meant denying the magistrate
any authority in religion, was possible. They found Lilburne's democratic
method of defending natural rights unacceptable. Cromwell preferred some-
thing nearer to the traditional constitution and re-established discipline in
the army. At the end of 1648 after some hesitation they broke finally with
the Levellers and chose to accept the purged Parliament, the Rump, as
the instrument of the godly. On 4 January 1649 the Rump resolved
that the People are, under God the Original of all just Power... that the Commons
of England in Parliament assembled being chosen by, and representing, the People
have the supreme Power in this Nation.. . That whatsoever is enacted, or declared
for Law by the Commons, in Parliament assembled hath the Force of Law; and all
the People of this Nation are concluded thereby, although the Consent... of King,
or House of Peers be not had thereunto.
Ideas of sovereignty and raison d'etat had triumphed.
Some supporters of the king turned arguments from fundamental laws
against Parliament. Sir Robert Filmer in Patriarcha or the Natural
Power of Kings (written before 1642) used natural law as revealed by
scripture and history to justify royal absolutism as of patriarchal origin.
The first government was Adam's over his family, followed by Noah's
over his sons. Patriarchs had an absolute power which came from God,
not from the votes of their children. Kings had the same absolute patriar-
chal power over their subjects that Noah had over his sons.
But the most formidable defender of absolutism was Hobbes. Before
1637 he had begun a general treatise on nature and man, founded on
materialist and mechanistic principles. As a known defender of absolutism,
he took refuge in France in 1640, where his De Cive was published in
1642. His masterpiece Leviathan was written in Paris, but published in
1651 in London, whither Hobbes returned, submitting to the Common-
wealth. Hobbes did not believe that man was naturally a social animal.
His natural state was war of 'everyone against everyone'. Men are
approximately equal in ability and in hopes of attaining their ends. If one
is stronger, the weaker can defeat him by ruses or by joining with others.
In pursuit of 'their End (which is principally their own conservation . . . )
129
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
[they] endeavour to destroy or subdue one another'. In this state of war,
nothing can be unjust, because there is no law, which needs a common
power to keep all in awe; 'everything is his which getteth it and keepeth
it by force; which is neither Propriety, nor Community; but Uncertainty'.
Men wish to escape from this miserable state. Their reason, given them
by God, shows them laws of nature, 'Justice, Equity, Modesty, Mercy
and (in summe) doing to others as we would be done to', which would
ensure peace. But men will only keep these laws when they can do so
safely. 'Covenants without the Sword are but Words', so they must erect
a common power to enforce obedience, reduce all their wills to one. This
is more than consent, it is a covenant whereby each 'gives up my Right of
governing myself, to this Man, or to this Assembly of men, on this condi-
tion, that thou give up thy Right to him and Authorise all his Actions in
like manner'. This creates the state, 'that great Leviathan . . . to which
we owe . . . our peace and defence', the essence of which is the exercise
of sovereign power 'as great as possibly men can be imagined to make it'.
The sovereign, whether a man or an assembly, has the right to raise
troops, administer justice, make war and peace, legislate, appoint judges
and officials and to forbid opinions and doctrines considered dangerous.
Division of sovereign power, or belief in absolute individual rights, such
as property rights, will destroy the state. Once conferred and established,
sovereignty cannot be denied, limited, or repudiated. It can be exercised
in three types of state: democracy, aristocracy, and monarchy, whose
difference is not one of power, but of aptitude' to produce the Peace and
Security of the people'. The aptest is monarchy, provided it is absolute.
Hobbes had transformed the theory of contract and so influenced
Locke and Rousseau. His work also had an immediate success. In France,
Mersenne and Gassendi recommended De Cive,' this rare work... of the in-
comparable M. Hobbes', to Sorbiere. The first edition was soon exhausted,
as was the second, published by Sorbiere at the Hague in 1647. Sorbiere
published a French translation in 1649 which went through three editions
that year. He also translated De Corpore Politico, publishing it in 1652.
Thus absolutism made considerable progress from 1610 to 1651, thanks
to the influence of various embodiments of ideas of sovereignty and
raison d'etat. But there was a striking change in methods of argument.
Suarez, Bellarmine, the neo-Thomists and their disciples, had mainly
used the scholastic procedure of deduction starting from axioms pro-
vided by metaphysics and theology. Their politics was a science, because
it was purely rational, a knowledge founded on essences and real causes.
They used history simply to verify and confirm these results by experience.
But there were others more in tune with the new philosophy, like Turquet
de Mayerne and Loyseau in France, Alamos in Spain, or Hobbes in
England, who used induction. From a knowledge of particular instances
they devised categories including them and general laws governing them.
130
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EXPONENTS AND CRITICS OF ABSOLUTISM
Many facts were obtained by historical studies, but many also by observ-
ing their own societies, as Turquet de Mayerne and Hobbes so strikingly
did. They were also remarkable for being deeply concerned in the scientific
movement of their time. Turquet de Mayerne, like the neo-Pythagoreans
and the disciples of Archimedes of the sixteenth century and Galileo and
the mechanists in the seventeenth, believed that mathematics was the key
to nature. Hobbes held similar views; he had been a familiar of Bacon,
was an admirer of Copernicus, Galileo and Harvey and was himself a
mechanist. From 1634 to 1636 he associated with the leading mechanists,
Mersenne, Descartes, Gassendi at Paris, and visited Galileo in Italy. He
published a little treatise in 1637 in which he explained sensations as
variations in movement and in 1646 a treatise on optics. For such men
political science had a character different from that recognized by the
neo-Thomists. It was a practical science which provided knowledge of
how things happened and interacted and how they might be controlled;
they were not concerned with the essence and formal causes of things.
The word cause changed its meaning, the final causes which had dominated
the constructions of Suarez and Bellarmine were eliminated, while efficient
causes became simply varying arrangements of facts. Political science was
transformed by the substitution of mechanistic for Aristotelian methods.
Suarez, Bellarmine and the neo-Thomists, as heirs of the biologist
Aristotle, saw the state as an organism whose general character they
grasped at first sight; men who by nature were social animals were forced
to choose a body politic and were bound by the laws of its functioning.
Thus the choice of a particular kind of body politic arose from con-
sensus, not contract. But Turquet de Mayerne, and Hobbes were accus-
tomed through application of mathematics to the natural sciences to
abstracting simple material elements, to seeking their connections, prefer-
ably materially verifiable, measurable ones. Men were individuals whose
egoistic concerns forced them to associate with each other, while making
free use of the full scope of natural laws to form contracts. In the last resort
everything in social and international relations depended upon contracts
and conventions. Everything was a matter of convention, of adjusting
mechanisms which might differ in themselves, yet produce the same results.
The neo-Thomists' practice produced a limited and finite number of
political forms and categories which corresponded with the Aristotelian
conception of a finite and limited cosmos with a fixed number of kinds
and species. Although Hobbes retained the old classifications into mon-
archy, aristocracy and democracy, his approach in principle opened up
unlimited possibilities of creating new political and social forms. This
fitted in with the conception of the universe as heliocentric and infinite,
held together solely by the uniformity of its laws. Political ideas were not
merely linked to political, social and economic situations, but were a
function of the whole of European civilization.
131
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER IV
THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND
ITS INFLUENCE 1610-50
EARLY all Galileo Galilei's (1564-1642) intellectual contem-
poraries would have agreed with his dramatic declaration that in
order to introduce a new philosophy 'it will be first necessary to
new-mold the brains of men, and make them apt to distinguish truth from
falsehood'. 1 They called for a revolution in thinking about nature that
would still be far in advance of results at the mid-century, but no previous
generation had had so much reason to believe that it had at last acquired
a method which, by correcting its own errors, offered the certainty of
discovering the one actual structure of the physical world. Older habits
of erudition and speculation in natural philosophy were losing their
appeal and were being replaced by the practice of systematic research.
The promise and achievements of the enterprise gave fresh confidence to
appeals for conditions making such research possible, for more adequate
provision for natural science in the universities and in new institutions,
and for money to be spent on science in the public interest.
To a large extent the new science was establishing itself on the margins
of official learning and recognized professional activities. This is reflected
in the diversity of the occupations and social origins of the men engaged
in science and the conditions in which they carried out their scientific
work. Central to the traditional profession of learning were those holding
academic posts in the faculties of arts or of medicine in universities or in
newer institutions such as the College de France in Paris and Gresham
College in London. If we include the minor figures this remained the
largest single group. Yet the list of scientists who had no full-time aca-
demic post is equally impressive. Some of these, for example Simon Stevin
(1548-1620) and Johann Kepler (1571-1630), and Galileo in later life,
were employed by governments or great patrons specifically for scientific
work. A much larger number earned their living wholly or in part in
professions related to science. Many of these were practising physicians
like William Harvey (1578-1657), J. B. van Helmont (C.1580-C.1644) and
Jean Rey (C.1582-C.1645). Some engaged in other 'learned' practical
professions as engineers, architects, or surveyors, like Stevin, Cornelis
Drebbel (1572-1634) and Gerard Desargues (1593-1662). Others, lower
down in the hierarchy of learning, practised as surgeons or as apothe-
N
1
Galileo, Dialogo sopra i due massimi sistemi del mondo I (1632), in Opere, ed. naz.
Vol. 7 (Florence, 1897), p. 82; Thomas Salusbury, Mathematical collections and translations
(London, 1661), p. 43.
132
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE
caries like the chemist Rudolf Glauber (1604-70), as lens-grinders or as
instrument makers like Joost Burgi (1552-1632), or as teachers of 'practi-
cal mathematics' and other practical subjects outside the universities. But
a great many of the scientists of the period owed their principal livelihood
to wholly non-scientific sources. These included officials like Pierre Fermat
(1601-65), conseilleur du Parlement de Toulouse, and Otto von Guericke
(1602-68), mayor of Magdeburg; gentlemen of private means such as Rene
Descartes (1596-1650), John Napier (1550-1617), Blaise Pascal (1623-62)
and Nicolas Claude Fabri de Peiresc (1580-1637); and many clerics: regulars
like the JesuatBonaventuraCavalieri (1598-1647) and the Jesuit Christoph
Scheiner (1575-1650), and Marin Mersenne (1588-1648), a Minim friar;
beneficed seculars like Pierre Gassendi (1592-1655); and Anglican country
parsons like William Oughtred (157 5-1660) and Jeremiah Horrox (1617-41).
Critics of the state of scientific learning in the early seventeenth century
were largely in agreement in their diagnoses of its alleged ailments and
their causes. The most systematic critic was Francis Bacon. In The advance-
ment of learning (1695) and later in the Novum organum (1620) and in the
preface to the Instauratio magna (1620-3), Bacon presented his diagnosis
of present ills through an interpretation of the history of learning. He
found only three societies in which, for short periods, the sciences had
progressed: among the Greeks and the Romans in antiquity, and among
the modern nations of western Europe. But even in those relatively
favourable periods progress had faltered. In present times practitioners
of the mechanical arts had fared best because of their close contact with
practical experience, but they took no account of larger theoretical issues;
by contrast, philosophers spinning out theoretical systems without
reference to experimental facts had discovered nothing new. Bacon
pointed out that each side lost by remaining ignorant of the other's
problems; his own proposal for an experimental 'inquisition of nature' 1
was offered as a method of discovery that would provide both explanations
of nature and a rational basis for technology. The failure of the theoretical
sciences to search for new knowledge he traced back to the failure of the
contemporary university system.
Contemporary scientists such as Descartes and Evangelista Torricelli
(1608-47) likewise urged the extension of scientific studies in universities
and the endowment of research. Criticism of the conservatism and
pedantry of formal courses in the sciences became a commonplace of
intellectual autobiographies of the period. Yet in spite of the criticisms of
university education in science and in spite of the diversity in origins,
training and occupations of the men engaged in scientific work, the
leaders of the scientific movement who made the great original contribu-
tions of this period were without exception university graduates. However
justified the complaints against academic conservatism, it was in fact the
1
Francis Bacon, Instauratio magna, preface.
133
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
universities that produced the body of men educated to think at the
abstract theoretical level where these contributions could be made. From
the staple compulsory Aristotelian logic and natural philosophy of the
arts course they learnt the elements of a theoretical scientific system,
even though an outmoded one; those with the enterprise to go beyond this
would introduce new theories making the common assumption with the
old, that nature was explicable as a rational, discoverable, abstract
system. Against such a background scientific innovation was intelligible,
and intelligible at the most abstract theoretical level, even when not
encouraged; the new philosophy made its appeal by offering a far more
effective means of theoretical explanation. The other main form of
scientific education available, a purely technical training in one of the
skills for 'practitioners', provided no such preparation for thinking at
this abstract level where the main scientific debates were taking place. The
contributions made possible by such an untheoretical technical training
might be indispensable for experimentation, but something more was
needed to appreciate the critical bearing of an experiment on a scientific
argument. It is significant that the critics of the universities were all them-
selves their products, and that it was the university 'philosophers' and
not the practical 'mechanics' who pointed out the scientific interest of the
empirical information, instruments and problems provided by contempor-
ary technology. If graduates went outside the universities to 'practi-
tioners' for experimental and practical skills, it was from their university
education that they learnt the meaning of creating not merely a scientific
technology but a 'new experimental philosophy'.
The innovators attempting to reform scientific education had to con-
tend with an academic structure established in the medieval foundations
and persisting generally in European universities, in spite of some con-
cessions already made to new studies in literature and history. Non-
experimental science had its traditional place in the mathematical quadri-
vium (arithmetic, music, geometry, astronomy, with some additions such
as optics) and natural philosophy of the arts course, and in the course for
a professional degree in the higher faculty of medicine. Formal instruction
consisted traditionally of the exposition by 'lecture' and commentary of
standard texts of Euclid, Ptolemy, Aristotle, Galen and in favourable
circumstances more recent authors, together with disputations in which
the student defended 'theses' provided by these texts. This system
weighted even medical education overwhelmingly with book-learning; in
all the years of the Cambridge course only three days were given to dis-
section and even so these had to be enforced under penalty. For the most
part, the innovators were on common ground with the conservatives in
assuming that the primary function of a university was 'the virtuous
education of youth' 1 in arts and the provision of good professional train-
1
M. H. Curtis, Oxford and Cambridge in transition, 1558-1642 (Oxford, 1959), p. 83.
134
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE
ing in the higher faculties. The place of research in universities was to be
a subject of the reforms of the nineteenth century: what the scientific
reformers of the seventeenth century wanted was that universities should
provide teaching for the new mathematical and experimental sciences
that recognized their radical difference in content, aims and methods from
the older studies and was appropriate to this different character.
By 1650, indeed for long afterwards, no university had yet made statu-
tory changes on a scale that came near meeting the wishes of the reformers,
but opportunities for the new scientific studies had been provided both
publicly and privately in many universities and in some these exerted an
increasing influence. Public provision for such studies had been and con-
tinued to be made through the establishment of new chairs, and through
collections of mathematical, astronomical and physical instruments,
chemical laboratories, and the anatomy theatres and botanical gardens
which most of the larger universities possessed by 1650. The faculties of
medicine were especially active in providing for their professional interest
in anatomy, botany and chemistry. The new chairs in these subjects and
in mathematics and natural philosophy helped to establish the sciences
as independent disciplines and at the same time provided a livelihood for
individuals whose researches contributed to the general advance of know-
ledge and made them famous in the republic of letters at large. In addition
to these public provisions, private advantage was taken in teaching of the
opportunity to introduce new content into the old form of the statutory
curricula.
Conditions varied characteristically in different countries. Until the
middle of the century the Italian universities retained their lead in offering
the most professional scientific training. More than elsewhere the Italian
cities provided in princely academies, the entourages of dukes and
cardinals, religious houses, and the universities themselves an active
scientific body of mathematicians, astronomers, experimenters, medical
men and philosophers from which all could gain. The richer universities
like Padua and Bologna could afford well-paid chairs in all the main
scientific subjects—mathematics, astronomy, physics, anatomy, botany,
surgery, medicine—and more than one specialized chair in some fields.
The great medical school at Padua had brought the study of anatomy by
dissection to a high degree of perfection and the distinguished succession
of professors since Vesalius continued with the pupils of Hieronymo
Fabrizio of Aquapendente (c.1553-1619), the great anatomical teacher
of his day. Other pupils of Fabrizio had carried Paduan methods beyond
the Alps to Basel, Leiden and Copenhagen; Harvey, greatest of them all,
brought them to London. Also with a chair at Padua was Santorio San-
torio (1561-1636), a pioneer of experimental medicine. As well as at
Padua, teaching of anatomy by dissection was prescribed by statute and
carried out systematically at Bologna, Pisa, the Sapienza in Rome, and
135
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Pavia where Gasparo Aselli (i 581-1626), discoverer of the lacteal vessels,
held a chair. At Bologna worked the Jesuits Giovanni Battista Riccioli
(1598-1671) and Francesco Maria Grimaldi (1618-63), both skilful
experimenters in physics. Pisa especially cultivated the mathematical
sciences and offered courses in applied mathematics and engineering;
there also the mathematician Giovanni Alfonso Borelli (1608-79),
coming to a chair at the same time as Marcello Malpighi (1628-94),
developed his interest in physiology. Galileo's friend Benedetto Castelli
(c. 1577-1643) taught at Pisa and Rome; his most brilliant pupil, Torri-
celli, succeeded Galileo at Florence.
Outside Italy the universities in which the new sciences were most
actively cultivated were those in the Netherlands. Courses in the mathe-
matical sciences at Leiden were up to date, a good collection of 'mathe-
matical instruments' was available and the mathematical professors in-
cluded Willebrord Snell (1591-1626), but it was in the medical faculty
that the university came to establish its reputation for scientific learning.
Leiden and in less degree Utrecht came to rival the universities of north
Italy in attracting foreign students. In spite of initial opposition it was in
the Netherlands that the Cartesian system first took root, and from there
it spread to the rest of Europe. The German universities, both Protestant
and Catholic, although predominantly conservative, also took some steps
to introduce the new science before the wars of religion put a temporary
stop to progress. Marburg in 1609 established what was apparently the
first European chair of chemistry. At Giessen there was a laboratorium
chymicum in 1612 and the botanist Joachim Jung (1587-1657) held a
chair of medicine. At Wiirzburg, under Jesuit control, new ideas on
pathology were taught. Further anatomy theatres were built, for example
at Freiburg (1620), Jena (1629) and Altdorf (1637). In neighbouring
northern countries Caspar Bauhin (1550-1624), a graduate of Padua, had
established the study of botany and anatomy through his double chair at
Basel, and Thomas Bartholinus (1616-80) brought fame to the chair of
anatomy at Copenhagen. At the other end of Europe the great university
of Salamanca, which had taken a lead in the teaching of anatomy and of
Copernican astronomy in the sixteenth century, seems to have lost its
interest in science, but at the Casa de Contratacion, the school of naviga-
tion in Seville, a good training in 'practical mathematics' could still be
found.
Apart from Montpellier with its tradition of teaching in botany,
anatomy, and medicine, in no great European country did the universities
offer so little encouragement to the new philosophy as in France. Domi-
nated by Paris, still by far the largest university in Europe, the French
universities reacted conservatively on all sensitive issues whether in rela-
tion to philosophy, theology or respect for ancient authorities. The impor-
tance of the University of Paris in political and ecclesiastical affairs
136
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE
exposed it to strong outside pressure; its energies became absorbed in a
double controversy over Jansenism and over Jesuit control. Philosophy
remained strictly Aristotelian, and the university exercised its function as
censor of books to condemn the new mechanistic philosophies of both
Gassendi and Descartes as theologically subversive. No provision was
made for teaching the new science in the arts faculty. Gassendi persuaded
the Sorbonne not to condemn the Copernican hypothesis in 1631, but the
medical faculty led by Guy Patin (1602-72) and the distinguished anato-
mist Jean Riolan (1580-1657) rejected Harvey's theory of the circulation
of the blood and were to earn the satires of Moliere and Boileau. Mean-
while the physicians of the faculty of medicine rigidly maintained the
exclusion of the surgeons from a university education and kept tight
control of all aspects of the medical profession. With the one exception of
Montpellier the new science was given a place in French education almost
entirely apart from the universities. Some courses were available at the
College de France on anatomy and on mathematics, in which Gassendi
and Gilles Personne de Roberval (1602-75) successively held the chair.
Botany, and from 1648 chemistry, were taught at the new Jardin du Roi
founded in 1636 with chairs of botany, anatomy and surgery. And among
the Jesuit colleges physical science figured prominently in the teaching:
thus at La Fleche Descartes gratefully records that he was not only intro-
duced to ancient and modern mathematics and astronomy but learnt also
of Galileo's newly invented telescope and its startling discoveries.
Besides Italy and the Netherlands, it was England whose universities
gave most encouragement to the new science. In spite of the conservatism
of their statutes some public provision had been made available through
the regius chairs of medicine at Oxford and Cambridge, and Oxford
acquired chairs of geometry and astronomy founded by Sir Henry
Savile in 1619, a chair of natural philosophy founded by William Sedley
in 1621, a 'Physick Garden' in 1622 and a readership in anatomy in 1624.
Other foundations at both universities followed later in the century.
Savile required his professor of geometry to read Archimedes and Apol-
lonius as well as Euclid and to teach applied mathematics, including
practical instruction in surveying, and his professor of astronomy to
teach the Copernican theory and practical applications of astronomy,
especially in geography and 'those parts of navigation depending on
mathematics'. 1 Elected into the chair of geometry in 1649, John Wallis
(1616-1707) introduced Descartes' analytical geometry and Cavalieri's
method of indivisibles into his teaching. At Cambridge Francis Glisson
(1597-1677) had by 1637 introduced Harvey's theory into his teaching as
regius professor of physic. But it was through the tutorial system in the
colleges that best advantage was taken of opportunities to introduce new
scientific knowledge into the old statutory curricula. For a new class of
1
6
Curtis, Oxford and Cambridge in transition, p. 117.
I37
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
MHPDECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
gentry entering the universities the desirability of learning was tested by
utility and virtil. There were fellowships for medicine and for the mathe-
matical sciences in various colleges. At Oxford a tutor in arts at Corpus
Christi College, one Brian Twyne, left full notes showing that between
1605 and 1623 he was teaching his pupils 'practical' mathematical sub-
jects, based on recent English works, similar to those laid down by Savile
for his professors, and was expounding the astronomical theories of
Copernicus, Kepler and Galileo as against Ptolemy. There is evidence of
similar mathematical teaching in other colleges both at Oxford and at
Cambridge, where distinguished men such as Oughtred, Henry Briggs
(1561-1630) and Lawrence Rooke (1623-62) held fellowships and where
the new astronomy was also expounded in comparison with the old.
Yet even accepting Sprat's claim that it was in the universities that
natural philosophy in England 'has been principally cherish'd, and
reviv'd', 1 the best professional scientific training in England was available
not at Oxford or Cambridge but in London. Lectures open to the general
public were given at Greshatn College in geometry, astronomy and
'physic'. The geometry and astronomy were strongly related to practical
problems, especially in navigation, and the professors, several of whom
had previously taught in Oxford or Cambridge, were in close contact over
many years with the Royal Navy and with instrument-makers and other
mathematical practitioners. It was at Gresham College or nearby that
there met from about 1645 the group which was to form the nucleus of
the Royal Society. For the study of medicine many Englishmen still went
to Italy or Holland, but in London serious training was provided by the
Royal College of Physicians and, in surgery, at the College of Barber
Surgeons. At the former Harvey as Lumleian Lecturer had from 1616
pioneered morbid and comparative anatomy and prepared for his
demonstration of the circulation of the blood, 2 and at the latter Sir
Charles Scarborough (1616-94) 'was the first who introduced Geometrical
and Mechanical Speculations into Anatomy', s when lecturing on muscles.
Christopher Wren had at one time acted as his demonstrator.
The main case of the scientific critics against the universities as teaching
institutions was that even when in the most favourable circumstances they
allowed new knowledge to be fitted somehow into old curricula and
methods of instruction, they would adapt neither in such a way as to
make a really congenial home for the new scientific enquiries. Too often
1
Thomas Sprat, The history of the Royal Society of London (London, 1667), p. 328;
critical ed. by J. I. Cope and H. W. Jones (London, 1959).
2
Sir G. Keynes, The life of William Harvey (Oxford, 1966), pp. 8 4 - m ; cf. Sir G. N.
Clark, A history of the Royal College of Physicians, Vol. I (Oxford, 1964).
* Charles Goodall, The Royal College of Physicians of London...: and An Historical
Account of the College's Proceedings against Empiricks..., Epistle Dedicatory to latter
(London, 1684); P.Allen, 'Medical education in seventeenth-century England', Journal of
the history of medicine,.Vol. 1 (1946), pp. 139-40.
138
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE
the new disciplines had to be acquired outside the universities altogether.
The result was that while the practitioner, whether 'learned' like the
physician, the surveyor or the engineer, or 'unlearned' like the surgeon,
the apothecary, the instrument-maker or the assayer, could learn his skill
professionally by clinical experience or practical apprenticeship, the
theoretician, the university-educated natural philosopher who was pri-
marily responsible for the development of original scientific thought,
usually had to bring himself abreast of new knowledge by private reading
or tuition. Many Oxford and Cambridge men, including the future
Savilian professors Seth Ward (1617-89), Wallis and Wren, learnt modern
mathematics from Oughtred after he had left Cambridge for a country
living, and the biographies of other leading scientists of this period show
that throughout Europe a high proportion of them acquired an up-to-
date mastery of science by similar means outside their formal university
studies. The concentration of universities on teaching, leaving research as
a private activity, left curricula out of contact with advancing knowledge
and the spirit of enquiry, even where no theologically or otherwise
sensitive issues were involved. Where such issues did arise a positive stand
was taken against the new. Thus whereas new methods in mathematics
and experimentation as such encountered no external opposition,
criticism of Aristotle's physics or Galen's anatomy and physiology ran
foul of a strong residue of academic humanist conservatism. Opposition
to Copernican astronomy was largely academic until De revolutionibus
was prohibited donee corrigatur by the Roman Congregation of the
Index in 1616, 1 when the issue became an ecclesiastical one. After Galileo's
condemnation in 1633 administrative measures in Catholic countries
against Copernicanism became even more determined. Descartes' inno-
vations in mathematics and optics were welcomed but his mechanistic
physics and physiology were at first opposed, in Protestant Utrecht and
Leiden as in Catholic Louvain and in Paris, because his doctrines were
held to lead to atheism and to have theologically dangerous implications
for the nature of the soul and for the eucharist.
The pursuit of original enquiry sprang from a wide variety of motives,
ranging from the religious to the wholly utilitarian, that had only a
limited place in the conception of their functions normally accepted in the
seventeenth-century universities. The habit of research was cultivated
almost entirely apart from teaching and when it came to receive organized
recognition this was in institutions of a new kind, the scientific societies.
Beginning as associations of men of similar interests either in universities,
under great patrons or round some private figure, these societies aimed
in the first place to meet the need for a means of communicating and
discussing new knowledge more direct than was possible through the
1
Galileo, Opere, ed. naz. Vol. 19 (1907), p. 323.
139
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
6-2DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
publication of books and through correspondence. They also met to
perform experiments, but the need for endowment and apparatus for
research, though expressed, was not provided for on any adequate scale
before the end of the century. Like their literary predecessors on which
they were modelled, the scientific societies cultivated a new kind of learn-
ing still neglected in the universities and placed the highest value on
original skill.
A common pattern was for associations beginning informally to set
down their customs later in formal rules governing activities and member-
ship; later still some of these associations gave rise to officially recognized
national academies. Beginning in Italy, a number of such societies passed
through a transitory if active existence there during the sixteenth century.
In 1603 a new society, the Accademia dei Lincei (the lynx being endowed
with specially keen sight according to bestiary lore), was formed at Rome
by Duke Federigo Cesi (1585-1630), a young man of eighteen, with three
friends. Conceived on grandiose lines as a research institute on the model
of a religious order or order of chivalry, it was reorganized in 1609 with
an enlarged membership rising to over thirty and including Giambattista
della Porta (c.1534-1615) and Galileo. For two decades it had an active
life, supported by Cesi and meeting at his palace where there was a
botanical garden, a cabinet of natural history and a library. Members
studied botany and entomology; an ambitious description of plants and
animals of Mexico was published; and it was in the academy that the
term microscopium was coined for an instrument made for it by Galileo
and first used for zoological investigations by another member, Francesco
Stelluti (1577-1653). The academy also published Scheiner's and Galileo's
letters on the sun-spots (1613) and Galileo's // Saggiatore (1623). It
survived a bitter quarrel that arose among the members over its continued
support, encouraged especially by Galileo, of Copernican cosmology
after its condemnation of 1616, but, as Cesi's death in 1630 was followed
by Galileo's condemnation in 1633, the academy's activities became more
and more difficult, and they ceased altogether in 1657. In the same year a
new society, the Accademia del Cimento, began its short but successful life
of one decade in Florence (see Vol. v in this series).
Following those in Italy, associations for scientific work were formed
most actively in France, where Italian influence was most immediate.
The earliest French associations grew up informally round private indi-
viduals and were kept in touch by correspondence as well as meetings. A
good example of such an individual is Peiresc; Counsellor to the Parle-
ment of Provence and in science an intelligent and well-informed dilettante,
he became with Mersenne the chief link between French scientists and
with others outside France in the early years of the century. The centrali-
zation of France gave prominence to Paris in intellectual as in other
aspects of life and among Peiresc's correspondents were the principal
140
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE
men round whom the scientific life of the capital came to revolve. Intellec-
tual circles in Paris were composed largely of men of independent means
or of high professional position as lawyers, judges or counsellors of state,
or doctors or clerics, who met in each others' houses to share common
interests. The earliest of the private Parisian associations with scientific
interests was the famous Cabinet, called first du President de Thou, and
later des freres Dupuy after the two sons of a counsellor to the Parlement
of Paris who effectively organized its meetings in the Hotel de Thou.
More specifically scientific in character were the meetings held by Des-
cartes in his lodgings about 1626. Other meetings with a rather different
tone were organized by Theophraste Renaudot (1586-1653), a graduate
in medicine at Montpellier, who between 1633 and 1642 arranged
lectures and discussions on an inconsequential variety of topics ranging
from medicine to popular morality at his Bureau d'Adresse, an organiza-
tion offering an equally wide assortment of services including those of a
free clinic and dispensary and an advertising agency. Renaudot's con-
ferences are said to have attracted large crowds to the Maison du Grand
Coq in the He de la Cite where they were held on Monday afternoons.
But the most important of the early scientific associations in Paris was
undoubtedly that formed by Mersenne about 1635. Educated by the
Jesuits at La Fleche, Mersenne became a Minim friar and made his cell
in the convent near Place Royale (now Place des Vosges) both a meeting-
place for scientific discussions and experiments and, from 1620 to 1648,
the centre of a vast and systematic scientific correspondence by which he
maintained a flow of news of scientific discoveries and ideas between
most of the leading scientists of the day. 1 His correspondents included
Torricelli, Cavalieri, Descartes, Fermat, Gassendi, Desargues, Roberval,
Pascal, Thomas Hobbes (1588-1679), Theodore Haak (1605-90), and
many others from as far apart as Sweden, Poland, and the Levant. For
Mersenne, the methods of the new science were of supreme value because
they freed men's minds from error. A skilful experimenter himself,
especially in acoustics, and a capable mathematician, he chose his group
with discrimination to discuss problems and to perform experiments. The
observations associated with Pascal concerning the void, including the
famous experiment made in 1648 with a barometer on Puy-de-D6me,
arose out of the discussions in this group, at which visitors from abroad
were welcomed. Descartes in Holland kept in touch with scientific news
through Mersenne. In 1634, the year after Galileo's trial, Mersenne
translated into French and published an early work by Galileo under the
title Les mecaniques de Galilee and gave a summary account of his
Dialogo and trial in Les questions theologiques, physiques, morales et
mathematiques. After Mersenne's death in 1648 meetings of the same group
1
Correspondence du P. Marin Mersenne, ed. C. de Waard, Vol. 1 (Paris, 1932), pp.
xix-lv; edition continued from Vol. 7 (1962) by B. Rochot.
141
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
were carried on by others; but all such private associations were eclipsed by
Colbert's foundation of a national Academie royale des Sciences in 1666.
Some sense of a scientific community not only in Paris but in France
as a whole was created by contacts maintained between the capital and
provinces. Du Thou's and Mersenne's groups especially kept in touch
not only with Peiresc but also, for example, with local groups at Bor-
deaux and P6rigord. Mersenne also kept in touch with scientific activity
outside France, his relations with Italian and English scientists being
especially close. One result of the exchanges of scientific correspondence
that took place between Paris and London was to aid the flow of know-
ledge of English science and of Bacon's experimental philosophy into
France, and of French mathematics and of Cartesian philosophy into
England. Another was to bring English scientists into contact with the
habit of forming associations, so that the group that met at Gresham
College on 28 November 1660 to take the first formal step towards the
founding of the Royal Society could describe their action as being
'according to the Manner in other Countryes, where there were voluntary
associations of men into Academies for the advancement of various parts
of learning'. 1
The extent to which speculative proposals for a scientific institute such
as those made in Bacon's New Atlantis (1627) or Abraham Cowley's
suggestion for a philosophical college (1661) influenced the founders of
the Royal Society is problematical. The event of material significance is
that some of the persons present in 1660 had begun a few years before the
mid-century to meet for scientific discussions and to make experiments.
According to the only reports available from an eye-witness, in two
accounts written long afterwards by John Wallis, a group including him-
self, John Wilkins (1614-72), Glisson and others began during the Civil
War 'about the year 1645' 2 to hold informal weekly meetings at Gresham
College or near by. In his second account Wallis suggested that the idea
of the meetings may have been first proposed by Theodore Haak, a
German resident in London who had some connection through Samuel
Hartlib (d.1662) with Comenius' pansophic movement. But the activities
at the meetings had no connection with this or any other such general
scheme for human enlightenment. According to Wallis they met weekly
at a certain day and hour, under a certain Penalty, and a weekly Contribution for
Charge of Experiments, with certain Rules agreed amongst us. Where (to avoid
diversion to other discourses, and for some other reasons) we debarred all Discourses
of Divinity, of State Affairs, and of News, (other than what concern'd our business
of Philosophy) confining our selves to Philosophical Inquiries, and such as related
1
D. McKie, 'The origins and foundation of the Royal Society of London', in The Royal
Society; its origins and founders, ed. Sir H. Hartley (London, i960), p. 1; cf. C. Webster,
'The origins of the Royal Society', in History of Science, ed. A. C. Crombie and M. A.
Hoskin, Vol. 6 (Cambridge, 1967), pp. 106-28.
2
John Wallis, A defence of the Royal Society (London, 1678), p. 7.
142
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE
thereunto; as Physick, Anatomy, Geometry, Astronomy, Navigation, Staticks,
Mechanicks, and Natural Experiments. 1
Haak himself in a letter written to Mersenne in 1648 mentions repeating
an experiment with a tube of mercury (TorriceJJi's experiment) of which
Mersenne had sent him news; it seems unlikely that he was referring to
any other than Wallis's group. Thus it seems that from these early
meetings a characteristic policy, to be continued later by the Royal
Society, was adopted: to concentrate on natural science, exclude all other
subjects, and perform experiments. This is not surprising when it is remem-
bered that the meeting-place of this group was the most professional
scientific institution in the country, and that professors at Gresham
College were among its leading members (see Vol. v in this series).
The supreme achievement of the generation that first firmly established
this new scientific philosophy, the generation of Galileo, Kepler, Bacon,
Harvey and Descartes, was that instead of merely skirmishing like their
predecessors within recognized conceptual frontiers or proposing pro-
grammes without precise enough specifications for their realization, they
found an opening into the intelligibility of nature through which they
successfully deployed a whole, systematic campaign. In essence the new
'physico-mathematical experimental learning', 2 'the real, the mechanical,
the experimental philosophy', 3 comprised three interconnected elements:
a new conception of scientific research, a new conception of nature itself
and hence of scientific explanation, and a new conception of the utility
and power of scientific enquiry. Although considerably diversified by the
content of the different sciences, in these elements the 'new philosophy'
provided a common form shared widely enough to be seen as charac-
terizing the whole scientific movement.
The distinctive new move made in scientific research was to look for the
intelligibility of nature not in immediate observation but in an underlying
mathematical and mechanical structure, and to seek by systematic and
quantitative theoretical analysis and experimentation to discover the one
actual structure of this real world. For Galileo and his contemporaries
the basically Aristotelian physics still dominant at the beginning of the
century was not only inaccurate but fundamentally misconceived. Their
main criticisms of it were that it was explicitly qualitative and that its
generalizations were too hastily formulated from immediate observation:
essentially it was a classification of the immediately observed behaviour
of different things, presented as manifestations of their qualitatively,
irreducibly distinct' natures' or principles of behaviour, and as such it
1
Ibid. Cf. 'Dr. Wallis's Account of some Passages in his own Life', in Peter Langtofi's
Chronicle, transcribed.. .by Thomas Hearne, Vol. I (Oxford, 1725), pp. clxi-clxii.
2
M. Ornstein, The role of scientific societies in the seventeenth century (3rd ed. Chicago,
1938), p. 101.
1
Robert Hooke, Micrographia (London, 1665), preface.
143
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
was incapable of becoming more than a mere classification. They saw in
this system of explanations only an accidental provision for measurement,
calculation and quantitative prediction, but these, by contrast, became
the essential procedures by which nature as they conceived it must be
investigated. For them, in Galileo's famous words:
Philosophy is written in this greatest book that is continuously open in front of our
eyes (I mean the universe), but it cannot be understood unless one first learns to
understand the language and to know the characters in which it is written. It is
written in mathematical language and the characters are triangles, circles, and other
geometrical figures, without which means it is impossible to understand humanly
a
word of it; without these, one is wandering hopelessly in a dark labyrinth . . - 1
Once this was accepted the new physics came clearly into the light as a
physics of what Galileo distinguished as the mathematical and mechanical
'primary and real properties', in contrast with Aristotle's physics of the
immediately experienced 'secondary qualities'. As he concluded his
discussion of what 'we call heat', the locus classicus of this distinction in
modern literature:
I do not believe that for exciting in us tastes, smells, and sounds there are required
in external bodies anything but sizes, shapes, numbers, and slow or fast movements;
and I think that if ears, tongues and noses were taken away, shapes and numbers
and motions would remain but not smells or tastes or sounds. These, I believe, are
nothing but names, apart from the living animal, just as tickling and titillation
are
nothing but names if the armpits and the skin round the nose were removed. 8
In thus establishing the methodological programme for the new physics
explicitly as the search for the laws of nature as the laws of the primary
properties and the processes lying behind the appearances they produced,
the new scientific philosophy introduced a systematic change in the
questions asked about nature and in the criteria for accepting the con-
clusions reached. Simply as an epistomological doctrine the mechanistic
philosophy was of course not new, as Galileo and Kepler acknowledged
in their different claims to be 'Platonists' and Gassendi recognized in
setting out to restore the atomism of Democritus and Epicurus. The
novelty of the 'new Philosophy' lay in the attempt made to use the success
of quantitative mathematical and experimental analysis as the only
criterion for accepting conclusions about the nature of things. In conse-
quence much that was essential in the Aristotelian science of physics was
not so much refuted as laid aside as answers to questions no longer thought
relevant. In its place the mechanistic conception of natural laws as the
stage machinery behind the spectacle of appearances implied that the
discovery of a true science of nature depended upon the manipulative
1
II Saggiatore, question 6 (1623), in Opere, ed. naz. Vol. 6 (1896), p. 252.
Ibid, question 48, p. 350; cf. A. C. Crombie, 'The primary properties and secondary
qualities in Galileo Galilei's natural philosophy', in Saggi su Galileo Galilei (Florence,
in press), Galileo's natural philosophy: theories of science and the senses (in press).
2
144
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE
mathematical and experimental skills traditionally classified as mere
techne, ars. These then became the essential methods of the new philo-
sophy, which inevitably changed the model adopted for the whole uni-
verse as well as for its parts. In place of the organic model of the Aris-
totelian cosmos, with parts teleologically related to the whole, the uni-
verse became likened to a vast automaton. 'My aim in this', wrote
Kepler (in cautiously abandoning one peculiar organic model of his own),
'is to show that the celestial machine is to be likened not to a kind of
divine living being but rather to a clockwork . . . , in so far as nearly all
the manifold movements are carried out by means of a single simple
magnetic corporeal force, just as in a clockwork all motions come from a
simple weight. Moreover I show how this physical conception is to be
presented through calculation and geometry'. 1
Actual scientific enquiry is a different activity from that of formulating
scientific philosophy and method, and their influences on the course of
history may differ widely, but the whole notion developed in the seven-
teenth century of science as a new philosophy, and not just a new techno-
logy, linked them closely together. With the exception of Bacon the chief
writers on method also made important contributions to science, whether
to the natural sciences like Galileo, Kepler, Descartes and Gassendi or to
the social sciences and psychology like Hobbes. The logical and practical
methods used for this new art of scientific enquiry were developed within
inherited forms which set the initial problems both of how to proceed and
of what to accept as a satisfactory conclusion. The ideal made explicit in
cleanly mathematical sciences such as mechanics and astronomy and
also in more experimental sciences such as optics was the 'Euclidean'
form with which the Greeks had scored their greatest successes with these
sciences. Kepler's Dioptrice (1611), Galileo's Discorsi e dimostrazione
matematiche intorno a due nuove scienze (1638), as later Huygens' Horo-
logium oscillatorium (1673) and Newton's Principia mathematica (1687),
are only outstanding examples of scientific treatises presented (in Galileo's
case within a dialogue) in this 'geometrical' form beginning with a set of
'first principles'—axioms, definitions, postulates and hypotheses—from
which the experimental conclusions demonstrated are shown to follow.
The problem was how to discover such principles, expressing the real
causal relations between the primary properties, as satisfied the criterion
that these speculations a priori must not conflict with experimental
evidence'. 2 As the great optimist of the scientific movement, Descartes
habitually wrote as if he had so far succeeded in discovering the true
principles that the whole scientific programme was within sight of com-
1
Kepler to Herwart von Hohenburg, 10 February 1605, Gesammelte Werke, Vol. 15,
ed. M. Caspar (Munich, 1951), p. 146.
2
Kepler to Herwart von Hohenburg, 12 July 1600, Ces. Werke, Vol. 14, ed. Caspar
(1949), p. 130.
145
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
pletion; then, in Seth Ward's neat epitome, 'when the operations of
nature shall be followed up to their staticall (and mechanicall) causes, the
use of induction will cease, and syllogisme succeed in place of it'. 1 But
Ward continued: 'in the interim we are to desire that men have patience
not to lay aside induction before they have reason'.
Contemporary writers saw in this process of enquiry, whereby the
observed world was first anatomized and then rationally reconstructed as
a consequence of the principles so discovered, a definite logical sequence
and structure to which Galileo and Castelli applied the name metodo
resolutivo e compositivo, derived from sixteenth-century Pisan and Paduan
logic, and Descartes (in whose method, despite his over-optimism, experi-
ment played an essential part) applied the corresponding terms 'analysis
and synthesis'. Even with subject matter not immediately open to a simple
mathematical approach or to straight reduction to mechanisms, the
leading sciences of the seventeenth century aimed at a similar form to this:
idealized postulates or hypotheses with some mathematical or logical
means of operating with them, whether that being postulated was the
principle of inertia or Descartes' mechanistic models for optics or physio-
logy or Harvey's hypothesis of the circulation of the blood. For contem-
poraries the novelty given to this form by the 'experimental philosophy'
lay in the effectiveness of its clear procedures beginning with an intellectual
dissection of a problem before one approached it experimentally. In the
light of this antecedent theoretical dissection experimental situations
could be devised, with essential factors varied one by one, in which nature
could be compelled to answer questions not readily answered simply by
observation. Bacon was only making a current view explicit when he
declared that 'the secrets of nature reveal themselves more readily when
tormented by art than when they go their own way'. 2
In normal experience a science grows largely because one question
leads to another, that is, through its content, rather than because some
particular form of enquiry is put into operation. Nevertheless both the
form and the conception of nature assumed in an enquiry establish
general objectives that are effective especially in determining the criteria
accepted for a satisfactory conclusion to the enquiry and for satisfactory
scientific explanation. The common objective of those who explicitly dis-
cussed scientific method in the early seventeenth century, notably Bacon,
Galileo and Descartes, was to show how to establish undeniable causal
relationships between phenomena, the causes themselves being assumed
to lie in the underlying abstract structure of the primary properties. Bacon
made an original and very important contribution to the logic of such an
enquiry by his systematic exposition of his method of 'exclusion' by
negative instances in the Novum organum (1620), a name given to the
1
a
Seth Ward, Vindiciae acadetniarum (Oxford, 1654), p. 25.
Novum organum, 1.98.
146
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE
work as an explicit challenge to Aristotle. Bacon's 'true and legitimate'
induction began by collecting instances of a phenomenon (in his example
heat) and classifying them into three tables which he called respectively
tables of 'Essence and Presence', of 'Deviation or Absence in Proximity',
and of 'Degrees or Comparison'. Induction consisted in the inspection of
the tables and the rejection of a causal connection between phenomena
which were not always present or absent together and did not vary con-
comitantly. In his example Bacon went on to show that motion ' is as the
genus of which heat is the species', meaning that 'heat itself, or the essence
of heat, is motion and nothing else', 1 a conclusion in keeping with the
mechanical philosophy but which Bacon did not know how to develop
scientifically. In the more mathematically tractable sciences the aim com-
ing into focus, that correlations between phenomena should be expressed
quantitatively as relations of functional dependence between cause and
effect, at once made the discovery of concomitant variations—the
subject of Bacon's third table—the essential criterion of a causal relation-
ship. Thus, Galileo wrote, 'whenever a fixed and constant alteration is
seen in the effect, there must be a fixed and constant alteration in the
cause'. 2 These criteria for establishing causal connections brought into
play all the characteristic practices that came to be part of experimental
enquiry, especially the use of controls to isolate factors and, where the
subject permitted, the measurement of concomitant changes in isolated
factors varied one by one.
The contribution made by Descartes to the forms of enquiry and ex-
planation used in seventeenth-century science was something different
from that of either Bacon or Galileo. Descartes made his impact upon his
contemporaries and established his lasting influence by publishing in the
Principia philosophiae (1644) and other works something never attempted
before or afterwards, a complete reduction (enriched by some genuine
discoveries) of all forms of physical change to a single form, that of
matter in motion. The basis of Descartes' reduction was his division of the
created world into two mutually exclusive and collectively exhaustive
essences or 'simple natures', extension and thought, and his conviction
that his arguments to this conclusion were guaranteed by the perfection
of God who would not deceive true reason. Since the whole world of
matter was nothing but extension, with motion as its mode, existing in
various stages of complexity, the laws of nature became for Descartes
nothing more than the laws of motion. 'I have described', he wrote,
'the whole visible world as if it were simply a machine in which there
was nothing to consider but the shape and movements [of its parts]'. 3
1
Novum organum, 11. 20.
* Dialogo, iv, in Opere, ed. naz. Vol. 7, p. 471.
* Principia philosophiae, iv. 188, in Oeuvres, ed. C.Adam and P. Tannery, Vol.8 (1)
(Paris, 1905), p. 315 (Latin); Vol. 9 (2) (1904), p. 310 (French): the passage in square
brackets occurs only in the French version (1647).
147
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Descartes criticized Harvey as well as Galileo for not making this reduc-
tion and so for failing to show why things happened as well as how. It was
a programme that led him into his worst mistakes, but also into reversing
a normal Greek attitude to nature inherited in Aristotelian thought and
so into making his most original contributions to methods of scientific
discovery. In Aristotelian thought an absolute ontological distinction
was made between artificial and natural bodies, whether naturally
generated substances or living organisms, so that in principle no humanly
constructed model could throw any real light on the nature of natural
things. But Descartes' universal mechanism put him into a position to
declare that there was no difference between machines and natural bodies
except in the size of their parts.
And certainly there are no rules in mechanics that do not hold also in physics, of
which mechanics forms a part or species, [so that all artificial things are at the same
time natural]: for it is not less natural for a clock, made of these or those wheels,
to indicate the hours, than for a tree which has sprung from this or that seed to
produce a particular fruit. Accordingly, just as those who apply themselves to the
consideration of automata, when they know the use of some machine and see some
of its parts, easily infer from these the manner in which others which they have not
seen are made, so, from the perceptible effects and parts of natural bodies,
I have
endeavoured to find out what are their imperceptible causes and parts. 1
By his innovation of asserting the identity of the synthesized artificial
construction with the natural product and of making this identification
an instrument of scientific research, Descartes made himself the first
great modern master of the hypothetical model. Models and analogies
had been commonly used in science since Greek times. Descartes' reduc-
tion enabled him to make the fundamentally new move of making the
principles of the mechanistic model the only principles operating in
nature, thus bringing the objectives of the engineer into the search for the
nature of things and throwing the entire world of matter open to the same
form of scientific inquiry and explanation. The value of the Cartesian
model, like that of any other theory advanced in anticipation of factual
knowledge, was to raise questions of which otherwise no one would have
thought, and the main issue, in any historical judgement of Descartes'
role in the scientific movement, is not whether his conclusions were true
but whether his questions were fruitful. In some sciences, especially in
optics and physiology, they undoubtedly were.
The 'new philosophy' of Galileo and Kepler, Bacon and Descartes
liberated the science of nature from old bonds, from the ontology of the
qualitatively irreducible Aristotelian 'natures' and the perfection of
circular motion, and brought about a submission to fact, however untidy,
1
Ibid. iv. 203, in Oeuvres, Vol. 8(1), p. 326; Vol. 9 (2), pp. 321-2: the passage in square
brackets occurs only in the French version.
148
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE
and eventually a greater scruple over actual, observational as distinct
from theoretical, mathematical accuracy. In consequence it brought
about an increasing emphasis on precision, both in calculation and in
closer observation and measurement, in the last augmenting the senses
by 'a supplying of their infirmities with Instruments, and, as it were, the
adding of artificial Organs to the natural'. 1 Indeed, if the conceptual
organization of the new philosophy was to be made effective in scientific
enquiry, adequate tools, both mathematical and observational, were an
absolute necessity.
In this the task of the first half of the century was to reveal the power
latent in such tools rather than to apply the tools to specific problems.
Only after 1650 were the traditional scientific instruments and apparatus
supplanted by inventions of the first half of the century. Especially where
mass production was required it took time for the instrument makers to
adapt themselves to the new techniques; and where the instruments were
for practical use, in navigation, cartography, or chemistry, it took time
for the practitioners to learn their use. Meanwhile aids to the senses in
piercing the veil of nature had to be not only invented but also con-
structed by the scientists themselves, and their immediate impact was
lessened by their rarity and by imperfections in their design. A form of
compound microscope was in use about 1610 and Stelluti published a fine
illustration of the structure of the bee in 1625, but it was not until Hooke's
Micrographia (1665) that the new worlds to be discovered with this instru-
ment were appreciated. Meanwhile the simple microscope in fact remained
the more precise scientific tool, as Leeuwenhoek was to show. An air
thermometer was devised by Galileo by 1603, and its use in medicine
described by Santorio in 1612, but variations in air pressure combined
with loss from evaporation to make these instruments unreliable, and it
was many years before the thermometer became a serious scientific tool.
The barometer, simplest to construct of all the tools, was significant for
its part in the development of the theory of atmospheric pressure in the
1640s rather than as a source of observations. The isochronism of the
pendulum had been established by Galileo. By early 1634 Mersenne
demonstrated that its frequency was inversely proportional to the square
root of its length, 2 and he and Riccioli used it to measure time in their
experiments, but it was first incorporated into a mechanical clock by
Christiaan Huygens (1629-95) about 1656.
The telescope, similarly, became a serious scientific tool only with the
1
Hooke, Micrographia, preface.
Mersenne, Correspondance, ed. de Waard, Vol. 4 (1955), pp. 81-2, 444-55; Harmoni-
corum libri, n, props, XXVI-XXIX(Paris, 1636),Harmonieuniverselle..., 'Traitd desinstru-
mens', 1, prop, xx (Paris, 1636-7); A. C. Crombie, 'Mathematics, music and medical
science', Proceedings of the Twelfth International Congress of the History of Science; Paris,
1968 (Paris, in press) and forthcoming studies of Galileo and Mersenne; A. Koyr6, Meta-
2
physics and measurement (London, 1968), pp. 89-117.
149
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
work of John Flamsteed and others in the last decades of the century.
But the brilliance with which Galileo exploited his early observations
made the telescope the symbol of this movement towards 'artificial
organs'. ' The present observations strip the decrees of former writers of
authority,' he wrote, 'who if they had seen them, would have decided
differently. n It had been in 1609 that word had reached him from Holland
that combinations of lenses had been used to make distant Objects seem
near, and he had needed only ten months to devise and construct his own
telescopes, apply them to the stars, and announce his dramatic discoveries
to a startled world. The Moon, he claimed in Sidereus nuncius 2 , was not
'robed in a smooth and polished surface' but had mountains whose
height he was actually able to measure; the Milky Way was composed of
innumerable tiny stars; so-called 'nebulous' stars were similarly formed;
and, most striking of all, the planet Jupiter, like the Earth on the Coper-
nican view, had satellite moons, four in all. Similar observations were
made in England during 1609 and 1610 by Thomas Harriot (1560-1621). 3
At first these discoveries, and Galileo's announcement of spots on the
surface of the Sun and of the Moon-like phases of Venus which followed
in 1612, were widely doubted. How could mere combinations of lenses
lead to truths unknown since the world began, especially as curved glass
had been since Antiquity the means of producing illusions? But Galileo's
claims aroused immediate and widespread interest and as they were con-
firmed by other astronomers it was realized how much new tools might
do towards enlarging man's horizons, even though it was to be many
years before telescopes were manufactured in quantity. Galileo himself
hoped that eclipses of the satellites of Jupiter, being frequent, could be
used to solve the problem of the determination of longitude at sea: tables
would supply the times of these eclipses for a standard longitude. For this
purpose a table for the first satellite was published annually from 1690
onwards, but even at this late date telescopes could be not adapted for
use at sea, the long refraGtors proving unsteady and the specula of
reflectors tarnishing rapidly.
New mathematical tools likewise proved their power only in the
second half of the century, above all in Newton's Prlncipia (1687). Only
then was there developed a physics of broad application and mathe-
matical in fact, not merely in intention as had been the case with Des-
cartes' cosmology. Descartes himself, even when claiming to have reduced
science to mathematics, had practised mathematics mainly for its intrinsic
interest, and the same was true of his leading contemporaries. The great
1
Third letter about the sun-spots (1612), in Opere, ed. naz. Vol. 5 (1895), p. 201.
In ibid. Vol. 3 (1892), p. 59.
D
S. P. Rigaud, Supplement to Dr. Bradley's miscellaneous works: with an account of
Harriot's astronomical papers (Oxford, 1833), pp. 17-70; see the two papers by R. C. H.
Tanner and J. V. Pepper, 'The study of Thomas Harriot's manuscripts', History of science,
ed. A. C. Crombie and M. A. Hoskin, Vol. 6 (1967), pp. i-40.
4
150
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE
sixteenth-century printed editions of Archimedes, Apollonius, Hero and
Pappus suggested problems and techniques some of which had originated
in the context of physics and were later to prove of immense value in that
field, but in the early seventeenth century these were studied for their own
sake and with little reference to the development of science and still less
to that of technology.
Logarithms provided the main exception. Here the stimulus came from
the need to handle long computations in theoretical astronomy, and
logarithms were frequently discussed in the context of trigonometry
and spherical geometry. Their invention, by Biirgi and by Napier, 1 who
published the first tables in 1614, was equivalent to the addition of many
years to the life of an astronomer. Among those who published tables
soon afterwards were Briggs and Edmund Gunter (1581-1626) of
Gresham College, and Kepler; the popularity of these tables greatly
accelerated the acceptance of Arabic numerals. The slide-rule, which is
based on the same principle as logarithms, was developed gradually
during the century from instruments devised by Gunter and Oughtred,
and the nautical interests of the Gresham circle also led to the invention
of mathematical instruments for use in navigation, although observations
at sea were still too crude to warrant the use of sophisticated mathe-
matical techniques. It was some time before either logarithms or the
slide-rule came into general use, but meanwhile the tedium of long calcu-
lations led to the invention of various other devices, ranging from the
elementary 'bones' of Napier to the cumbersome calculating machines of
Pascal and Leibniz.
Logarithms aside, mathematicians worked at problems suggested by
the Greek works or by the more arithmetical and algebraic tradition
inherited from Arabic authors. Infinitesimals were studied in the context
of area and centre-of-gravity problems first of all in Italy, notably by
Cavalieri and Torricelli, and later in northern Europe by Fermat and
Roberval and by the Belgian Jesuit mathematician Gregoire de Saint
Vincent (1584-1667). The study of moving bodies also required the use
of infinitesimals, for example in Kepler's derivation of his first two laws of
planetary motion and in Galileo's treatment of concepts such as instan-
taneous velocity ultimately based on theoretical treatises written in four-
teenth-century Oxford.
Analytical geometry was created by Fermat, who was stimulated by
Pappus' account of a lost work of Apollonius, and by Descartes, whom a
correspondent interested in a famous problem discussed by Pappus. Both
men developed methods of determining tangents to curves, although it
was not until the time of Newton that the close link between this problem
and that of areas was appreciated. Fermat's work, often done at odd
moments, was known to his contemporaries chiefly by report. Descartes
1
Mirifici logarithmorum cartonis descriptio (Edinburgh, 1614).
151
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
published his Geometrie in 1637 as the third essay illustrating his method
of discovery, but his presentation was intentionally obscure and the
originality of his thought in both algebra and geometry was revealed only
through the efforts of later commentators. Less fortunate was the Lyon-
naise architect and engineer Gerard Desargues. His projective geometry,
although extended further by the precocious Blaise Pascal, went un-
noticed in his controversy with Parisian artists and architects. Apart from
Descartes, the principal contributors to algebra were Harriot and
Oughtred, although an influential legacy from the sixteenth century was
contained in the 1646 edition of the works of Francois Viete (1540-1603).
The 'new philosophy' found expression and justification in specific
scientific achievements. The unshakable confidence of its adherents
stemmed from its success in reorganizing three large areas of natural
enquiry, each of which yielded a developed system of thought. The first
of these areas was that of cosmology and the science of motion. Tradi-
tionally, the detailed study of the heavens concentrated on mathematical
descriptions of the planetary motions rather than on their causes. Ter-
restrial physics, on the other hand, was concerned with the causes of
movement; and since the world formed a cosmos analogous to a living
body, particular motions were referred to this general pattern: natural
motion brought an object closer to its place in the scheme of things, while
violent motion imposed from without had the reverse effect.
The destruction of this outlook and its replacement by a new view of
nature was mainly the work of three men, Galileo, Kepler and Descartes.
Galileo laid the foundations of his contributions to physics early in his
career, when he was professor of mathematics first at Pisa and then at
Padua, but his main publications date from 1610, when he became chief
philosopher and mathematician to the grand duke of Tuscany. His best-
known work, which led to his condemnation and house arrest, bears the
misleading title of Dialogue on the two great world systems, the Ptolemaic
and Copernican (1632). While a young man, Galileo had been converted
to the Copernican view that the Earth moves round the Sun, and he
realized that the need was for a new physics that would explain why such
a motion was imperceptible to us. It must be change of motion, rather
than motion itself, that required a cause; for then a passenger on the
moving Earth would be as unconscious of its steady motion as was a
sailor on a calm day. But to transform the traditional view of motion
demanded the creation of a new world system to replace the cosmos, and
Galileo appreciated that such a fundamental change in outlook could not
be forced on readers by particular experiments or observations. The
Dialogue, therefore, was mainly an informal initiation into a new philo-
sophy of nature in which motions no longer required a continuously
acting cause. It is significant that for Galileo the world was still finite, so
152
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE
that indefinitely extended straight-line motion—the inertial motion of
Newtonian physics—was automatically excluded. In conformity with
this view of the world the motions that persisted (under ideal conditions)
were circular: a spinning top, or a ball rolling on a smooth surface
curving with the curvature of the Earth. Galileo failed to go one stage
further and explain the movement of the ball as the result of a force
restraining it from moving away from the Earth along a tangent line: for
him heaviness remained an intrinsic property of matter, leading him to
retain privileged places in the world, such as the centre of the Earth,
about which bodies turned. Against this Descartes in Le Monde (pub-
lished posthumously in 1664) and Principia philosophiae explained
heaviness as a mere consequence of the motion of matter. Arguing that
it followed from God's immutability that a body would persist in the
state in which it was at any instant of time unless acted on by an external
cause, and that only motion in a straight line existed at an instant, he
concluded that it was this motion that would persist. This conception of
motion was intimately associated with and led naturally to Descartes'
view of space as infinite and without privileged places or directions,
representing the final and complete break with the cosmos and its
replacement by the universe of classical geometry.
But Galileo's conception of large-scale inertial motion as curved did
not affect the discussion of free fall and the path of projectiles which he
published in 1638. His ideas on this subject had been maturing for some
forty years, and his law of free fall had already been announced in the
Dialogue; published when its author had become blind, the Discourses on
two new sciences was to be his last and greatest work. 'The suprahuman
Archimedes', as Galileo described him, 1 had shown how to idealize
statical problems in such a way that they were mathematically tractable
while still relevant to the real world, and his methods had recently been
applied to other questions in statics by Stevin, particularly to the equili-
brium conditions of bodies on an inclined plane. A theory of moving
bodies, on the other hand, had been developed by fourteenth-century
writers, but although Galileo was to draw on their analyses and concepts,
they had not succeeded in relating their results to the real world. It was
Galileo who extended the Archimedean technique to the study of how
projectiles move. Basing himself in the Discourses on the belief that nature
acted in simple ways, he first demonstrated that under ideal conditions
velocity in free fall was proportional to the time elapsed. This relation he
transformed by mathematical argument into one between distance, which
he could measure, and time; then by viewing free fall as a special case of
rolling motion down an inclined plane, he arrived at a relationship
between distance and relatively large intervals of time, which he could
also measure. Finally he confirmed this relationship by experiments,
1
De motu, in Opere, ed. naz. Vol. I (1890), p. 300.
153
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
although his account of their perfect success does not carry complete
conviction.
For Galileo motions were no longer processes, as with Aristotle, that
could interfere with each other. They might therefore be combined mathe-
matically, and Galileo showed how uniform motion in a horizontal
direction combined with accelerated motion in the vertical to give a
parabolic path for projectiles, and proved many other similar theorems.
The elementary character of his results is no index to the great importance
of his book. He wrote himself :'what I think is more important, a passage
and entrance will be opened to a most ample and excellent science, of
which these our labours will be elements; into the more hidden recesses of
which science more perspicacious minds than mine will penetrate'. 1
By implying in the Dialogue that only two world systems deserved
consideration, Galileo had deliberately closed his eyes to the existence of
a third system which two decades before had replaced the Ptolemaic as
the rallying point for those who believed the Earth to be at the centre.
This was the one developed after 1584 by the great Danish observer
Tycho Brahe. In it the relative motions of the planets were basically the
same as for Copernicus; but it was the Earth that was absolutely at rest.
This system retained many of the advantages of the Copernican while
avoiding the scandal of a moving Earth. Tycho was only one of a number
of astronomers who independently adopted similar systems, some
allowing the Earth to spin daily and others having it wholly at rest; as
late as 1625 the Oxford geographer Nathanael Carpenter (1589-1628) 2
was claiming the invention for himself. Unfortunately Galileo's strongest
anti-Ptolemaic arguments, in particular the Moon-like phases of Venus,
could be interpreted as support either for Copernicus or for Tycho. So,
as he could not disprove Tycho, he sought to discredit him by presenting
his system as a compromise unworthy of serious consideration, although
after the condemnation of Copernicanism in 1616 Jesuit astronomers
had adopted the Tychonic system to a man, and it was to command a
considerable body of outside support until well into the second half of the
century.
The most powerful arguments in favour of the heliocentric view were
contained in Kepler's Astronomia nova [New astronomy studied through
causes, or celestial physics, 1609]. In this epoch-making work Kepler
finally broke with the age-old approach to planetary motions in terms of
circles, by stating that the planets in fact moved in ellipses with the Sun
at one focus—one single curve sufficing for each planet. His work was
widely discussed among mathematical astronomers, including in England
Harriot and Horrox and their respective friends, although it was ignored
1
Discorsi..., in, in ibid. Vol. 8 (1898), p. 190. See the important critical edition of the
Discorsi with extensive historical notes by A. Carugo and L. Geymonat (Turin, 1958).
1
Geography (Oxford, 1625), p. i n .
154
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE
by men like Galileo and Descartes who had no patience for the intricate
calculations which Kepler delighted to inflict on his readers. But even
more important than his results were the physical considerations that had
guided him. The causes traditionally studied in terrestrial physics were
now applied to the planets; and the world was to be thought of not as an
organism, a cosmos, but as a machine actuated by a force residing in the
Sun.
As so often with the products of a period of transition, the Astronomia
nova was antiquated as well as prophetic. It taught that the Sun's force
was required continually to maintain the planets in motion, for without
it they would, in Aristotelian fashion, come to a halt. With Kepler's
physics quickly superseded in this important particular, and with general
uncertainty as to whether his laws of planetary motion were exact or mere
approximations, planetary astronomy entered on a period of indecision
which was resolved only in 1687 when Newton showed that all three
Keplerian laws were consequences of his gravitational attraction.
If Descartes was unequal to the detailed study of planetary motion, he
did give in his Principia philosophiae magisterial expression to the mathe-
matical and mechanical vision of the world. The distribution of motion
and the transference of motion, under laws 'derived not from the pre-
judices of the senses, but from the light of reason', 1 were to provide a
complete account of the physical world, at least in so far as this did not
depend upon the particular way in which God had chosen to distribute
motion at the moment of Creation. Irrespective of this choice one could
assert, by analogy with disturbances in pools of water, that in time matter
must arrange itself in whirlpools or vortices, of which the solar system was
an example; and one could plausibly explain many detailed properties of
bodies such as the Earth which were carried round in these whirlpools.
But for a discussion of the properties of an individual whirlpool it was
necessary to abandon the deductive method and instead make hypotheses
and test them by experiment.
The Cartesian synthesis was doomed to eventual failure because although
mathematical in principle, in practice it had to be developed by verbal,
non-mathematical discussion which could too easily be accommodated
to almost any facts. The deductive approach, so powerful a tool when
used in suitable circumstances and with discretion as in the hands of
Galileo, was now employed without discrimination: even Descartes' laws
of motion proved to be not merely false but mutually contradictory. And
within his own lifetime his disciples had begun to gloss over the meta-
physical basis to his physics which for him was fundamental. Yet his work
with its serenely confident exposition of the mechanical philosophy
marks the watershed between the anti-Aristotelian polemics of Galileo's
writings and the positive application of the new approach characteristic
1
Prittc.philos., in. I.
155
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
of science in the second half of the century. To the educated layman
especially he offered for a wide range of phenomena explanations at last
shorn of all mystery: gone for ever were the 'occult' forms and qualities
of the Aristotelians. Other writers gave expression to the power of
explanations through matter in motion: in particular Gassendi's Chris-
tianized version of Epicurean atomism provided for many a refreshing
alternative to the cramping rigidity of Cartesianism. But it was Descartes
who both systematized the mechanical philosophy and applied it plausibly
on a massive scale to detailed problems taken from fields as far apart as
cosmology and physiology.
The second large area of natural enquiry to be reorganized by the new
philosophy was the experimental investigation of the mode of production
of a series of inanimate physical phenomena within this range of contem-
porary interests. Although the new philosophy was mechanical in con-
ception, paradoxically the actual science of mechanics depended too
heavily on theoretical rather than experimental developments to be the
exemplar for the mathematical and experimental method that exploited
the power of the conception. This role was played rather by optics, which
since Greek times had been the most advanced of the terrestrial sciences
in combining experiment with mathematics. A new impetus came from
Galileo's challenge to accepted ideas on the basis of evidence derived from
a combination of lenses. Even Kepler, who had done so much to clarify
the ancient confusion between the physics, physiology and psychology of
vision (see below), seems to have hesitated before accepting the existence
of satellites of Jupiter, but it was not long before the triumph of Galileo's
primitive telescopes brought urgency to the study of lenses and in parti-
cular the law of refraction. Within a matter of months Kepler in his
Dioptrice (1611) described an experimental study of refraction, and in
spite of only partial success he was able to go on to explain many of
the phenomena associated with lenses. He proposed an important
improvement in the construction of the telescope which was quickly
adopted.
The correct law, that the sines of the angles of incidence and of refrac-
tion are in a constant ratio depending on the media concerned, had been
discovered about 1601 by Harriott in the course of a fundamental mathema-
tical and experimental study of refraction carried out between 1597 and
1605. 1 Equipped with this law he made the first major advance since the
1
J. Lohne, "Thomas Harriott (1560-1621): the Tycho Brahe of optics', Centaurus, Vol. 6
(1959). PP- 113-21, 'The fair fame of Thomas Harriott', ibid. Vol. 8 (1963), pp. 69-84,
'Zur Geschichte des Brechungsgesetzes', Sudhoffs Archivfiir Geschichte der Medizin undder
Naturwissenschaften, Vol. 47 (1963), pp. 152-72, 'Regenbogen und BrechzahF, ibid. Vol. 49
O965), pp. 401-15; cf. J. W. Shirley, 'An early experimental determination of Snell's law',
American Journal of Physics, Vol. 19 (1951), pp. 507-8; Rigaud, Supplement to Dr. Bradley's
.. .works, p. 41.
156
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE
fourteenth century by determining mathematically the behaviour of rays
of sunlight in passing through globes of water to form a rainbow, and by
measuring the dispersion into different colours of sunlight passed through
a glass prism, and in water and other liquids. Neither Harriot nor Snell,
who also arrived at the sine law of refraction probably not long before his
death in 1626, published their results. Whether Descartes knew of their
work is uncertain, although the physical derivation he gave in La Diop-
trique, published in 1637 in illustration of his Discours de la methode, is
not very convincing. Fermat, in fact, while accepting Descartes' formu-
lation of the law, later gave quite another physical derivation of it. In
Les Meteores, another essay appended to the Discours, Descartes like
Harriot used the law to give a quantitative analysis of the formation of a
rainbow and of the dispersion of colours, but he added an important
physical explanation relating colour to a periodic speed, that of rotation
of the corpuscles assumed in his theory of light. Some years later Johann
Marcus Marci of Kronland (1595-1667), already the author of an original
work on motion and the pendulum, published in Prague (1648) the further
discovery that the colours formed by a prism passed unaltered through a
second prism.
Another field of physics in which experiment combined with conceptual
developments to open up vast new possibilities was pneumatics. In the
Discourses on two new sciences Galileo mentioned what must have been
common knowledge to those whose task it was to pump water out of
mines, that there is a limit to the height through which water can be
raised by suction. Isaac Beeckman (1588-1637) and Giovanni Battista
Baliani (1582-1660) had attributed this phenomenon to the weight of the
atmosphere, but it was Torricelli who hit upon the idea of experimenting
with the heavier and more compact fluid mercury. In a letter written in
1644 Torricelli described what was to become a famous experiment, in
which he filled a long tube with mercury, placed a finger over the open
end and inverted the tube so that its mouth was submerged in a dish of
mercury. When he removed his finger the level of mercury in the tube fell
to about thirty inches, leaving what became known as the Torricellian
vacuum. Torricelli explained his results by saying 'We live submerged at
the bottom of an ocean of the element air, which by unquestioned experi-
ments is known to have weight', 1 and he drew the conclusion that varia-
tions in the height of the mercury reflected variations in the air pressure.
To Pascal, who learned of Torricelli's work from Mersenne, this sug-
gested a simple but striking test for the hypothesis: the air pressure, and
therefore the height of the mercury, should be less at the peak of a moun-
tain than at its foot. In 1648 the experiment was successfully carried out
1
Evangelista Torricelli, Opere, ed. G. Loria and G. Vassura, Vol. 3 (Faenza, 1919), p.
187; see Galileo, Discorsi, ed. Carugo and Geymonat, pp. 616-22; C. de Waard, L'exper-
ience barometrique (Thouars, 1936) and W. E. K. Middleton, The history of the barometer
(Baltimore, 1964).
157
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
on the Puy-de-D6me by Florin Peiier. Meanwhile von Guericke was
developing at Magdeburg apparatus for withdrawing the air imprisoned
between two tightly fitting hemispheres, and in 1654 he publicly demon-
strated the powerful force which then united the two hemispheres: teams of
horses could not separate them. These striking experiments drew attention
to the unexpected opportunities for studying physical and physiological
behaviour in the absence of air. The air pump became the first complex
machine in laboratory use, it accustomed scientists to working with
controlled and wholly artificial conditions, and the wealth of new infor-
mation that resulted was proof again of the value of apparatus and in-
struments in extending the range of available evidence.
A number of problems in acoustics also began to give way when attacked
by a combination of mathematics and experiment. Following the six-
teenth-century work of Girolamo Fracastoro, Giovanni Battista Bene-
detti and Galileo's father Vincenzo Galilei, between 1614 and 1634
Beeckman, Descartes and Mersenne finally established the fundamental
proposition that pitch is proportional to frequency of vibration and the
laws relating pitch to the length, tension and specific gravity of vibrating
strings and to similar quantities in pipes and percussion instruments, and
so were able to give physical explanations of resonance, consonance and
dissonance. 1 Mersenne published these results as well as further original
work, including the law relating the frequency to the length of a pendulum
and its application to the measurement of time, in his systematic treatises
Harmonicorum libri (1636) and Harmonie universelle, contenant la theorie
et la pratique de la musique (1636-7). In these and later works he also
pioneered the scientific study of overtones, the measurement of the speed
of sound which he showed to be independent of pitch and loudness, and
the investigation of the medium of sound. He established that the inten-
sity of sound varied, like that of light, inversely with the square of the
distance from the source. Galileo published some similar results relating
to vibrating strings and the pendulum in the Discourses on two new
sciences (1638), and it was his discussion in this work of the vacuum in a
suction pump that stimulated the experiments begun by Gasparo Berti
probably shortly before 1642, and completed by Guericke and Robert
Boyle, demonstrating conclusively that the medium of sound in the
atmosphere is air.
In these fields of physical science, application of the mathematical and
experimental method to problems interpreted through the mechanical
philosophy proved immediately successful; elsewhere results were less
fortunate. Magnetism, for example, had been the subject of an intensive
investigation by William Gilbert (1540-1603), whose De magnete was
1
C. V. Palisca,' Scientific empiricism in musical thought', in Seventeenth century science
and the arts, ed. H. H. Rhys (Princeton, 1961); Crombie,' Mathematics, music and medical
science' and forthcoming studies of Galileo and Mersenne.
158
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE
published in 1600, and this was followed by other notable works such as
the Philosophica magnetica (1629) of the Jesuit Niccolo Cabeo (1586-1650)
and the monumental Magnes (1641) of another Jesuit Athanasius Kircher
(1601-80). But although magnetic phenomena were becoming familiar, the
nature of magnetism remained a profound mystery. It was Descartes 1
who removed much of the wonder surrounding it by giving a purely
mechanical account of its action, but his explanation failed to achieve
quantitative predictive power. The study of electricity, meanwhile,
made little progress because methods of generating electricity were
lacking and so there was limited evidence on which to theorize.
Chemistry, on the other hand, was embarrassed for the opposite reason.
Thousands of years of metallurgical practice and alchemical theory and
experiment had amassed a great variety of empirical knowledge, and to
the normal human urge to understand were added the pressing require-
ments of the physician, the druggist, the dyeworker, and many others. It
was a daunting prospect, in the face of which many took refuge in hope-
lessly inadequate theories which they made little attempt to support by
experiment except by way of brief illustration. Interest still centred on
reactions on heating. Apparatus was crude and fragile, and it was difficult
both to maintain an adequate temperature and to prevent the heated
vessels from shattering. Substances were seldom unadulterated, and those
chiefly studied were organic and therefore complex. Under such condi-
tions the interplay of mathematics and experiment would clearly have
been impossible even if there had been an agreed interpretative scheme
such as the mechanical philosophy, and the developments of lasting value
that occurred were mainly at the levels of technique and natural history.
Thus the German iatrochemist Glauber devised a method of preparing
'Glauber's salt', and obtained sal ammoniac from urine, common salt,
soot and bulls' blood.
Chemical and alchemical theory meanwhile was divided between
various schools, with the Aristotelian four elements and the three prin-
ciples of Paracelsus predominant. At this level the most original con-
tribution came from van Helmont, who taught that water was the basis
of all substances. Air was for him chemically inert, but he obtained various
gases which he regarded as air with impurities. By contrast some chemists,
notably Daniel Sennert (1572-1637) and Joachim Jung, were already
beginning to explain chemical reactions in terms of the motions of atoms,
and in this they foreshadowed the work of Robert Boyle (1627-91) who
was to bring chemical theory within the mechanical philosophy and so
make chemistry a respected part of physics.
The third large field of natural philosophy in which the programmes of
experimental and of mechanistic analysis combined to produce a radically
1
Princ.philos., iv. 144 ff.
159
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
new system of thought in this period was that defined by Galileo's phrase
'the animate and sensitive body'. 1 The philosophical assumption that the
whole physical world, including living bodies, operated as a system of
mechanics defined the problem as that of discovering the particular
mechanisms concerned. Achievement was limited by the tools of research
available: macroscopic anatomy, elementary knowledge of mechanics,
geometrical optics and some other physical sciences, some elementary
chemistry, simple instruments such as the scalpel and ligature, the lens,
and the balance. In addition, the comparative method was revealed as a
powerful instrument of research, both into the mechanisms of the body
and into the rational ordering of living nature as a whole.
The outstanding physiological achievement of the period was the
demonstration of the circulation of the blood by Harvey. Educated in
medicine at Padua, Harvey used its methods. He has studied there for five
years under the great comparative anatomist and embryologist Fabrizio,
Galileo's colleague and personal physician and author of the first clear
description of valves in the veins. Another of Galileo's colleagues, San-
torio, systematically introduced quantitative methods into medicine,
designing instruments to measure temperature and pulse-rate; in his
De medicina statica (1614) he described a famous experiment in which he
spent several days on a large balance weighing food and excrement in
order to determine the material exchanges of the body. But it was Harvey
who succeeded in using these methods to bring about a revolution in
theory, first in the specific theory of the motion of the blood and then,
because of the role of the blood in existing physiological systems, in
physiological theory as a whole.
The Galenic physiology with which Harvey had to contend was based
on the division of the body into three great independent systems: those
of the veins, the arteries, and the (hollow) nerves. Venous blood carrying
'natural spirit' was supposed to be manufactured in the liver and to flow
out in the veins from that organ, carrying nutriment to the whole body.
Some of this blood entered the right side of the heart, whence, as it was
shown in the sixteenth century, it went to the lungs and so to the left side
of the heart. In the left ventricle this venous blood was endowed by the
'air' from the lungs with 'vital spirit' (the principle of life manifested as
innate heat) and converted into arterial blood, which the arteries then
distributed throughout the body. Some of this again was converted in the
brain into 'animal spirit', the principle of sensation and voluntary move-
ment which operated through the hollow nerves.
According to his own statement and the evidence of his manuscript
notes for his lectures at the Royal College of Physicians, Harvey's doubts
about the Galenic system for the blood and realization of its circulation
developed in stages from over nine years before writing his De motu
1
// Saggiatore, question 48, in Opere, ed. naz. Vol. 6, pp. 348, 351.
160
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE
cordis (1628). 1 In this work he set out the full argument, an elegant essay
in fact if not in name in the Paduan logic of 'resolution and composition',
establishing the essential propositions of his new theory. Galen had had
an accurate knowledge of the anatomy of the heart and of the course of
the blood through it as determined by its valves. But he thought that it was
when the heart expanded that the arterial blood entered the aorta and the
pulse occurred. Harvey showed that the heart pushed the blood out into the
arteries when its muscle contracted, its structure allowing a flow through
it in only one direction; later he compared it to a kind of force-pump. He
showed by means of ligatures, puncturing of appropriate vessels, and
observations on a variety of animals and embryos, that the blood could
flow through the body also in only one direction, to the heart through the
veins, whose valves prevented any return flow, and then out through the
arteries. He calculated that the heart pumped through itself in an hour an
amount of blood weighing more than the whole body. This amount could
not be continuously manufactured in the liver, as the Galenic theory would
have to suppose, and this led to the conclusion that the veins and arteries
formed a single system through which the blood was propelled in a circle
by the beat of the heart's muscle.
Apart from a lens with which he observed the flow of blood through a
transparent shrimp and other small animals, Harvey used techniques
that were familiar to Galen. His triumph was a triumph of thought and
above all of the comparative as well as the quantitative methods. Thus he
likened the practice of anatomists who based general conclusions on the
examination only of the dead human body to 'those who, seeing the
manner of Government in one Commonwealth, frame Politicks, or they
who, knowing the nature of one piece of land, believe that they under-
stand agriculture' 2 . By his comparative studies he was able to see the
human (and mammalian) blood system as a special case within a general
theory that included within its scope all the particular circulatory systems
of different animals, with and without lungs and with and without red
blood, and of embryos as well as adults. Gradually accepted by the younger
generation in spite of opposition from the professional establishment,
especially in the medical faculty in Paris, his new system put an end to
Galen's general physiology and immediately raised a whole new range of
physiological questions about the functions of the blood and of the lungs,
liver and other organs. But perhaps his greatest contribution to future
1
The anatomical lectures: Prelectiones anatomie universalis, de musculis, ed., with an intro.,
trans, and notes, by G. Whitteridge (Edinburgh and London, 1964), pp. xxv-xxix, xxxvii-li;
cf. W. Pagel, William Harvey's biological ideas (Basel and N.Y., 1967); C. Webster,' William
Harvey's conception of the heart as a pump', Bull. Hist. Med., Vol. 39 (1965), pp. 508-17.
2
Harvey, De motu cordis, Chapter 6; earliest English translation, London, 1653. Des-
cartes in his Traite de Vhomme (1633; published posthumously in Latin, 1662, French, 1664)
was one of the first to accept Harvey's theory of the circulation, but he held that the heart
propelled the blood not by its muscular contraction but by heating it to vaporization so
that it expanded.
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
biological thought was the example he gave of comparative experimental
physiology.
As a study in intellectual behaviour, De motu cordis is a model of the
intelligent control of ideas by experimental analysis, its author refusing
to go beyond the organic structures he could see. Some of his contem-
poraries, viewing the operations of living things in the light of far more
speculative schemes than his restrained Aristotelianism with its emphasis
on the primacy of the heart, left their mark on the programme of enquiry
by aiming to discover the more fundamental processes behind the visible.
Each alternative scheme tried to extend a limited success into a universal
principle of explanation. Van Helmont established one influential view by
treating the living body as a system of chemical processes brought about
by 'ferments' under the control of an immaterial principle, the 'archaeus'.
Although hazardously speculative, van Helmont was a good experi-
menter; in addition to practising medicine he spent much of his time
working in the laboratory which a wealthy marriage had allowed him to
construct in his house in Louvain. To test his belief that the principle of all
matter was water, he carried out a quantitative experiment similar to one
described by Nicholas of Cusa, growing a tree in a pot for five years
merely by watering it, and finding that at the end of that period the weight
of the earth in the pot had scarcely altered. 1 The starting-point of his
animal physiology was his study of digestions, where he demonstrated the
acid 'fermentation' in the stomach and its neutralization by the bile.
His view of the disease as an alien entity or 'archaeus' entering the body
led him to become a pioneer in aetiology and morbid anatomy. The chemi-
cal view of physiology and medicine achieved a further success with
Francois de la Boe (Sylvius, 1624-73), whose most valuable contribution
was his explanation of digestion by the successive 'fermentations' of the
food by the saliva, the pancreatic juice and the bile. In the field of therapy
these chemical ideas came to dominate medical discussions for a time
because of a furious debate, involving the French court itself, between
the Galenists favouring vegetable drugs, the Paracelsists promoting the
uses of inorganic drugs such as antimony and mercury, and other schools
of thought.
The main alternative view, that the living body could be explained as a
system not of chemical but of mechanical processes, originated principally
from the successes of the mathematical and mechanical sciences in
explaining sensory mechanisms and behaviour. 2 In his Ad Vitellionem
paralipomena (1604) Kepler had made the first great discovery in modern
physiology by showing how the eye, treated simply as an optical instru-
1
Van Helmont's manuscripts were published posthumously with some additions by his
son as Ortus medicinae (Amsterdam, i648);seepp. 53, 109. An English translation appeared
under the title Oriatrike or, Physick Refined (London, 1662).
8
A. C. Crombie, "The mechanistic hypothesis and the scientific study of vision', Pro-
ceedings of the Royal Microscopical Society, Vol. 2 (1967), pp. 3-112.
162
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE
ment, focused the image of an object on to the retina. The immediate
effect of this discovery was to allow further problems to be formulated
for exact analysis, even if not immediately solved. Kepler himself in the
Dioptrice (1611), Scheiner in his Oculus (1619) and Rosa Ursina (1630),
Descartes in La Dioptrique (1637), and Mersenne in his Universae . . .
geometriae synopsis (1644) and Voptique et la catoptrique (1651) brought
current physiological optics to an advanced scientific stage by their exact,
quantitative and frequently experimental investigations of long and short
sight and the design of appropriate compensating lenses, visual acuity,
accommodation, the formation of a single visual field with two eyes,
the relation between direct and indirect vision, and numerous other
phenomena. Mersenne, first in his Harmonie universelle and later in his
Cogitata physico-mathematica (1644) and Novarum observationum
physico-mathematicarum tomus tres (1647), embarked on a similar
analysis of hearing. In the whole problem clear distinctions between the
physiological and psychological aspects of sensation, and between con-
jecture and established fact, became possible and were often clearly made.
Yet the enquiry was committed from the start to giving an account of
the mechanisms mediating not only each special sense but also the corre-
lation of the stimuli from them into a consistent view of the external
world and consistent behaviour in relation to it. This question was
broached in different ways by Mersenne, Gassendi and Hobbes, but it
was Descartes who carried it through to the point of producing a general
mechanistic model for living things. 'I want you to consider', he wrote
in his TraM de Vhomme, 'that all these functions follow naturally in this
machine simply from the arrangement of its parts, no more or less than
do the movements of a clock, or other automata, from that of its weights
and its wheels'. 1 By rigorously asking the same mechanistic question and
allowing no others, by asking only what physical motions followed each
preceding motion, beginning with the physical impressions of light and
other material influences on the appropriate sense organs and carrying
through to the consequential movements of the animal's muscles, he
reduced the 'animate and sensitive body' to a system of built-in responses
designed to preserve and propagate itself by pursuing the beneficial and
avoiding the harmful aspects of the environment acting on it. The rela-
tions between the immaterial human soul and this bodily machine
Descartes made the subject of his very interesting psychological essay,
Les passions de fame (1649); all other living things were simply machines.
The influence of these speculations on actual discovery was probably
very small; discoveries were made rather by attacking limited problems as
in the work of Harvey, in that on the sensory mechanisms, and later in
that which G. A. Borelli published in his De motu animalium (1680). The
significance of philosophical mechanism is rather that it made explicit the
1
Oeuvres, Vol. 11 (1909), p. 202.
163
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
assumptions with which mathematicians and experimenters had already
been working, providing a philosophical cosmology extending as far
beyond physical science as psychology and the model for society de-
scribed in Hobbes' De cive (1642), Leviathan (1651), De corpore (1655) and
De homine (1657).
Beyond these investigations with a clear theoretical bearing, the steady
accumulation of observations continued during this whole period to
throw increasing light on the diversity of natural history. Collections of
hitherto unknown plants were brought back from the Americas, Africa,
India, and as far afield as China and the Philippines. In Europe itself
experience with breeding plants under different conditions was developed
through horticulture and agriculture and the establishment of botanical
gardens, mainly with a medical interest. Publications on descriptive botany
grew in number and with them the number of known species, which
increased from about 500 recognized by Leonard Fuchs in 1542, to about
6,000 recognized by Caspar Bauhin in his Prodromus theatri botanici
(1620), and then to about 18,000 recognized by John Ray in 1682. Bauhin,
Jung and other botanists tried to keep up with this accumulation by
devising ever more precise and diagnostic descriptions and comprehen-
sive systems of classification. The continued study of anatomy, especially
in Italy and England, brought about a similar increase in knowledge of
animals, and in 1645 appeared the earliest comprehensive treatise on
comparative anatomy, the Zootomia Democritaea (1645) of Marc
Antonio Severino (1580-1656) of Naples. A remarkable feature of this
work is Severino's recognition of unity of type based on man as the
'archetype', an idea which he tried to extend to the whole animal kingdom
and even to plants. Further advances were made in comparative embryo-
logy, notably by Harvey in his Exercitationes de generatione animalium
(1651), where the assertion, 'all animals whatever, even Viviparous also,
nay man himself to be made of an Egge . . . just as the first conceptions
of all Plants are certain seeds, n was to lay down a fundamental principle
to be established later by experiment. Knowledge of the earth's surface
likewise accumulated. A theory of ocean currents was published by a
French Jesuit explorer, George Fournier, in his Hydrographie (1643), and
Descartes' brilliant conjectures, attempting to account for the geological
history of the earth within the general mechanistic theory of the Principia
philosophiae, projected this whole subject into the evolutionary discus-
sions of a later period.
As in science, so in technology the application of mathematics was
expected to usher in an age whose achievements would know no bounds;
yet the technology of this period is related to that of the previous genera-
tion rather as the sculpture of the baroque is to that of the age of Michel-
1
Exercitatio 1; cf. Exer. 62; earliest English translation, London, 1653.
I64
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE
angelo. The picture presented to us is of a somewhat overblown style:
a growing ambition linked to an achievement that falls below even that
of the sixteenth century. Mathematics applied to the arts and especially to
machinery could, it was thought, compel Nature to deliver to the man
who knew her secrets a Faustian capacity to achieve all his desires: his
carriages would require no horses, his house would never lack light, the
Moon itself was not beyond his reach. Most tempting of all was the
promise of perpetual motion, that will-o'-the-wisp which obsessed so
many of the imaginations of our period with the dream of infinite power,
a chimera which enraptured them as much as Eldorado or the Philo-
sopher's Stone. As Galileo observed:
I have seen the general run of mechanicians deceived in trying to apply machines to
many operations impossible by their nature, of the success of which they have
remained in error, while others have similarly been defrauded of the hope conceived
from their promises. These deceptions seem to me to have their chief cause in the
belief these craftsmen have had, and continually have, of being able to raise very
great weights with a little force, as it were with their machines cheating nature, whose
firmest instinct is rather that no resistance can be overcome by a force that is not
more powerful than i t . . . By the deception of so many princes and to their own
shame, engineers of little
comprehension go dreaming, applying themselves to im-
possible undertakings. 1
Little books written mostly by amateurs, like Thaumaturgus mathematicus
(1628) by Gaspar Ens and Mathematicall magick (1648) by John Wilkins,
spread the good news. The titles are significant: fantasy played a large
part in their conceptions, and where there was a scientific basis it was
often an idea that had been long since exhausted. The perpetual motions
of Jan van der Straet (Stradanus, 1536-1604) were being published long
after 1650, and one of the first and most famous of these works, Magia
naturalis (1558) by G. B. della Porta, appeared in a fine English version in
1658, a century after its original publication.
But if these dreams could only bring inevitable disappointment, pro-
gress in the more routine spheres of technology was little better. For this
the reason often lay outside science. Just as today, a rapid advance could
only be obtained by the investment, without hope of quick returns, of
sums that were not in fact forthcoming. The more ambitious schemes,
although using methods already long established, were also held up by
slow communications and in consequence tardy and inefficient admini-
stration. Projects dragged on for decades, or were undertaken only many
years after they had been first proposed. The Briare Canal, one of the
first of the major French canals, connecting the Loing and Loire, took
more than forty years to cover a hardly greater number of miles: begun
some years before our period opens it was only completed a few years
before its close. Plans for the draining of the fens, which occupied Cornelis
1
Galileo, Le mecaniche, in Opere, ed. naz. Vol. 2 (1891), pp. 155,15S.
165
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Vermuyden (c.i 590-1677) much of the thirties and forties, had been laid
down by Humphrey Bradley half a century before.
The machine of state, like those of industry, creaked slowly and
inefficiently into action, when correspondence might take weeks to pass
from a capital to its remoter provinces. Often the demands of the state,
as for guns in time of war, had to be satisfied in quantity and without
delay, and therefore by the traditional methods, leaving little scope for
experimentation with new techniques. The plague of 1630-1 and the
recurrent economic and political crises sapped initiative. Yet in the new
and rising centre of economic progress in the North Sea—England and
the Netherlands, and to a lesser extent north Germany and Scandinavia—
repeated failures and delays did not prevent a growing optimism and
belief in the possibility of indefinite technical improvement, if only
science could be applied to the 'useful arts'.
Unfortunately the science that was in fact applied was often obsolete,
a symptom of the gulf between academic and artisan that constituted a
further barrier to technological advance. This of course did not apply to
the virtuosi who were stimulated by the need to administer their estates
and commercial interests. Edward Somerset (1601-67), second marquis of
Worcester, employed a gun-founder to study inventions and make models
of them, and in 1663 published A century of the names and scantlings of
such inventions, as at present I can call to mind to have tried and perfected.
Sir Nicholas Crisp (c. 1599-1666) rewarded inventors, actively encouraged
the spread of their ideas, and himself devised a successful new method of
making bricks. But the great majority of practical men had no contact
with recent science. Galileo's masterly study of projectile motion in his
Discourses on two new sciences showed that under idealized conditions a
cannon-ball moved in a parabolic path, but for half a century afterwards
the only books likely to fall into the hands of gunners continued to
expound the doctrine taught by Tartaglia as long ago as 1537. Harriot's
innumerable contributions to the desperate problem of accurate naviga-
tion began under his first patron Raleigh and went on after Raleigh's fall in
1603. Edward Wright (c.1558-1615), translator of Stevirfs Haven-finding
art and author of the famous Certaine errors in navigation (1599), until his
death provided new tables and techniques in the use of charts and
lectured annually on navigation on behalf of the East India Company.
John Tapp (fl. 1596-1631) and Briggs and Gunter of Gresham College
continued this work, but how limited was their impact is shown by the
republication in 1644 of Pathway to perfect sayling by Richard Polter,
sometime Master of the King's Ships and typically conservative in outlook,
whose book was hopelessly outdated when it first appeared in 1605. This
preference shown by practical man for the traditional and tried techniques
meant that the direction of influence was rather from technology to
science: the difficulty of pumping mines clear of water, the repeated
166
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SCIENTIFIC MOVEMENT AND ITS INFLUENCE
failures of apparatus in spite of the successes of small-scale models, the
gunner's uncertainty over the correct elevation of his piece, all suggested
problems that were given an autonomous existence within pure science
rather than made occasions for science to aid technology.
Yet another obstacle to technological advance lay in the very nature
of the new scientific ideas. The paradox whereby the complexity of the
natural world must be idealized before it can be understood had been
appreciated and accepted by the new philosophy both at the conceptual
level and in controlled experiments. But it was altogether more difficult
to take the next step and connect theory with the actual crudities of a
primitive technology. Where the theory was classical the attempt to apply
it was sometimes made. In innumerable contraptions gear was added to
gear, lever to lever, in the fond expectation that, as with the idealized
machines of mechanical theory, a small force would operate the whole.
Where the theory was novel application was not even attempted. The
range of a gun might be of great importance, but there was little use in
applying Galileo's parabolas to a situation where not only was wind-
resistance a major factor but powder, shot and bore all varied consider-
ably; as Halley was to write, gunners 'loose all the Geometrical accuracy
of their art from ye unfittness of ye boare to ye ball, & ye uncertain
reverse of ye Gun, which is indeed verry hard to overcome'. 1
Not surprisingly, then, the technological successes of the period were
comparatively few. Dyeing improved strikingly, Cornelis Drebbel, that
most fertile and ingenious of inventors, being partly responsible for a
new scarlet dye that appeared about 1620. Complex machinery became
popular with the spread of the knitting machine invented by William Lee
in 1589. But the most significant developments were the result of a better
understanding of the limitations of a mere multiplication of gears: the
attempts to find new prime movers. To begin with there were efforts to
expand the use of wind power which had proved so invaluable in draining
the Netherlands. The first attempt at a land vehicle driven by an inanimate
power was the Dutch sailing cart which tradition ascribes to Stevin. But
it proved more a toy, a new game for Prince Maurice, than a generally
useful means of transport.
More fertile for the future was the use of steam. Here too the first
experiments were amusements more than anything, automata inspired
by Hero of Alexandria. Hero's aeolipile, in which a small boiler emitted a
jet of steam from a narrow pipe, had been used in the Renaissance for
reinforcing fires. Ens mentions a great many applications for the aeolipile,
most of them toys although he does include the driving of mills, and
Giovanni Branca (1571-1640) in Le machine (1629) describes one to take
the place of a jet of water in working a powder-mill. The idea has obvious
1
Edmond Halley, 19 March 1700/1, in Correspondence and papers, ed. E. F. MacPike
(Oxford, 1932), p. 168.
167
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
drawbacks and, like projects' to drive up water by fire, not by drawing or
sucking it upwards', 1 came to nothing. But it gave would-be improvers
ideas, as did other failures of the period, and forced them to re-examine
their theoretical foundations.
The period concluded then, despite the slow rate of progress, on a
note of optimism and a sense of opening frontiers. There was a growing
demand that this progress should be organized, the various useful arts
studied with a view to their improvement, and scientific methods applied
to the calculation of sounder technological theories. Philosophy and the
useful arts were now to join hands to bring in an age of indefinite improve-
ment, and both were to be brought under the shelter of national organi-
zations. During this period these ideas had been put forward by some-
what eccentric individuals, at best by small groups. Their general adoption
early in the second half of the century began a new era.
1
Marquis of Worcester, A century of
inventions, No. 68.
168
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER V
CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT
T
HE first decades of the seventeenth century played a special role in
the evolution of religious thought. They were neither the seedtime
of new ideas about the relationship of God to man nor a time of the
discarding of old beliefs, but rather the age in which some of the great
issues of religious history were fought out anew. The chief concern of
religious thought was one which had never lost interest since the beginnings
of Christianity, that of man's free will and of his freedom to arrive at his
own religious experiences. This problem was reflected in the controversies
over free will and predestination which rent both Calvinism and Catholi-
cism in our period. On another level, it was reflected in the quest for
religious individualism against a religious orthodoxy which had become
dominant in both Protestantism and Catholicism.
Under the impact of the theological quarrels which centred on these
issues, the orthodox and their challengers, as well as those believing either
in free will or predestination, took ever more radical positions. Thus some
important ideas became re-emphasized. Rationalism penetrated to the
very heart of religious thought, bringing the formulation of an explicit
rational religion. This period also witnessed a growing trend towards
deism and even unbelief. At the other end of the religious spectrum,
religious individualism led to pietism and to a renewed mysticism.
Beneath the issues raised by such religious thought coursed the piety of
the ordinary people. We know almost nothing about this popular piety;
yet it cannot be omitted from this account since modes of popular
religious expression posed problems which theologians had to meet.
It will be useful to start with a discussion of Protestant religious ortho-
doxy. By the end of the sixteenth century both Lutheranism and Calvinism
were revolutionary movements which had run their course. The Lutheran
Reformation had begun with the 'pure' word of Scripture, but now
Scripture was in danger of being replaced by officially enforced confes-
sions of faith. The Book of Concordance of 1580 had become binding for
two-thirds of German Protestantism. It included Luther's Catechism, the
Confession of Augsburg, and the articles of the League of Schmalkalden.
Contemporaries called the book a 'pope made out of paper', and it was
indeed the Lutheran counterpart to the Canons of the Council of Trent.
Everywhere there were attempts to define religious faith and to enforce
the definitions. Luther himself became one sanctified, a 'last Elias'. Even
the printers' mistakes in his works became a part of the new Holy Writ.
The impetus for orthodoxy was provided by the quest for order in an
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
age when diversity of religious expression was regarded as' denial of
religious truth. Every new form of religious worship, once it had estab-
lished itself, sought to guard its own truth by excluding all others as
heresy. At a time when toleration was thought to be the condoning of
heresy or at best to be religious indifference, a surge towards orthodoxy
was inevitable even in movements which themselves had once been
regarded as heresies. Exceptions to this trend were found in those modes
of religious expression—notably the Arminians and Socinians—which
sought to widen the allowable within their own framework of thought.
In the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries the impetus towards ortho-
doxy was further strengthened by another traditional belief, that religious
divergence was political treason. Religious disorder meant chaos, and
chaos in turn meant dissolution of all established political and social
order. This was not, however, merely the theory of conservatives who
desired to preserve things as they were; a practical reason strengthened
such belief. Throughout the history of Christianity in the West religious
challenges to authority had been accompanied by political challenges. In
Lutheranism there had been from the beginning an incipient conflict
between religious individualism and the attempt to preserve order. It was
order which won, even during Luther's lifetime, and the religious wars
strengthened the feeling that political order and religious order were
inexorably intertwined.
Lutheranism's equation of natural law with the Decalogue provided a
strong rationale for the princes to regulate the faith, since the interpreta-
tion of natural law had always been a concern of rulers. Calvinists, like
those of the Palatinate, were at one in this belief with the Lutherans. State
control was spelled out in a series of 'church orders' issued throughout
the sixteenth century. What started as the ordering of the outward manner
of worship shaded over by the end of that century into the regulation of
belief itself. This was a step which Luther had always opposed, yet con-
fessions of faith triumphed throughout the Lutheran as well as the Cal-
vinist world. The Anglican church followed this pattern. The Acts of
Uniformity equated political loyalty with religious obedience. The Thirty-
nine Articles went beyond outward conformity and attempted to order
belief, although the lines were loosely drawn and some divergence of
belief was allowed.
Though the enforcement machinery of such conformity varied, it tended
to become vested in the powerful classes of the community. In Branden-
burg the landlords enforced religious conformity and in England the
justices of the peace were at times used for the same purpose. In towns,
the gilds played an important part in effecting the religious conformity of
their members. Calvinist Hesse used the nobility as well as the magistrates
to oversee religious discipline. There was a tendency in Germany for
ecclesiastical control to gravitate to the lowest authorities, the local squire
170
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT
and village council. However they were enforced, it was the ruler who
laid down the regulations and decided upon the confession of faith for
his territories.
In addition to defining belief, these regulations emphasized church
attendance. Fines were often imposed on those who did not attend ser-
vices or who were lax in taking communion. The regulations also signifi-
cantly included a check on the morals of the community. Loose habits
were taken to mean general political and social unreliability. Order had
to be observed here as in all else. Once again there was a real base to the
theory. As we shall see, the 'atheistic' movements of the century tended
to be libertine. Moreover, in Germany the imperial police regulations of
the fifteenth and sixteenth centuries gave an example to Protestant princes.
They had condemned blasphemy, luxury, and drinking as evils which
would bring upon the empire the wrath of God. Since drunkenness was
the curse of Germany in our period, there was good practical reasoning
behind such regulations. The pater patriae, the territorial ruler, had to
guard his people. Because these vices led to hell, the citizens had to be
protected from them as a part of religious conformity.
How effective were these regulations? Sometimes they were accom-
panied by cynicism. In Brandenburg the ministers were told to subscribe
to the Book of Concordance but after that, could think and teach as they
liked. 1 These sentiments remind one of that Elizabethan cynicism which
emphasized subscription to Anglicanism chiefly as a matter of political
loyalty. Even where there was less sophistication it seemed easier to make
regulations than to enforce them. The Magdeburg visitation of 1656 tells
us that there were no Bibles in the churches, that converts waited for
years before having their children baptized, that preachers were not
properly installed, and that weekday sermons had ceased in the country
districts. Above all, popular piety went its own way, since it was difficult
to harness its exuberance through regulations.
In the border regions between the faiths, Protestants streamed to
Catholic festivities to obtain holy water blessed against sickness, to take
part in religious processions, or to make merry at the inauguration of
new churches. The triumphal entrance of the great Spanish saints Ignatius
Loyola and Francis Xavier into Germany also affected Lutheran regions.
Many a Lutheran living on the North Sea believed in Xavier as the pro-
tector against stormy seas, and as late as 1772 Protestants of Schwerin
asked for Ignatius water to heal animal diseases. Similarly, the books of
edification of the Spanish mystic Louis de Granada spread throughout
Protestant lands. On this level, the baroque did not by-pass Protestant
countries. Men everywhere delighted in a world which was not abstract
1
I. P. Meyer,' Der Konfessionszwang in den deutschen evangelischen landeskirchen des
16.-18. Jahrhunderts', Zeitschrift der Geschichte der Niedersachsischen Kirche, Vol. xxxiv
(1929), p. 284.
171
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
7-2DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
but which stressed spectacles, feasts, and the imagination. Religion was a
release from the drabness of daily life and from the many evil spirits and
dangers that were menacing on all sides. If more often than not popular
religious expression managed to circumvent the regulations of morals and
belief, it was still true that such regulations were successful at times in
controlling religious and political thought. Of the many antimonarchical
systems of the century, none arose on Lutheran soil.
The acceptance of confessions of faith did not mean an end to theo-
logical argument; instead they gave it a different turn. Theologians now
disputed not the fundamentals of faith but the words of the confessions.
Such disputations, carried on both by Calvinist and Lutheran orthodoxy,
were bound to be scholastic in tone, and the kind of argument which
Luther had condemned when he talked about 'foolish Aristotle'. Signifi-
cantly, one leading Lutheran now called the logic of Aristotle' God's own
logic'. Dialectics came into its own. Since no new dogmas could be
formed, theologians became logicians. An important consequence of this
Protestant scholasticism was the application of reason to religious debate.
These theologians thought to prove the rightness of the confessions by the
exercise of logic and reason. It seemed that in Lutheran orthodoxy the
spirit of rationalism triumphed over the Bible.
If we search beyond the endless hair-splitting that these arguments
involved, another unlooked-for consequence emerges. The very narrow-
ness of theological speculation and its rationalist tendencies gave a fuller
freedom to the development of natural sciences on Lutheran soil than
elsewhere. A Lutheran prince furthered the publication of Copernicus'
work and a Lutheran printer published it. Underlying this openness of
Lutheranism to the natural sciences was Luther's own idea that heaven as
the seat of God was not a fixed place in a geographical sense. This gave to
the cosmos a kind of infinity which was able to assimilate more rapidly the
great astronomical discoveries of the age. When Copernicus' ideas were
taught, it was in Lutheran universities like that at Tubingen. 1
These consequences of Lutheran orthodoxy were not apparent to con-
temporaries. The new scholasticism seemed stifling to them. It quite con-
sciously excluded all those from religious discussions who were not
qualified theologians, that is to say, ordained ministers. This assertion of
the ministers' powers led one of them to state bluntly that only theologians
could go to heaven. Such high claims came at the very time when mini-
sters were declining in social status. The Thirty Years War had much to
do with this decline, though such a development had haunted Lutheranism
from the beginning. The ministers' material position was wretched; many
preachers had to have a second profession as trader or craftsman, while
in the countryside they tended in effect to become peasants. A basic abuse
was the impropriation of the worldly goods of the churches, which were
1
Werner Elert, Morphologie des Lutherthums (Munich, 1952), Vol. I, pp. 374 ff.
172
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT
sometimes pawned or sold outright. This was a general evil of the century
and was not confined to Lutheran regions. Rising prices in the second
half of the century made bad conditions still worse. In Germany after
1633 there were frequent unsuccessful attempts to free the rural clergy
from a condition in which the minister was often simply a 'Latinizing
peasant'. This was not the fault of orthodoxy, but it demonstrated that
even as religious thought became the monopoly of theologians and the
minister's role was increasingly stressed, his status in society was
deteriorating.
In the reactions against orthodoxy two different phenomena confront
us. Initially there was a religious disorientation which led to a questioning
of Christianity itself. 1 One German cobbler, for example, became in turn
a Lutheran, a monk, a pietist, and a Catholic once more, only to end as a
Jew, because for him the only certain fact was the existence of one God.
Such a loss of religious moorings was manifest in all parts of Christianity.
Less specifically, the second half of the century saw in the Lutheran regions
a general decline in church attendance. In the end the trend towards deism
and rationalism received an impetus through this religious disorientation.
Immediately, however, the second aspect of the reaction towards ortho-
doxy was more important. This reaction was linked to a deep-rooted
trend of popular piety—that mysticism and chiliasm which Protestantism
had combated from the beginning. Chiliasm, the expectation of the end
of the world and the last judgement, fulfilled the deep need for hope among
the lower classes but not among those classes only. It ran like a thread
through much of the religious thought of the period. In Cromwell's
England many radical sects lived in such expectation. In Germany as
well as in Holland, chiliastic visions were frequent. These were spread
by unlettered peasant preachers. One of their number proclaimed that
'misery and hate' were the lot of the peasant but the last judgement would
obliterate them and redress human inequalities. Such preaching was also
anti-clerical. In 1590 another successful peasant preacher told his
audiences that hell was paved with ministers, and in it masters, intellec-
tuals, and gamblers were chained together like the hounds of the devil.
Enmity towards authority, the learned, and the preachers of the church
were all one in this chiliastic thought. Such religious attitudes led to
extremes. In Saxony in 1621 many peasants sold their lands in order to go
to Zion in the expectation of Christ. This release from daily misery was
not confined to German or Dutch peasants or to English Puritan radicals;
the Jews also experienced the same phenomena. The appearance of the
'Pseudo Messiah Sabbatai Zevi (1626-76) led many to sell their all in
order to follow him to the Holy Land.
This ferment gave rise to one of the greatest figures in German religious
thought, the Silesian cobbler Jakob Boehme (1575-1624). His chiliasm
1
Leo Baeck, Spinozas erste Einwirkung auf Deutschland (Berlin, 1895), p. 61.
173
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
was drawn from the social misery of his native Silesia which he believed
God could only have permitted because the last judgement was at hand.
The church too was unimportant to Boehme as a preacher of the word.
The true church was the 'invisible' church of the reborn. This belief made
for tolerance, for it was unimportant whether or not one were a professed
Christian as long as one strove towards God. Boehme, however, was no
deist; in his thought, Christ was the salvation from death and sin, and
the picture of Christ in the heart of man made it possible for him to unite
with the Deity, to be reborn. God would realize himself in that human
being who could become immune to carnal lusts. Religion thus became
uniquely a matter of inward faith, of the soul.
Boehme was therefore symptomatic of another trend in seventeenth-
century Christian thought which was coursing beneath the official ortho-
doxies. On the Catholic side at the same time, Francis de Sales spoke of a
need to go beyond Christian institutions to Christian inspiration. The
evangelism of the early Jansenists had much the same emphasis. But
Francis de Sales and the Jansenists believed that the church and its sacra-
ments were essential in Christian inspiration, while for Boehme God re-
vealed himself not in the church but in and through nature. Through
nature one might learn to understand Scripture, and Boehme hoped that
the quarrels of the theologians would thereby be ended. Nature was at
once good in her trees, stones, and flowers, and bad in her continuous
ruthless struggle for existence. Life could be understood only through this
contrast. What then was the relationship of all this to the reborn man?
Only he could see the godliness of Nature, of God revealing himself. Just
as God was above the good and evil in nature, so man had to overcome
the dialectic of anxiety and freedom. 'In overcoming is joy', and only
through suffering could the human spirit be conscious of itself.
Boehme's mysticism rejected predestination: it was man's own will, the
working of Christ within him, which led to rebirth. Boehme's view of
human nature was optimistic; man was essentially predisposed to good
rather than evil. This voluntarism contrasted with the ideas of the Jan-
senist Blaise Pascal, who emphasized man's sinfulness. The Silesian
cobbler had a kind of happiness not to be found in the tortured soul of
the Parisian intellectual. The reborn viewed nature happily once he had
overcome the dualism of good and evil. This emphasis upon nature was
important; it was a part of the new feeling in the seventeenth century.
The God of the Bible left the Word, now imprisoned in confessions, and
emerged in nature to be recognized and worshipped.
We find identical ideas among the writings of the Rosicrucians (1614-
16), although they also placed emphasis on alchemy, the stone of wisdom,
and secret rituals. With them too, God was the God of nature, even if he
was connected with it not through the human soul reborn but in the
mysteries of alchemy. In England such extreme Puritan sects as the
174
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT
Ranters had that same feeling for nature. They wished to live 'in unity
with the creation'. They shared their ideas, in turn, with the learned and
sophisticated Cambridge Platonists. This religious thought was con-
nected with the neo-Platonic belief in a spiritual principle which illumined
all the world. The emphasis on nature, bound up with mysticism here,
could at the same time lead to an anti-Christian philosophy. Lucilio
Vanini, a contemporary of Boehme, wrote of 'nature which is God'. His
Secrets of Nature (1616) was called, not without reason, an introduction
to the undevout life. Did he not cry out on the scaffold 'a miserable Jew
[i.e. Christ] is the cause that I am here'? For Boehme, the Ranters and
the Cambridge Platonists, God reflected himself in nature, but to Vanini
and his group, nature herself was divine. Jakob Boehme's own mysticism,
unlike orthodoxy, infused all of nature with Christianity and did not
confine it to a narrow confessional base. Boehme's influence was wide-
spread and in revolutionary England his writings were widely read. 1
Piety, however, was not confined to such modes of expression. There
was also an emerging pietism which sought to revive faith within the
framework of orthodoxy. Johann Valentin Andreae constructed his
Christianopolis (1619) as a place of refuge based upon virtue inculcated
through education in the love of God. Such a piety also informed
Johannes Arndt's True Christianity (1605), but here personal belief was
emphasized: 'piety of the heart'. Religious creativity also found other
outlets within accepted orthodoxy. The hymn, free from the confine of
the letter of faith, provided a partial release. Paulus Gerhardt (1607-76)
proved to be, after Luther, Protestantism's greatest hymnologist. In con-
trast with the dogmatic sermons of theologians, Gerhardt's hymns
touched the mainstream of popular piety. They were songs of the cross
and of consolation, written against the background of the Thirty Years
War. Calvinism saw a similar attempt to revive piety within orthodoxy
after the Synod of Dort through pietistic conventicles which were intended
to serve as examples. These in turn were similar in purpose to the ora-
tories founded as a part of the Catholic Reformation.
The reaction against orthodoxy, then, meant both religious disorienta-
tion and a deepening of personal faith. The contrast between this faith
and orthodox thought can be seen in a typical orthodox funeral eulogy:
the deceased, it said, never failed to attend church: he was always the
first in church and the last to leave it; he was conscientious in taking the
sacraments, in reading the Holy Scripture, and in leading a life of sobriety
and moderation. There is nothing about inner piety, the linking of his
soul to God; instead, church attendance had become the prime mark of
the pious man. 2 Not only Lutheran orthodoxy preached such eulogies.
1
Cf. Wilhelm Struck, Dei- Einfluss Jakob Boehmes auf die Englische Literatur des 17
Jahrhunderts (Berlin, 1936), p. 195.
2
D. A. Tholuck, Vorgeschichte des Rationalismus (Berlin, 1862), Vol. n (pt. 2), p. 203.
175
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
In England also church attendance played a primary role in official reli-
gion, and in most Calvinist countries it was no different. Orthodoxy was
the officially sanctioned religion in an age of increasing conformity. It was
religious control in the age of sovereignty and mercantilism.
The problems of Lutheran orthodoxy were duplicated in Calvinism.
Yet, despite such similarity, the relationship between these two chief
branches of Protestantism was far from amicable. Characteristic was the
Lutheran theologian who in 1621 attempted to prove that the Calvinists
agreed in ninety-nine points with the Arians and Turks and that the
Huguenot martyrs deserved their fate. Such feeling is easy to understand
against the background of rivalry exacerbated by the Thirty Years War
in which Lutheran princes preferred co-operation with the emperor to
union with the Calvinists. The original Lutheran attack on the papacy
was now partly deflected against the Calvinists and partly broadened to
include them. The slogan 'keep us, Lord, close to your holy word, and
put an end to the murdering Popes and Turks' was interpreted by one
Lutheran preacher to include with the pope's name that of 'all our
enemies', that is to say, the Anabaptists and the Calvinists. In spite of
such polemics, the actual development of Calvinism and Lutheranism
towards orthodoxy was very similar.
Calvinist princes also ordered their church. Even where the church
took form as a presbytery, rulers promulgated orders for it and told the
elders what to do. The church orders of Hesse in 1657 were an example
of such commands to the supposedly elected officials of the church. The
democratic element in the Calvinist church structure was vanishing.
Calvin's successor at Geneva, Theodore Beza (1519-1605), stressed the
function of the ministers. Calvin's biblical ordering of the Christian
community was in Beza's hands centred on the religious aristocracy of
preachers. Here, as in Lutheranism, the ministry trained as theologians
became the pivots of the church. The increasingly authoritarian church
organization was accompanied also by a series of confessions of faith: the
Confessio Gallicana of 1559, Scotia of 1560, and the Heidelberg Cate-
chism of 1563. In England, too, when the Presbyterians had a chance at
power, they tried to impose the Westminster Confession of Faith in 1647.
These confessions differed as to the strictness of detail. The Helvetic
Consensus of 1675 made the vowel points of Hebrew in Scripture a
matter of regulation. The basic tenets of Calvinism and its view of Scrip-
ture were here codified into an official interpretation. It is important to
realize that this Calvinist orthodoxy entailed a denial of free will on the
part of a predestined man. The element of predestination emerged more
sharply in Calvinist orthodoxy than in Calvin's own work. The Re-
former's image of the world as the 'theatre of God' was taken to mean
that God rigidly controlled his actors. Mankind was divided into the
elect and the damned, and it was widely held that the 'saints' could not
176
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT
fall from grace. The gulf between the will of God and the actions freely
taken by men was vast and unbridgeable. This was true even when these
ideas were expressed with moderation as, for example, by the leader of
Calvinist orthodoxy in Holland, Franciscus Gomarus (1563-1641), who
asserted that no man taught that God absolutely decreed to cast man
away without sin. As he did decree the end, however, so he decreed the
means—that as he predestined man to death, so he predestined man to
sin, the only way to death. Gomarus' statement to the Synod of Dort was
echoed by the synod's canon that God chose certain individuals from the
mass of fallen man for salvation while the rest of sinful mankind was
doomed.
This orthodox thought had a great deal of appeal. It gave to Calvinism
a faith in the cause of its elect which was echoed by that English Puritan
who wrote: 'For who would not courageously fight that is beforehand
assured of victory?' This piety had to reject any human tampering with
the Divine. It was small wonder that the opponents of Calvinist ortho-
doxy believed that such emphasis upon God's will swamped all personal
or scriptural religious experience. In the Netherlands, opposition to
orthodoxy came into its own. A predominantly urban and commercial
community with its emphasis on private initiative in trade found it rather
difficult to understand the powerlessness of man before God. This state-
ment needs qualification, however, for election could be and was equated
with external success as a successful waging of war against sin. More
important for the challenge to orthodoxy, however, was the humanist
tradition of the Netherlands, the country of Erasmus and of the Christian
Renaissance.
Arminianism has rightly been called a theological revival of humanism. 1
Jacobus Arminius (1560-1609), a professor at the University of Leiden,
found himself unable to defend the orthodox Belgic Confession, though
he had been brought up in orthodoxy and had been a student of Beza's.
His chief opponent was Franciscus Gomarus, a Leiden colleague. What
started as a dispute within the university soon became a debate dividing
all Calvinism. Arminius sought to modify the doctrine of predestination,
which had always been the Achilles heel of Calvinism. Together with his
disciples he made the attack on predestination the basis for advocacy of a
more general religious liberalism.
The controversy began in 1603 when Arminius accused Gomarus of
making God the author of sin through stress on God's direct rule over
man, allowing man no freedom. This accusation was a commonplace one
against the predestinarians; it had been made forcefully by Cardinal
Bellarmine against the erirlier Calvinists. Gomarus in turn accused
Arminius of reviving the Pelagian heresy by exalting the human element
1
1, p.
Hans Emil Weber, Reformation, Orthodoxie und Rationalismus (Gutersloh, 1951), Vol.
100.
177
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
in redemption so as to obscure the doctrine of grace given freely of God's
own volition. Since the controversy between the Jesuits and the Jansenists
also concerned the accusation of Pelagianism, we touch once more upon
a general current of the century. A basic problem of Christian thought
was involved; how to reconcile the sovereignty of God with the free will
of man. Arminius believed that the human will had to co-operate freely
with God in salvation. Free will thus became necessary for the reception
of grace, and in this manner personal religious striving became the centre
of religious experience. Arminius was especially concerned with the
imprisonment of Scripture within the bounds of theological determinism;
he tried to revive the centrality of the Holy Word by reasserting the
principle of private judgement. Truth in religion was not something cer-
tain as orthodoxy professed, but something towards which man, guided by
Scripture, had to strive by means of his free will.
Several important consequences follow from this doctrine. Since the
decree of election applied only to those who repented, believed, and per-
severed in their individual striving, the elect were not a fixed religious
elite. Election was thus fluid, and the saints could fall from grace while
the reprobate could attain it. Moreover, the bitter quarrels of theologians
were beside the point in a faith oriented to Scripture revitalized by private
judgement. Doctrinal belief or theological creeds were not necessary to
Christian communion. Arminians came to distinguish between funda-
mental and non-fundamental creeds. The only fundamentals were the
language of Scripture and the creeds of the Apostles. Here was a lati-
tudinarianism opposed to the 'vanity of dogmatizing'. A rational spirit
was also in evidence. The Holy Word being central, Arminianism could
only make good its arguments by biblical enquiry, and here it used a
rational method. To Luther, reason was a whore, but for the Arminians
reason was a revelation from God within which man's free will moved.
Arminius died in the early phase of this controversy. His successor as
leader of the Arminians was Simon Episcopius (1583-1643), who led the
movement through the critical phase of its development and formulated
still more sharply the tenets of Arminianism. For him, the whole per-
sonality was destroyed if man lost free will. Moreover, doctrine should
be reduced to its essentials. 'It is better to err concerning a truth that is
nonessential, than so to misuse or correct views of it as to make it an
occasion for dissension and odium.' Christ had died for all and made
everyone's salvation possible, not just that of the elect. Before the Synod
of Dort he reiterated the essence of Arminian belief: Scripture and solid
reason would lead to the truth. Man's conscience should rest not on the
vote of the multitude (the synod) but upon the strength of reason. Epis-
copius was a forceful leader, and upon hearing him the Englishman John
Hales 'bade Calvin good-night'. Arminians also stressed personal piety
and here Jan Uytenbogaert, with his practical bent, added impetus.
178
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT
Personal piety was the highest good and could not be captured within the
confines of a religious organization. The controversy became a concern
for the whole of the Netherlands when in 1610 the Arminians presented
the States of Holland with a Remonstrance setting forth their views.
From that time on, they were called the 'Remonstrants'. The Remon-
strance rejected the idea of election and predestination; challenged the
concept that Christ died for the elect alone and the belief in irresistible
grace, i.e. the exclusion of man's free will from co-operation with God;
and rejected the idea that the elect could not fall from grace. The oppo-
nents of this Remonstrance, the Contra-Remonstrants, demanded the
calling of a national synod.
The controversy meanwhile became enmeshed in politics. The advocate
of Holland, Oldenbarneveldt, was friendly to the Arminians. As long as he
dominated affairs, Oldenbarneveldt prevented the calling of a national
synod which might be unfriendly to their position. His control was
challenged by Maurice of Nassau, the stadtholder. The religious question
became involved in the struggle for power between the stadtholder and
the advocate. Maurice's opposition to the Remonstrants was political
rather than religious, a part of his attempt to concentrate the executive
power into his own hands.
Arminians were not hostile to a ruler's power, indeed more friendly to
it than the orthodox. While the latter sought to safeguard the rights of the
church by stressing the divine importance of its ecclesiastical organization,
the former denied the existence of a separate ecclesiastical jurisdiction.
As part of their emphasis on personal religious enquiry, the Arminians
stressed the 'internal' nature of the church; in external ecclesiastical
power the magistrate possessed his imperium directly from God, but
spiritual life was inaccessible to this imperium. This last doctrine tempered
the erastianism of the Arminians. The ruler's powers were seen to be
incapable of persuading men of the truth in religion; thus, persecution
was morally unjustifiable. Freedom of worship was a civil right. There
was, however, in Arminian political thought no doctrine of resistance.
Its greatest weakness lay in the assumption that the magistrate would be a
Christian complying with the Arminian definition of his office.
Once Maurice had won his struggle with Oldenbarnevelt, he fell far
short of the Arminian view of a Christian ruler. Not only was the National
Synod called (1618) despite the Remonstrants and the State of Holland,
but it was from the outset weighted against the Arminians. In his opening
prayer the president of the synod praised Maurice as 'verus et fortissimus
heros\ The Remonstrants were received as prisoners awaiting judgement.
On the surface the synod had been called to revise confessions of faith,
like the Heidelberg Catechism, but in reality it was committed to the con-
fessions before any discussion occurred. A decision for orthodoxy was a
foregone conclusion. Typically enough, however, while confirming
179
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
predestination, election and irresistible grace, the synod failed to settle
church-state relationships on a Calvinist basis. From the first it was
forced to co-opt representatives of the state at its sessions. Maurice had
not called the synod to lessen his own powers. His political purpose in
calling Dort was reasserted when he threatened to treat all further meet-
ings of Calvinist synods as disturbances of the peace.
The Synod of Dort was an impressive gathering of Calvinists from the
Netherlands and from other countries as well. One hundred and five
theologians attended; twenty-six were from abroad. James I of England
played a large role throughout, supporting orthodoxy against the Remon-
strants. This seemed strange for a king subsequently accused by Puritans
of that very Arminianism which he had done his best to expunge. For
James, however, any divergence from official orthodoxy was treason,
whether it concerned the Puritans at home or the Arminians abroad.
The lasting results of the synod must not be overlooked. Orthodoxy was
reaffirmed. The Remonstrants, when they did return from exile, became
merely a tolerated sect which was without official status. People took
greater pains to preserve an orthodox demeanour since the church in the
Netherlands interfered in the most personal matters. War was declared on
those elements of popular piety which still clung to Catholic customs.
Here we perceive the same phenomenon previously observed in Lutheran
orthodoxy, the attempt to bring popular religious expression under
control.
The synod did not succeed, however, in imposing the strict orthodoxy
it had sought. The pretensions of the Calvinist ministers had led to an
instinctive reaction against them on the part of the patriciates. The very
decentralization of Dutch political life which Maurice could not overcome
meant that anyone threatened with persecution could always find shelter
somewhere under the authority and protection of the provinces sensitive
about their special privileges. While in the southern Netherlands after 1618
theological considerations continued to play a major part in government,
in the north, even after Dort, no one thought of consulting synods or
theologians on political matters. Under such circumstances the Remon-
strants' exile was brief. Amsterdam initiated a counter-revolution against
orthodox ministers and after 1631 ignored the decree of the States
General against the Arminians. Even before this date Arminians had
started to return. Maurice died in 1625 and Prince Frederick Henry was
more sympathetic to the Arminian cause. When a Remonstrant school
and seminary was established at Amsterdam in 1632, Arminianism had
once again found a home in the Netherlands.
During this struggle for existence, the elaboration of Arminian thought
continued. The most important theorist in this stage of Arminian develop-
ment was Hugo Grotius (1583-1645), who had been exiled after the
Synod of Dort. He, too, stated the fundamentals of the Arminian faith.
180
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT
Religion was something received by morally free men. The act of faith
had nothing to do with being 'reborn', as mystics like Boehme had
thought; rather, faith was a rational act of the will. God, he wrote in his
De Veritate religionis Christianae (1627), had created man with liberty of
action. Such liberty was not evil in itself but it might become the cause
of something evil. To make God, through predestination, the author of
evils of this kind was the highest wickedness. There was in Grotius, the
Arminian of the second generation, an increasing emphasis on rational-
ism. For him the end of life included both the spiritual and the civil good,
because man's happiness contained both. His viewpoint reflected not
so much the paganism with which Grotius was subsequently charged, but
a unitary view of the world: 'The universality of the end is correspon-
dent to the universality of matter.' Since God dominated all, the Christian
life also entailed leading a good life in society. This in turn contributed to
Grotius' view of the state. If the state was a part of the totality of things,
the two-kingdom theory of orthodox Calvinism had to be rejected. God,
the author of unity, disposed all things in due order and the state was
disposed under the final authority of the magistrate. Like Episcopius,
Grotius believed religion to be an inward matter. The true invisible
church was not the concern of authority, but the visible organized church
was a part of society. It had no methods of law enforcement of its own;
as opposed to the Calvinist form of discipline it depended upon the
voluntary co-operation of individuals. The sovereignty in which Grotius
believed was concerned with external actions alone.
Authoritarian though all this seems, in the end it facilitated the advent
of toleration. While on its face Arminianism was well fitted for a state
church, as James I and Archbishop Laud realized, Grotius believed that
the essence of religion was authorized by God alone and subject to the will
of no man. Though there were no real safeguards against the encroach-
ment of the sovereign magistrate into the spiritual sphere in either Grotius
or Episcopius, their emphasis on spiritual freedom, on ecclesiastical
voluntarism, was important. They put forward ideas of toleration and
of a free church within the state, without, however, menacing the actual
power of the ruler. In an age when religious dissent was thought to be a
threat to political order, we have here an important step towards making
the doctrine of toleration politically respectable.
Arminianism was carried into the French Huguenot church by Moses
Amyraut (1596-1664). However, the French church followed Dort and
ordered its ministers to subscribe to its canons (1621). This, in turn, led to
debate and dissension. While Grotius was refused communion by the
chief Huguenot church of Paris, the issue was kept alive by Episcopius
and Uytenbogaert, who both spent their exile in that city. In England
Arminian ideas filtered into the state church, as the Puritan opposition
never ceased to declare. To most of the latter, Anglicanism had fallen into
181
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
' an error that makes the grace of God lacky after the will of man'. Citing
an equal emphasis on free will in Catholicism, Puritans regarded Armi-
nians as 'spawns of the Papists'. Arminianism became a stick with which
to beat the established church, but once that church had been defeated,
Calvinist orthodoxy could not maintain itself either.
Arminianism raised within the Protestant fold the question of man's
free will, just as Jansenism raised the problem for the Catholic church.
Beyond that, Arminianism laid the foundation for an increasingly rational
approach and method of enquiry into religious thought and experience.
Like the reaction to Lutheran orthodoxy, it stressed piety and the Word
of Scripture considered on the basis of personal experience rather than
creeds. There were obviously many common concerns in the Christian
thought of the century. If we pass to Catholicism, its orthodoxy and its
challenge, this will become increasingly clear.
The Council of Trent formulated Catholic orthodoxy in the sixteenth
century; the beginning of the seventeenth saw the further triumphant
progress of the Catholic Reformation. The political victories of Emperor
Ferdinand II, of Richelieu, and of John Sigismund in Poland, gave to
Catholicism an elan which was augmented by the conversion of notables,
like Queen Christina of Sweden. A Rome transformed by Bernini and
Borromini reflected this feeling of triumph and power; Roma triumphans
became a city designed for religious spectacles on a grand scale. Whatever
the objections to this transformation of Rome were, whatever the actual
setbacks of the Catholic Reformation at the Treaty of Westphalia, there
was in this phase of that Reformation a delight in grandiose religious
ceremonies and in liturgical colour and form.
The dramatic element in popular piety to which we have already referred
was in tune with this impetus. No doubt the rulers in Catholic countries
encouraged the peasants in pilgrimages and religious spectacles in order
to deter them from Protestantism and to assuage their sad life. Their
intentions were in tune with ancient popular needs. The miracle came to
be central in this popular piety. Pictorial representations of the lives and,
above all, the miracles of saints became common, especially in Germany.
Moreover, chronicles were now kept, reporting miraculous healings and
tales of wonders wrought by the patron saint of the town or village. In
addition to patron saints, the beginning of the century saw an added
emphasis on Spanish saints, especially Ignatius Loyola and Francis
Xavier. The Jesuits furthered the introduction of their saints but the great
popularity of Francis Xavier was due in part to another reason: through
him the imagination of the people could follow into strange and exotic
lands.
Power came to the foreground of the worship of saints. They were
ruler types. Their power became power over the human spirit; earthly and
heavenly power complemented themselves in their lives, reflecting Spanish
182
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT
realism and Spanish idealism. 1 The ever-present social hierarchy was
reflected in the fact that the nobility was the chief beneficiary of the
miracles performed by the saints.
Side by side with popular piety and the feeling of Roma triumphans was
a deeper revival of Catholic piety, especially in France. Cardinal Pierre de
Berulle (1575-1629), Francis de Sales (1567-1622), and Vincent de Paul
(1580-1660), all typified this new spirit. Berulle's thought, like much of
this Catholic piety, was deeply influenced by neo-Platonism. The universe
for him was suffused by the divine. But Berulle was also in the Augustinian
tradition; his tragic view of life, his emphasis on redemption and the
insufficiency of man links him to the later Jansenist movement. Personal
sanctification was the centre of his thought. Such sanctification entailed a
rigoristic moral attitude on the part of sinful man. Humanity had to be
reminded of what it had forfeited with original sin. This went hand in
hand with a moral protest against the growing luxury of the Grand Siecle.
In 1611 Berulle founded the Oratory in Paris on the model of that already
founded by Philip Neri in Rome in 1564. These oratories were associations
of secular priests, without specific vows, but under the authority of a
'superior general'. Their purpose was individual sanctification and the
deepening of individual piety in order to bring people to Christ. The oratories
were a creation of the revitalized piety of the Catholic Reformation;
the orthodoxy of Trent did not lead to a stifling of such piety. There was,
nevertheless, danger to orthodoxy in such oratories. Berulle's oratory
came under the suspicion of Jansenism, and in the next century many
members actually joined the Jansenist movement.
We have already quoted Francis de Sales as saying that Christian
inspiration must go beyond Christian institutions. De Sales revived the
mystical piety in Catholicism which was so often threatened by extinction
through undue emphasis on hierarchy and discipline. Love was his
central theme. The love of man should tend naturally towards God but
it needed God's grace to give effect to this natural inclination. The love of
God was superior to earthly acts, for man could not add to God's perfec-
tion. As the eye could see a flower and immediately understand its
beauty, so the soul by simple looking and sentiment could conceive God's
truth in God's love. This was the vision which was called grace. Francis'
thought, however, was not quietist; good works were the means of con-
version and a part of the love towards man. Such love is an act of free
determination in which man is sustained once he has united himself with
God. For this the sacraments and the liturgy of the church are necessary.
Piety, for the bishop of Geneva, was not something apart from this world
but something to be practised within the context of daily life. Nor did it
mean the ecstasies and castigations of an exaggerated popular piety; the
contrary was the case. Man must avoid both despair and pharisaical
1
Georg Schreiber, Deutschland und Spanien (DUsseldorf, 1936), p. 139.
183
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
security merely through rules. To do this, Francis de Sales presented a
solution which impressed contemporaries as his greatest innovation;
men had to choose a spiritual director who understood them better than
they knew themselves, who should be blindly obeyed because God spoke
through his mouth. This emphasis upon the spiritual director became the
fashion in much of French society. However, the unquestioning devotion
of the nuns of Port Royal to Saint Cryan was to go much beyond the
usual devotion to the spiritual director of a convent. It came close to
idolatry.
The religious thought of the bishop of Geneva was re-enforced by that
of Vincent de Paul. What de Paul stressed was the abandonment of man
to the love of God, an abandonment which to him consisted both in
living at a high point of spiritual tension and in actualizing this through
the practice of humble and solid virtues. For Vincent de Paul, charity
became central, though it had also played an important role in the thought
of Francis de Sales. These ideas were translated into practice when
Vincent made it clear to the women of French society that their social
status entailed, as a point of duty, leadership in charitable works. Thus
de Paul founded the Daughters of Charity in 1629. Under the impact of
such piety a whole segment of Paris society went mad over theology. In
competition with the worldly salons at the court Madame Arcarie (1566-
1618) established a centre for spiritual action at her Paris home. Francis
de Sales and de Paul became the spiritual directors of many of the
nobility. Such piety could easily escape the moderation upon which the
two saints always insisted. Madame Arcarie spole about' burning in God',
about 'annihilating' herself before God. This kind of French society
provided the setting for Jansenism. The emphasis on man's complete
abandonment to the love of God could lead, and did lead with Jansenism,
to a sharp revival of the doctrine of predestination. This was especially
opposed to Jesuit theology, which was becoming the accepted mode of
thought in the church.
The Jesuits entered fully into the spirit of Roma triumphans; indeed,
they provided many of the ingredients which went into its making. Strict
though their own discipline was, they were open to the new tendencies and
ideas of the age. Their Church of Gesii in Rome was typical; it combined
the architectural techniques of the Renaissance and the love for space and
colour of the Catholic Reformation with the needs of the order. As the
shock troops of the papacy, Jesuits stood in the midst of the political life
of their times. They approached human nature from a practical point of
view, and in doing so raised once more the problem of man's free will.
Their thought thus led Catholicism into the same kind of controversy that
we witnessed in Calvinism and the Arminians.
This controversy centred around the Jesuit interpretation of casuistry,
the adjustment of the Christian framework of ethics to meet new situations
184
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT
and dangers. Such casuistry raised the question of how much free will
man had to regulate his affairs and, subsequently, what the relationship of
this free will was to man's salvation. In our period the ideas of the
Spanish Jesuit Luis Molina (i535-1600) became the official doctrine of
his order (1613). 'Do not', Molina wrote, 'insist so much upon the efficacy
of grace that we grow in the midst of men the poisonous error which
denies liberty.' To him there was a constant concurrence between man's
will and God's in the quest for salvation, as if two men were pulling a
barge ashore. God wanted to save all men, but the salvation of each man
was in his own hands. God had foreknowledge of man's actions, to be
sure, but he did not in any way ordain them. This theory gave ample
room to the free will of man. It also emphasized the art of persuading the
free man to use his liberty in the service of godliness, an art at which the
Jesuits were adept. But how far could such persuasion go without becom-
ing impious ? The Jesuits were accused of making religion easy to attain
and easy to observe.
The books of casuistry, which were meant for father confessors only,
sought to deal with this problem. The most important were those of the
Spaniard, Escobar y Mendoza (d. 1669), which went through countless
editions and drew upon themselves the famed invective of Blaise Pascal.
Escobar's theme was that the human in man would sometimes err and
had to be excused. This contrasted with the Jansenist position that
ignorance did not excuse sinning. Moreover, for Escobar, a right action
could be judged, not by its object alone, but also by its purpose and the
surrounding circumstances. If there were any uncertainty about an action,
the father confessor had to be consulted. Indeed he became central in a
situation where man's single acts did not tell the tale of eventual righteous-
ness. Circumstances might well permit the use of mental reservations, and
for this the Jesuits were constantly attacked by their enemies. Such
reservations, however, were never outright lies but rather circumlocutions
in extreme situations, and, for Escobar, circumlocutions which the hearer
could easily notice. Despite all the attacks on Jesuit casuistry which
accompanied Molinism in our period, their opponents also employed
casuistry. The Puritan William Perkins' question as to how one could
with good conscience use policy in the affairs of this life, confronted all
religious thought. It was answered on all sides of the Reformation barrier
in a way not too dissimilar to Escobar. Once more we touch upon a general
current on the age. It was symbolized by Cardinal Richelieu, who ordered
a textual comparison between Machiavelli and Scripture to be made,
pointing out the similarities.
But what of the papacy? The Council of Trent had defined a papal
centralism in the church by leaving future reforms to papal discretion.
Nuncios appeared everywhere supplied with papal briefs, and permanent
papal nunciatures were established in many countries. Such papal
185
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
centralism led inevitably to reactions. The Gallican assertions of France
put forward in the second half of the century were one reaction. In Ger-
many the national-church element was represented by the territorial
rulers seeking to diminish the rights of the church in their territories. The
papacy itself fell increasingly under the influence of the secular powers.
At the election of Pope Innocent X in 1644 the right of veto was exercised
openly when Spain excluded one candidate from the election without
bothering to give any reasons for this action.
After this episode, other local cardinals exercised vetoes by their
nations at later papal elections and these wishes were observed. The papal
protest on the Peace of Westphalia was typical of the contrast between
papal centralism and the actual extent of papal power. Innocent X in his
breve Zelo domus dei, 26 November 1648, complained that the emperor
had given away things that were not his to give: the goods of the church to
the heretics in perpetuity, freedom of worship to heretics, and a voice in
the election of the emperor. It was a peace against all canon law, all
councils, all concordats. This was a declaration by a pope much more
conciliatory than his predecessor Urban VIII, who had consistently re-
fused to recognize the Protestant powers as partners in any negotiations.
It had been Urban's intransigence which largly ended papal influence on
the course of events at a time when after many years of war a longing for
peace emerged from sheer weariness.
The long reign of Urban VIII, Barberini (1623-44), brings out in
sharp relief the problems of the papacy. Urban conceived the papacy in
medieval terms. Since heretics and infidels were the enemy, he wanted to
form a league of princes for war against the Turks. He saw himself as
repeating the pontificate of the crusading Urban II. A part of this dream
left its mark: the College of the Propaganda of the Faith stands as a
monument to Urban's zeal. In a gesture meant to demonstrate the su-
periority of popes over rulers Urban had the remains of Countess Mat-
hilda, heroine of Canossa, brought to Rome and entombed in St Peter's.
Bernini's frieze on the tomb shows the humiliation of one emperor, per-
haps to warn another. Urban's actions, however, were more often dictated
by the interests of the papal states than by grandiose visions of a militant
church. He fought a dreary war against those princes who held out
against his power and he continued the struggle against Venice. On the
international scene he gave his support to France, seeing a menace in
Austrian predominance, despite the emperor's piety and leadership of the
Catholic cause in Germany. These contradictions were inherent in the
political position of the papacy.
But Urban, despite his ambitions for the church, was no doctrinal
purist. He himself composed poetry and sonnets in Latin and Greek.
Moreover, he received Galileo in six long audiences, and when Galileo
came into doctrinal conflict with the Holy See, he treated him with the
186
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT
utmost consideration. Indeed, he could not bring himself to sign the
document, ratified by the cardinals, which condemned Galileo's defiance
of the church. Urban presented a mixture of medieval intransigence for
the power of the church and an openness to new ideas in art, architecture,
and scientific thought. He was the principal creator of the Roma trium-
phans of the baroque. As patron of Bernini and Borromini, he trans-
formed Rome, making his capital a fit setting for the confident might
and aspirations of the papacy. His inauguration of St Peter's Cathedral
in 1626 symbolized the feeling of triumph in Rome; yet this feeling was
not shared by many of Rome's citizens. Urban had to raise taxes on
staples and had to strip the classical monuments for materials to aid
Bernini's building programme. Both actions were unpopular, and the
stripping of ancient monuments led to the famous quip: Quod non
fecerunt barbari fecerunt barberini (1625). There was little gratitude for
the new and grandiose city that was under construction. To the Romans
it was expensive modernization.
Urban was the absolute ruler of Rome and of his states. Moreover, he
still thought of the papacy as a dynastic institution, even if it was not
hereditary. Nepotism remained an evil in the papacy, becoming especially
grave under Urban's successor, Innocent X (1644-65). This pope found
only one able member of his family to assist him and this was a woman.
The presence of Donna Olympia at the papal court caused widespread
scandal. It was, however, precisely in Innocent's reign that nepotism
received a severe blow when the key office of secretary of state was put
into the hands of a cardinal, where it has remained. Though more flexible
in his political approaches than Urban, Pope Innocent was rigorous in
dogma. There was good reason for this, since his pontificate faced the
serious Jansenist threat to the unity of the church.
The Catholic church thus presented a varied front to the religious prob-
lems of the century. The new piety seemed to conflict with the Jesuit
approach to religious thought and reform, while the papacy, concerned
for the power and unity of the church, compromised with political
realities and retained some of the abuses from an earlier age. In the end,
papal centralism was to combine with the Jesuits against the Jansenist
movement.
The origins of Jansenism trace to a dispute at the University of Lou-
vain between the Jesuits and those who opposed their doctrine of free will.
In opposition to the Jesuits, Cornelius Jansen, bishop of Ypres (1585-
1638), emphasized a rigid determinism based upon the idea of pre-
destination. For him the prime fact in the relationship between God and
man was that man had fallen. Fallen man was powerless in the hands of
God; without God's grace he could not perform any good works or
deeds because through original sin man had fallen into the necessity of
sinning. But God's free grace was given only to a very few, and for these
187
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
elect such grace was irresistible. Jansen, who saw such ideas exemplified
by Augustine, called his work the Augustinus (1640). Like Augustine, he
accused his opponents of being Pelagians, just as Gomarus had accused
Arminius of that ancient heresy. Through Jansen's friendship with
Saint Cyran, these concepts became central in Jansenist theology.
From these ideas it became axiomatic for Jansenists that very few
people went to heaven and then only by an exercise of God's mercy which
could not be resisted when it came. Thus they viewed practically all of
mankind as reprobates. The world had to be shunned if one were to live
the religiously strenuous life which might merit election. As good works
could only be accomplished by God's direct inspiration, every action
had to be carefully scrutinized. With this they combined a stress on grace
as an interior matter. However, the offices of the church were central to
Jansenists, and about this there was no pseudo-Protestantism whatsoever.
Because the mass was essential, temporary abstinence from communion—
the great joy of being in God's presence—was thought to be a useful
discipline for unworthy man. Such was Jansenist teaching, and as such,
most of it was condensed into five propositions by the Sorbonne and
condemned by Innocent X in the bull Cum occasione of 1650. Innocent
rejected Jansenism's denial of human free will and its sombre, hopeless
outlook on the role of man in the world.
The founder of Jansenism was not Jansen himself, but Jean du Vergier
de Haurranne, the abbe of Saint Cyran (1581-1643). He started his
career in anti-Protestant polemics in the shadow of the court. But his
great opportunity came when, through diverse machinations, he dis-
placed the previous spiritual director of the Convent of Port Royal in
1635. Port Royal des Champs, the original Jansenist convent outside
Paris, was no ordinary religious house when the impact of Saint Cyran's
ideas fell upon the nuns. It had been restored to the primitive Cistercian
life by a young reforming abbess, Angelique Arnauld (1591-1661). Mere
Angelique was a spiritual daughter of Francis de Sales and like Saint
Cyran was closely linked with Berulle's oratory. However, it was Saint
Cyran who transformed the convent. Not only did he introduce an ever
more Augustinian theology but he also gave Port Royal two auxiliary
institutions which furthered its influence. The school, la petite ecole, was
designed to match and rival Jesuit education. The second innovation
comprised the societaires, men who without taking vows undertook a
religious life under Saint Cyran's direction outside the convent walls. In
this manner the movement was extended beyond the nuns and the leading
controversialists became men like Antoine Arnauld and Blaise Pascal.
At the height of the movement Port Royal contained only some 200 nuns,
both in the original Port Royal des Champs and the Port Royal in
Paris; yet despite its small size, the influence of the movement embraced
wide circles of society. In a sense it was a family affair, and members
188
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT
of the important Arnauld family occupied leading positions in the
movement.
Saint Cyran's influence was further increased by his supposed martyr-
dom when Richelieu had him imprisoned in 1638. The abbot had become
involved in the dispute between the 'Catholic' (devot) party at court and
the policies of the cardinal. The devots disapproved of Richelieu's alliance
with the German Protestants, of his concept of' reason of state' which they
contrasted to Christian idealism. The abbot opposed the 'selfish' policies
of Richelieu, and his imprisonment was part of the continuing struggle
between the devots and those who advocated the politics of reason of
state and centralization. Louis XIV's opposition to Port Royal belongs
in this setting: here was a coterie of important families whose religious
attitudes opposed them to pragmatic royal policies.
Saint Cyran died in prison, but meanwhile he had read Jansenius and,
in collaboration with Antoine Arnauld, written his Jansenist books. If
Saint Cyran introduced such religious ideas into Port Royal, Mere
Angelique combined these with great self-consciousness and a tendency to
dramatize all situations. She was confident that her life and that of her
nuns was THE life which brought grace. Self-righteousness, hand in hand
with a rigid predestinarianism came to the fore. This serious outlook upon
life produced a certain pomposity as evidenced in the letter of one solitary
to his father: 'God has used you to put me into this world.' 1 It also
produced a puritan attitude towards the world, though Port Royal had
no monopoly of puritanism defined as a moral rigorism which is an
ingredient of most religious revivals. Like the English Puritans, Jansenists
opposed the theatre, gambling, indeed all mundane amusements. The
world was, after all, evil. A Jansenist countess wrote that when servants
commit faults against God, one should be strict to the point of being
terrible, for terror would bring true repentance and deepen their spirit.
Jansenism was a genuine religious revival. Jansenists believed that ever
since the time of the Fathers, the church had left the true path of theology.
As time went on, however, Jansenists concentrated increasingly on con-
troversy against the Jesuits or, indeed, against anyone who questioned
their actions. Here the second generation shone: Antoine Arnauld
(1612-94), Pierre Nicole (1625-95), and Blaise Pascal (1623-62).
The great Arnauld was, above all, a controversialist. His De lafrequente
communion of 1643 was a reply to a broadsheet of an obscure cleric. His
statement of the necessity of abstaining from communion from time to
time in order to purify one's love for God was made in a huge folio
volume full of patristic learning. Jansenist controversial writing was not
directed to the market-place but to fellow-theologians. Yet the first
edition of De la frequente communion was sold out in one fortnight.
1
Cf. R. A. Knox, Enthusiasm (Oxford, 1950), p. 186; see also account of Jansenism,
pp. 176 ff.
189
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Nevertheless, the quarrels had much the same tone as the theological
quarrels in Lutheranism. Legalism also entered here, and Arnauld's
distinction of 'fact 'and 'right' was typical. A question was raised of how
the nuns could subscribe to the five propositions without repudiating what
they held to be the doctrine of Augustine. They could do so by distingui-
shing the doctrine of Augustine, as interpreted by Jansen, from the propo-
sitions by the claim that in 'fact' these doctrines were not contained in the
propositions and therefore by 'right' as a legal thing they could subscribe.
Blaise Pascal was also a controversialist. His Provincial Letters were
a bitter attack upon the Jesuits. But Pascal was also more than this, as
his Pensees (1670) show. That book reflected the spiritual climax of
Jansenism precisely at a time when the movement was granted its last
decade of relative peace from persecution. Pascal based himself upon the
supernaturalism of Port Royal. Man for him was nothing before the
infinite. He did not stop there, however; man was not a zero because he
had the power of thought. This power man could employ to relate him-
self to the whole of the universe. Could man do this through his reason,
through that geometrical spirit which represented the link between
thought and space? Pascal rejected this view of man's capabilities; the
former geometrician was wholly converted. Man could not comprehend
the whole of that universe of which he was a part through the power of his
own individual self. This great supernatural unity had to be grasped by
intuition. The universe, then, could not be understood by man through his
own reason. Thus there was a continual tension in man's thought between
his desire to comprehend the whole universe through reason, to possess
certainty, and his inability to do so. It was a tension that could not be
resolved. Indeed, for Pascal, any certainty and, in consequence, security in
religion was rejected. Man's soul and mind were torn between the attempt
to comprehend the incomprehensible and the necessary failure of that
attempt.
Man was not, however, entirely helpless; his thought did amount to
something before the almighty universe of God. Man's thought could
make him recognize his very powerlessness before God, his misery: "The
greatness of man is that he can recognize his misery, a tree cannot recog-
nize its misery.' In this way man's thought could surpass his nothingness,
and 'Vhomme depasse infiniment Vhomme\ Pascal's view of man was dim
but there was no smug self-satisfaction with election. Man was a tortured
soul, torn between the capability of his thought and reason and the
inability to comprehend the universe in that way. The end had to be an
insight into man's own misery before God. The Pensees injected a note of
pessimism into the Jansenist movement as Pascal renewed the stress on
man's abandonment to God and his condition as a 'feeble reed'.
While Pascal was renewing the spiritual impetus in Jansenism, the per-
secution, though a bloodless one, of the movement had already begun.
190
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT
Saint Cyran remained the only 'martyr' for the cause. Papal condemna-
tion and the five propositions did not end the movement; eventually the
nuns did subscribe, keeping the distinction between 'right' and 'fact' in
mind. Even when the nuns were forced to subscribe without reservations
in 1661, Jansenism continued into the next century.
The Jansenists remained a threat to Catholic orthodoxy. They posited
an Augustinianism which ignored the tradition of the church since the
Church Fathers. Their doctrines of grace, free will, and abstinence from
communion could not be reconciled with the canons of Trent. This
revival of piety differed from that in the Protestant countries. There ortho-
doxy was rigid and protest was channelled along the lines of free individual
religious experience. Here orthodoxy was wedded to free will and the
reaction was rigid and determinist. But Jansenism was not Protestant.
Arnauld and Pascal regarded all Protestants as morally lax. While
Protestantism had reduced the sacraments, Jansenists believed in the
necessity of both external and internal religious action, with the latter
providing the foundations for the former. Arnauld stressed that appro-
bation of actions by God was co-existent with the approbations of actions
by the church. But these orthodox sentiments did not mean that Jan-
senists were unwilling to defy the papacy. Their theology forced them to
conceive of themselves as right and all their opponents as wrong.
Since the Jansenists had the support of many French bishops, they
tended to regard the pope as primus inter pares among the episcopate,
subordinate to general councils. It is not to be wondered at that Jansenism
had a certain sympathy with Gallicanism. In their constant struggle with
Rome they found a refuge in Gallican principles. But the Gallicanism of
the Jansenists was not regalism but episcopalianism. Though they
remained loyal to the crown during the Fronde, the increasing hostility
of the monarchy against them left them no choice but to oppose royal
encroachment upon religious matters. Despite all this, the Jansenists
were social conservatives. Pascal believed that social hierarchy was a
necessity, that all men wanted to dominate, but only some could. Starting
from their view of sinful men, the Jansenists took a position in favour of
political absolutism. For Arnauld, oppression was the only possible
basis for political government among men. Pascal, who condemned any
moral laxity whatsoever, had a cynical view of politics. Stratagem was
justified to maintain the necessary power and order. Though casuistry
was denied to ordinary mortals, it was not so condemned for the ruler.
Despite their attacks upon Jesuit casuistry, even Pascal was forced to
realize that Christian ethics had to bend when unregenerate man was
confronted with political problems.
Jansenists, sure that theirs was the doctrine of Augustine in its purity,
constituted a revival of Augustinian piety. Augustinianism, a strong force
in the Reformation itself, now played a role in reasserting religious deter-
191
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
minism as a challenge to doctrines of free will and man's power. Augustine
had been the main opponent of Pelagius, and seventeenth-century men
steeped in church history saw the ancient struggle repeated in their own
time.
The Jansenists were not alone in reviving Augustinianism. The Puri-
tans in England were akin to them in this struggle against established
orthodoxy. Like Catholicism, the Anglican church was in the midst of a
religious revival, here centred upon liturgy. A typical figure, Lancelot
Andrewes (i 555-1626), stressed the ceremonial ritual of the church, which
for Puritans was close to the Catholic; he combined with ritual an appeal
beyond Scripture to church history. Moreover, under increasing Puritan
attacks, Anglican preaching stressed the divinely established authority of
church and state. Archbishop Laud (1573-1645) clearly formulated and
enforced the ideas behind this Anglican revival. On the one hand, he built
new churches and talked about the 'beauty of holiness', while on the
other, he held that the church had the right to decree ceremonies and to
decide religious controversies. He was imbued with the image of an
idealized medieval church which he also viewed as a social institution regu-
lating the anti-social appetites of men. This also he attempted to re-create.
The broad Arminian base which had influenced the church never vanished.
Laud protected men like Chillingworth, and Andrewes demonstrated
wise tolerance. Anglicanism continued to stress man's free will and to
reject the pseudo-Augustinian definition of predestination.
This Anglican revival was curtailed by the victory of the Puritan
opposition. Laud's intransigence was matched by Puritan hostility to a
church, which not only had its Inquisition in the Court of High Com-
mission but which was also a firm supporter of the unpopular monarchy.
It was typical that Puritanism tended at first to take a negative position
opposing the liturgy, the High Commission, and above all, the monarchy
which Anglicans saw as of divine origin. Their attitude on social regula-
tion was ambiguous. Some Puritans did not oppose governmental
paternalism provided it was not exercised by the Stuart government, which
they regarded as oppressive. Others followed that Puritan who opposed
such regulations by citing the biblical story of Job: 'it was an old trick of
the devil when he meant to take away Job's religion he begins at his
goods'. 1 Such differing positions on the social question enabled Puri-
tanism after 1640 to find a variety of allies, each with different grievances
against the existing regime. Nevertheless, a basic core of belief common
to most of Puritanism developed.
This belief centred in a hidden God who did not reveal himself wholly
in his creation. The Bible was his declared will; behind this lay his secret
will. God was a mysterious, threatening God, who hid that part of his will
1
The Proceedings and Debates of the House of Commons etc. collected by Sir Thomas
Crewe (London, 1707), p. 17.
192
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT
from man which was not declared in Scripture. Predestinarianism accom-
panied such thought. The elect were surrounded by a depraved and evil
world. Those regenerated were made so by God's free, irresistible grace.
The emphasis was once more upon the fall of man in paradise, upon
predestination, and upon election by irresistible grace. In this, Puritanism
was close to the piety of the Jansenists.
However, the Puritans relegated church sacraments to a lesser place.
They emphasized instead two things: man's conscience and literal bibli-
cism. The latter emphasis was combined (in contrast to Jansenism) with
disinterestedness in church history. All had to be supported by Scripture,
the only revealed will of God. Such biblicism, however, meant the intro-
duction of a certain rationalism into Puritan thought, for how was one
to get at the 'matter' of Scripture? By and large, they adopted the logic
of Petrus Ramus (1515-72) which had become linked to Calvinist ortho-
doxy on the continent and which was a formal method of reasoning. Part
of the Puritan success was due to the fact that their sermons were scriptural
and simply organized according to a Ramist pattern which the unlettered
could follow. Their emphasis on conscience went back specifically to
Calvin, who saw in it the mechanism through which God spoke to man.
For Calvin a clear conscience had been the only sign of election; it was
equally central in a Puritan thought which rejected any external aids to
grace. As one Puritan defined it: 'The conscience of man . . . is man's
judgment of himself according to the judgment of God of him.' This
common core of Puritan thought, however, was not static.
From the end of the sixteenth century Puritans in England and Pres-
byterians in Scotland began to cast their theology into the form of
covenants between God and man which they deduced from Scripture.
Christ had introduced a 'covenant of grace', a covenant with man which
made salvation possible for the regenerate. Hand in hand with the 'cove-
nant of grace' went the 'covenant of works' which affected all mankind
since the fall. It implied that all had pledged themselves to be obedient to
God and to follow the leadership of those elect who had already attained
to the covenant of grace. This covenant provided the reason for eccle-
siastical discipline and the regulation of morals. The importance of
covenant theology was twofold. It softened the orthodox view of God to
one who out of his mercy covenanted with fallen man; secondly, this
religious thought went beyond confessions of faith, like that of Dort, to
deduce the covenants directly from Scripture. This development was not
confined to Puritanism. In Leiden Johannes Cocceius (1603-69) systema-
tized covenant theology in order to combat Protestant scholasticism in
the name of a more biblical approach.
Not all Puritans accepted covenant theology; it was the more con-
servative who did so. Nor could such orthodoxy be introduced into
England; the Westminster Assembly of Divines tried but failed. Many of
193
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
those who had fought the Civil War desired freedom from enforced dog-
mas. This desire affected church organization. The 'independents' did not
want organizational centralism to stifle their religious expression; instead,
they insisted on the self-sufficiency of each congregation. In theology the
ideal of predestination was accepted even by some radicals. Such men
thought that they were elect and on that basis they revived the idea of
prophecy, believing that as saints they had the right to prophesy on all
matters.
Religious individualism could feed on this piety if church discipline
was removed and the Ramian logic regulating scriptural interpretation
was disregarded. Self-consciousness of election combined with the gift of
prophecy became a human and present sainthood. John Saltmarsh
thought that as a saint he had rights beyond any ordinary man damned by
reprobation. Ludovic Muggleton conceived of himself as a prophet
chosen by God to elect and to damn his fellow-men. The distance was slight
from being chosen by God to salvation to becoming God's instrument in
choosing others. Predestination penetrated deep into Puritan thought.
Even a man like Robert Greville, Lord Brooke, imbued with platonism
and Christian stoicism, held fast to doctrines of election and reprobation.
The self-deification of radical Puritan groups also had those chiliastic
overtones which we saw exemplified in German popular piety. They
thought the judgement day was at hand. The political revolution was the
prelude to the second coming of Christ which would issue in the golden
age of the righteous. The notion became widespread that the English
nation would soon see the fulfilment of the prophecies of the Book of
Daniel about a coming fifth kingdom. The Fifth Monarchy men were the
specific sect which expressed these ideas but they affected a wide variety
of religious experience. Thus the 'particular Baptists' split from the
Baptist movement in upholding such chiliastic ideas and in the belief
that only the elect were to be saved.
Some of the religious radicals did modify exclusive ideas of election and
rejected the determinism of predestination. This was true of the Baptists,
a continuation of the more moderate strain of the Anabaptist movement
of the previous century. Menno Simons (1492-1559) had given them their
form of religious thought, one opposed to the chiliastic and excited
anabaptism connected with David Joris. The moderates believed in adult
baptism and held infant baptism to be worthless. Above all, they clung
to the idea of the church as a purely voluntary gathering of believers. Their
community was open to every man who could attain to 'active sainthood'.
All men could do so, if they repented and believed in the gospel, none
was irrevocably damned. The Baptists advocated complete toleration on
the basis of their beliefs. One early English Baptist proclaimed that as 'the
wind blows where it listeth, so is everyman that is born of the spirit'.
Emphasis on the 'Holy Spirit' was central to such Puritan radicalism,
194
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT
and at times, even to orthodox Puritan thought. For God was not only
all-powerful, he was everywhere close at hand, working through man's
conscience and through the 'Holy Spirit' in his heart. This 'Holy Spirit'
or 'Inner Light' gave emotional certitude of salvation to those who
recognized themselves to be of the holy community. It was this 'inner
light' which George Fox (1624-91) stressed as the central realization of
the Society of Friends, who were called 'Quakers' because they quaked in
ecstasy before the Lord; however their radicalism was tempered by an
emphasis upon the Scriptures in contrast to many radicals who tended to
dissociate Scripture and the 'Holy Spirit'. The Quakers also stressed
the sinfulness of man and the need to combat this by means of a simple
and frugal life. The Society of Friends managed in this way to strip itself
of the undisciplined excesses of religious individualism while maintaining
the 'inner light' as the centre of their religious experience. Similarly the
Baptists, with their tolerant and disciplined holy community, were able
to avoid the chaotic individualism of the radical sects. It is significant that
out of all the religious ferment of revolutionary England, the only sects
to survive were those which managed to discipline turbulent and chaotic
religious expression. Such radical religious manifestations were expres-
sions of popular piety; lower-class membership predominated in the
sects. They expressed, as did all popular piety, the undisciplined longing
for a better world.
Free will and determinism were the two poles around which much of
the religious thought of the century moved. To the partisans of free will
must be attributed that development which is known as the rise of
rational theology. Here the Socinians stood in the forefront, though their
rationalism was limited by a revelation which was beyond human reason.
If Puritanism and Jansenism have certain affinities, that of the Socinians
was with the Arminian movement. The organization of the Socinian or
Anti-Trinitarian church was an accomplished fact by the time our period
opens. From humble origins, the much-persecuted sect had founded
nourishing churches in both Poland and Transylvania. Although Soci-
nianism was the least numerous group among the Protestants in Poland,
none had more distinguished adherents. Their centre was the city of
Rakow, which became a kind of New Jerusalem for the Socinians. Its
presses issued their books; its church was their largest.
The early leader of the Anti-Trinitarians in Poland was an Italian, just
as the movement had been fed by Italian leadership from its beginning.
Faustus Socinus (1539-1604) established the dogma of the sect which bore
his name. Scripture, Socinus believed, could not contain anything con-
trary to reason and good sense. Man's will was free and rational. Adam
had transgressed because his senses dominated his reason but this trans-
gression did not result in original sin. Christ saved mankind in the sense
that he made man more perfect to choose the good freely. These ideas
195
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
were incorporated into the Catechism of the Socinians, known, because
of its place of origin, as the Rakovian Catechism (1605). Translated into
every European language it spread their cause abroad. Free will was
asserted because God's equity could not strip man of the will and power
to act rightly. Sin was a voluntary act, for one sin like Adam's could not
have deprived all humanity. Predestination was utterly false for it would
make God unjust; this was the same argument as that of the Arminians.
But what of Christ? Anti-Trinitarians or Unitarians, as they were also
called, denied the Trinity and with it the 'Godhead' of Christ. None the
less, the only way for mortal man to gain salvation was by knowledge of
God and Christ. Since God was only one person, belief in the Trinity
would, the Catechism held, destroy the unity of God. It was also a belief
against reason and not warranted by Scripture. Christ was by his nature
a true man, though not a mere man because he was miraculously born
and he performed miracles, but he was the son of God and not a God
himself. An important Socinian theologian thought that the Trinity might
involve Christians in polytheism.
Socinians sought to reduce theology to a minimum since Holy Scripture
was clear and explicit. Indeed, the Rakovian Catechism sought to deny
that it was a confession of faith akin to those spreading throughout the
Christian world. These catechisms were termed 'trumpets of discord'.
Instead, the framers of the Rakovian Catechism, not wanting to bind the
conscience, stated at once: 'Let every person enjoy the freedom of his
own judgment in religion.' The school at Rakow contained within it
different faiths; students were left a religious liberty unique in Europe.
When for the first and only time a Unitarian king, John Sigismund,
attained power in Transylvania, perfect equality was established between
Catholic, Lutheran, Calvinist, and Unitarian faiths (1571) at a time when
elsewhere such procedure would have been all but impossible.
Scripture and reason led the Socinians to this position of toleration
because, as in Arminian thought, innate human reason governed the
judgement of Scripture. Within this movement the rational stream of the
Reformation had found a home from the beginning. It is not strange that
the leaders of the movement numbered Episcopius and Grotius among
their friends and correspondents. Socinianism did not have popular appeal.
It demanded too critical an attitude, a too individual and rational approach
to life. Its adherents were drawn from the noble and professional classes.
The movement was one of an intellectual elite, dependent in Poland upon
the support of about 1,000 of the nobility. When that support failed them,
the Socinians were doomed. It did fail eventually, not only because of the
Catholic reconquest of Poland but also because of Protestant disunity
in the nation itself. Despite repeated Unitarian efforts the Calvinists
would not align with Lutherans and neither would join with the Socinians
against the increased menace of Catholicism. When Lutherans and Cal-
196
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT
vinists finally held a conference at Thorn in 1645, the Unitarians were
pointedly excluded. Thus all fell together. The Swedish invasion of
Poland led to the final Catholic conversion. John Casimir swore an oath
to the Virgin to submit to her protection if Poland were to be saved, and
in 1657 Poland was. John Casimir, however, could not have reconverted
Poland if the nobility had not already deserted the Protestant cause. Here,
in preparing the way, the Jesuits scored their greatest triumph of the
century. In Transylvania also the end came. The Jesuits had again
prepared the way and the process was completed when Transylvania
came under Austrian rule in 1690. Only in a part of Hungary, protected
by the Turks suspicious of Catholic Habsburg designs, did Unitarianism
continue in the region of its erstwhile glory.
Exile was bitter. The other Protestants could expect welcome from
governments loyal to their respective faiths. No such welcome awaited the
Socinians from Poland or Transylvania. Their physical wanderings in the
political desert were extensive but their ideas wandered with greater force.
In Holland they influenced Arminian development. In England they came
together once more with Arminianism to influence rational theology,
though, like Anglicans and Catholics, they were excluded from the
general toleration of Puritan England and their books were burned. While
Socinianism and Arminianism provided one of the factors which went
into the making of rational theology, there was also another impetus of
great importance.
The penetration of rationalism into the heart of seventeenth-century
religious thought was closely linked to the influence of classical thought.
Stemming from the Renaissance, this had seen something of a revival in
the early century. Platonism and stoicism in particular became influential.
The Cambridge Platonists, like some of their Renaissance forerunners,
believed that Plato derived his wisdom from Moses. In the great con-
troversy between free will and determinism, Plato supported free will in
opposition to Augustine as that century understood him. The idea of the
good was for Plato the end and aim of knowledge, of all striving; in com-
prehending all beings it drew the world into unity. Eros, the spirit inter-
mediate between the divine and human, worked against the doctrine of
original evil and triumphed over it. No Augustinian eradication of the
will was predicated; original nobility was not lost through contact with
the senses. Man was his own master, united to the universe and God
through the principle of love. Platonism thus forged a weapon against
predestination. Reason and will were one in this platonic thought;
reason signified not a mere logic or critical faculty but a capacity for man
to attain the divine truth in a universe suffused by God. These ideas were
taken up in particular by a group of men in England known as the Cam-
bridge Platonists, whose religious approach was based on reason. As
Benjamin Whichcote (1609-83) put it: nothing truly religious was irrational
197
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
and nothing truly rational was irreligious. As this was so, religious ques-
tions could only be settled by free discussion.
There was no need for infallible guides. William Chillingworth (1602-
44), for example, believed that men achieved different degrees of truth
according to their endowments; it was the effort to find the truth that was
important. Chillingworth was an Anglican who wanted to broaden the
church rather than abandon it. Here the Arminianism of Anglicanism
provided, together with platonic influences, the background for a tolerant
latitudinarianism. Divine grace, however, was a necessity for all these men.
It came to man through his reason: 'Reason discovers what is natural,
and reason receives what is supernatural.' The essence of piety was the
use of reason, but something else entered as well; an ethical principle
held together the universe and thus men were compelled to lead a good
life. John Smith (1616-52) defined divinity as divine life rather than divine
science. A pure, good, and beautiful life could only exist in the Divine
which was a reality.
All religions desired this good life, but in this case it was divorced from
any dogma. There was no need for confessions, books of casuistry, or
ecclesiastical discipline. The essence of rational theology can be simply
stated: it divorced religion from enforced dogma or theology and made
man his own master on the basis of his reason and ethical nature, but
within the divine context. The Cambridge Platonists and their allies fought
with equal vigour against the sects and against what they considered to be
the barren materialism of Thomas Hobbes.
Stoic ideas also made themselves felt. The significance of stoicism lay
in the bridge it formed between rational religion and deism, as well as
unbelief. William du Vair (1556-1621) had tried to Christianize this
stoicism, asserting that reason had to be used to overcome man's passion
and aid him to live according to his true nature. God's universe here too,
was suffused by the divine, but it was a universe whose laws were immu-
tably fixed by God and which would never be changed. Neo-stoicism
seemed to combine man's free will, in the need to overcome his passions,
with a kind of general predestination. Such Christian stoicism thinly
disguised two pagan ideas. The first was the stoic idea of resignation, of
apathy, and to one writer Christ on the cross signified such a concept. The
second, and more important, was the stoic idea of an inevitable destiny,
here transformed into God's immutable providence. God was the captive
of His own providence; He had created but did not create. These ideas led
directly into deism. A typical work was the Quatraine du Diiste (1622),
a poem which was widely read. In it God's whole involvement with the
world was denied. How could a sovereign God have anything to do with a
world which was so evil? How could a good God take notice of human
sin? God, adored as a first cause only, removed from human concerns,
allowed man freely to enjoy His creation.
198
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT
The atheistic possibilities of such deism were demonstrated by Pierre
Charron in his Of Wisdom, of 1601. With God so far removed, it was
man's place to live according to his nature and his reason. Charron
inveighed against men being good or bad because they were Christian;
goodness and badness were things which man's own nature can clearly
distinguish. The emphasis was brought from heaven to nature, because,
for Charron, 'nature is God'. Religions that have miracles, saints, articles
of faith and oracles were false to human nature. This 'nature which is
God' could be elucidated through human reason. The removal of God
from the world and apathy in the face of destiny meant an emphasis upon
man's nature, his own ethical self-sufficiency. Atheism, implicit here,
came into focus with the ideas of the French poet and courtier Theophile
de Viau (1590-1626). If nature was God, it followed that it was not the
divine, but passions which moved the soul. By omitting the tempering
factor of human reason and by believing man's passion to be his natural
expression, the way was opened for libertinism. The word libertine had
been used in the previous century to denote those who thought themselves
as free from the church and subject only to the Holy Spirit; but now the
word was increasingly used for men like Theophile, who ridiculed Chris-
tianity on behalf of a naturalistic philosophy which allowed free reign to
human passions. Their philosophy could easily become outright material-
ism; indeed, Theophile asserted that it was the elements, not God, which
had created man.
In France such ideas became fashionable, contrasting with the revival
of piety. With great exaggeration Father Mersenne in 1623 counted
50,000 such 'atheists' in Paris alone. However, not only France was
involved, for Venice was the real fountainhead of such ideas. At its
university of Padua, Cesare Cremonini (1550-1631) taught a naturalistic
philosophy. A teacher of great fame, he held in Aristotle's sense that the
soul was mortal and that God was not an efficient cause. His philosophy
was taken up by the Venetian ruling classes, who were embattled with the
papacy. The Academia degli Incogniti formed by the young aristocrats
of the city reflected these ideas. 1 Anti-Christian in tone, it at times struck
a note of nihilism and negation.
Two Italians gave to this unbelief a still wider currency. Thomas Cam-
panella's Atheismus triumphatus of 1631 was in form a tract against
atheism, but in reality its arguments were a support of that position. What
governed this world were the blind forces of nature; man had to live
according to his natural reason. The divine mysteries and Christ were
rejected. Under platonic influences, however, Campanella kept a vague
sort of religion as a force for the general good. This appeared as such in
his famous Utopia, the City of the Sun (1623). Typically enough, however,
the priests of this imaginary state occupied themselves with natural
1
Cf. G. Spini, Ricerca dei Libertini (Rome, 1950), pp. 139 ff.
199
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
science and astrology, trying to make their prophecies more accurate.
Christ was merely primus inter pares among important commanders,
lawgivers, and scientists. Campanella, like other 'atheists', was influenced
by Averroism, especially in the concept of religion as a mere law, per-
ceiving the founders of religions not as divine but as lawgivers only.
Moreover, the Averroist stress upon astrology had continued into this
age as a kind of astrological determinism which had led one Florentine
to write that Christ's death was not connected with the salvation of
humanity, but with an unfavourable conjunction of the stars.
While Campanella was at times hesitant in his unbelief, there was no
such hesitation in the thought of Lucilio Vanini (1585-1619). For him,
man was a biological phenomenon whose character was formed not by
the divine within him but by the material circumstances of his life. Nature
and, through it, natural circumstances, represented the immutable decree
of God. Christ and Moses were mere impostors; a pretence of divinity
kept poor people in servitude. Religion was the opium of the people for
most of these men long before Marx used that term. Vanini had a remark-
able liberty of movement until he opened a successful school to teach his
doctrine in Toulouse. Only then, in 1619, was he burnt as a heretic.
The frequent attacks on such atheism and deism during the first half of
the century demonstrated the relative force of these ideas. Writers never
tired of reiterating the existence of a body of men who did not believe in
Christ, in the immortality of the soul, or in the Bible. To these men nature
was the only and highest power. It became obvious, however, that this
seventeenth-century unbelief destroyed Christianity only to erect a new
authoritarianism: man chained to.nature unable to escape a destiny in
which an absent God refused to intervene. The element of free will meant
living according to this nature, giving to man an ethical self-sufficiency
which excluded the divine. Most of these men did believe in a God,
however remote or powerless. There were some, however, who under the
influence of Epicurean thought rejected even this belief. Thus, starting
from a classical impetus, our period saw the rise of an important move-
ment, anti-Christian in character, which went beyond rational religion
to various forms of deism and unbelief.
Did the growing strength of such religious attitudes lead to toleration ?
The theory of toleration was embodied in rational religion and in the
thought of those who stressed the 'Holy Spirit' working within man, but
nowhere did such men have political power. Confessions of faith were
enforced in Protestant lands and Catholicism had its Inquisition. Yet
there were examples of practical toleration: Poland and Transylvania
before re-Catholicization, the Netherlands, and revolutionary England.
However, in the Netherlands such toleration was largely confined to the
province of Holland; under the English Protectorate Socinians were
excluded, while Anglicans and Catholics were only allowed to worship in
200
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHANGES IN RELIGIOUS THOUGHT
private. There were also some other small islands of tolerance: Altona
near Hamburg; Friedrichstadt in Schleswig-Holstein, Glueckstadt in
Denmark. As in Amsterdam, all religions, including Jews, were encouraged
to live side by side in these towns. The reason for these astounding pheno-
mena was not theological, but economic. In every case toleration was
desired to encourage trade and to found a flourishing and profitable com-
mercial centre.
For all these examples, the important development may well have been
a less tangible one. Persecution for heresy did grow less, burnings there
still were, but fewer in number than before. Perhaps the growing penetra-
tion of religious rationalism was, in part, responsible for this latitudin-
arianism which we saw reflected in many of these movements. Perhaps
also a growing religious indifference was responsible, which placed less
value on religious conformity if political allegiance was preserved.
Several unifying threads have run through our analysis. The challenges
to orthodoxy in this age are obvious. Many challengers managed to
establish themselves and to gain a following. Religious diversity could
not be stopped with the Protestant Reformation, though Protestant as
well as Catholic orthodoxy tried to restrain it. The issue of free will against
predestination occupied much of the religious thought of the age, in-
volving as it did the great question of man's power over his own destiny.
In this struggle rationalism played a principal part though it led, as we
have seen, under the impetus of classical thought not only to rational
religion but also to modes of deism and unbelief. Modern materialism
and modern anti-Christian thought have their clearly defined beginnings
here as movements in our age. The greater emphasis on nature was striking
also, exemplified in Boehme's mysticism on the one side, and in Vanini's
ideas on the other extreme. Yet the age was also that of the revival of
piety. It gave to Catholicism two of its greatest saints, and Augustinianism
was certainly one expression of this piety within Jansenism and in
Puritanism. Beneath it all, on the level of popular piety, there was a same-
ness of expression, a traditionalism, re-emphasized by the hard times of a
period of almost continuous war and rising prices. Chiliasm, mysticism,
and an exuberance in religious expression typified the longing for a
better world. The first part of the century settled none of these issues,
just as it did not begin them. The change in our period was not so much
the creation of something new, but the crystallization and definition of
these trends of religious thought.
201
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER VI
MILITARY FORCES AND WARFARE 1610-48
OR the military historian, the main feature of what is usually called
the modern period is that it is dominated by the professional soldier,
hired at home or abroad. In the early part of the period, troops were
recruited abroad to serve for a limited period only: these were the mer-
cenaries or 'hired troops' in the strict sense, of whom the purest example
were the Lansquenets, troops completely unattached to any one state or
government, who sold their services to the highest bidder on terms mu-
tually agreed and laid down in a deed of engagement. Mercenaries,
however, came to be replaced by troops of home origin, engaged by the
state for an indefinite period of time and organized into regiments or
companies which were permanent sections of the military forces; that is,
by a standing or national professional army. In practice, such standing
armies also comprised a varying number of foreigners, either grouped
into separate regiments or spread among the various sections of the
army. Naturally, the process of transition from the one method of raising
an army to the other differed from country to country, but in general it
can be said to have taken place in the first half of the seventeenth century.
This was closely bound up with the development of the modern state and
with the evolution of absolute monarchy, the most powerful weapon of
which the standing army proved to be.
The use of hired troops can be traced far back into the Middle Ages and
predominated from before the beginning of the sixteenth century. But,
obviously, governments forced to take hired troops into their service
could not close their eyes to the danger of entrusting their own and their
subjects' interests to foreign adventurers, nor to the thieving, plundering,
extortion and other outrages which made these bands the terror of friend
and foe alike—not only in the field, but also after they had been dis-
banded. Then, too, not every ruler could afford the heavy cost of main-
taining a hired army. Attempts were therefore made to find some other
way of providing defence forces, and the obvious answer was a national
militia, raised from among the home population. This was in line with the
long-established practice of general conscription in the event of enemy
invasion. Similar instances were found in the 'franc-archers' of Charles
VII of France, in the civil guard on the Roman model which Machiavelli
had built up in Florence in the early years of the sixteenth century, and in
the 'legions' of Francis I.
In Germany particularly, where, after the failure of Charles V's policy
real power had passed into the hands of the local princes, several wrestled
F
202
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008MILITARY FORCES AND WARFARE I 6 I O - 4 8
with the problem of defence—and with good reason, for the animosity
between Protestantism and the Counter-Reformation sharpened visibly
about the end of the sixteenth century, and it became obvious that an
armed clash would not be long in coming. And so in this period there
were attempts throughout Germany to build up people's armies, referred
to as the Landesdefension or Landrettung. Here, Bavaria (where Duke
Maximilian, the energetic head of the Catholic League, founded in 1609,
did much to help the cause) was the most prominent state, along with
Brandenburg, Saxony, the Rhine Palatinate and Nassau. The Landrettung
of Nassau is important because of the close ties between Count John the
Elder—brother of William of Orange—and his son, John de Middelste
[the Middle One], and the Dutch generals, Maurice and William Louis.
Since the Peace of Augsburg (1555) there had, after all, been no oppor-
tunity in Germany of acquiring any practical knowledge or gaining any
experience of modern warfare. We can therefore understand why the
Nassau leaders turned to the Netherlands, then the military college of
Europe. John of Nassau {de Middelste) was the chief intermediary for this
purpose. He went on some of the most important campaigns undertaken
by Prince Maurice and recorded the valuable experience he gained there
in a number of military manuals [krijgsboeken], which form one of our
chief sources of information about the reforms in the Nassau army. The
manuscripts now lie in the state archives at Wiesbaden.
Great pains were taken with the Landesdefension, but they were doomed
to failure. The causes were many. One of the first requirements for an
army based on national service is a strong national feeling. This was
entirely lacking in the countless patriarchally ruled states into which the
German Empire was divided. Passive resistance rather than co-operation
was to be expected from the 'subjects', good-natured peasants whose
interests did not range far beyond local matters.
The extensive paperwork which national service inevitably involves
was also under-estimated. The state administration at that time was
unable to cope with the work, as it did not have enough well-trained and
reliable officials. As far as the organization of the army was concerned,
one of the weaknesses always encountered in a people's army of this kind,
was the shortage of officers, that is to say, of an efficient corps of instruc-
tors. Moreover, the training period was too short, attendance poor and
irregular, while months or even years might elapse without any exercises
being held. The nobility looked upon the arming of the peasants with
distrust: they were afraid there would be marauding and had not forgotten
the Peasants' War. The townspeople, who had to provide the funds,
showed little enthusiasm for a venture in which no one had any confi-
dence. Admittedly the main purpose of the system was to provide protec-
tion against bands of plunderers, but the Thirty Years War demonstrated
clearly enough that it could not achieve even this modest aim. The
203
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
8-2DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
beginning of the Thirty Years War meant the end of the Landrettung.
When, in 1620, Spinola and his experienced troops invaded the Palatinate,
rapid collapse ensued, practically without a struggle.
One may ask whether the Landrettung left any positive gains. Of chief
importance are the military writings it left, designed to advance the
knowledge of warfare in line with modern ideas. The manuscripts of
John of Nassau (de Middelste) have already been mentioned. In addition,
he became very famous as the compiler of the first European drill-book,
consisting of plates by Jacob de Gheyn, reproductions of which can still
be found in countless books all over the world. He found a partner in
George Frederick, the margrave of Baden-Durlach. Another was Johann
Jacobi van Wallhausen, who published a series of books on the art of
warfare and who may be regarded as the leading author on military
matters at the time of the Thirty Years War. He was also the first head of
the military college for sons of the nobility which John de Middelste had
founded at Siegen in 1616. The aim of this establishment was to meet, by
theoretical study, the need for practical experience of war, there being
little opportunity of acquiring it, as there had been peace in the Nether-
lands since 1609. This military college, the first of its kind in Germany,
was, however, to enjoy only a brief existence: the outbreak of the Thirty
Years War was the probable reason why it had to close as early as 1619.
The failure of practically every experiment with a militia based on
compulsory military service may be taken as proof that, given the political
and social situation in Europe in the sixteenth and succeeding centuries,
the professional army was the type of military force required. There was
hardly a country at war which did not have to engage large or small num-
bers of foreign troops to supplement the home or 'national' army. Thus
the United Netherlands continuously had regiments of English, Scottish,
French, German and Walloon troops in their service. Spain fought her
wars mainly with Italians, Burgundians, Walloons, Germans and Swiss.
German mercenary cavalry [reitres] and infantry [lansquenets] were
important in the French religious wars. During the Thirty Years War
Walloon regiments served with commanders like Tilly and Bucquoi under
Bavarian and imperial banners. Even Gustavus Adolphus had German
and Scottish troops in the army with which he landed in Germany in
1630.
Provided they were paid regularly, hired troops can be generally said
to have possessed one good quality, courage. In battles, sieges, and espe-
cially when storming cities and redoubts, they repeatedly showed a
defiance of death, which is all the more remarkable as they were seldom,
if ever, inspired by patriotic feelings. The hired soldier has often been
regarded as a ready mutineer, but he mutinied almost always because of
arrears in his pay. Moreover, he would never mutiny for higher pay, but
because he received no pay at all. Discipline and regular pay went hand
204
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008MILITARY FORCES AND WARFARE 1 6 I O - 4 8
in hand. Under leaders with such forceful personalities as Maurice and
Frederick Henry had, there was, for those days, excellent discipline in the
Netherlands army. The most striking evidence for this is that the towns
liked having a garrison, which in former times had been looked upon as a
scourge. After all, a garrison brought a town money and trade, the city
treasury benefited by higher excise revenues, while many citizens found it
very profitable to let rooms and to receive a compensation for billeting.
This was only true, however, if order and discipline were maintained; the
terms of the deed of engagement laid down severe punishments for
fighting and for mishandling people providing quarters; anyone even
drawing a sword in the garrison did so on pain of death.
One of the main advantages of the professional army compared with
the militia system was that it was a result of what people wanted. After the
religious wars had come to an end, people did regard warfare as a matter
for rulers and governments; a recruiting system which interfered as little
as possible with social and economic life was consistent with this attitude.
The professional army undoubtedly met this requirement and this was its
main justification. As early as the third decade of the sixteenth century
the states of Holland rejected the idea of recruiting a militia, considering
'that it was impolitic to set citizens or countryfolk against hirelings who
had nothing to lose'. This was to be the prevailing opinion right up to the
time of the French Revolution. The argument heard in favour of the hired
army—that it did not withdraw any labour from the home market—
sprang from the same line of thought. It was also considered no small
advantage of such an army that it relieved society of its unemployed, of its
vagrants and of elements likely to cause unrest and endanger the state,
thereby undoubtedly performing a useful service to society. It is obvious
as well that once war was over, or the threat of war had passed, block dis-
charges became necessary, and a new problem arose for the solution of
which society in those days had only primitive means at its disposal.
Finally, there was this to be said for the hired army, that in poverty-
stricken or poorly developed areas it could absorb the surplus population
and be a welcome refuge in difficult times. It is not surprising, then, that
severe winters, bad harvests and famine had a favourable effect on
recruiting.
The fact that the hired army was a necessity in its day does not mean
that the system had no disadvantages: there were, in fact, great disadvan-
tages. First and foremost, the indispensable bond between army and
people was lacking. The two existed side by side, with little mutual con-
tact, respect or understanding, as two entirely separate entities within the
state. The soldier served for pay, and once this pay had been found, the
citizen had no further obligation towards the army. The mercenary, in his
turn, had little or no interest in the cause for which he fought. This is why
there were always deserters and turncoats; why, for instance, prisoners
205
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
would sometimes go over to the enemy en masse; why mutiny and trea-
chery were of great importance in the wars of the time. One should be
careful, however, not to generalize too much about this. In those coun-
tries, like Gustavus Adolphus' Sweden and Cromwell's England, which
had a mainly national army, and which, moreover, were fighting for some
religious or political ideal, morale was definitely higher than when pay
and booty were the sole motives. The same was true of those religious
wars which really were struggles of faith, but not all religious wars were
of this kind. For purely practical reasons, leaders had to be very tolerant.
The notorious duke of Alva frequently used German Lutheran regiments
with the Spanish troops operating in the Netherlands, whereas, elsewhere,
supporters of the faith preached by the Lutheran chaplains were put to the
sword. In Wallenstein's army Protestant officers were to be found right
up to the highest ranks, and as far as the rank and file were concerned, we
know for certain that their faith was never recorded when they were
enlisted. All one can say is that, very broadly speaking, both Protestant
and Catholic countries recruited their forces in districts where their own
faith was predominant. It was to be expected that the terms of the deed of
engagement reflected the attitude of the state or official church, and as
some of these deeds made attendance at religious service compulsory (the
Swedish ones of 1621 and 1632; the Danish one of 1635; and the English
one of 1585, among others), this meant that soldiers would be forced to
practise a religion or take part in services different from their own. It is
likely that the terms of the deed were not applied too strictly in this
instance. In the Dutch deed of 1590, there were, it is true, threats of
severe punishments for swearing and for disrespectful treatment of
servants of the church [kerken dienaers], but attendance at church services
was not made compulsory. Contemporary historians were generally
agreed that officers and men did not lead very religious lives. Swearing and
blaspheming in particular, which carried such severe punishments (in the
Netherlands, for example, piercing of the tongue with a red-hot dagger),
seem to have been prevalent, along with drunkenness and whoring, not
to mention other offences. Military life apparently fostered licence rather
than piety, and this was certainly one of the reasons for the army's bad
reputation in most countries.
The chief victims of the 'other offences' were the people living in the
country. From the very first days of its existence, the mercenary army was
a two-edged sword. The homeland often had to suffer as severely as, if
not more than, the enemy territory. And in later periods too, the chroni-
cles of war are accompanied by a sombre tale of murder and arson,
plundering, extortion and robbery. The countless edicts published to curb
all these enormities had little effect. To some extent, the lack of funds
with which almost all the warring rulers had to contend was the source
of these evils too. It was, in fact, a very common practice simply to
206
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008MILITARY FORCES AND WARFARE 1 6 I O - 4 8
'quarter' troops whose pay could not be found in country areas and let
them fend for themselves, the countryfolk having to shoulder the burden.
During the Dutch war of liberation, the Spanish side resorted to this
method with troops whose pay was in arrears by two years or more and
whose demands for food and drink knew no bounds. The Spanish
soldiers acted in similar fashion, but then on their own authority, during
the many mutinies—again the result of irregular payment—which
hampered and sometimes completely paralysed military operations. They
sent their officers packing and chose an eletto which, supported and
supervised by a sort of soldiers' council, laid down the duties, observing
very strict discipline, maintained by barbarous punishments. The duties
consisted in collecting food and forage by means of a levy on the surround-
ing villages; for this purpose threatening letters were circulated, the
purport of which was sometimes made quite clear by scorch-marks on
the corners. Here again, it was the home territory that had to foot the bill.
If the escadron submitted once more to government authority, which never
happened unless it was paid off and granted an amnesty, the eletto would
receive a sum of money to enable it to seek its fortune abroad.
Columns on the march were also a plague, not only because the soldiers
and the women, boys and horses following in their train had to be pro-
vided with food and shelter, with hay, straw and carts and anything else
they might require, but also because troops on the march were usually
accompanied by bands of marauders who looted and pillaged on their
own account. In this, the role of the partisans was very important.
Partisans were small bands of soldiers which would set out, with or
without a commander, on short expeditions or on reconnaissance. Their
good knowledge of the region frequently enabled them to penetrate deep
into enemy territory, showing great adroitness and daring. Nevertheless,
it was difficult to draw a line between such 'expeditions' and looting
raids. In the northern Netherlands it was therefore stipulated that, to
claim the right to be treated as prisoners of war, members of a 'party'
must be at least twenty-five in number, and under the command of an
officer.
A country which suffered particularly was Germany during the Thirty
Years War; most of all from the swarms of wives, whores, boys, children,
drivers and servants which followed the army together with hundreds of
waggons and herds of cattle, and which, at the end of every march, spread
across the countryside like a plague of locusts. While on the march the
armies must have resembled a mass migration, increasingly so as the war
proceeded. As early as 1617, however, in his Krijghskonst te Voet [The
Art of Infantry Warfare], Van Wallhausen estimates that there were at
least 4,000' whores, boys and bawdy-waggons' to 3,000 German soldiers. It
was the task of the Rumormeister and the Hurenweibel to maintain law
and order among this rabble. The longer the army remained in one place,
207
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
the wider the area stripped clean. The worst feature of all was the atro-
cious tortures inflicted to discover where food and valuables had been
hidden. The armies which Wallenstein recruited with his own means in
1625 and succeeding years had a particularly lamentable record.
It goes without saying that the actual aim of the war did not make the
slightest difference to the situation. Officers as well as ordinary soldiers
assembled from all corners of Europe at the sound of the recruiting drum.
The men who slew Wallenstein at Eger in 1634 were partly Scottish
Protestants, partly Irish Catholics. It was inevitable that the army-camps
developed their own type of language—a crude professional slang—
which gave rise to a host of the most outlandish corruptions, such as
'leutenampt' for 'lieutenant'; it has left its traces in many modern lan-
guages. The international composition of these armies certainly helps to
explain why we find similar military terms used all over the world today,
such as the names for army units and ranks.
The way in which the state obtained its mercenaries is typical of the—as
yet—primitive structure of its government. In those days, the state or-
ganized as little as possible itself, leaving as much as possible to private
initiative. The head of state could acquire soldiers in two ways: by
recruiting at home or abroad, or by employing one or more of the corps
of foreign troops already existing. In the latter case, a contract or
'capitulation' was signed with the government concerned, containing
details of the mutual financial and other commitments, as well as of the
conditions on which the troops might be used. An advantage of this
procedure was that trained soldiers were obtained and recruitment
expenses avoided. In the former case, recruitment was put in the hands
of a general who was popular among the soldiers and who had sufficient
funds to pay the cost of recruiting and arming the troops, and, sometimes,
to advance their first month's pay as well. Conditions were laid down in a
special 'commission' [commissie or Bestallung]. The general, in turn,
commissioned colonels or captains to take charge of recruiting. The large
towns were favourite recruiting centres. The men who came forward were
ordered to attend at the place-of-muster or drill-ground on a given day;
at the same time they were paid a sum as muster money. At the assembly-
point they were enrolled by muster-commissioners, provided, where
necessary, with weapons, the cost of these being deducted from their pay,
and divided into sections. The subordinate commanders were appointed,
the colours handed out with a show of ceremony, the articles of war read
out; the oath of allegiance was sworn to the king or whoever was hiring
the soldiers, who promised to protect the colours and obey the articles of
war. With this, the regiment existed officially, and, having received the
first month's pay, it was ready to march off to its destination.
The advocates of the national militia did not fail to point out the great
disadvantages of this system. First, there were the high costs incurred
208
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008MILITARY FORCES AND WARFARE 1 6 I O - 4 8
before the troops had even caught sight of the enemy; the muster-money
had to be paid, and weapons bought and transported; the recruiting
staff's travelling and subsistence expenses had to be met, and above all
there was the cost of providing for the recruits at the place-of-muster.
Every day spent there cost a considerable sum of money and this was
particularly felt if there were delays in mustering. If payment was not
forthcoming, the soldiers were forced to provide for themselves by
plundering until they finally made off for good—a frequent occurrence—
so that all the expense had been in vain, which sometimes even benefited
the enemy. The same happened when the enemy attacked the place-of-
muster, often on neutral ground, dispersing the troops that had been
recruited and seizing their weapons. It is not surprising that a number of
the recruits disappeared without trace after receiving the 'king's shilling'.
Finally, the discharging of mercenary troops often involved difficulties.
Arrears of pay had then to be paid, besides money for the journey back
home, if the mercenaries were to be dissuaded from remaining in the
country as vagabonds or joining the enemy. With the treasuries of the
warring princes usually all but empty, troops could often neither be paid
nor discharged. This was the situation in the Netherlands, when, on the
occasion of the famous siege of Bois-le-Duc, the republic had altogether
no less than 120,000 men under arms, a great many of whom had to be
discharged after the campaign. This was carried out quite successfully,
although with great difficulty, leaving in the end some 6,000 men, for whom
no better solution could be found than to let them spend the winter in the
neutral territories of Cleves, Mark and Berg, at the expense of the local
inhabitants.
Newly recruited regiments, entirely lacking in discipline, cohesion and
training, were naturally no match for old experienced soldiers. The very
reason for the defeats which the Netherlands suffered in the field at the
beginning of the Eighty Years War was that they had to go to war with
scratch regiments of newly recruited German auxiliaries. This explains the
clause in the Dutch deed of engagement, which reads:' Anyone demanding
money when our forces are marching on the enemy or setting off to make
any kind of attack will forfeit his life, without appeal to mercy.'
It is general knowledge that the armies were made up of the scum of
the nations. Dislike of regular work, the prospect of booty, a craving for
adventure, debts, the desire to keep out of the hands of the law, these
were the principal reasons for answering the call of the recruiting drum.
George Gascoigne, an English captain who was a poet of the English
Renaissance, divided those who earned their living by soldiering into
three categories, to which he gave the allegorical names of 'Haughty
Harte', 'Greedy Minde' and 'Miser'; that is to say, those eager for fame
and honour, those out for money and booty, and those driven by poverty
and need, extravagance or crime. If it seems surprising that so many young
209
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
men preferred a soldier's life to the workshop or the plough, it must be
remembered that living conditions were unfavourable, hours of work
long and wages low in town and countryside, and this is probably where
the explanation lies. Countrymen were said to make the better soldiers.
Of course, the situation was not the same in every army. In the Spanish
infantry, for instance, many sons of the lower nobility—hidalgos—served
as ordinary soldiers, though with a batman and a horse for marches,
which they left behind with the baggage during battle. In France, a large
part of the cavalry consisted of volunteer noblemen; these must be distin-
guished from members of the arriere-ban, service in which was, in theory,
still compulsory for all vassals, but which had already largely fallen into
decay by the sixteenth century. In the southern Netherlands the nobility
was strongly represented in the Benden van Ordonnantie. There was a
curious development in Germany. Here the lance had already gone out
of use by the early sixteenth century even, and had been replaced by two
pistols. Unlike the lance, the pistols could also be used by batmen and
servants, who were accordingly incorporated into the large, unwieldy
squadrons of the day, the nobleman being paid according to the number
of mounted retainers he had. The German cavalry [reitres] played an
important part, particularly in the French religious wars. Owing to their
custom of not polishing their armour, but painting it black instead—a
practical measure—they became known as the 'Black Cavalry'.
There was no proper course of training for officers. As we saw, the
military academy at Siegen enjoyed only a brief existence. Those destined
for careers as officers joined a company as 'noblemen', 'cadets' or
'captain's bodyguards', and had to climb the ladder. Others began their
careers as volunteers in a general's or colonel's retinue; then there were
those who obtained commissions as lieutenants or ensigns by favour or
purchase, often at the expense of others who had a better claim to the rank.
Most officers ended their careers with the rank of captain; or sometimes
as captains-of-the-guard or adjutants in a fortress or redoubt. Colonels
and lieutenant-colonels who had worked their way up from the ranks
were not unknown, but this was usually referred to as exceptional. There
was no more question of a fixed rule for pensions than there was for
promotion. They were granted to ordinary soldiers, non-commissioned
officers and officers' widows, by way of exception only, and on request.
Educationally, the officers of the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries
could naturally not compete with the officers of today. Only a few had
been to a university, either at home or abroad, or undertook any serious
study. Furthermore, the situation varied from country to country. It is
especially worth noting that several English officers who fought in the
Netherlands against Spain became known as scientists or artists or
recorded their experience of the war in books. Most celebrated of them
all was Sir Philip Sidney, who was fatally wounded at Zutphen: as well
210
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008MILITARY FORCES AND WARFARE I 6 I O - 4 8
as being a distinguished poet, he was a man of great erudition and refine-
ment. But there were others too, among them George Gascoigne (who
was mentioned above), Ben Jonson, Thomas Churchyard, John Wey-
mouth, Roger Williams, Francis Markham and his brother, Gervase.
In the south of Europe, especially in Spain and France, there seem to
have been more officers with an academic education than in the north.
The military literature of the south, to which the Renaissance had come
so much earlier than to the north, is proof of this; it was unrivalled by
anything published on the subject in Germany or the Netherlands. Works
such as those by Mendoza, Coloma, Ufano and Melzo—to name but a
few—are outstanding for their clarity, objective presentation and erudi-
tion. Many revealed a more than superficial knowledge of the classics.
Military writings in the north were very often left in manuscript form,
so that no enemy power could benefit by them. The works of John de
Middelste, for example, were not printed. Nevertheless, important works
appeared in the Netherlands and Germany on fortress engineering and on
artillery, the technical subjects proper, the experts on which were not
regarded as soldiers.
For a long time the prejudice against reading remained fairly common
among officers, this giving all military reformers much to contend with.
It was said that warfare could not be learned from books. It must be
admitted that many authors encouraged this conservatism by embellish-
ing their works with battle formations of the strangest kind, entirely
devoid of practical value, in order to give them a 'learned' appearance.
A characteristic difference between the officer corps of former times
and that of today is that the higher-ranking officers, up to the very highest
ranks, each had a company, either in their own or in another regiment.
These companies were under the command of a 'lieutenant-captain'. In
addition, the higher-ranking officers held numerous other posts, which
carried high salaries, one of which was that of fortress-governor. But a
company in itself was considered well worth having, since all manner of
other emoluments, official and unofficial, went with the salary. The main
thing, however, was to ensure that there were many more soldiers on the
muster-roll than were actually present. All sorts of ruses were therefore
invented to mislead the muster-commissioner—the captain's sworn
enemy—on the day of the muster, with the company-clerk in particular
lending his powerful support. The idea was to have all those who had
died, deserted or been discharged since the last muster reported as present
and fit for duty at the new muster. This was done by substituting soldiers
from another company, townspeople, peasants, or any others willing to
offer their services, in return for a small consideration, in the place of the
absent troops. Such persons were known as passevolanten. They are often
confused with the mortepaien or 'dummy names' of the system whereby
the captain received pay for a few more men than the number shown on
211
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
the muster-roll; in effect, this was like awarding him an extra allowance
for some reason or other.
The records tell us that captains had other advantages too. If a soldier
died or deserted, his weapons became the captain's property; if he was
discharged he had to forfeit, in the captain's favour, most of what the
latter still owed him; a fifth or sixth of all booty went to the captain; and
finally, he made something on the soldier's clothing. On occasions, troops
were paid in cloth, more being deducted from their ordinary pay for this
than was right and proper. In the Netherlands, the number of troops actu-
ally serving was sometimes estimated to be three-quarters of the nominal
strength, even lower for some companies. Attempts to remedy these
abuses by direct payment to the men were always frustrated by those
who had something to lose. Since this state of affairs was common know-
ledge outside the army too, it obviously deterred citizens from making
financial sacrifices for the military forces, while the popularity and prestige
of the army greatly declined as a result of all this corruption.
Something which had a far-reaching effect on the armies of the time
was the absence of barracks. When not in the field, the soldier was in
billets. The provider of these quarters received a certain sum in payment,
known as 'service money'. The soldier paid for his own meals, and, if he
was married, for those of his wife and children as well. It is a mystery how
a soldier ever managed to keep a family on the pay he received. The wife
probably earned something too, by washing, cleaning, spinning or by
doing some similar type of work. Apart from drill and target practice,
both of which were infrequent at first, the only duty in the garrison was
keeping the watch. In the summer, many soldiers worked for farmers or
practised some craft or other, much to the annoyance of the urban gilds.
They found others who were willing to do their sentry-duty for them, and
paid them for it; in this way, these people too, who were known as 'paid
sentries', were able to earn a little extra. The town authorities were not
very well disposed to the wives and children of soldiers. If, at the end of a
campaign, a soldier went to live in a garrison other than the one where his
wife and children were staying, a strict ban was imposed on letting rooms
or sleeping accommodation to these unfortunate people, and sometimes
they were expelled from the town without more ado.
Basically at least, the armies of the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries
were all organized in much the same way. For example, in an English
infantry company of 150 men (the normal complement), there were,
besides the captain, a lieutenant, an ensign, two sergeants, two drummers,
a surgeon, a chaplain, a gunner and a clerk. There were also six corporals,
each in charge of a section of the company and responsible for training
recruits. A number of noblemen were assigned to each company. The
strength of the companies varied considerably: in the Netherlands it was
usually 113 or 150 in the seventeenth century, and in Germany 300. In
212
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008MILITARY FORCES AND WARFARE 1 6 I O - 4 8
other countries, in addition to those already mentioned for England,
there were a number of other ranks: that of landspassaat, corresponding
approximately with that of corporal; that of capitaine d'armes, for the
company armourer; and in the United Netherlands, France, and Germany
respectively, those of adelborst, cadet and Gefreyter, all referring to what
may be called prospective officers. In Germany and Sweden, there was
also a Fiihrer, who carried the colours when the company was on the
march, but not when it was in the field, and finally, in the Netherlands
and Germany, the captain's bodyguard. Ranks below those of lieutenant
and ensign were appointed by the captain; but for a long time all mem-
bers of the company staff, including for example, the drummers and the
surgeon, were called 'officers'. In England and the Dutch Republic all
officers down to and including the ensign held the commission or warrant
of the king or whoever else was paying them. This explains why corporals,
sergeants and certain others below the rank of second-lieutenant in the
British army are still called non-commissioned officers.
The only permanent unit above a company was a regiment. The num-
ber of companies in a regiment varied considerably. In 1635, there were
582 companies of infantry spread over 33 regiments in the Dutch Republi-
can army, the number of companies per regiment varying between 9 and
30. They included four English regiments, two of 17, one of 18 and one of
23 companies (9,550 men in all), and 3 Scottish regiments, each of 10
companies (3,870 men). The colonel's company was always larger than the
others. In addition to the colonel, the regimental staff consisted of the
lieutenant-colonel, the sergeant-major, the quartermaster and the provost.
In some countries it was quite a long time before permanent regiments with
a permanent staff were formed. The Spanish Tercios were very old
regiments, while in France the regiments known as les Vieux, which went
back to Francis I's legions (Picardie, Piemont, Navarre and Champagne),
had existed since the middle of the sixteenth century. Henri IV added a
few more, known as les Petits Vieux. It was not until 1623 that the first
permanent regiment was formed in the Netherlands. Until that year the
practice had been to amalgamate a number of companies under a colonel
for one campaign as a temporary measure, since there was no permanent
staff. Foreign troops in the service of the states, on the other hand, were
organized into permanent regiments. The first English regiment was
Humphrey Gilbert's, which fought in Zeeland in 1572; its men were
probably the original 'Buffs'.
For many years the States' cavalry also had no regiments except when
in the field. It was not until 1635 that it was organized into four standards,
companies or 'cornets'. In the field, the regiments were led by a major,
since the colonel almost always held other posts which kept him else-
where. Sometimes, too, as a favour, a very young person or even a child
would be appointed colonel. That officers could hold a command in the
213
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
cavalry and the infantry at one and the same time was another evil that
could never be rooted out entirely.
As early as the end of the sixteenth century, an important reform had
taken place in the cavalry: the lance had been abolished. There was much
discussion about the advantages and disadvantages of the lance compared
with the cuirassier's pistol. The ultimate reason for the disappearance of
the lance (it was to return two centuries later) was that it made heavy
demands on both rider and horse, demands which it became increasingly
difficult to meet in the new age. And so the knightly weapon par excel-
lence disappeared from the armouries of France in 1594 and from those
of the Dutch Republic in 1596. Apparently, it remained in use longer in
other countries. As late as the Battle of Marston Moor (1644) a unit of
lancers 400 strong was successfully deployed by the parliamentarian army.
Meanwhile, various countries had found it necessary to introduce
troops of a type midway between the infantry and the cavalry. These were
the dragoons. Before this, there had been no better ways of moving foot
soldiers rapidly from one place to another than to carry them in waggons
or mount them behind cavalrymen. Horses had even been taken from
arquebusiers to transport troops. Mounted infantrymen were used in
France as early as the religious wars; the origin of their name ''dragons''
remains obscure. They were armed and fought as infantrymen, the horse
being for them not a weapon, but simply a means of conveyance. In the
Netherlands it was not until 1606 that the first companies of dragoons
were formed. Of cavalry proper, there were only two kinds: cuirassiers,
the heavy cavalry, and arquebusiers, the light cavalry. The former were
armed with a sword and two pistols, the latter with a carbine, a pistol and
a sword.
In the seventeenth century there was a general tendency towards
uniformity in weapons. Thus the double-handled broadsword went out
of use, as did the shield (buckler) of the captain's bodyguard. The halberd
was retained only as an emblem of rank for sergeants, the partisan (long-
handled spear) for captains and lieutenants. Weapons no longer service-
able in the field, including ones like the morgenstern [mace] and the storm-
ing flail, found their way to the fort lumber-rooms.
Armour remained unaltered for the time being. Cuirassiers wore a
complete suit of plate armour, except that below the knee the leg was
protected by a boot only; they wore a helmet with either a visor or bars.
The left hand only was protected by a steel glove. The breastplate, back-
plate and helmet had to be proof against pistol-fire. The arquebusiers,
known also as carabineers or 'bandoleer-horsemen', wore a helmet open
at the front, their only other protection being breastplates and back-
plates. In the course of the Thirty Years War, an entirely new and highly
practical type of helmet was introduced from the East; it came to be
widely used, and was worn, for example, by the cavalry in England during
214
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008MILITARY FORCES AND WARFARE I 6 I O - 4 8
the Civil War. The helmet consisted of a metal skull, to which were
attached a horizontal rain-flap with an opening for an adjustable nose-
guard, a strong, reliable neck-guard and cheek-flaps with apertures for the
ears. The pikemen, also known as 'double-pay men' on account of the
high pay they received, who were the backbone of the battle-formation,
were protected by a morion, breastplate and backplate, gorget and by
guards of steel covering part of their arms and legs [besagues and tosses].
In addition they carried a 13-ft pike and a dagger. The musketeers and
unmounted arquebusiers wore either a hat or a morion. Using -fe lb.
bullets, the musket had a range of between 220 and 270 yards. The powder
was carried in leather-lined tin canisters attached to a bandoleer; the
arquebusiers, however, used powder-flasks.
In the first half of the seventeenth century there were still no uniforms
proper. It was always a simple matter, therefore, for partisans or soldiers
taking towns by surprise to pretend they belonged to the other side. The
absence of uniforms made all kinds of stratagems possible, but also
encouraged numerous abuses, desertion, of course, being the main one.
Sashes, sword-knots and cockades of a given colour were used to distin-
guish one side from the other. Other means employed were battle-tokens
of foliage, cloth or bunches of straw attached to the headgear, and a pre-
arranged battle-cry. Companies with all their men dressed in uniforms of
the same colour existed quite early, but this would be because the captain
or colonel had bought cloth of one colour, not because a general order
had been given. The first general order regulating the colour of uniforms
came with the introduction of the New Model Army in England in 1645,
when red was the colour prescribed for all troops. This was to remain the
colour worn by British troops right up to the First World War.
By tradition the infantry, especially the pikemen, who represented the
real strength of any force, were drawn up in the battle-field in three or
four rectangular masses, referred to as battalions, squadrons, hopen
(Dutch) or Gewalthaufen (German). They were usually twice as deep as
they were broad. The artillery and musketeers either stood, in deep forma-
tion like the infantry, on the four corners or on the wings of the squadron,
or in a few ranks all the way round the outside. In the cavalry, the lancers
originally fought en haie in the medieval manner, but after the pistol had
become their main weapon, they too adopted the rectangular formation,
with squadrons of 500 to 1,000 men. During an engagement, the artillery
and musketeers fought in small groups as skirmishers, seeking cover
among or behind the pikemen in the event of a cavalry charge. The
cavalry's usual method of fighting was the caracole; this meant that they
fired rank by rank, the rank which had just fired closing up behind the
squadron and reloading.
The disadvantage of deep, unwieldy formations was that they were
difficult to move and, more especially, that only the outer ranks (in the
215
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
case of the pikemen no more than the first five ranks, according to esti-
mates) could take a direct part in the fighting. Besides, once it was en-
gaged in man-to-man combat, a battalion or squadron, whatever its size,
was highly vulnerable to attack from another quarter. These considera-
tions above all led the stadtholders of Nassau to adopt a new battle-
formation, with which the name of Prince Maurice is associated. Its
special features were: battalions no bigger than one regiment (500 to
1,000 men); cavalry squadrons no bigger than one company (c. 100 horse);
battalions drawn up in ten ranks, cavalry squadrons in five; the entire
force in three lines; the cavalry on the wings, except for a few squadrons
held in reserve. The artillery and musketeers stood on the left and right
of the pikemen and, with them, comprised one squadron. Firing took
place rank by rank, the rank which had just fired moving to the back, via
gaps left open for the purpose, and reloading. This allowed continuous
fire to be maintained. This new battle-formation proved its superiority
at Nieuwpoort in 1600. This would not have been possible without first-
class troops. The ten-rank formation was a venture at the time and the
firing in particular obviously called for much practice and a high standard
of discipline. This standard was obtained by the reintroduction of drill
exercises on the model of the Ancients, as described in the works of
classical writers such as Aelianus Tacticus, Leo VI (the Wise) and Polybius.
An intensive study was made of these works, with the help of Latin
translations. The work of scholars such as Justus Lipsius, professor at
Leiden and later at Louvain, under whom Prince Maurice studied for
eighteen months and whose De Militia Romana went through eleven
editions, was of great assistance; and particularly that of the versatile
scholar Simon Stevin, whom Maurice, quite justifiably, refers to as his
guide and mentor. It is difficult to over-estimate the importance of this
drill, which was the main feature of the Nassau army reform. Its value
far exceeded its direct, tactical use in the battle-field: the eventual aim
was to create a type of soldier entirely different from the soldier of the
time, who was still moulded in the mercenary tradition. Maurice and his
nephew and brother-in-law, William Louis, undoubtedly had great diffi-
culty in overcoming initial resistance. Eventually, however, the drill was
not only accepted in the Netherlands, but was adopted sooner or later by
all European powers and is now in use all over the world.
Maurice gave much attention to siegecraft and fortress engineering,
intervening personally in these matters. As far as the artillery, bridge-
building, the supply-train and encampment were concerned, here, too, a
reorganization took place which was unsurpassed in any other country
and met requirements for many years. It was in this period that nobles
and soldiers from numerous countries visited the Netherlands to study
'modern' warfare, with the aim of returning home and building on the
foundations laid there.
216
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008MILITARY FORCES AND WARFARE 1 6 I O - 4 8
As can be expected, it was mainly the Protestant powers which strove
to reform their military systems on Nassau lines, Sweden being the first
to organize its army as the Netherlands had done. Charles of Sodermann-
land, later Charles IX, had already made some attempt at army reform in
Sweden, but with little effect as, being poor, the country could not find the
necessary funds. The intermediary was John de Middelste, mentioned earlier
as the organizer of the Nassau national militia and of the Landrettung
in the Palatinate. In 1601 and 1602 he fought as commander-in-chief of
the Swedish troops against the Poles in Livonia, his services being highly
appreciated. There can be little doubt that knowledge of the new methods
of warfare was greatly increased in Sweden as a result of the period he
spent in command of these troops, short though it may have been. In
1608 Jacob de la Gardie, a former general in Prince Maurice's army, was
entrusted with the military education of the young Gustavus Adolphus,
who was then fifteen years old. Like the Nassaus, the heir to the Swedish
throne, who had a great talent for languages, made a thorough study of
the classical authors on the art of war. Records mention that he read the
works of Aelianus, Frontinus and Vegetius, as well as Lipsius' celebrated
De Militia Romana and his Poliorceticon which deals with siegecraft.
It is therefore little wonder that, when in 1611 he ascended the throne
at the age of seventeen, Gustavus Adolphus concentrated all his efforts on
improving the army and that—even though it was only because of his
great respect for Prince Maurice—he took the Dutch system as his model.
It was not, however, a question of mere slavish imitation, but of further
development based on the Dutch reforms. Indeed, the situation, parti-
cularly as regards the method of recruiting, was entirely different in
Sweden. The Netherlands possessed an international army of mercenaries;
although its core was Dutch, most of the troops were foreigners from a
variety of countries. Sweden, on the other hand, was the first country in
Europe to possess an entirely national army, recruited on the basis of com-
pulsory service, and stationed in regimental districts, corresponding with
the ancient rural provinces, where martial qualities were fostered by strong
local patriotism. In this country, where feudalism had failed to make the
same inroads as in the other countries of Europe, fighting spirit was not
the monopoly of a particular social class or profession, but a quality
possessed by an entire nation of robust peasants. It was an inheritance
from Germanic times.
Piety, enthusiasm for the Protestant cause: loyalty to a king who was
a member of the courageous Vasa family: these were the foundations on
which Gustavus Adolphus was able to build a strict discipline. Experience
gained in the Polish and Russian wars forged the army into an efficient
instrument of war; in addition, there were the tactical and technical
changes demanded by the times.
In the infantry, a lighter type of musket was introduced, so that the
217
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
forked rest could be dispensed with; thus greater mobility and a faster
rate of fire were achieved. The firelock was no longer needed; this
weapon had already disappeared from armoury orders in the Netherlands
by 1623. An important change resulting from the increase in the rate of
fire was that it became possible to reduce the number of ranks in a
battalion. These were reduced from ten to six and, if necessary, this
number could be reduced to three by doubling the rate of fire. Otherwise
the battalions were drawn up in the same way as those under Maurice's
command with the pikemen in the centre, musketeers on each side, and
with gaps to facilitate rank-by-rank firing. It became possible to shorten
the length of the pike, which still remained indispensable for warding off
cavalry charges. While, in Maurice's army, the most frequent ratio of
pikes to firearms was 5 : 6, the new type of company which the Swedish
king introduced in about 1621 had 54 pikes to 72 firearms, a small
proportionate reduction. A natural result of the increased fire-power was
that it became more and more common for troops to be drawn up in
lines. Since there was a danger of the infantry therefore becoming split up
into too many weak battalions, the king introduced the brigade unit,
with four battalions to the brigade. Thus a unit now existed which could
match the very powerful squadrons still in use on the Spanish-German
side, while at the same time the troops became more manoeuvrable.
Fire-power was increased not only in the infantry, but also in the
artillery. Until this time, artillery had played a major role in sieges, but
only a very minor one on the battle-field. Gustavus Adolphus created the
first real field artillery. This was regimental artillery, consisting of light
three-pounders, two—later three—per battalion. The ammunition used
appears to have been grapeshot, but it would be wrong to under-estimate
the effect of the bullets on the serried ranks of the time. In the army with
which the king crossed over to Germany in 1630, there were 81 three-
pounders of this kind, in addition to 24 twenty-five-pounders (siege
artillery) and 25 mortars.
Pieces of artillery very famous during this period were the 'leather
cannons'. They were invented by a certain Eberhard, of Zurich, and were
taken across to Sweden by the Austrian general Wurmprandt. Their
composition long remained a mystery, and in recent times X-ray techni-
ques have been used to reveal the secrets of the sole surviving example.
Only the outer casing was of leather. The rest of the cannon consisted of
an iron core, reinforced by a system of coiled wire and rope, iron strips,
a wooden filling and linen wrapping. It was an attempt to manufacture a
piece of field artillery lighter than the usual type. A number of these
cannons were successfully used in the war against Poland between 1627
and 1629. They were never, however, used on a wide scale, probably
because of their intricate construction and the difficult manufacturing
process involved. A man who did much to help build the Swedish artillery
218
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008MILITARY FORCES AND WARFARE I 6 I O - 4 8
was Louis de Geer, a great merchant, industrialist and financier, and the
founder of the Swedish iron and armaments industry. He was on intimate
terms with Gustavus Adolphus. Although his importance is perhaps
greater for the economic than for the military historian, this does not
diminish the relevance of his work for the latter.
Gustavus Adolphus also improved the cavalry: his main achievement
was to abolish the caracole. During the charge only the front rank was
allowed to fire, from the shortest distance, after which the cavalry engaged
the enemy hand-to-hand with sword and pistols.
As in Sweden, the military situation in England was also rather special,
for the task of defending the homeland was entrusted to the trained bands,
a sort of national militia. Thus military power was not in the king's hands,
which is why absolute monarchy never obtained a footing in England.
The few troops maintained by the king as palace guards, and engaged in
policing duties in Ireland and along the Scottish border were inadequate
for war on an extensive scale. The national militia comprised all male
residents from fifteen to sixty years of age and was organized according
to the Statute of Winchester of 1285. Two statutes of Mary's reign and
later administrative efforts had brought this venerable institution up
to date to some extent, but no radical change was involved. One of the
remarkable features of this situation was that the crown in fact had no
right whatsoever to compel its subjects to serve overseas, or even outside
their own country, except in the event of enemy invasion. In practice,
however, this was disregarded. Thus the troops which were sent overseas
consisted partly of recruited volunteers, the rest being militia conscripts.
In the militia, a distinction was made between trained men—those who
had received some sort of training—and untrained men; since the former
were considered indispensable for the defence of the country, the others
were preferred for service overseas. The selection, arming and mustering
of the conscripts was the task of the lord lieutenant of the county. Here,
again, there were two categories: substantial citizens, who tried by every
possible means to avoid the highly unpopular service in the militia, and
the ' rogues and vagabonds' (the unemployed and the tramps), who were
simply pressed into service. This brief summary gives some idea of the
military value of these overseas contingents, especially when it is borne in
mind that a sea journey of any length was enough in itself to cause the
loss of many men and horses. The expedition to Cadiz in 1625 was one
notorious case in point. In the Netherlands, the English had the reputation
of being courageous soldiers in the field, who found it difficult, however,
to adapt themselves to the food, climate and way of life of foreign lands.
The names of Vere, Morgan, Norris and Cecil are sufficient reminder of
the valour shown by the English on countless occasions in the Eighty
Years War.
In England, the impetus for the setting up of a standing army cast
219
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
in the new mould did not come until the Civil War. In the nobility and
gentry, inspired by the virtues of chivalry and honour, lay the strength
of the Royalist army; above all else, they provided an excellent cavalry.
On the parliamentary side, on the other hand, support came from many
of the cities, the ports and, above all, from London, the commercial
metropolis, and from part of the gentry. Provided the resources thus
available were used properly, there could be no doubt of final victory. In
this respect the Civil War in England bears some resemblance to the
American Civil War.
At first there was chaos on both sides. Each county waged its own war
and the struggle seemed to be disintegrating into a series of minor opera-
tions, sieges in particular. Admittedly, there were no true strongholds
in the country, but then neither side had reliable siege artillery. The
Parliamentarians, who were commanded by a parliamentary committee,
made the further mistake of constantly setting up new regiments and
allowing the old ones to disintegrate; so it was not surprising that the
initial advantage lay with the Royalists who had an excellent cavalry
general in Prince Rupert of the Rhine. At the Battle of Edgehill (October
1642), the Roundheads were driven north, but Charles did not consider
himself strong enough to advance upon London. Later attempts to do so
also failed, and Charles' headquarters continued to be at Oxford. In
July 1643 the Cavaliers took Bristol, the country's second city, by storm:
this was to be their last great success. The intervention of the Scots, after
they had signed the Covenant with the Parliamentarians in September of
the same year, in effect decided the war against the king, and his defeat was
certain after the battles at Marston Moor (July 1644) and Naseby (June
1645). On both occasions the Roundheads owed their victory to the
magnificent charges of Oliver Cromwell and his Ironsides.
It is general knowledge how Cromwell succeeded in inspiring the
Parliamentarian army with a religious fervour bordering on fanaticism,
which was at one and the same time a source of relentless energy, iron
discipline and sober living. These qualities fashioned a military force
unique in history. Cromwell's remarkable achievement was all the more
astonishing as he was not, in fact, the commander-in-chief, but merely
the lieutenant-general of the cavalry.
The new army, known by historians as the New Model Army, was
given concrete shape in the New Model Ordinance which passed the
Commons in January 1645 and the Lords in February of the same year.
It has rightly been called 'a body of Bible warriors'. Both Dutch and
Swedish influences were reflected in its organization, English officers
having served in the Swedish army and in the Dutch army under Prince
Frederick Henry. The infantry was divided into 12 regiments, each with
1200 men in 10 companies—two-thirds musketeers to one-third pikemen.
The cavalry consisted of 11 regiments, each with 6 squadrons of 100 horse-
220
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008MILITARY FORCES AND WARFARE 1 6 I O - 4 8
men, armed as cuirassiers, with a sword, two pistols, helmet, breastplate
and backplate. As elsewhere, however, about the middle of the century,
the helmet and suit of armour were replaced by a hat and jerkin of buffalo
hide. The New Model Army also had a regiment of dragoons of 1,000
men which were divided into 10 companies and armed like musketeers.
They were usually drawn up in ranks of ten, one rank sometimes looking
after the horses of the other nine. The artillery, which had so far been the
Cinderella of the forces, was put on a firm basis; each cannon was
served by a gunner who had two men to help him. Two regiments of
'firelocks' and two of infantry were specially detailed to escort the
artillery. The records tell us that artillerymen and pioneers had a bad
reputation, particularly for their foul language. Apparently, they were not
regarded as soldiers, any more than the engineers and the baggage-train
men were.
Some idea of the composition of the headquarters staff can be obtained
from the following list of the main appointments: commander-in-chief or
'captain-general' (Sir Thomas Fairfax); chief of staff (Major-General
Skippon); a commissioner-general for the muster, another for provisions
and another for forage; a wagonmaster-general; a scoutmaster-general
(cf. French Maitre de Guei); eight paymasters; a solicitor-general; two
doctors of medicine; an apothecary; a chaplain; a secretary of the war
council with two clerks; and two adjutants.
In addition, there was a general staff for the infantry, for the cavalry
and for the baggage-train, under a major-general (Skippon), a lieutenant-
general (Oliver Cromwell) and a lieutenant-general of the artillery
(Hammond) respectively.
The artillery had an inspector, a master-gunner of the field, a super-
intendent of ammunition and a superintendent of the draughthorse.
There was also an engineer-general with four engineers under him and,
finally, a captain of the pioneers. What is nowadays known as the en-
gineers did not, therefore, exist as a separate army department.
While England, in 1660, after fifteen years of military dictatorship,
returned to constitutional monarchy, France had an absolute monarchy
after the end of the Fronde in 1653. From the death of Henri IV until
1653, the internal political history of France was an uninterrupted suc-
cession of civil wars, risings and court intrigues which formed the back-
ground to the resistance of the nobility to the growing despotism of the
throne. France's foreign affairs during this period were dominated by the
traditional struggle against the Spanish-Habsburg alliance, which was
continued after the Peace of Miinster until as late as 1659, against a Spain
falling deeper and deeper into decline. Of the few battles in this conflict,
that at Rocroi (1643) is of military-historical importance, as the defeat
there of the Spaniards under De Melo is usually regarded as marking the
end of the superiority of the Spanish infantry after a century and a half of
221
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
dominance. All the same, according to reports of the righting, the Spanish
infantry gave a good account of itself. It was at this battle that the great
Conde won his first laurels.
The construction of fortifications occupies an important place in the
development of warcraft. About the middle of the sixteenth century
nearly every town still had its medieval walls with their gateways and
moat. With the increased use of cannons, new fortifications were added
here and there, principally to defend the gateways, while the towers in the
walls were converted into round bastions and rebuilt to accommodate
cannons. New fortifications were constructed on the Italian model, with
high earth walls, retaining walls (revetments) and small bastions. During
the Dutch war of liberation against Spain the need to modernize fortifica-
tions became urgent, but because of the lack of funds, the watery nature
of the terrain and the softness of the ground in many places, the heavy,
expensive revetments were dispensed with, earth walls having to suffice.
Such walls could withstand bombardment by the solid cannon balls of the
time, in contrast to stone walls which, when they collapsed, also filled in
the moat. The moats (or ditches), which were deep, broad and marshy,
gave sufficient protection against storming; there were palisades to
thwart surprise attacks. When it froze, the ditches were hacked open and
water was poured over the walls. The walls being very thick, there was a
large 'blind angle', which meant that the defence of a town was entirely
dependent on flanking fire from cannons and muskets. The bastions or
bulwarks were used for this purpose, the attack being largely concentrated
on them.
In the moat, there were very often smaller defence works called ravelins,
and, on the other side, there was a covered way with a glacis; moreover,
important strongholds and forts on the frontier also had demi-lunes and
hornworks. The result was an elaborate system of defences, care always
being taken to see that each defence-work could be covered by flanking
fire from a distance of 220 to 250 yards—the range of a musket. Thus, all
distances and angles were interrelated; the task of calculating these, and
of marking out the terrain, was that of the engineers, who therefore
needed a sound knowledge of arithmetic and surveying.
The Old-Dutch type of fortress engineering which developed in this way
had great influence elsewhere in Europe, principally in the Protestant
countries and where strongholds were situated in low-lying marshy terrain.
Dutch engineers frequently served with foreign armies or were consulted
by foreign rulers. There was evidence of their activity in the fortifications
of Berlin, Hamburg, Bremen, Danzig, Neisse and even as far afield as
Rostov and Terki in Russia.
Improvements in siegecraft kept pace with advances in fortress en-
gineering. Sieges became slower and more methodical, and called for
more artillery. While Prince Maurice, for instance, besieged Groenlo in
222
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008MILITARY FORCES AND WARFARE I 6 I O - 4 8
1595 with 16 pieces of artillery, and in 1597 with 14, in 1627, Frederick
Henry used 80 pieces including 15 mortars. Again, while Maurice used
22 pieces when besieging Bois-le-Duc in 1601—unsuccessfully, it is true—
in 1629 Frederick Henry took the city with 116 cannon, not counting
the mortars. During the siege of Hulst in 1645, more projectiles were fired
in one month than during the entire seven months of the siege of Haarlem
in 1573.
If there was a possibility that relief would be brought to a besieged
town or fort, a wide circumvallation was built, almost a fortress in itself.
Within this line the besieging forces set up three camps or 'quarters',
from which, under cover of artillery fire, zig-zag trenches were dug
towards the bastion or front being attacked. The covered-way was usually
taken only after a hard struggle. Then, however, came the most difficult
phase of the operation, the crossing of the moat. For this, a dam had to be
constructed, across which a gallery (proof against cannon and musket fire,
was built. Once the foot of the wall had been reached, usually, after the
requisite mine-galleries had been dug out, an attempt was made to blow
it up. Both of these tasks were always given to experienced sappers or
professional miners. It sometimes required weeks of struggle underground
before the breach could be stormed. Often, however, the defender did
not allow things to reach this extreme, but capitulated in order to avoid
the slaughter and plundering which, according to the rules of war, in-
evitably followed upon capture by storm; and also to obtain favourable
conditions. And so, in the course of time, a remarkable change took
place: as sieges became more methodical, the main defence was shifted
to the covered-way. This situation was very different from that during the
religious wars.
Of the countries of eastern Europe, Poland and Turkey 1 deserve parti-
cular attention. In both countries, there was clearly an intimate connec-
tion between the organization of the army and the political and social
structure. In Poland, a country with a weak central government, the army
was in a state of acute disruption. Lithuania had its own army, separate
from Poland's. Apart from the state army, there were the private troops
which all manner of potentates—such as secular and ecclesiastical leaders
and nobles—as well as the free cities, maintained at their own expense.
The state army consisted of two entirely different kinds of troops: first,
those levied by feudal summons; and secondly, the professional soldiers
of the standing army which was the nucleus of the defence forces and
comprised both Polish and foreign troops, especially Germans. In addi-
tion, there were the Cossacks, who formed an important element of the
national army in the south-east of the country; and in times of extreme
need, a peasant reserve could be called up. The main section of the army
was the cavalry, of which there were three types: heavy, medium and
1
For Turkey, see Vol. HI in this series, Chapter xi; and below, Chapter xx.
223
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
light. The light cavalry was unarmoured and consisted of Wallachians
and Tartars. The infantry was of little account, compared with the very
strong cavalry.
A few words on the method of waging war: although strategy was
based on a few main principles of a general nature, the manner in which
these principles were applied depended very largely on factors which, in
the course of time, were subject to change. Thus the long duration of most
wars must be attributed mainly to the custom of halting operations in
the winter (which always gave the weaker side an opportunity to recoup
its losses), and to the fact that wars consisted principally of sieges. In the
Dutch war of liberation, for instance, not a single battle was fought after
the Battle of Neiuwpoort in 1600; in the Franco-Spanish War (1635-59),
too, the battles were few; in the Thirty Years War and in the Civil War in
England, however, they again became comparatively more frequent. It
can be generally said that sieges were more, and field campaigns less
important than they are today. War was more territorial in character.
Indeed, a field army seldom set out with the express aim of searching out
and destroying the enemy army; on the contrary, it was used chiefly to
besiege and relieve strongholds, mainly towns. The towns were the seats
of trade, industry and government; they controlled the roads and—even
more important—the waterways and river-crossings, and served as opera-
tional bases; from some border strongholds, vast areas were laid under
contribution. The field armies were not large enough to undertake other
operations while conducting a siege of any appreciable size. The campaign-
ing season (from April to October) therefore soon passed with the taking
of one or two fortresses.
In conclusion, a comparison of the military situation in the year the
Peace of Munster was signed with that at the beginning of the seventeenth
century reveals many similarities, but also a number of important
changes. Not only did armies increase considerably in size during this
period, as a result of the states' greater financial resources, but a general
modernization took place. Armaments, as we have seen, were adapted to
the needs of the time. In the artillery, modernization took the form of a
much larger number of pieces, standardization based on a small number
of calibres, progress in the manufacture of pieces, particularly of bronze
and 'metal' pieces, and the frequent use of bombs fired from mortars.
Developments in fortress engineering have already been discussed, as
have the new tactics and battle-order.
The fundamental change, however, was that in the seventeenth century
an army was forged which was different from that of the sixteenth century.
The hired army made way for a standing national army of professional
soldiers, or at least an army with a national core, an army meeting the
requirements of increasingly centralized government. Discipline in the
224
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008MILITARY FORCES AND WARFARE 1 6 1 O - 4 8
new army was stricter, its standard being maintained in peacetime by
drill and exercises: it moulded a new type of soldier. The remaining traces
of the days of the lansquenet disappeared: the nomination of the sub-
ordinate commanders by the troops at the recruiting stage, the dispensa-
tion of justice by the council of soldiers gathered in a ring, the holding of
meetings by the soldiers on their own authority, were abolished for good;
even religious congregations were strictly forbidden, unless expressly
ordered. The deed of engagement, originally a form of contract, was
replaced by a penal code. The ferocity and bitterness of the religious
wars belonged to the past; the prisoner-of-war now bought his freedom
for the fixed price of one month's wages; and officers on opposing sides
now regarded each other as colleagues and exchanged courtesies, when
the occasion arose. These were all signs of the arrival of a new age, and
a new spirit in the armies of western Europe.
225
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER VII
SEA-POWER
HANGES in the distribution of sea-power among the states of
Europe affected large areas outside Europe more directly than ever
before. For Europe's sea communications had encompassed the
world. Besides the regular trans-Atlantic routes, little-frequented ones
went across the Pacific to the Philippines and from the East Indies to
Macao, Formosa and Japan. Commercial exchanges with Europe might
require a cycle of as long as five years, quantities were minute, in some
of these cases only one ship a year reached the final destination, but a
regular pattern of trade existed. Originally the Portuguese had established
themselves in the East thanks to a margin of technical superiority in sea-
fighting, but by the late sixteenth century they were accustomed to peaceful
trading in almost unarmed ships. After 1600 both they and the native
traders were to suffer from the competition and incursions of heavily
armed Dutch and English ships. In particular the heavier armament,
superior organization and better seamanship of the Dutch East India
Company enabled them to establish a commercial supremacy in Indonesia
by 1650, despite prolonged and sometimes effective resistance by the
Portuguese and others. Europeans did not control the trade of the Indian
Ocean or Indonesia, even the Dutch never held a completely effective
monopoly of the spice trade. Nevertheless they dominated important and
profitable trades, because ultimately their naval power was greater than
that of the native states. If Iberian power was eclipsed in the East, their
monopoly of trans-Atlantic trade, still virtually intact in 1600, was also
broken. By 1621 over half the carrying trade of Brazil was in Dutch hands,
by the 1650s the Dutch and English were permanently established in the
Caribbean and were establishing treaty rights in Brazilian and Portuguese
trade.
C
Distribution of sea-power was itself changed by changing distribution
of trade and also by technical developments in shipbuilding and the con-
duct of war. Heavily armed ships from north-western Europe began to
dominate the trade and warfare of the Mediterranean. The traditional
galleys were still used in war, but together with sailing ships which more
and more dominated the battles. By the 1650s the battle-fleets of the
English and the Dutch were dominated by specialized fighting ships with
two or three gun-decks, designed for inboard-loading and for increasingly
heavy and controlled broadside fire, which in turn involved the gradual
adoption of line-ahead formations. There was increasing professionaliza-
tion of naval officers, though in wartime seamen from the merchant marine
226
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SEA-POWER
were essential to man the fleets which still also included merchant ships.
Naval strategy turned more than ever on the protection and destruction
of trade, and sea-power as always depended upon both trading and fighting
fleets. But the maintenance of a fighting fleet was more expensive than
ever before, requiring a larger permanent organization which could
design, build and maintain specialized ships, unsuitable for trade. In
1639 before the Battle of the Downs Tromp's strength had been trebled
in a matter of weeks by fitting out merchant ships. Before 1642 hired
merchantmen had usually made up more than half the numbers of English
fleets. Their proportion in the Parliamentary fleets during the Civil War
was much smaller; in the Dutch war Blake wished to keep it down to a
fifth and in fact it seldom exceeded a third. 1 After 1653 hired merchant-
men might still play a decisive part in the war between Venice and the
Turks but not in wars between great naval powers.
By the 1650s the distribution of sea-power had changed decisively. In
1600 the Iberian kingdoms might still claim to be the greatest maritime
power, their merchant fleet was second only to the Dutch and their com-
bined naval strength greater than that of either the Dutch or the English.
Even in the 1620s Spain was the strongest naval power in the Mediter-
ranean and in the Atlantic and could hopefully plan to challenge the
Dutch in their home waters. The Habsburgs could even dream of dominat-
ing the Baltic in alliance with a revivified Hanseatic League. By 1659
Spain was weaker in both the Atlantic and the Mediterranean than Eng-
land or Holland and was soon to be outstripped by France. The technical
changes of the period seem to have largely passed Spain by. In the 1630s
the English and Dutch built the Sovereign and the Aemilia, prototypes
of the heavy and medium ships of the future battle lines. 2 The Spaniards
still built relatively undergunned galleons, just as they failed to adopt newer
types of fishing vessels and cargo carriers, although they were more recep-
tive to the Dunkirkers' example in developing fast frigates. Spain's fleets
were chronically short of gunners and seamen so that their ability to fight
and even to survive the ordinary hazards of the sea were both impaired.
Matters were even worse for the Portuguese on the Cape route, since they
persisted in using unwieldy carracks of 1,000 tons 3 or more, though
well aware smaller ships would be more seaworthy. They then persis-
tently overloaded and overcrowded them, despite regulations to the
contrary and a shortage of seamen. Losses from shipwreck increased
in the late sixteenth century and continued to be heavy until 1650, after-
wards the rate dropped steeply; from 1590 to 1635 some 220 sailings from
1
A. H. Taylor, 'Galleon into ship of the line', Mariner's Mirror, Vol. XLIV (1958),
pp. 267-84.
* J. E. Elias, De Vlootbouw in Nederland. . . 1596-1655 (Amsterdam, 1933),
pp. 61-3.
8
Estimates of tonnage throughout are approximations, concealing divergent measures.
One last has been taken to equal two tons.
227
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Lisbon resulted in the loss of thirty-four ships, while some 130 from India
lost thirty-three. 1
The decline of Iberian sea-power did not happen because statesmen
were blind to its importance, though the general contempt for sailors and
their profession found in both Spain and Portugal may have contributed
to it. 2 As with so many problems which beset Spain, the need to maintain
her power at sea was understood and analysed, but the resources for
effective action were lacking. To renew the war against the Dutch Spain
had to accept continental commitments and communications, sending
troops and money from north Italy overland to the Netherlands. To
secure these communications Spain had to subsidize and assist allies in
the empire whom she could neither control nor afford. Spain's maritime
resources had to be concentrated on keeping her Atlantic communications
open for her treasure-fleets and the western Mediterranean safe for the
transfer of funds and troops to Genoa for Milan, Germany and Flanders.
The failure to continue the land campaign against the Dutch with real
success after the capture of Breda (1625) meant that the risk of the Dutch
wearing down Spain's Atlantic communications by the organized attacks
of the West India Company increased. To counter this pressure Olivares
wanted to erode Dutch sea-power by destroying her trade. Like his pre-
decessors he would have liked to close the Straits of Gibraltar to the
Dutch and English, but there was no real prospect of establishing an
effective blockade. Hopes of a potentially much more decisive counter-
stroke caused the revival of projects for attacking the Dutch in the most
vital area of their maritime and commercial hegemony, the Baltic. In 1624
Olivares proposed to found a company with Flemish and Hanseatic
participation which would have a monopoly of Iberian trade with the
rest of Europe, thus undermining the entrepot trade of Amsterdam as
well as providing a fleet of twenty-four ships to challenge the Dutch from
bases in East Friesland. After 1626 this last objective was changed and the
fleet was to be based in the Baltic in order to harry Dutch trade there.
Sigismund III of Poland had long wished to build up a fleet and was
anxious to ally himself with Madrid, but none of the Hanseatic towns
would entertain the project for fear of offending the Dutch. In 1628 the
arrival of Wallenstein on the Baltic coast roused fresh hopes, but he
refused to accept Madrid's terms for subsidizing a fleet. He was deter-
mined to keep complete control of it himself and to use it against the
Danes rather than the Dutch. The Spanish envoys did buy some ships
from the Hanse, but in 1629, to the fury of Sigismund, they were sent to
Flanders. The main result of these projects was to disillusion Sigismund
1
M. Godinho, cited by P. Chaunu in Studi in Onore di A. Fanfani (Milan, 1962), Vol. iv,
pp 247-8, notes 61-2; C. R. Boxer (ed.), The Tragic History of the Sea, Hakluyt Soc.,
Ser. 11, Vol. CXII (1959), PP- 1-30.
2
Ibid. p. 11. This also seems to have been a feature of Venetian society.
228
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SEA-POWER
about Habsburg plans and promises and to encourage him to make his
truce with Sweden. 1 The only real damage to Dutch trade was done by the
Dunkirkers. They seldom had more than thirty ships at sea at one time,
but the admiralty records show that from 1626 to 1634 they captured
1,499 ships, sank another 336 (two-thirds or more may have been Dutch),
and sold booty for £1,139,000 sterling, while losing fifteen royal ships and
105 privateers to the enemy. From the late 1630s the Dutch blockade
may have been more effective in reducing losses, but it was never more
than partially effective. 2
Although Spain beat off the first Dutch attacks on Brazil and the
English attack on Cadiz, her Atlantic power suffered a great disaster when
Piet Heyn captured and destroyed the treasure-fleet at Matanzas in Cuba
in 1628. This not only financed the West India Company's successful
conquests in Brazil, but also destroyed about a third of the ships em-
ployed in Seville's Atlantic trade. Between 1623 and 1636 the company
took or destroyed 547 ships worth some 5,500,000 gulden. 3 Spain made a
last great effort to reconquer northern Brazil in 1638, when twenty-six
galleons and twenty other ships were sent from Lisbon in September, later
reinforced at Bahia to a total of eighteen Spanish and twelve Portuguese
galleons, thirty-four armed merchantmen and twenty-three small ships.
This armada was frustrated by unfavourable weather and irresolute com-
mand and was scattered by the Dutch in January 1640 without achieving
anything. 4 This final failure to protect Brazil and the Caribbean from the
Dutch was overshadowed by Tromp's annihilation of the last Spanish
fleet to challenge Dutch sea-power in the Channel at the Battle of the
Downs in October 1639.
This Spanish effort was a last desperate gamble by planners who had
lost touch with the realities of both Dutch and Spanish sea-power. Both
before and after 1639 troops were taken to and from Flanders by sea, but
this was done by taking risks and evading the Dutch, not by challenging
them to battle. The fall of Breisach in 1638 and the consequent closing of
the land route doubtless made some attempt at reinforcement by sea
essential in 1639, while the French fleet's incursions against the Biscayan
ports also needed checking. But it was reckless to scrape together all
available ships from the Mediterranean and the Atlantic and then in-
struct the admiral, Oquendo, when encumbered with the transport of
10,000 troops, to give battle if he met the Dutch, and stake everything on
1
A. Gindely, Die maritime Plane der Habsburger . . . 1627-9 (Vienna, 1890); Rafael
Rodefias Vilar, 'Un Gran Proyecto anti-Holandes en tiempo de Felipe I V , Hispania, pp.
xxn (1962), pp. 543-58; La Politico Europea de Espana durante la Cuerra de Treinta Anos
(1624-30) (Madrid, 1967), pp. 113-47.
1
H. Malo, Les Corsaires DunkerquoU et Jean Bart (1912), Vol. I, pp. 314-20, 333-4,
342-7.
* J. de Laet, Iaerlyck Verhael. . ., ed. Naber and Warnsinck (Hague, 1937), Vol. iv,
pp. 282-5.
* C. R. Boxer, The Dutch in Brazil 1624-1654 (Oxford, 1957), pp. 89-94.
229
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
destroying their fleet. Of the seventy-odd ships which sailed from Corunna
some thirty had been hired from foreigners (from Ragusa, Lubeck and
Hamburg, apart from at least eight English transports). In all there were
some fifty warships, as usual short of gunners and seamen; Tromp with
twenty-four ships established such a decisive superiority in sailing and
gunnery that he drove the Spaniards to take refuge off the English coast.
In the final attack the Dutch had superior numbers, but the Spaniards
mostly ran their ships aground without a fight, losing forty-three ships
and 6,000 men. Ironically most of the troops and treasure did reach
Dunkirk along with the only efficient part of the fleet, the original Dunkirk
squadron; a result which could have been achieved without destroying a
large part of Spain's navy and all its reputation. 1
The composition and fate of Oquendo's armada is only one symptom of
Spain's declining sea-power. The trend of Seville's trans-Atlantic trade
suggests even more serious structural changes; comparing 1616-20 with
1646-50 the tonnage employed had decreased by about half. In the later
period only some forty per cent of the ships were Spanish built, roughly
the same number were American built, while some seventeen per cent
came from northern Europe; before 1610 most of the ships used had been
built in northern Spain. 2 In the late sixteenth century ships from northern
Spain had predominated in the fisheries off Newfoundland; their share
declined rapidly in the seventeenth century and was insignificant by 1650,
as was their share in Spain's European trade. The main source of Spain's
maritime strength had begun to fail even before being subjected to further
stress by war. Dr Andrews has recently suggested that this failure was due
to the Elizabethan war against Spain's shipping. 3 Although this never
seriously interfered with the trans-Atlantic routes, by forcing Spain to
concentrate all her resources on protecting them, it left shipping on
shorter and coastal routes, especially on the approaches to Galician and
Biscayan ports, unprotected against privateers. The losses in ships and
seamen were certainly serious and, whether or not it decisively undermined
Spain's sea-power, it may well have contributed to the decline of her
northern ports, along with shortages of timber.
When the revolts of Catalonia and Portugal followed less than a year
after Oquendo's defeat, it might have seemed dubious whether Spain
could defend her own coasts. Luckily France, her nearest enemy, was not
strong enough at sea to exploit the situation. Richelieu had been at pains
to build up the French navy but he started from scratch; in the 1620s the
crown had to hire foreign ships against La Rochelle, in 1635 there was a
Channel fleet of some thirty-five sizeable ships, though many of them were
1
C. R. Boxer, The Journal of M.T. Tromp (Cambridge, 1930), introduction, pp. 1-67.
[H. and] P. Chaunu, Seville et VAtlantique 1304-1650 (Paris, 1955-9), Vol. vm, 2, ii,
pp. 1428-9, 1566, 1621-2, 1878; Vol. vi, Pt 1, pp. 166-7, Table 12 E.
3
K. R. Andrews, Elizabethan Privateering (Cambridge, 1964), pp. 224-6. Spain and
Portugal lost about 1,000 ships to the English.
2
230
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SEA-POWER
foreign-built and the Mediterranean fleet had been increased from
thirteen to twenty-two galleys. By concentrating her resources, especially
those of the royal squadron from Dunkirk, first in Biscay, then in the
western Mediterranean Spain held the French in check. French strength
in the Channel declined after 1642 and Spain was able to concentrate
more effectively in the Mediterranean so that the French were usually
outnumbered. Despite much hard fighting in the 1640s they were never
able to get command of the sea, or seriously interrupt Spanish communi-
cations. Spain's superiority at sea helped her to reconquer Catalonia and
prevented the French establishing themselves in Tuscany and exploiting
the revolt of Naples. Consciousness of France's growing naval inferiority
to Spain after 1648 made Mazarin the more ataxious to secure either a
Dutch or an English alliance.
By the 1650s the decline of Spain and the failure to achieve a lasting
revival of the French navy meant that the relative preponderance of the
Dutch and English was greater and affected a greater geographical area
than had been true of leading sea-powers in the past. There were now
purely local balances of power between the states bordering each of
Europe's inner seas, the Baltic and the Mediterranean, but these ulti-
mately depended upon the new powers of Atlantic Europe. The most
striking local changes were in the Baltic. There Denmark had long been
the dominant naval power, but Gustavus Adolphus built up the Swedish
navy to protect his communications and control the Prussian ports. After
his death its growth continued and in 1644 it decisively shook Denmark's
supremacy, though both sides also hired Dutch ships. Local supremacy
passed to Sweden and Charles X wished to convert this into an absolute
control of the Baltic, which would have been fatal to Dutch commercial
hegemony. From 1649 the Dutch supported the Danes and in 1658 their
fleet defeated Charles' ambitions. 1 The English were always jealous of
Dutch power in the Baltic, but it was also against their interest to allow
any local power absolute control. Thus in 1659 the local balance of power
was dictated by the Dutch and English fleets' ability to keep the area open
to their influence.
In the western Mediterranean, as we have seen, Spain was still able to
enforce her interests against her local rivals. In the eastern Mediterranean
the Turks had been at war with Venice for control of Crete since 1645. In
the first years of the war the Turkish fleets consisted almost entirely of
galleys and the mixed fleets of the Venetians were more successful. In the
1650s the Turks used mixed fleets, but they suffered a severe defeat off the
Dardanelles in 1656, losing forty-six ships and forty-seven galleys. How-
ever, the Venetians were unable to maintain an effective blockade of the
Dardanelles and they never established command of the Aegean for any
considerable period, while the effort of maintaining fleets there contri-
1
See Vol. v in this series, pp. 286-7, 519-22.
231
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
buted to the final eclipse of Venice as a commercial and maritime power.
If either the English or the Dutch put their naval strength, or even part
of it, into the Mediterranean they could outclass any of the local powers.
All they needed, as Blake and De Ruyter showed, was the use of ports
which local rivalries could be relied on to provide.
But the local balance of maritime trade had changed long before the
mid-seventeenth century. In the long period of official truce between
Spain and the Turks after 1580, Dutch and English ships entered the
Mediterranean in increasing numbers. They not only dominated the trade
between the Mediterranean and north-west Europe, but also captured an
ever-increasing share of trade within the Mediterranean. They introduced
a new type of ship, known there as the berton, and a new phase of warfare.
The berton was smaller, but more heavily armed and built, faster and
more manoeuvrable than the Mediterranean argosies which were similar
to the Portuguese carracks. Around 1600 the northerners engaged in both
trade and piracy, as opportunity offered, making the sea unsafe for native
shipping. After about 1604 northerners who specialized exclusively in
piracy began to appear. They mostly operated from Tripoli, Tunis,
Algiers and Sallee and they taught the Muslims there to use bertons.
Before 1620 their pupils had become so apt that the golden age of the
Barbary corsairs began, at its height they may have had 150 ships. They
raided throughout the Mediterranean and into the Atlantic as far as Cape
Verde, Iceland, the Azores and the Great Banks, though they usually
concentrated on the approaches to the Straits and the Channel. But even
after the first generation of northern captains had gone, piracy was not an
exclusively Muslim enterprise; the.dukes of Savoy and Tuscany provided
bases for privateers at Villefranche and Leghorn, while the knights of
Malta and San Stefano took prizes indiscriminately. In these conditions
only heavily armed ships, like those of the English Levant Company,
could trade safely and the worst sufferers were native traders, especially
the Venetians. Venice not only provided the richest prizes in the Levant,
but was often unable to protect her shipping in the Adriatic from the
local pirates, the Uscocchi. Piracy helped to weaken Venice and to make
her increasingly dependent on northern shipping. 1
The amount of shipping using the port of Venice increased from 1587
to 1609, but the proportion of foreign-owned and -built ships also grew.
By the early 1620s the total volume was barely half that of 1607-9 and the
decline continued; interrupted during the 1630s, it became very steep
during the Cretan war and the relative share of foreign shipping probably
increased. The main reason for hiring foreign ships was that they were
better able to protect themselves. 2 Venice had to hire Dutch and English
1
A. Tenenti, Venezia e i corsari 1588-1615 (Ban, 1961).
F. C. Lane, 'Le Trafic Maritime de Venise' in Quatrieme Collogue d'Histoire Maritime,
Les Sources de VHistoire Maritime, ed. M. Mollat (Paris, 1962), pp. 12-14,28.
2
232
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SEA-POWER
ships to meet the challenge of Osuna, the Viceroy of Naples, in the Adriatic
in 1617-18. Both sides in the Cretan war made extensive use of foreign-
built and -hired ships. Of course the northerners were not immune to
piracy; from 1617 to 1625 the Algerines took some 200 Dutch ships. 1 But
the northerners increased their trade, while that of Venice declined, and in
the long run they were more successful in forcing the Barbary states to
respect their flags. In the mid-1650s the English and Dutch had squadrons
in the Mediterranean partly for this purpose. England made treaties with
Sallee, Algiers and Tunis from 1655 to 1658. After the English squadron
withdrew in 1658 there were difficulties, but after 1661 the treaties were
observed.
If only well-armed ships could usually trade securely in the Mediter-
ranean, conditions in the North Sea and Baltic were different. The main
cargoes of the Baltic and Scandinavian trades were bulky ones, grain,
timber, salt, wine and fish. The Dutch had long dominated these trades
and by the last years of the sixteenth century had developed a type of
cargo carrier, the fluit, which perpetuated their domination. This was a
slow, lightly built, virtually unarmed ship, with a long keel, bluff bows
and a relatively flat bottom, needing only a small crew to manage its
relatively small area of sails. Its cheap building and running costs meant
cheap freight rates which ensured Dutch supremacy in the carrying trades
so that in 1669 Colbert enviously guessed that they owned three-quarters
of Europe's total tonnage. The Dutch themselves in 1636 estimated that
they had 1,050 ships trading to the Baltic, Norway and south-west France
averaging a hundred lasts, 250 ships (of 120-50 lasts) in the Mediterranean
and Archangel trades, 450 of 20 to 40 lasts in the Channel and North Sea
as well as 2,000 fishing busses and 300 ships in the extra-European trades.
This would suggest a total of 4,500 to 4,800 ships with a tonnage of
600,000 to 700,000, four or five times that of England. 2 The basic Dutch
trades were very vulnerable to the Dunkirkers so that they flourished most
in peacetime. In war they were checked by losses which meant high insur-
ance and freight rates. With the Peace of Westphalia trade boomed and
the customs figures suggest that from 1648 to 1651 it reached a level which
was possibly never surpassed in the seventeenth century, 3 while Dutch
shipping threatened to eliminate all rivals from the Baltic, North Sea and
Atlantic trades.
This triumphant position was partly founded on the eclipse of the
Hanseatic towns' ability to assert any effective power, either collectively
or individually. Their share of Baltic trade had declined in the sixteenth
1
K. Heeringa, Bronnen Tot de Geschiedenis van den Levantschen Handel, Vol. n (The
Hague, 1910), p. 1042, note 451.
1
J. E. Elias, Het Voorspel van den Eersten Engehchen Oorlog (The Hague, 1920), Vol.
1, pp. 61-2.
* J. G. van Dillen in Algemene Geschiedenis der Nederlanden, Vol. vn (Utrecht, 1954),
pp. 312-51-
9
233
MHP
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
century. About 1600 they had about 1,000 ships amounting to some
90,000 tons, about one-third belonging to Hamburg (7,000 lasts) and
Liibeck (8,000 lasts). Liibeck's fleet was still growing in the early seven-
teenth century; 1 its first fluit was built in 1618 2 and its shipbuilding only
declined decisively after 1648. Hamburg's fleet doubled to about 14,000
lasts between 1600 and 1650. But the shipping of Danzig declined, as did
that of Wismar, Rostock and Stralsund. These last had been heavily
involved in trade to Norway which after 1625 was completely dominated
by the Dutch and Danes. Hamburg and to a lesser extent Liibeck were
able to increase their trade to southern Europe after 1621. Although
Hamburg sustained a flourishing entrepdt trade, it was dominated by
foreign merchants, while after 1648 Sweden levied tolls of 350,000 thalers
a year on the other Hanseatic towns, a revenue approaching that of the
Sound tolls. 3 Thus Liibeck's and the Hanse's rejection of Spain's offers in
1628 lost them their last dubious chance of reversing their decline at the
expense of the Dutch. The decline of Iberian sea-power meant increasing
exploitation by foreign merchants. First Cromwell forced Portugal to
grant privileges to English merchants both there and in the Brazil trade.
Spain later tacitly acquiesced in the exploitation of her trade by Dutch,
English and French merchants. The failure of the Hanseatic towns to find
effective allies and their inability to mobilize naval power condemned them
to exploitation by Sweden, under which only Hamburg prospered, having
277 ships (42,000 tons) by 1672.
If by 1650 the Hanseatic towns were powerless to avoid exploitation
by the victors at Westphalia, the English were not. Their reply to the
Dutch was war.
English shipbuilders had never attempted to imitate the fluit. Their
topical product was the 'defensible' ship of sixty tons and upwards more
heavily built, with finer lines, faster, needing a larger crew and carrying
a number of guns proportionate to its size. Even colliers in the Newcastle
trade conformed to this type, so that foreign ships dominated in the
export of coal. Such ships were very suitable for dangerous Mediter-
ranean waters and for privateering, but in most other trades they could
not compete with the Dutch in peacetime. Nevertheless the tonnage of
English shipping had probably doubled between 1582 and 1624 but the
opportunity provided by the Dutch being at war after 1621 was spoilt
initially by England also being involved in war from 1625 to 1629.
England lost some 300 ships amounting to well over 20,000 tons and may
have taken rather more prizes herself. In 1629 England's total tonnage was
115.000 and it may have risen to about 140,000 by 1640. 4 Until then the
1
W. Vogel, 'Zur Grosse der europaischen Handelsflotten . , . ' in Festschrift... Dietrich
Schafer, ed. A. Hofmeister (Jena, 1915), pp. 283-301.
2
8
W. Vogel, Die Deutichen als Seefahrer (Hamburg, 1949), p. 118.
Ibid. p. 125.
4
R. Davis, The Rise of the English Shipping Industry (London, 1962), pp. 7, 10-11, 15,
315.1 have estimated the tonnage lost from several MSS. of the report to the Commons in
234
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SEA-POWER
greatest expansion since 1600, apart from the Mediterranean and the
coastal coal trades, was in the Newfoundland fisheries which came to be
dominated by the English. In the early 1630s the East India Company
had 9,000-10,000 tons of shipping. 1 If the Dutch dominated the North
Sea fisheries, the English held their own to a greater extent off Iceland
and in whaling off Spitzbergen. After 1640 direct English exploitation
of all these fisheries declined. To compete successfully even for the
carrying trade of their own ports, English ships needed either govern-
ment protection or the advantages of neutrality when the Dutch were
at war.
The Civil War obviously hindered trade and shipping, but it increased
England's naval strength. From 1642 to 1647 Parliament sent thirty to
forty warships to sea every summer and kept a winter-guard of some
twenty ships, so that the fleet was more continuously manned than ever
before. Then the Commonwealth expanded the fleet from 1649 to 1651
and forty-one new ships were added, almost doubling it. The ships were
used to pursue the ships which had joined the Royalists in 1648, to secure
the trans-Atlantic colonies and enforce respect for the Commonwealth's
flag in European waters. These efforts, meant long voyages to Portugal,
the Mediterranean and America. The French not only assisted the
Royalists, but also placed an embargo on English cloth. This produced an
embargo on French wines and silk in 1649. Both sides proceeded to
seizures of goods and ships. Convoys were needed for English ships in
the Mediterranean and the Dutch became the neutral carriers of Anglo-
French trade. The Navigation Act, searches of Dutch ships for French
goods and exaction of salutes all annoyed the Dutch. By February 1652
the States General, alarmed by the growth of the English fleet, resolved to
fit out 150 ships in addition to the 76 already available. The expansion of
the English fleet continued even after the end of the Dutch war; from 1650
to 1656 80 new ships were built and many prizes added to it. In 1625 the
navy had about 30 ships, in 1640 about 40, in 1651 about 95 and in 1660
about 140. 2 Probably many fewer large merchant ships were built in the
1650s compared with the 1630s, so that the naval building may only have
made up this difference.
Although Dutch resources in shipbuilding and seamen were so much
greater, their ability to transform them into effective naval power was
limited. The fact that they had far more trade to protect and that Britain
June 1628. R. G. Marsden estimated the number of prize sentences 1625-30 as at least
600, E.H.R. Vol. xxv (1910), p. 256. The crown received £217,468 from French goods,
reprisal goods and wrecks and £20,131 from tenths of Admiralty, B. M. Harleian MS. 3796,
fo. 36.
1
Estimated from K. N. Chaudhuri, The English East India Company 1600-1640 (1965),
Appendix B.
!
Numbers built and strengths calculated from R. C. Anderson, English Men-of-War
1509-1649, English Ships 1649-1702, Soc. for Nautical Research Occasional Publications,
Nos. 7. 5 (1959. 1935)-
235
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
9-2DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
lay across the vital routes nourishing their Baltic trade were severe handi-
caps. Their naval administration suffered from decentralization among
five boards of admiralty and from friction between the provinces. The
English had more very large ships and in general their ships were more
heavily built and armed with heavier guns. They were also quicker to
see the advantage of line-ahead formations and made greater efforts to
found their battle tactics upon them. All these factors helped to give them
the balance of advantage in the whole series of battles. The English
attempt to blockade the Dutch coast in 1653 was not completely successful,
but the Channel was closed to Dutch shipping from February 1653.
The Dutch economy depended on the sea far more than the English and
for the first time they were fighting an enemy whose naval strength was
ultimately more effective. The truth of this can be seen not by claiming
the last battle off the Texel as a decisive English victory—both sides
could have put powerful fleets to sea again in 1654, if they had not chosen
to make peace—but in the fact that the war was disastrous for Dutch
trade. The English took between 1,000 and 1,700 Dutch prizes (a figure
nearer the lower one seems more likely) and lost few of their own ships.
The English having failed to build economical cargo carriers had now
captured them in abundance. They appeared to have checked the growth
of Dutch trade which had been so evident after 1647 and had acquired the
means to survive in the carrying trade; it is probable 'that between 1654
and 1675 foreign built ships were never less than a third of the total ton-
nage in English ownership . . . \*
The immediate consequences of the effective mobilization of so much
naval power were not altogether happy for English trade. Despite the
Navigation Act, English trade to the Baltic remained depressed and the
Dutch continued to carry a large part of English colonial trade. One of the
reasons for undertaking the Western Design against the Spanish Indies
was that Cromwell's council were mostly anxious to find a use for the
large navy which had been created and hoped the venture would pay for
itself, as the Dutch West India Company had done in its heyday. The
resulting war with Spain demonstrated the greatness of English sea-power,
since Spain's Atlantic communications were far more effectively cut than
they had ever been by the Dutch. But the gains were disappointing;
instead of delivering a death blow to the Spanish Empire, Jamaica was
captured; Blake destroyed the silver fleet, but failed to capture the treasure.
English sea-power commanded the approaches to Spain, but the Dutch
as neutral carriers monopolized Spanish trade, while the English suffered
severely from privateering. Anti-Cromwellian propaganda put the loss
as high as 1,800 ships, more probably about 1,000 were lost as against
some 400 captured by the English; in three months, May to July 1656, the
Dunkirkers claimed to have taken over 100 English ships.
1
Davis, Rise of the English Shipping Industry, pp. 51-2.
236
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SEA-POWER
Cromwell's acquisition of Dunkirk not only removed a real threat to
English shipping, but also reinforced the command of the Channel,
already asserted in the Dutch war. By 1659 an equilibrium existed; if
Dutch naval and commercial power still dominated the Sound, they
had to respect English interests there; if the English dominated the
Straits of Dover more completely than before, the Commonwealth's hopes
of mobilizing naval power to destroy or capture Dutch commercial supre-
macy and the Protectorate's dreams of using it to destroy the Spanish
Empire in America had both proved equally illusory. Nevertheless
England was enabled to share naval, though not as yet commercial,
hegemony with the Dutch and to assert her power and interests in the
Atlantic, the Mediterranean and the Baltic. Temporarily England might
even claim to be the strongest naval power in Europe, though this would
be challenged again by both the Dutch and the French. Her achievement
had altered the balance of power in Europe and was part of the process
whereby power was being concentrated in north-western Europe at the
expense of the Iberian and Mediterranean states.
If England had become one of the two greatest naval powers by 1660, in
terms of merchant shipping her relative position is less clear, but despite
losses in the Spanish war the total may have been about 200,000 tons. In
1664 French shipping, including fishing boats, amounted to about
130,000 tons. This total was probably little larger than it had been about
1570, 1 when it was perhaps twice as great as that of England. The total
of the German ports had probably fallen slightly since 1600, when it was
about 120,000 tons; 2 that of Spain and Venice must have declined drasti-
cally. The years 1600-60 seemed to show men such as Colbert and
Downing that the prosperity of trade and shipping depended more
closely than ever on possession of effective naval power. The changes in
the tactics and in organization of armies between 1560 and 1660 were so
considerable that they have been held to amount to a military revolution.
For sixteenth-century lansquenets war had been a seasonal occupation,
for the soldiers of the Thirty Years War it was a full-time one. By 1650
many states were heavily in debt to tax-farmers and military entrepreneurs,
but the future did not belong to entrepreneurs, such as Wallenstein,
Bernard of Saxe-Weimar, or Charles IV of Lorraine, who raised whole
armies. As the organization of armies became more elaborate, so they
came more and more completely under the control of the state. In France
Le Tellier had endeavoured since 1643 to reform military administration
and to give the crown real control over its officers and regiments, though
he did not begin to achieve anything appreciable until after the peace of
1659, when royal control grew rapidly. Taxes continued to be farmed out
to contractors, but not armies and regiments. As long as naval power
1
Vogel, Festschrift. . . Dietrich Schafer, ed. Hofmeister, pp. 329, 331.
* Vogel, Die Deutschen als Seefahrer, p. i l l .
237
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
could be farmed out to entrepreneurs such as the West India Company and
as long as hired merchant ships were a major part of battle-fleets, direct
and continuous control by the state was restricted. While privateering
remains an obvious exception, the growth of professionalism and speciali-
zation in naval forces in the 1650s can be seen as part of a general process
in which states were beginning to exercise much more rigorous and effec-
tive control over their armed forces.
238
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER VIII
DRAMA AND SOCIETY
Y • 1HE first half of the seventeenth century marks an important
I stage in the development of European drama. Inevitably greater
JL heights were attained in one country than in another. In England
Shakespeare was only the greatest among an extraordinary galaxy of
talented playwrights active in this period, and if the years between his
withdrawal from the stage and the closing of the London theatres by
Parliament in 1642 are generally regarded as a period of decline, it was
none the less an age of intense dramatic activity which bore within it the
seeds of future developments. In Spain another summit of dramatic
achievement was reached in the plays of Lope de Vega and his contem-
poraries, and this great age of the Spanish theatre was prolonged into the
second half of the century by the works of Calderon.
Although in our period Italy produced no outstanding playwrights, not
only did it continue to influence the drama of other European countries
through the Commedia dell'Arte; it created the new genre of the opera
which was gradually to spread to other lands, and in the sphere of theatre
architecture, machinery and scenery it showed the way to the whole of
Europe. In France the opening decades of the century form a strange
contrast with the extraordinary flowering of drama in the age of Corneille,
Moliere and Racine from about 1630 to 1680: it was only with the trium-
phant success of Le Cid (1637) that France began to rival England and
Spain in the drama. In Germany, where the backwardness of drama was
still further increased by the ravages of the Thirty Years War, the main
impetus towards theatrical activity came at first from abroad and it was
only at the very end of our period, with Andreas Gryphius, that a native
drama of any note began to emerge.
Although the tendency to transfer the term 'baroque' from the history
of art to that of drama and of literature in general continues to spread from
country to country, the fact remains that, however important outside
influences may have been, the drama of each country developed on
national lines. If the drama of England and France had certain things in
common at the beginning of the century, the two countries were to develop
in a very different manner. For all its influence abroad, Spanish drama,
with its intensely spiritual side, revealed particularly in its Corpus Christi
plays [autos sacramentales] which were developed out of medieval
religious drama, followed its own native pattern. Each nation, with its
own traditions and social and political conditions, evolved its own types
of drama, however much it might owe to the theatre of other countries.
239
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Even so, considering the difficulties of travel, there was an extra-
ordinary amount of coming and going by companies of actors in search
of an audience. If Italian actors do not seem to have carried their im-
provised comedy as far afield as they had done in the second half of the
sixteenth century, they made several lengthy sojourns at the French court
under both Henri IV and Louis XIII, and were frequently called upon to
entertain the Habsburg emperors. Spanish actors, while they chiefly
performed outside Spain in their country's possessions in Italy and the
Netherlands, occasionally found their way to Paris and once, in the reign
of Charles I, even to London. As French drama grew in stature, French
actors made their mark in both Holland and the Spanish Netherlands,
while at rarer intervals they found their way across the Channel to London
and to the courts of James I and Charles I. English actors in their turn
visited the continent. Although their last recorded visit to the French
court took place in 1604, they were long to continue their wanderings
through Holland and especially Germany, entertaining the courts of princes
and princelings as well as the citizens of the great commercial centres.
Inevitably the travels abroad of these strolling players combined with
the diffusion of the printed play to influence in some degree the drama
of the different countries. The Commedia delFArte continued in our period
to exercise a wide influence, both in the German-speaking countries and
in France where the comedy of Moliere is rooted in this popular drama.
The comedia of Spain offered a model to the struggling drama of Germany,
and from about 1630 onwards stimulated the development of both comedy
and tragi-comedy in France; Corneille's first masterpiece, Le Cid, like
his later comedy, Le Menteur, was an adaptation of a Spanish play.
Although Shakespeare and English drama in general were virtually un-
known in these years over the greater part of Europe, in Germany
English strolling players, who were gradually absorbed into the national
life by the addition of native actors and the use of the German language,
helped to bring to life a native drama with their crude adaptations of
English plays.
The professional actor, whose existence one takes for granted, now
emerges as a distinct social type. Performances by amateurs, especially by
schoolboys and students, gradually ceased to have their old importance,
at any rate so far as drama in the vernacular was concerned, although
even at the end of our period, in a backward country like Germany, the
plays of Gryphius were mostly performed by schoolboys. In countries
where the drama had begun to flourish earlier—in Italy, Spain, England
and even France—the professional actor had established himself before
1600, but the growing popularity of drama made his position more
assured, while even in Germany, largely under the influence of foreign
strolling players, particularly English, the professional actor slowly
began to emerge.
240
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DRAMA AND SOCIETY
Even in those countries where the drama was most highly developed
and where many actors had risen above the status of impoverished stroll-
ing players, their status was not on the whole a high one, although it
varied from country to country according to social and religious condi-
tions. In England the Puritan tradition had always been hostile to the
purveyors of such a lewd art as drama; and if in Catholic Italy the actor
enjoyed more esteem, in Catholic France the church set him beyond the
pale and denied him the sacraments, while middle-class opinion tended to
despise so immoral and often so precarious a calling. The place of
women in the profession varied from country to country. In Italy and
Spain actresses had long been admired members of the profession, and in
France, where they had not been numerous before 1600, they gradually
came into their own in our period. In England, on the other hand, and in
Germany too, they were virtually unknown; female parts continued to be
played by boys or men, and the presence of women on the stage was a
cause for horror.
When a visiting French company gave a performance at a London
theatre in 1629, the presence of actresses on the stage was one of the
reasons for the hostility of a contemporary who wrote:' Last daye certaine
vagrant French players, who had beene expelled from their owne contrey,
and those women, did attempt, thereby giving just offence to all vertuous
and well-disposed persons in this town, to act a certain lascivious and
unchaste comedye, in the French tonge at the Blackfryers.' Not without
some exaggeration perhaps, he thus describes their reception: 'Glad I am
to saye they were hissed, hooted, and pippin-pelted from the stage.' 1
The scandal caused in Puritan circles by the appearance of Charles I's
French queen in a court performance of a pastoral play in 1633 coincided
with the publication of William Prynne's Histriomastix where in the index,
under the heading Women-Actors, notorious whores, he wrote: 'S.Paul
prohibites women to speak publikely in the Church... And dare then any
Christian women be so more than whorishly impudent, as to act, to
speak publikely on a Stage (perchance in mans apparell, and cut haire,
here proved sinfull and abominable) in the presence of sundry men and
women?' The savage punishment meted out to Prynne was intended as a
warning to those who meddled with the royal pleasures among which,
as we shall see, various forms of dramatic entertainments played a pro-
minent part.
Social and political conditions in this and the previous age brought
about a very different development of the theatre in the various countries
of Europe. Although Italy led the way in most spheres, its drama lacked
the central focus provided by the capital of a large, unified country.
There the drama evolved in a piecemeal fashion at the courts of a series
1
G. E. Bentley, The Jacobean and Caroline Stage. Dramatic Companies and Players
(2 vols. Oxford, 1941), Vol. 1, p. 25.
241
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
of small states, particularly those of northern Italy, such as Florence,
Mantua or Parma. Such playhouses as were constructed were for the
entertainment of the prince and his court, though occasionally spectators
from outside that narrow circle might be admitted; a famous playhouse
like the Teatro Farnese at Parma, built in 1618, was, of course, a court
theatre. Permanent theatres, open to the public in return for payment,
developed late, and then through the emergence of opera; it was only in
1637 that the first public theatre was constructed in Italy. This was at
Venice and was for use as an opera house. Eight years later Evelyn wrote
in his diary:
We went to the Opera which are Comedies & other plays represented in Recitative
Music by the most excellent Musitians vocal & Instrumental, together with variety
of Seeanes painted & contrived with no lesse art of Perspective, and Machines, for
flying in the aire & other wonderfull notions. So taken together it is doubtlesse one
of the most magnificent & expensfull diversions the Wit of Men can invent. 1
A similar dispersal of dramatic activity was inevitably also found in the
German-speaking countries. There were no public theatres, and such
dramatic performances as were given took place at the court of the
emperor or of the princes, in schools and in great commercial cities like
Frankfurt. Once again there was no common centre for the development
of the theatre such as was provided by the capitals of such centralized
countries as England, Spain or France.
In London the first playhouse, named the Theatre, dated from 1576.
Between that date and the closing of the theatres in 1642 a considerable
number of playhouses were built or rebuilt, among them the so-called
'private' theatres which were differentiated from the 'public' theatres by
being indoor buildings, smaller and considerably more expensive. Looking
back to the flourishing state of drama in London before the civil wars, a
writer of the end of the century declared:
Before the wars, there were in being all these play-houses at the same time. The
Black-friars and Globe on the Bank-side, a winter and summer House, belonging
to the same Company, called the King's Servants; the Cockpit or Phoenix, in Drury
Lane, called the Queen's Servants; the Private House in Salisbury Court, called
the Prince's Servants; the Fortune near Whitecross Street, and the Red Bull at the
upper end of St. John's Street. 2
Just as there were curious, if quite accidental resemblances between the
material set-up in the 'public' theatres of London and the theatres of
Madrid, so there too public playhouses go back to the last quarter of the
sixteenth century: the Corral de la Cruz dating from 1579 and the Corral
del Principe from 1582. Yet Madrid did not play quite the preponderant
role in the theatrical life of Spain that London did in that of England.
1
Diary, ed. E. S. de Beer (6 vols., Oxford, 1955), Vol. 11, pp. 449-50.
James Wright, Historia Histrionica (1699), reprinted in Dodsley's Old English Plays,
ed. W. C. Hazlitt (London, 1876), Vol. xv, pp. 406-7.
2
242
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DRAMA AND SOCIETY
If English provincial towns were by no means deprived of theatrical
performances, since there were more or less frequent visits from companies
of strolling players, in Spain where Madrid had only recently been
elevated to the status of capital, provincial towns like Seville or Valencia
played a part denied to towns of the same size in England or France,
Again, despite the popularity of the drama in Madrid, the number of
permanent theatres was never so great as in London and in our period it
never rose beyond the two founded in the sixteenth century.
It is true that in France, during the first two decades of the seventeenth
century, a provincial town like Rouen would seem to have been at least
as important as Paris as a theatrical centre. The only permanent theatre
in the capital, the Hotel de Bourgogne, was hired out to a succession of
French companies, with at intervals Italian, Spanish and even English
actors; to begin with none of the French companies could find enough
support to establish itself permanently in the capital and had soon to
return to touring in the provinces or go abroad. However, as time passed,
Paris, by far the largest city in France, the seat of the government and
court, gradually came to exert its influence in the world of the theatre.
By 1630 the Comediens du Roi were permanently established at the Hotel
de Bourgogne, and a second company had settled in Paris, eventually
putting up a new building, the Theatre du Marais. Even so, the attempt of
the young Moliere in the 1640s to set up a third theatrical company in
Paris soon ended in failure, and from 1645 onwards he and his com-
panions were compelled to spend thirteen years touring the provinces.
Although in our period the principal developments inevitably took
place in the field of vernacular drama, drama in Latin must not be left
completely out of account. In Catholic countries, from Spain to Poland,
the teaching orders, and more especially the Jesuits, deliberately used the
dramatic performances given in their schools for both educational and
propaganda purposes. Most of their plays, though by no means all, were
written in Latin, but even so they were not designed exclusively for a
learned audience. If the elegant language in which they were written
appealed to the connoisseur, the great stress on scenic effects, on music
and dancing, and even on comic interludes, was designed to interest
much wider circles, from the members of the court and the aristocracy of
both sexes to bourgeois and even plebeian spectators. Inevitably the plays
performed in the different countries reflected to some degree tendencies in
local vernacular drama, but at the same time, particularly in the theatri-
cally backward German-speaking countries, they influenced the develop-
ment of the drama, including opera, particularly through their relatively
advanced technique in the use of scenery, costume and spectacle.
What sort of spectators frequented the public theatres for which men
like Shakespeare or Corneille or Lope de Vega wrote is a fascinating
question, but one which it is by no means easy to answer, despite its
243
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
importance for an interpretation of the historical significance of their
plays. Only too often labels such as 'aristocratic' or 'plebeian' are
attached by historians to the audiences of the age without much prelimin-
ary investigation of the available facts; and if an attempt is made to
assemble the scattered contemporary documents which bear on this
question, they are often interpreted in too narrow a spirit, without refer-
ence to long-term trends in the theatre of the country under discussion and
without comparisons with conditions in neighbouring countries in the
same period.
Unfortunately our information about Paris theatre audiences in the
first two or three decades of the seventeenth century is extremely meagre.
Given the poorness of such plays of the time as have survived, this is not
an unmitigated misfortune, but it does make it difficult for us to assess the
long-term trend in changes in the composition of audiences and to link on
to the much more definite information which we possess for the age of
Corneille, Moliere and Racine. Our almost total ignorance of what Paris
theatre audiences were like in the opening decades of the century has left
the field clear for the over-simplified view that the aesthetic and moral
crudity of French drama in that period was due to the preponderantly
plebeian audiences which lacked the refining influence of the aristocracy,
of the learned and especially of respectable women.
The information at our disposal for these decades does not do more
than enable us to qualify this view by pointing to fragments of evidence
which indicate that the aristocracy—even the king and his court—did on
occasion frequent the Hotel de Bourgogne; and that not only did writers
and other middle-class spectators find their way to this place of perdition,
but that the ban imposed by some modern historians of the theatre on the
attendance of respectable women does not seem (any more than in London
at the same date) to have been by any means strictly observed. The
presence of Henri IV's queen and the ladies of the court at the Hotel de
Bourgogne is attested.
No doubt it is possible that when, about 1630, the theatre became more
popular in Paris and began to produce plays of a greater aesthetic and
moral refinement, the audience did become less plebeian; but it is also
possible that this improvement was the result less of changes in the social
composition of the audience than of the growing refinement of taste which
was brought about in these years among the upper classes of society by the
development of the salons and of social life.
Fortunately we can discuss the question of Paris theatre audiences in
the period after 1630 on a firm foundation of documents, fragmentary and
at times tantalizingly incomplete, it is true, but still sufficiently clear for
our purpose. Despite a multitude of contemporary references to the
presence of lepeuple in the theatres of Paris during the rest of the century,
it is clear that in contemporary usage the word, when it did not simply
244
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DRAMA AND SOCIETY
mean 'audience', generally implied 'those who were not of noble birth',
as in the expression la com et le peuple. Most of the spectators below
noble rank appear to have been solid bourgeois like merchants or lawyers
or else writers or aspiring writers and in general people of some education.
Undoubtedly in the days of Corneille, Moliere and Racine the middle-
class section of the audience was already extremely important, especially
as the part of the theatre which it mainly frequented—the parterre [pit]—
generally contained at least half the audience. On the other hand, given
the thoroughly aristocratic nature of French society in that age, the noble-
men and their womenfolk played a very important part in the Paris
theatres of our period. Theatre prices rose steeply in the course of the
century, and the high cost of the best seats—particularly the first row of
boxes and, as the custom established itself towards the middle of the
century, the seats on the stage—made the spectators with blue blood or
money increasingly important from the box-office point of view. Scattered
remarks of contemporary playwrights and critics make it clear that the
importance of the aristocratic section of the audience was fully recognized,
even if, owing to their numbers, the spectators in the pit, who were all
men, could have a great influence on.the success or failure of new plays.
The size and composition of London theatre audiences in this period—
inevitably with special reference to those of Shakespeare—have been
studied in much greater detail than those of any continental country.
Although the evidence is fragmentary and at times contradictory, there
seems to be broad agreement about the long-term trend in changes in the
audience during these years. It is generally accepted that in the flourishing
days of Elizabethan drama and especially in the years when Shakespeare
was engaged both in acting and in writing plays, 'public' theatres like the
Globe (built in 1599 and rebuilt after a fire in 1613) took in all classes of
the community from the 'penny stinkards' who stood in the pit to the
noblemen who sat in the galleries, in the rather mysterious 'lord's room'
or—as was seen to be the case in the Paris theatres—on the stage.
Whether therefore the gatherers of the publique or private Play-house stand to
receive the aftemoones rent, [wrote Dekker in The Gulls Hornebooke (1609),] let
our Gallant (having paid it) presently advance himselfe up to the Throne of the
Stage . . . On the very Rushes where the Commedy is to daunce, yea and under the
state of Cambises himselfe must our fetherd Estridge like a peece of Ordnance be
planted valiantly (because
impudently) beating downe the mewes and hisses of the
opposed rascality. 1
Among the spectators in the galleries were a fair proportion of women—
respectable women as well as those who were less respectable.
Even in Shakespeare's day, however, there was a difference between the
' public' and the so-called' private' theatres. In the former, where the male
spectators in the pit were exposed to all the variety of English weather,
1
E. K. Chambers, The Elizabethan Stage (4 vols. Oxford, 1923), Vol. rv, p. 366.
245
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
admission was undoubtedly cheap, at any rate to that part of the house.
Indeed the author of the most detailed study of early seventeenth-century
London theatre audiences goes so far as to declare that 'audiences were
composed largely of shopkeepers and craftsmen' and even that 'it was
predominantly a working class audience'. 1 Although this is going far
beyond the available evidence and under-estimating the importance,
especially in the society of the day, of the aristocratic spectators, the
lawyers, merchants, and the other representatives, male and female, of
the leisured classes, it does seem established that the 'public' theatres of
Shakespeare's day attracted an audience drawn from all ranks of society.
A much more restricted audience was inevitably attracted to the so-
called 'private' theatres because of their smaller size and much higher
charges. Whereas in Shakespeare's day a penny secured admission to the
pit of the Globe or other 'public' theatres, sixpence was the minimum
charge in the more select 'private' theatres which were completely pro-
tected from the weather. In a poem prefixed to a play published in the
1630s (by this time all theatre prices had risen somewhat) we read of the
thrifty bourgeois who has blundered into one of the 'private' theatres
and soon regrets having parted with a shilling for a seat there:
I will hasten to the money Box
And take my shilling out again, for now
I have considered that it is too much;
I'll go to th' Bull, or Fortune, and there see
A Play for two pense, with a Jig to boot. 2
Before the Civil War the Fortune and the Red Bull, we are assured by a
writer at the end of the century, 3 were 'mostly frequented by citizens, and
the meaner sort of people'.
In considering this problem it must be remembered that in 1609 the
company of actors to which Shakespeare belonged added to its 'public'
theatre, the Globe, which it henceforth used only in the summer months,
the 'private' theatre of the Blackfriars which from that time onwards
was a far more lucrative proposition. Thus already in Shakespeare's day
there was developing a move away from the sort of audience which
embraced spectators drawn from all social classes, towards two rather
different types of theatre—the one attracting a more select audience,
drawn from the more aristocratic and wealthy sections of society, from
the court, the gentry, the professional classes, and the other appealing
to the middle classes and the lower orders.
The eventual outcome of this long evolution was that, when public
performances could at last begin again in London at the Restoration, the
smaller number of theatres available (there were never more than two
1
2
8
A. Harbage, Shakespeare's Audience (New York, 1941), pp. 64, 90.
Jbid. pp. 64-5.
James Wright in his Hhtoria Histrionica, p. 407.
246
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DRAMA AND SOCIETY
and for a period there was only one) were virtually monopolized by the
court and its hangers-on, and that both middle class and plebeian spec-
tators were not catered for at all. Thus in little more than half a century
London theatre audiences changed completely. In the age of Shakespeare
they were drawn from all classes of society, from nobleman to artisan; in
the age of Dryden and Congreve they came from a somewhat raffish
elite.
It is possible that an evolution in the same direction took place in Paris
theatres in our period but, as we have seen, our almost total ignorance of
what went on in the Paris theatrical world in the opening decades of the
century makes discussion of this point difficult. It is, however, certain
that even after the theatre became much more fashionable round about
1630, the solid bourgeois section of the audience in the pit retained
considerable importance, one which was recognized by the flattery
addressed to such spectators by Moliere, among others, in the 1660s. It
seems reasonably clear that no such drastic transformation took place in
Paris as occurred in London, from a 'universal' audience to one drawn
from only a narrow section of society.
The theatres of Madrid seem to have continued throughout our period
to attract spectators from all sections of the community. Philip IV, who
had a passion for the theatre and for actresses, even had a special box
[aposento] in one of the two public theatres, though he went incognito.
The clergy too, whose attitude to drama was not as hostile as that of
French clerics in the seventeenth century, had seats set aside for them in
the theatre; while the most distinguished spectators, male and female,
followed the play from the grated windows of the houses round the
courtyard where the stage was set up, and an area at the back was
reserved for women of more modest means, the pit, in which most of the
spectators stood, was, as in Paris, reserved for men. Its occupants had a
very considerable influence on the fate of a new play, applauding or
showing disapproval in the most vigorous fashion. The autos sacra-
mentales, performed by professional actors, also appealed to a wide
range of spectators. They were performed first at the royal palace and
then before the members of the royal council and the municipality of
Madrid before being given on portable stages for the general public in
the squares of the capital. From 1648 onwards the autos were also per-
formed in the public theatres.
The crude adaptations of English plays performed in Germany in our
period, at first in English and by English actors and then gradually in
German and with an admixture of German actors, are frequently con-
sidered to reflect the crude taste of the masses in the German cities
through which these companies passed. In the process the plays of
Shakespeare and his contemporaries certainly underwent a drastic trans-
formation. Prose replaced verse, all poetic passages were eliminated, the
247
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
maximum amount of dramatic tension was aroused and the spectator was
treated to processions, drums and trumpets, along with music, songs and
comic interludes. Yet to attribute this transformation purely to the
influence of the plebeian spectators who flocked to such entertainments is
surely wrong. Not only did town councils attend in a body the perfor-
mances given in their honour by the newly arrived actors, but from the
beginning the Englische Komodianten enjoyed the patronage of courts
all over Germany. While it is true that opera rather than drama was the
main theatrical entertainment of German princes and princelings in our
period, they were far from despising the offerings of the professional
actors. Their companies would be made welcome at court and passed on
with commendations to other prospective patrons, whether princes or
town councils.
Since we are here concerned with the age of absolute or would-be
absolute rulers, it is important to enquire a little more closely into the
interest in drama taken by the ruler and his court. Contrary to what was
once believed, there is every reason to think that in the opening decades
of the century the French court did take some interest in the theatre. If,
during the earlier years of the century, it is easier to find information
about ballets being performed at court than about plays, that does not
mean that no professional actors made their appearance at the court of
Henri IV or of the young Louis XIII. We have evidence of visits to the
court by French actors during Henri's reign, and both he and his Italian
wife, Marie de Medici, had Italian companies fetched across the Alps for
their own entertainment at court and incidentally for that of their subjects
at the Hotel de Bourgogne. Before and after his accession the young
Louis XIII was taken on several occasions to see performances at this
theatre, while both French and Italian actors frequently appeared before
the court. In one particularly active period, between November 1612 and
February 1614, we have records of at least seventy-six performances by
French actors and fifty-seven by Italians.
If, when he grew older, Louis XIII did not show anything like as
much interest in the theatre as his son in his prime was to do, he and his
queen, Anne of Austria, by no means ignored the drama and what was
going on in the theatrical world. It is true, however, that Richelieu's
role as a patron of the drama was much more important. The first
evidence which we have of his connection with the theatre goes back to
1629, and right down to his death in 1642 that interest was sustained. Not
only did he give pensions to playwrights and thus encourage a much
greater output in plays; he also took an interest in the composition and
performance of the works of his proteges. He inspired the production of
a number of plays which were performed in the Palais Cardinal (later the
Palais Royal) before members of the royal family and the court. To the
smaller theatre which he had there he added in due course a larger one.
248
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DRAMA AND SOCIETY
This second theatre, which was opened early in 1641 with a performance of
a spectacular tragicomedy, Mirame, written under his guidance by one of
his favourite playwrights, was technically a great advance on any such
building available in Paris down to that date. In it was performed, a few
weeks before the cardinal's death, a political play, Europe, which defended
his foreign policy and in the composition of which he was alleged by con-
temporaries to have had a considerable part. After his death and that of
Louis XIII soon after, the regent, Anne of Austria, continued to interest
herself in the theatre; even her period of mourning did not prevent her
from attending court performances in secret. All this laid a foundation
for the part which her son, Louis XIV, was to play as a patron of the
drama in all its forms until in his old age his piety made him develop
scruples about attending plays.
In England, in our period, down to the Civil Wars, the court showed
an increasing interest in drama. While Elizabeth was far from scorning
theatrical entertainments, the records of court performances which we
possess show that these were relatively few in number and concentrated
generally in one period of the year, between Christmas and the beginning
of Lent. The accession of James I brought about a considerable change, as
he, his queen and other members of the royal family showed considerably
more interest in the drama than Elizabeth had done. On James' accession
the company to which Shakespeare belonged, the Lord Chamberlain's
Men, became the King's Men; down to her death in 1619 the queen, Anne
of Denmark, gave her name to another London company, formerly
known as the Earl of Worcester's Men. Their sons also had companies
named after them. The number of court performances increased signifi-
cantly, particularly those given by the favoured company of the King's
Men; whereas for the last ten years of Elizabeth's reign the average
number of their performances at court was only three, the average
figure for the next ten years rose to thirteen, with great profit to their
purse.
With Charles I and his French queen who, as we have seen, did not
disdain on occasion to mount the boards herself for private performances
at court, the royal preoccupation with all forms of drama increased still
further. Professional companies were summoned to court more frequently
than ever before. The king's interest went so far as make him go through
the manuscript of one play and restore certain expressions removed by
the censor; on more than one occasion Charles appears to have furnished
the playwright with his plot. In the epilogue of one of these plays the
author addresses the king thus:
If what hath been presented to your sense
You do approve, thank your own influence;
Which moving in the story that you told
Infus'd new heat into a brain grown cold . . .
249
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
It was, however, his queen who showed the livelier enthusiasm for the
drama.
The sixteen-year-old Henrietta Maria brought with her from the
French court an interest in the ballet and in dramatic performances.
Shortly after her arrival in England a foreign envoy reported the following
entertainment in which the young queen took part:
On the day of carnival, for which Tuesday was set aside, she acted in a beauti-
ful pastoral of her own composition, assisted by twelve of her ladies whom she had
trained since Christmas. The pastoral succeeded admirably; not only in the decora-
tions and changes of scenery, but also in the acting and recitation of the ladies—
Her Majesty surpassing all the others. The performance was conducted as privately
as possible, inasmuch as it is an unusual thing in this country to see the Queen upon
a stage; the audience consequently was limited to a few of the nobility, expressly
invited, no others being admitted. 1
Seven years later, in 1633, Henrietta's appearance, in the part of Queen
Bellesa, in a court performance of Montague's pastoral play, The Shep-
herd's Paradise, coincided with Prynne's brutal onslaught on the stage.
The queen was also the patron of one of the London companies of actors
—Queen Henrietta's Men—and she is also known to have attended public
performances given by the King's Men at the Blackfriars Theatre. Again,
when Floridor's company came over from Paris during the winter of
1634-5, she did her best to make their visit a success. This royal interest
in the theatre was certainly to have an important effect on drama.
In Italy, as we have seen, the courts were inevitably the centre of drama-
tic activity as they had been in the sixteenth century. The patronage of
Mantua was important for the development of the Commedia deU'Arte,
and opera first developed in Florence and other courts before finding its
chief centre in Venice. In Spain Philip III, unlike his father, showed some
interest in the theatre, having both secular plays and autos performed
in the royal palaces. With his successor, Philip IV, who came to the throne
in 1621 and reigned until 1665, the drama was a veritable passion. Though
politically his reign was marked by Spain's defeat at the hands of France,
it coincided with a great flowering of Spanish drama in which the king
played a part. As a child he had taken part in amateur performances at
court, and not only did he and his queen (Henrietta Maria's elder sister)
attend vast numbers of theatrical performances in their palaces; he is even
said to have written several plays himself. At first court performances
mostly took place in the royal palace in Madrid or in the gardens at
Aranjuez, but from 1632 onwards many were given at the new royal
residence of Buen Retiro on the outskirts of Madrid, where the first
performance of many of Calderon's plays was to take place. Here were a
great variety of theatres—in the open air as well as the indoor Coliseo
1
Historical Manuscripts Commission, Eleventh Report (London, 1887), Appendix, Part
1, p- 47-
250
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DRAMA AND SOCIETY
de las Comedias, a splendid building erected in 1640. It was designed by
an Italian architect and equipped with all manner of up-to-date devices
to produce the most startling spectacular effects.
In German-speaking territories it was the Austrian Habsburgs, in close
contact through successive marriages with the Italian courts, who led the
way in the development of drama, even though it was only in 1652 that a
court theatre was constructed at the Hof burg. This, the work once again
of an Italian architect, was equipped with the very latest stage devices.
In Austria and throughout the rest of the empire there were large numbers
of courts, large and small, which played their part in the development of
the drama, whether by taking on companies of strolling players or by
offering other dramatic entertainments.
The performance of plays was by no means the only form of theatrical
entertainment indulged in by the courts of Europe in our period. In
France, for instance, in the opening decades of the century the royal
family and courtiers seem to have been more interested in ballet than in
drama in the narrow sense. Although the ballet did not reach its highest
point until the reign of Louis XIV, this form of entertainment was
extremely popular during the reigns of Henri IV and Louis XIII; the
courtiers, headed by the king himself, delighted to take part in such per-
formances, which ranged from relatively modest entertainments (ballets-
mascarades), often with a strong farce-like, grotesque element, to a great
spectacle like Le Ballet de la Prosperite des Armes de la France, per-
formed before the king in Richelieu's palace in 1641.
In England the allied entertainment of the masque reached its high point
at the courts of James I and Charles I. Two names are always associated
with these performances—those of Ben Jonson who for some twenty-five
years provided the words, and of Inigo Jones who furnished the elaborate
settings and spectacular effects, based largely on Italian models, until the
Civil Wars put an end to all such court entertainments. The dancing, the
splendid costumes and scenery, varied by the addition of a rudimentary
plot and the grotesque characters of the 'anti-masque', provided sump-
tuous spectacles for the king and court.
Italy, which had been the home of the ballet and the masque, also
developed during these years in its courts the new genre of the opera.
The first opera was performed at Florence in 1597, and the earliest opera
of which the music has survived—Euridice, with text by Rinuccini and
two separate musical settings—was performed there in 1600 for the
wedding of Henri IV of France and Marie de Medici. Monteverdi, whose
first operas were performed at the court of the dukes of Mantua, moved
to Venice in 1613. There the new genre ceased to be a purely court enter-
tainment, and the establishment of the first opera house in 1637 heralded
an extraordinary development of opera in the republic in the second half
of the century, when many other Italian cities also set up their own opera
251
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
houses. The later operas of Monteverdi, produced shortly before his
death in 1643, marked the final step in the establishment of modern opera.
From Italy the new genre spread rapidly to the courts of Austria and
southern Germany; performances at Salzburg are recorded as early as
1618, although Vienna was quickly to become the centre of its develop-
ment. Italian operas remained extremely influential in German-speaking
territories, but attempts were soon made to produce German libretti and
music, beginning with Martin Opitz' adaptation of a work by Rinuccini,
which was first performed at Torgau for a princely marriage in 1627.
The purposes of these court entertainments, whether they offered ballets,
masques, operas or plays, were no doubt varied. In the words of the
preface to one of Davenant's masques they were given by 'princes of
sweet and humane natures' in order to 'recreate their spirits wasted in
grave affairs of State, and for the entertainment of their nobility, ladies,
and court'. They also served to impress a wider public (for attendance at
many of such entertainments as masques and ballets was not rigorously
confined to the court circle) with the greatness and splendour of the ruler,
be he duke, king or emperor—or principal minister, like Richelieu.
Occasionally they might be made to serve a more precise propaganda
purpose. The comedie heroique, Europe, which Richelieu had performed
in the Palais Cardinal a few weeks before his death, had originally been
composed several years earlier to defend his foreign policy and particularly
the war against Spain.
Its aim, the preface tells us, was to depict Tambition des Espagnols
pour se rendre maitres de l'Europe et la protection que lui donne le Roi
avec ses allies pour la garantir de servitude'. The prologue of the play,
spoken by Peace, announces her return to the world:
Assez ont brille par les champs
Les casques emplum6s et les glaives tranchants.
Assez la triste horreur a regni dans le monde.
O vous, invincibles guerriers,
A qui tout a cede sur la terre et dans l'onde
Venez vous reposer dessous mes oliviers.
In the play the courageous warrior, Francion (France), is chosen by
Europe as her knight to defend her against the schemes of the dark-skinned
villain, Ibere (Spain). It is the ambition of Spain, Francion explains to
Europe, which has compelled France to enter the war:
Quoi! j'attendrais de voir mes voisins terrasses,
Et qu'Ibere, enrichi du bien des oppresses,
Glorieux de leur perte et riant de leurs larmes,
Jusque dans mes 6tats osat porter ses armes! . ..
J'ai droit de m'opposer a son injuste effort.
L'innocent et le faible ont en moi leur support. .
Enfin il faut la guerre, et j'y suis emporte,
Non par ambition, mais par necessite.
252
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DRAMA AND SOCIETY
The evil designs of Spain are denounced in words put into the mouth of
Ibere:
. . . . Pour mon ambition
J'immole honneur, parents, respect, religion.
Au besoin, pour avoir l'autorite supreme,
J'immolerais encore une part de moi-meme.
Je veux placer mon trone au-dessus de cent rois,
Par le mepris du sang, par le mepris des lois . . .
Un empire m'est tout, le reste ne m'est rien.
The conclusion of this comidie heroique is, of course, a happy one.
Francion compels Ibere to renounce his dream of adding the conquest
of Europe to that of America, and the play leaves the spectator with the
hope of French victories bringing about a negotiated peace between
France and Spain.
The same sort of political allegory is found in the masques performed
just previously to this at the court of Charles I as the clouds heralding the
Civil War grew thicker. Indeed, the stock ending for the masques per-
formed at Whitehall in this period was the disappearance of the clouds,
'leaving behind' as in Carew's Coelum Britannicum (1634), 'nothing but
a serene sky'—the symbol of the disappearance of opposition to the royal
will. Particularly striking from this point of view are Davenant's Britannia
Triumphans (1638) and, the last masque given before the Civil War, his
Salmacida Spolia (1640). In their elaborate Inigo Jones settings, with
Charles and Henrietta leading the dancers in their splendid costumes,
these masques view all the political discords of the times from the angle
of the ruler.
In the first, Britanocles (Charles) is presented a s ' the glory of the western
world' who 'hath by his wisdom, valour and piety, not only vindicated
his own, but far distant seas, infested with pirates'—a roundabout way
of defending the hated ship-money against the opposition of Imposture.
Imposture and Merlin, the magician, are driven out by Bellerophon at the
approach of Britanocles:
Away! Fame, still obedient unto fate,
This happy hour is call'd to celebrate
Britanocles, and those that in this Isle
The old with modern virtues reconcile.
Away! Fame's universal voice I hear,
[a trumpet within]
Tis fit you vanish quite when they appear.
Britanocles' entry is announced thus by the chorus:
Britanocles, the great and good appears,
His person fills our eyes, his name our ears,
His virtue every drooping spirit cheers!
At this point the masquers dance their entry and address their praises to
the queen, after which Galatea, riding in the sea on a dolphin, renews the
praise of Britanocles.
253
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
The subject of Salmacida Spolia is set forth by the author in these terms:
Discord, a malicious fury, appears in a storm, and by the invocation of malignant
spirits, proper to her evil use, having already put most of the world into disorder,
endeavours to disturb these parts, envying the blessings and tranquillity we have
long enjoyed.
These incantations are expressed by those spirits in an Antimasque: who on a
sudden are surprised, and stopt in their motion by a secret power, whose wisdom
they tremble at, and depart as foreknowing that Wisdom will change all their
malicious hope of these disorders into a sudden calm, which after their departure
is prepared by a disperst harmony of music.
This secret Wisdom, in the person of the King attended by his nobles, and under
the name of Philogenes or Lover of his people, hath his appearance prepared by
a Chorus, representing the beloved people, and is instantly discovered, environed
with those nobles in the throne of Honour.
Then the Queen, personating the chief heroine, with her martial ladies, is sent
down from Heaven by Pallas as a reward of his prudence, for reducing the threat'ning
storm into the following calm.
Verses like these are addressed t o the king by ' the chorus of the beloved
people' when he appears seated on the throne of honour:
If it be kingly to outlast
Those storms the people's giddy fury raise,
Till like fantastic winds themselves they waste,
The wisdom of that patience is thy praise . . .
Since strength of virtues gained you Honour's throne.
Accept our wonder, and enjoy our praise!
He's fit to govern there, and rule alone,
Whom inward helps, not outward force doth raise.
While the chorus was singing this song, the queen, once again pregnant,
descended with her 'martial ladies' from the heavens in a cloud 'in a
transparent brightness of thin exhalations, such as the gods are feigned to
descend in'. After the two dances, 'the chorus below filled all the whole
scene with apparitions and harmony', in a song addressed to Charles and
Henrietta, which contains the following verse:
All that are harsh, all that are rude,
Are by your harmony subdu'd;
Yet so into obedience wrought,
As if not forc'd to it, but taught.
The events of the remainder of the decade were to show up the complete
unreality of this world of make-believe.
The overwhelming majority of the straight plays of the period—come-
dies, tragedies, tragicomedies, pastoral plays and the like (not forgetting
the farces)—seem to have been performed quite indifferently at court or
on the public stage; for the most part they received their first performance
in the public theatres. Clearly the audiences in the public playhouses—
more or less restricted in their social composition according to the
254
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DRAMA AND SOCIETY
country concerned—were always decidedly more mixed than were the
relatively 'select' groups of spectators who attended a performance given
at court before the king and the royal family. It must not, however, be
imagined that the audience at court was completely different from that of
the public theatres. If at court the members of the aristocracy inevitably
made up the great majority of the spectators, they also provided a
respectable part of the audiences of the public theatres—not only numeri-
cally and financially, but also in a much wider sense, given the social
setting of the time in which the aristocracy enjoyed an importance difficult
for us to imagine today.
Even in countries like England or Spain where the audience, especially
in the opening years of the century, seems to have embraced representa-
tives of most sections of the community, plays might pass straight from
the public stage to performances in the royal palaces. In any case, it was
not as if, as is sometimes imagined, the king and his courtiers had a
peculiarly refined taste, raised far above that of the vulgar plebs in the
public theatres. Farce was popular at the French court under Henri IV:
in the rare glimpses which we have of him in the theatre we see him being
entertained by French or Italian farce-actors. The farce tradition persisted
at court in ballet as well as in comedy, right through the next reign into
that of the Sun-King. It is well known, for instance, that when in 1658
Moliere's company returned from the provinces and made its first
appearance in Paris at the Louvre before the king and court, it was not his
company's performance in a tragedy of Corneille which made an impres-
sion on this audience, but the little farce which rounded off the pro-
ceedings.
Sometimes two strands may be seen in the drama of the age, particularly
where, as in England, there was a definite trend towards a splitting up of
the once universal audience into the more plebeian spectators of the
'public' theatres and the more aristocratic audiences of the so-called
'private' theatres, which were both smaller and more expensive. On the
one hand, one finds certain types of play which owed their appeal to
middle class and plebeian spectators to their treatment of scenes from the
life of their equals; while, on the other hand, we find in the last decade or
two before the closing of the London theatres in 1642 a trend towards the
types of drama which were finally to emerge in the Restoration period,
after a period of incubation during the years when public performances
of plays were banned.
We find, for instance, in the tragedies and tragicomedies of Beaumont
and Fletcher, Shakespeare's successors as the chief playwrights for the
King's Men, installed from 1609 onwards for most of the year at the
'private' house of the Blackfriars, a foretaste of the drama of the Restora-
tion period. Their comedies of manners and those of writers like Middle-
ton and Shirley portray, in a manner close to that of Restoration comedy,
255
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
the world of fashionable society and at the same time pour scorn on the
middle classes. There is a great gap between plays like these and the
picture of the middle and lower ranks of society presented by such earlier
comedies as Dekker's Shoemaker's Holiday or Heywood's A Woman
Killed with Kindness.
Closer to contemporary European fashions in drama stand romantic
comedies or tragicomedies of this period like Shirley's The Wedding, or the
vogue, especially great at the court of Charles I, for pastoral plays which,
taking their source in Italy, had achieved some popularity in France,
where Racan in his Bergeries (performed c.1620) produced the outstand-
ing play of this type. The elaborate conventions of the pastoral, whether
in drama or the novel, were more calculated to win the approval of a
sophisticated court or preponderantly aristocratic audience than that of a
wider circle of spectators. Fletcher's Faithful Shepherdess, written in the
first decade of the century, found greatest favour when, in the 1630s, it
was given for Twelfth Night before Charles and Henrietta; we have
already seen what scandal was caused during the previous season by the
queen's appearance in another pastoral play, Walter Montague's Shep-
herd's Paradise. One of the most significant developments in the English
theatre during the 1630s was the emergence of the so-called Cavalier
drama, the work not of professional writers, but of courtiers like Monta-
gue, a gentleman of the privy-chamber to the king, or Sir John Suckling,
who is still remembered as a poet. To the same world belonged William
Davenant who, although the son of an Oxford vintner, succeeded in
securing entry to the court through his plays and masques, and was made
poet laureate in 1638. After being knighted during the Civil War for his
services to the Royalist cause, he revived dramatic performances in
London in 1656 with, among other works, The Siege of Rhodes, the first
English opera, and at the Restoration secured one of the two theatres in
the capital, thus forming a link between the early and the later Stuart
stage.
Nowhere on the continent was the trend towards two relatively clearly
differentiated types of drama, the one inclining towards the middle class
and the plebeian, and the other to the court and the aristocracy, so clearly
visible as in England. Yet even in this country one broad type or series of
types of play might please all audiences, whatever the social rank of the
spectators. The important thing for the playwright, then as now, was to
catch the spirit of his age and country as it was reflected in the tastes
and outlook of such spectators as could be attracted to a play. However
popular the theatre may have been in any given European town or city, it
could never attract more than a minority of the adult inhabitants. Even
when theatregoing was a habit not confined to the upper classes, there was
still a strong prejudice among the middle classes against the public theatre
as an entertainment, not only in Puritan London, but in Catholic Paris.
256
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DRAMA AND SOCIETY
Under certain circumstances the same plays might very well be seen by
both king and cobbler, although probably in very different surroundings;
but even so, given the society of the day with its worship of rank, the
choice of theme and its treatment would make more concessions to the
tastes and interests of the upper classes than to those of the masses.
It was, for instance, an accepted theory that while tragedy deals with
the misfortunes of the illustrious, comedy portrays the adventures of
characters drawn from the middle or lower ranks of society. With rare
exceptions the tragedy of the age is concerned with such highly placed
personages as the prince of Denmark or the Emperor Augustus, while
comedy brings on the stage private persons of less account. The European
vogue of tragicomedy tended to portray, against a confusing background
of romantic adventures, personages of birth involved in situations bor-
dering on the tragic, but ending after all happily.
Theatre audiences of the time were not merely composed of noblemen
and commoners; there was another division—that between the learned
and the unlearned. The learned also helped to colour the drama of the
age, though very variously according to country. Everywhere the great
majority of plays were written by men of some education, brought up at
least in the grammar school or its continental equivalent and given a
nodding acquaintance with Latin, if not with Greek. Often they wore their
learning, such as it was, very lightly, though it generally sufficed to enable
them to make use of the drama as well as of the mythology of the ancient
world in the writing of their plays. The great majority had their eye on
box-office success and the payment of the next month's rent or even of the
next meal, rather than on providing an exhibition of their learning. Play-
writing was still a miserably paid profession; receipts from actors and
publishers were seldom more than a mere pittance, and writers who lacked
private means (as most playwrights certainly did) were driven to seek the
patronage of kings and princes, ministers and tax-farmers, great noblemen
and ladies, a state of affairs to which the obsequious flattery of the flowery
dedications usual in this period bears eloquent witness. It was to please
both a wider audience of potential theatregoers and a narrow circle of
patrons that playwrights strove, rather than to show off their learning,
which in the circumstances of the day meant their knowledge of the an-
cient tongues and literatures.
In England or Spain the famous rules of drama, inherited by many
devious routes from Aristotle and other ancient writers, left next to no
mark on the drama of the period. In Germany the more learned Schul-
drama, as distinct from the crude offerings of the strolling players, was
performed in grammar schools to a more or less cultured audience; in
the 1620s and 1630s Martin Opitz urged writers to seek their models in
the Ancients, the French and Italians. Italy was, of course, the home of the
rules which the humanists of the previous century had derived from the
257
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
ancients; but most Italian playwrights of our age (Cicognini is the best
known of them), while paying lip-service to the rules, were more con-
cerned to produce popular plays.
The France of this period offers extraordinary contrasts in this field.
Corneille was later to confess that when in 1630 he began his long and
prolific career as a playwright, he had not even heard of the rules. Yet at
the very moment he began to write a revolutionary transformation was
taking place in French drama. Partly under Italian influence the rules—
not only the famous unities but the rules of verisimilitude [vraisemblance]
and the proprieties [bienseances]—were being slowly imposed by the
learned, against the resistance of those who stood for the freer drama of
the earlier decades of the century. It was in vain that they claimed for the
dramatist the right, indeed the duty, to keep himself free from such
entanglements which could only restrict his freedom to give the spectator
the variety of action and setting which he wanted. In the two decades
between 1630 and 1650 the rules were imposed on French drama with, to
some extent, the encouragement of aristocratic patrons, including Riche-
lieu himself, although it is nonsense to see in his support for the rules yet
another aspect of his desire to fasten an iron control over the whole of the
life of France.
Yet although the rules triumphed in France to a degree unparalleled
in any other European country and gradually effected a complete revolu-
tion in drama, eliminating step by step both the pastoral play and then
the immensely popular tragicomedy from the stage, it would be an utter
mistake to imagine that the result was a learned drama, written for an
intellectual elite. Comedy, as distinct from farce, only really began to
develop in France in the 1630s; but it always enjoyed a fair degree of
freedom from the rules, as can be seen in many of the comedies of
Moliere later in the century. Although the rules always weighed more
heavily on tragedy from its beginnings with Mairet's Sophonisbe (1634)
down to its unlamented demise nearly two centuries later, none the less it
reflected the outlook and tastes, not of a narrow intellectual elite, but of
the fairly broad cross-section of the population of Paris which frequented
the theatre, and more especially the interests of the upper-class section of
the audience, female as well as male. If the love theme was to occupy a
central position in tragedy only after the middle of the century in such
illustrious works as Racine's Andromaque or Phedre, already it almost
invariably occupied an important secondary place, whether as the driving
force behind the conspirators in Corneille's Cinna or in rivalry with the
religious theme of a martyr-play like Polyeucte. What is more, the
typical political tragedy of the 1630s and 1640s reflected something of the
restless ambition and desire for self-assertion which went into the nobility's
perpetual conspiracies against Richelieu or the tragic farce of the civil
wars of the Fronde.
258
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DRAMA AND SOCIETY
In these forty or fifty years to which we are driven to return by the
masterpieces of Shakespeare, Lope de Vega, Calderon and Corneille we
find, as we move from country to country, an infinitely varied interaction
between drama and society. Everywhere the small world of the theatre
reflected to some degree what was going on in the world outside. Now
dominated by the court, now appealing to the broader masses, drama and
the allied arts of the masque, the ballet and opera mirrored the aspira-
tions, the fears and sufferings of an age of international wars and civil
strife, or else provided escape from the cares and anxieties of everyday life
in a profusion of splendour, mingled characteristically with the exag-
gerated and the grotesque.
259
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER IX
SPAIN AND EUROPE 1598-1621
HEN Philip II's long reign came to a close, his Mediterranean
policy had largely succeeded. He had defeated the Turks and
closed his grip on Italy. But his northern policy had failed. He
had not defeated the Dutch 'rebels'. The vast enterprises into which he
had been tempted by the hope of quicker victory had been disastrous.
His treasury was empty. And now the favourable conjuncture which had
lasted so long, and which he had hoped to exploit, was over. For most of
his reign Phillip II had profited by the division and anarchy of France.
But by 1598 that was past: the new Bourbon dynasty was firmly estab-
lished and could not even be rejected as heretical. In his last year, there-
fore, Philip II came to terms with reality. Since the Netherlands would not
yield to him, he ostentatiously devolved his authority over them to an
'independent' sovereign, his own safely Spaniolized son-in-law, the
Archduke Albert; and he allowed this sovereign to negotiate, in his name,
peace with France.
Thus the dying Philip II laid down the policy which his son Philip III
should follow. Through the Archduke Albert he was to continue the
northern struggle. The 'rebels' in the Netherlands were to be crushed.
The war with heretical England, however disastrous, should be con-
tinued: after all, the succession to the English throne was still open and
Elizabeth's death, when it came, would offer a great opportunity. But on
the landward side the archduke should be undistracted. There was no
point in continuing the war with France. For practical purposes France
must be neutralized. Ideally—this at least was the papal ideal—France
might even combine with Spain against the heretics of both England and
Holland. Unfortunately neither of these last hopes was realized. France
would not join the crusade against England and Holland, and even in
peace it continued to distract the effort of Spain. The policy laid down by
Philip II was made impossible for Philip III, not least by the mere
presence of a re-united France, a restored French monarchy.
How distracting this presence could be is clear from a glance at the
map. Spain's war in the Netherlands depended absolutely on communi-
cations. Originally the normal route had been by sea, from Laredo or
Corufia to Flushing, but by 1580 Dutch and English 'pirates' had made
this route impossible, and as long as Spain was at war with Holland and
England it would remain impossible. Therefore all supplies of men,
material and money now had to reach Flanders by land. From Barcelona
or Naples they sailed to Genoa, assembled in the Duchy of Milan, and
W
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SPAIN AND EUROPE I 5 9 8 - I 6 2 I
passed through the Alps and down the Rhine to Franche-Comte and
Luxembourg. In the 1580s this had been easy enough. The Alpine passes
might be narrow, the Spanish stepping-stones small and scattered: but the
Spanish monopoly of power made the difference. The duke of Savoy, the
Catholic cantons of Switzerland, the princes and bishops of the Rhine,
lacking an alternative patron, had all accepted the power and pensions of
Spain. Little local difficulties, as in Cologne, had been easily settled. But
now it was not so-easy. With the revival of France, an alternative patron
was in sight. The vital land route was exposed to a new force, its local
rulers to a new temptation. Franche-Comte and Alsace could be invaded,
Lorraine and Savoy reduced. Local difficulties might become inter-
national difficulties. So a sudden electric tremor was felt along the string
of petty states which hitherto had quietly transmitted the Spanish forces
along the eastern borders of France.
Nor was the threat confined to the land-route north of the Alps. The
revival of France threatened the Spanish monopoly even in its securest
stronghold. In Spain itself the hated Moriscos were believed to be en-
couraged not only from Constantinople but from Paris. That view was
perhaps somewhat extravagant. But there could be no doubt about the
effects of French revival in what had previously seemed the firmest part
of the Spanish empire, Italy. Throughout the reign of Philip II, Italy had
been entirely and apparently happily subjected to Spain. The popes, at
least after the death of Pius V, had been wholly dependent upon Spain.
The duke of Savoy owed his throne to Spain. The grand duke of Tuscany
had been a Spanish client. Both Genoa (anyway tied to Spain by finance)
and Venice, though now proverbially neutral, had relied on Spanish
patronage to keep their colonies: Corsica in constant rebellion against
Genoese rule, Cyprus and Crete exposed to Turkish attack. And then there
were a dozen variations of ragion di stato whereby Spain could manage the
Italian princes: marriage into Spanish regal or vice-regal families;
commands in Spanish armies; offices in Milan, Naples, Sicily; the lure of
Spanish pensions; the pressure of Spanish garrisons as in Piacenza or the
Tuscan presidii. By such means all Italy had been, or seemed, little more
than a single, docile Spanish protectorate throughout the reign of
Philip H.
And yet, beneath the surface, what hatred of Spain was everywhere
apparent! The princes and their courts might be loyal to their makers and
preservers, and their philosophers and clergy—a Botero, an Ammirato,
and the Jesuit claque—might praise the new system of government; but
the heirs of the Renaissance and the voice of the people clamoured insis-
tently for freedom, and sometimes even princes listened to that voice. Of
course, in the reign of Philip II, they did not obey it. How could they ?
Spain was irresistible. But suppose another great power were to patronize
them? Leo X, after all, had driven the French out of Italy by bringing in
261
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
the Spaniards. What if France were to revive and another Italian ruler
were to call in, once again, the French? By 1595 the power of France had
revived. In 1600, by the Treaty of Lyon, Henri IV obtained from Savoy
the marquisate of Saluzzo, the gateway to Italy, and could come in.
Thus, after 1595, the same electric tremor which shocked or galvanized
the Rhineland electors and Alpine sentinels was felt, in different strength,
throughout Italy. Venice would turn openly to Henri IV, and would soon
win European fame, and become the Catholic hero of Protestantism, by
its resistance to both Rome and Spain. Ferdinand I of Tuscany, whose
father and brother had gained so little from the jealous protection of
Spain, would marry a French princess, support France in war, and defend
the local Italian lords against Spanish garrisons. A little later Charles
Emmanuel of Savoy, who had begun his career as a Spanish client and
had married the daughter of Philip II in the fond hopes of a royal throne,
would begin his long and turbulent career of seeking thrones as the
client of France, or the champion of Italian independence. By 1608 he
would be weaving conspiracies in Parma and Modena. Even the duke of
Mantua, fearing for his detached and exposed marquisate of Montferrat,
even Genoa, treasuring the relics of its independence, sometimes wavered
towards France or at least towards Tuscany, as a possible guarantor of
Italian liberties. And the same refreshing thrill was felt, of course, in the
greatest of all Italian courts, the court of Rome.
The popes of Rome were doubly tied to Spain. They were therefore, at
times, doubly resentful. Both as Italian princes and as rulers of Catholic
Christendom they resented their loss of independence. No doubt Rome
had gained something by Spanish power, even in religion. It was thanks to
Spanish (or Portuguese) arms and patronage that Catholicism had been
spread in Asia and America, that Protestantism had been stayed in
Europe. But Spanish patronage had its price. The popes had deeply
resented the heavy royal control over the church in Spain, in Portugal, and
more particularly—since it was nearer home—in Naples. Moreover,
Catholicism was not always the same in Spain as in Italy, and Italian
popes became increasingly impatient of Spanish dictation in religion as in
politics. While gladly relying on Spanish arms, they lamented the tem-
porary lack of any great Catholic ruler to balance against the house of
Habsburg. Now, in the 1590s, Clement VIII saw his chance. In the name
of Catholicism Philip II was seeking to impose his daughter on the throne,
first of France, then of England. To avoid this, Clement had sought rather
to convert the native claimants, James VI of Scotland and Henri of
Navarre. If he had failed in England, he had succeeded in France. Un-
deterred by the intrigues of the Spanish ambassador and his clique among
the cardinals, in 1595 he had solemnly absolved the returned prodigal
Henri IV, and all Rome had been lit up in honour of this triumph of the
faith. Ten years later Henri IV returned the compliment: in 1605 he
262
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SPAIN AND EUROPE I 5 9 8 - I 6 2 I
ordered salvos and illuminations throughout France to celebrate the
election of 'the French Pope', Leo XI. In those days of illumination,
Spain, it seemed, was in eclipse: it had lost its temporal monopoly of the
Catholic church in Europe.
For all these reasons the revival of France under Henri IV is of great
importance in the history both of Spain and Europe. Though outwardly
at peace, in fact Henri IV was a constant menace to Philip III throughout
his scattered empire; and this menace, combined with Spain's financial
weakness, make it impossible for the feeble successor of Philip II to
continue, even on a reduced scale, his northern wars. It is no accident that
the period of Henri IV's reign in France is the period, in Spanish history,
of las Pazes, the successive conclusions of those long, exhausting wars.
Philip III and his all-powerful minister, the duke of Lerma, are some-
times described as peace-loving. It is true they made peace. It is true that,
once made, they were reluctant to break it. It is true that, though they
connived at some of the aggressive acts of Spanish officials abroad, they
refused to be committed by them, and thus preserved the general peace.
But this love of peace was not positive or pure: it sprang from a combina-
tion of indolence and hateful necessity. In fact, when we look at the docu-
ments, we see that the court of Spain made its peace-treaties with the
utmost reluctance. Though the will-power of Philip II was gone, his
successors were still imprisoned by his spirit. Again and again, we catch
the echoes of his voice: the war against England is so holy, tan de Dios,
that it must go on, whatever the cost; the king will never, never, consent
to diminution of his title; he would rather lose all his kingdoms, and his
life also, than be ' a king of heretics'. It is the voice of ancient pride,
obstinate bigotry, the voice of the clergy and confessors who ruled both
king and Council of State, of the cristianos viejos throughout Spain. Even
in bankruptcy and defeat, even in dearth and plague, it was hard for a
lifeless court to resist that voice, and for a long time Lerma continued to
echo it. The initiative in resisting it came not from him but from the
theatre of war itself, from the man who had already negotiated the peace
with France, the archduke Albert. Theoretically independent, in fact
jealously controlled from Spain, in this one respect the archduke con-
trived to impose his will. Though entirely Spanish in his outlook, entirely
Catholic in his convictions, he at least studied the interests of his new
subjects, and he deserves to be remembered as the maker of all the three
treaties which ended the disastrous wars of Philip II.
After France, the next enemy to detach was England. Peace with
England was logical. By 1598 the war had lost its purpose. Originally
designed as a short, successful, diversionary war in order to end the revolt
of the Netherlands, it had now proved long, meaningless and disastrous.
Fortunately England too was weary of it, and in that year both sides felt
263
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
their way towards peace. In 1600 a. general peace-conference was arranged
at Boulogne. Unfortunately it came to nothing. When it met, the Spaniards
suddenly made impossible claims, and it was broken off. The reason
was clear enough. Once again, even at its nadir, the court of Spain had
been seduced by hopes of a miracle: a miracle promised by plausible
voices from the bogs of Ireland and the exiled Jesuits of England.
So for another four years the war dragged on while a Spanish expedition
was sent to Ireland and a Spanish queen was offered to England. Ireland,
after all, was in open revolt: who could say whether Spanish help might
not turn the scale? And if the Spaniards had a base in Ireland, the rest
(said Fr Persons and his friends) would be easy. The Spanish infanta's
only rival for the English throne was the king of Scots. But the king of
Scots was the candidate of the earl of Essex, and Sir Robert Cecil, who
held all power in England, would never allow him to prevail. Therefore all
that was necessary was to keep up the war, stand firm in Ireland, rely on
the Jesuits in England, and wait for Queen Elizabeth to die. It seemed too
simple. And besides, thought King Philip, if the infanta were queen of
England, she and her husband could be made to give that improper sove-
reignty of the Netherlands, which he had always resented, back to Spain.
In fact, as so often, the court of Spain had miscalculated and, as always,
the English Jesuits were wrong. The expedition to Ireland in 1601 was two
years too late and landed in the wrong place: in Kinsale, where the revolt
had already been crushed. The prospect of a Spanish queen of England
caused Henri IV and the French cardinals to protest in Rome; the pope
refused to support the project; and the English Jesuits, for pressing it,
were disowned by the English lay Catholics and secular priests, already
disgusted by their 'holier than thou' attitude. Meanwhile all the condi-
tions of success disappeared. Within a few months the Spaniards had
been driven out of Ireland, and, while Queen Elizabeth was still alive,
Essex was dead, and Cecil could therefore commit himself to the Scottish
succession. In March 1603, when the Ulster rebels surrendered uncondi-
tionally and James VI was proclaimed king of England unopposed, the
last hope and purpose of the war had finally disappeared. Even Spain could
do nothing but accept the facts, and the peace which the new king of
England hastened personally to offer. After all, as king of Scotland, James
had never been at war with Spain; and anyway, he added privately, he
liked neither the Dutch nor their cause.
Even so, it was not Lerma but the archduke who made the first move.
Without waiting for Spanish approval, he sent an emissary to Scotland to
congratulate the new king, and an ambassador to England after him. The
English Jesuits still protested that now was the time for a coup, that the king
of Spain had only to appear sword in hand to obtain all his desires; but the
archduke's emissaries insisted that all could be had much more cheaply—
£50,000 to the Howard family would fix anything. And in effect thus it was
264
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SPAIN AND EUROPE I 5 9 8 - I 6 2 I
done. The Spaniards complained bitterly of the archduke's show of in-
dependence, but soon they had to follow his example. Early in 1604 the
constable of Castile came to London as Spanish ambassador explicitly
empowered to treat of peace, and in August the Treaty of London was
signed. It ended hostilities while leaving other questions prudently vague.
James would have included the Dutch in the treaty, but they refused all
terms. The treaty was almost equally disliked by Puritans in England and
Catholics in Spain; but it inaugurated a period of great prosperity in
England. To Spain it gave new opportunities, if only they could be
exploited.
One such opportunity was to settle, at last, the problem of the Nether-
lands. Unfortunately, this proved no easier now that France and England
had been quieted than it had been forty years ago, before they had been
roused. Protestant critics of the English treaty complained that by it, the
United Netherlands had been 'deserted' and left to face Spanish power
alone; but in fact this was hardly so. English and Scottish regiments con-
tinued to serve in the Netherlands as volunteers and trade was uninter-
rupted. Moreover, thanks to their growing economic strength, their
superiority at sea, and the reorganization of their armed forces by Maurice
of Nassau, the Dutch were perfectly capable—in spite of the loss of
Ostend in 1604—of holding their own and wearing down the Spanish
forces. So successfully did they do so that within five years the Court of
Spain was obliged to make its third surrender to reality and consider
peace with 'the rebels'.
Once again, the initiative did not come from Spain but from the arch-
duke. The Spanish government might feel the financial strain of the war,
but the archduke saw every day the economic misery of the people with
which he now identified himself. If the country were ever to flourish again,
he insisted, peace must be made: and peace entailed the recognition of
the rebels and the withdrawal of the Spanish army. But such a peace was
not yet acceptable to Spain. The Spanish court absolutely refused to
recognize either heresy or rebellion and it would not consider withdrawing
the Spanish army which now seemed almost as necessary to control the
archduke as to fight the Dutch. The independence of the archduke in these
matters was strongly resented. It was said that he listened only to 'the
greatest enemies of the greatness of Your Majesty'—that is, to his Belgian
councillors; and he was regularly and bluntly reminded of his true posi-
tion: that, although officially declared an independent sovereign, he
really owed his authority to Spanish power and Spanish money, and that
if he ignored Spanish wishes he would be deposed and his provinces
subjected once again to direct military rule.
In fact, in 1604, the Spanish government took steps to discipline the
insubordinate archduke. It had already twice considered his deposition;
10
265
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
MHFDECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
now it decided to deprive him of his military authority and impose upon
him an independent commander who should take his orders direct from
Spain. It is ironical that the man thus sent to supplant him was in fact
to become the archduke's greatest ally in his struggle against a suicidal
war. For in the contest over the appointment the archduke contrived to
get rid of an uncongenial Spanish officer and secure the nomination of an
Italian whose services he had learned to value. This was Ambrogio
Spinola who had come to Flanders as a volunteer, at his own expense,
and had just saved the archduke's reputation by his brilliant capture of
Ostend. The court of Spain appointed Spinola, who was to prove the
greatest military commander of his generation, a worthy successor to
Alexander Farnese; but it did not forget the purpose of his appointment.
In 1606 Spinola received from Philip III a series of secret instructions for
use in the event of the infanta's death. By these, he was to ensure that all
power was taken out of the archduke's hands, and the archduke himself,
if necessary, arrested and imprisoned in the fortress of Antwerp. In fact
Spinola would never have to use these powers. In fact the infanta would
survive the archduke, and Spinola, though trusted by Spain, would be-
come for the rest of his life the firm ally of both sovereigns, a constant
advocate of peace in the Netherlands against the war party in Spain. Thus
the attempt to weaken the archduke by depriving him of his army in the
end strengthened him, by giving him a loyal and powerful ally who made
that army doubly effective in his service.
From 1605 onwards the archduke and Spinola constantly pressed for
peace. Their position was expressed clearly. Either the court of Spain
must make effective, aggressive war, and supply the cost of such a war, or
it must make peace; half measures were useless. 'If your Majesty could
assure the regular despatch, for a given time, of 300,000 ducats a month',
Spinola wrote to Philip III in 1607, 'we could continue operations with
some hope of reducing the pride of the rebels. But such an effort is beyond
the resources of Spain. Therefore there is only one course to take: to end
this long and costly war.' Two months later, on his own authority, the
archduke concluded an armistice with the Dutch, undertaking to recog-
nize their independence and sovereignty for the duration of the truce. The
Spanish government was furious, refused to ratify the truce, and once
again threatened to depose the archduke. But the fury had to pass. From
now on, fighting ceased in the Netherlands. Philip III, supported by his
confessors in Spain, continued to cry out that nothing could be more
disastrous than such a truce and that neither financial need nor any other
cause would force him to abandon the cause of God. But it made no
difference. Spinola, as the archduke's representative, sat at The Hague
negotiating for peace with the Dutch, under the mediation of England
and France. In 1608 there were renewed protests from Spain, and re-
newed talk of deposing the archduke; but the archduke was firm. He had
266
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SPAIN AND EUROPE I 5 9 8 - I 6 2 I
now converted not only Spinola, who had been sent to control his person,
but also the Dominican confessor who had been sent to control his con-
science, and who now came as his emissary to Spain to echo his views.
300,000 ducats a month, declared Fr Brizuela, were essential for war.
Otherwise there must be peace. Half-measures would not recover Holland,
they would only lead to the loss of Belgium; 'and you must consider that
if the obedient provinces are lost, the Catholic religion, which, as you
know, is now well established and accepted there, will be lost too; and we
well know what grief that would cause his Majesty'.
In the end, the archduke forced the truce on Spain, while on the Dutch
side Oldenbarnevelt forced it upon the extremists behind him: the
military nobility and gentry, the preachers, the privateers. It was a truce,
not a peace, and was to last twelve years. By it the military stalemate was
recognized and, as with England, under vague forms of words the enemies
of Spain contrived to surrender nothing. To Spain, the advantage was
merely respite: respite for twelve years from the crippling financial burden
of the last generation. Once again the question was, how would that
respite be used?
Thus at last, in 1609, the disastrous legacy of Philip II had been cleared
off. Philip III was at peace with both England and the Netherlands. It
was not a moment too soon. For in that very year a new danger threatened
to set off a new European war on that sensitive, exposed nerve of the
Spanish Empire, the Rhineland route from Milan to Flanders. In 1608 the
elector of the Palatinate had drawn the German Protestant princes into
alliance in the Evangelical Union. In 1609 the elector of Bavaria had
replied by forming the Catholic League. The Evangelical Union looked
for support to Henri IV of France; the Catholic League had been largely
created by the Spanish ambassador to the emperor, Balthasar de Zufiiga,
the constant advocate of a forward policy throughout Europe. Now, in
1609, these forces were set dangerously in motion by a succession-crisis
in the duchy of Julich-Cleves on the Lower Rhine. The reigning Catholic
duke had died and his Protestant kinsmen quickly seized the inheritance.
The emperor claimed the right to decide and sent the Archduke Leopold
to occupy the duchy. One episode, in that combustible area, quickly led to
another: it seemed as if the Cologne war of 1583 was to be repeated. But
this time there was a difference. This time French power was able to inter-
vene; and Henri IV made it clear that he was going to intervene.
Precisely what Henri IV's plans were we cannot now say. The Spanish
government made heavy mirth over the amorous episode in the struggle:
Henri's pursuit of the fugitive Princesse de Conde, the 'new Helen' who
was to launch a new war of nations. Sully, in his Memoirs, decently
buried this detail behind a vast political enterprise. He ascribed to Henri
IV a 'Grand Design', entailing the destruction and division of the whole
267
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
IO-3DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Spanish Empire. Later historians have demolished that too-systematic
thesis. But it is certain that Henri IV—on however limited a front—
intended to renew the old, direct struggle between France and Spain. He
was already in treaty with the Protestant princes of Germany. Now, early
in 1610, he turned to Italy and concluded, with Charles Emmanuel of
Savoy, the Treaty of Brussolo, by which the forces of Savoy were to be
launched against Milan. He was thus ready for action against Spain both
in the Rhineland and in Italy. Then, in May 1610, he prepared to strike.
He declared his queen, Marie de Medici, regent of France in his absence,
caused her to be crowned, and prepared to lead his army to the Rhine.
Before he could leave Paris he was dead, murdered in his coach by the
dagger of Ravaillac. With that blow, the whole pattern of European
politics was changed.
Whether Spanish gold or Spanish agents had inspired Ravaillac or not,
his feat was an incomparable service to Spain. Olivares afterwards counted
it as one of the saving miracles of the House of Habsburg. For in effect,
for the next decade, it destroyed the new power of France which, during the
last decade, had forced Spain into retreat in Europe. Henri IV's Grand
Design, whatever it was, collapsed. The years which followed his reign
were like those which had preceded it. The France of Marie de Mddici,
like the France of Catherine de Medici, was held to ransom by the great
nobles, and both at court and among the great nobles the Spanish am-
bassador, Ifiigo de Cardenas, with his pensions and promises and
patronage, easily built up a party. He forced the resignation and de-
manded the imprisonment of Sully. He patronized the Jesuits and the
divots. Pere Coton, the Jesuit confessor, and the papal nuncio were his
closest allies. And having secured, or at least discovered, a government
entirely in the Spanish interest, he consolidated the alliance by means
of a double marriage treaty. In 1611 it was agreed that the young king of
France and the heir to the crown of Spain should each marry the other's
sister; and in the following years the marriages duly took place, in France
and Spain, in scenes of costly splendour which seemed to immortalize the
final concord of the Catholic crowns.
Betrayed from above, the lesser clients of Henri IV quickly made their
peace, happy if the new government of France sweetened the terms of
their surrender. The governor of Milan soon brought Savoy to reason.
Isolated and defeated, Charles Emmanuel was obliged to send his son to
Madrid with abject apologies and a written, though unsigned, profession
of homage to Spain. Soon Spinola would as easily settle the affairs of
Jiilich-Cleves: an excursion into the Palatinate, in 1614, re-established
Spanish patronage there and elsewhere. Meanwhile the princes of Italy
withdrew from exposed positions. Pope Paul V, though elected with
French support, had already become a Spanish client; now Venice made
its peace with him. Tuscany under a new faineant grand duke sank com-
268
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SPAIN AND EUROPE I 5 9 8 - I 6 2 I
fortably back into Spanish tutelage. The dukes of Mantua and Modena
hastily forgot their half-hatched anti-Spanish conspiracies. Instead of
European war, the year of 1610 began an age of European peace. And it
was Pax Hispanica. Defeated in France, defeated against England,
defeated in the Netherlands, it was nevertheless Spain—the Spain of
Philip III and Lerma—which was, or seemed, thanks to a series of sur-
renders and an assassin's knife, the sole and universal victor of Europe.
Flattery, pensions, an open-handed ambassador, royal marriage: such
was the technique of Spain in France. But why only in France ? After 1610
it was applied in England too, and hardly less successfully. Till 1610, in
spite of the peace of 1604, James I of England had continued the methods
and ministers of Queen Elizabeth. But in 1610 he emancipated himself,
first from Parliament, then from his inherited Elizabethan ministers. The
reign of the Howards, pro-Spanish and crypto-Catholic, began. The
memory of Queen Elizabeth was suppressed, the memory of Mary Queen
of Scots revived. The body of Mary—the agent and martyr of Rome and
Spain—was even brought in pomp from Fotheringhay to Westminster
Abbey. In 1613, by marrying his daughter to the Calvinist Elector
Palatine, James paid a last tribute to the old policy; but in the same year
he began a longer and more serious treaty to marry his heir to a Spanish
infanta. For the next ten years, while one infanta tied France to Spain,
another was dangled before the English Court. In England, as in France,
a skilful ambassador flattered the court, distributed bribes, appealed to
the snobisme of crowned heads and courtiers, and held up, as a shining
model, Spanish gravity, Spanish government, Spanish discipline. And
here as there, the treatment worked—indeed, its success here was even
greater. If Cardenas, in France, dismissed Sully from power, Gondomar,
in England, would send Sir Walter Raleigh to the block.
So the Pax Hispanica was established in Europe. It was a paradoxical
peace, for the universal victor was the power which had been universally
defeated. Economically, peace was more necessary to Spain than to any
of its enemies. And yet there could be no doubt that in the decade after
1610 Philip III seemed 'monarch of the world', more powerful through
peace than his father had been through war. Critics both in Spain and in
Europe might realize that his monarchy rested on precarious foundations,
but outwardly its strength was imposing. It might have withdrawn from
a few provinces, but its total extent was now greater than ever. It might
have lost all its wars, but its tercios were still invincible. It might be
bankrupt, but it always had money for pageants and pensions. Kings and
ministers, cardinals and bishops throughout Europe were its pen-
sionaries—even firm Protestant statesmen like the earl of Salisbury and
Maurice of Nassau featured on its payroll. And thanks to its alliance
with the church, and particularly with the Jesuits, it enjoyed genuine
269
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
ideological and social support even in independent or politically hostile
countries.
This indeed was the essence of the Pax Hispanica, its strength and its
weakness. It was not merely a set of political alliances: it was an inter-
national social system—static perhaps, parasitic perhaps, but deeply
involved in social interests everywhere. Spain at war might be the enemy
of the free states of Europe, but Spain at peace was the ally and example
of a whole social class, and moreover of a possessing social class, within
all those states. That social class was the class of princes and their courts—
administrators, courtiers, officers, and the great merchants and state
clergy who depended on them. Since the Jesuits, in Catholic countries,
had become the teachers and consolidators of this class, the Jesuits were
the natural allies of Spain. Wherever Spain triumphed, the Jesuits fol-
lowed; wherever the Jesuits were admitted, a pro-Spanish party was
created. Moreover (and herein lay the strength of the Spanish system),
this class was everywhere growing in wealth and numbers. It was the
European ruling class, a freemasonry, an 'establishment'.
Of course this social division was a source of weakness too. The Pax
Hispanica of Philip III was like the Pax Austriaca of Metternich. It was
essentially defensive. For in all the countries of Europe the princely
courts were becoming a social and economic burden, and opposition to
them was growing. If there was a freemasonry of the 'court', there was
also a freemasonry of the 'country', of the gentry and lesser merchants
who did not profit from the establishment, and who might enlist, above
or below them, at different times, other allies: discontented politicians,
special groups interested in war or privateering, or mutinous, overtaxed
consumers. This freemasonry of 'the country' can be found, with only
trivial differences, in many lands. Where Spain and the Counter-Reforma-
tion had triumphed, it was stifled; but in England, in Venice, in France, in
Holland it was articulate, even powerful. And it had a recognizable
ideology. It was conservative, with a conscious, positive conservatism, for
the 'court' was a mushroom beside the ancient institutions which it had
overtopped; it was nationalist, for it opposed an international system; it
was puritan, for the court lived by ostentatious consumption; and since
the court ultimately looked to Spanish power or example, it was anti-
Spanish.
How completely the Pax Hispanica was identified with the princely
' establishment' of the time can be seen if we compare the' country' parties
of both Catholic and Protestant lands and then look at the areas of direct
Spanish rule. The programme of the giovani in Venice—the lesser nobles
and merchants, ready for maritime aggression in the Mediterranean—is
hardly different from that of the English puritan 'country party' with its
allies the West Indian privateers, demanding maritime aggression in the
Atlantic, or from the Dutch Orangists with their allies, the exiled Flemings
270
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SPAIN AND EUROPE I 5 9 8 - 1 6 2 I
who would create the Dutch West India Company, the organ of oceanic
aggression even in time of peace. All these parties were, in some sense,
'puritan'. They were also nationalist and anti-Spanish. On the other hand
the ruling classes in all three countries—the court and city in Jacobean
London, the 'arminian' merchant oligarchies in Holland, the 'old'
nobility of land and finance in Venice—profited by the present system,
accepted, to some extent, the patronage of Spain, and were accused, in
consequence, of 'appeasement' and popery. Finally, in the countries of
direct Spanish rule the full effects of the Pax Hispanica could be seen. In
Italy, in Flanders, in Spain itself we see the growth of officialdom and
clericalism; the fiscal oppression and consequent flight of capital; the
transformation of municipal into bureaucratic institutions; the switch of
'bourgeois' wealth from trade into office or land (the basis of office);
the competition—and the market—in titles of nobility; and, in conse-
quence of this switch, the decay of industry and increase of 'official'
expenditure in lavish building or mere consumption. On top of all this
was the most obvious, most loudly denounced, of all burdens: the con-
stant pressure of huge Spanish armies, here migrant, there billeted, but
always predatory. When we remember that the Spanish Empire in Europe
included Flanders and Italy and much of the Rhineland between them,
and that the towns of these areas had hitherto been the commercial,
industrial and intellectual centres of Europe, and when we look at these
areas under Spanish rule and find them everywhere dominated by rural
landlords and urban officers, we may measure some of the social changes
which, if not caused, were at least favoured by Spanish patronage and
Spanish rule.
In the areas of direct rule the Pax Hispanica was successfully applied.
We see it at its most extreme in Spain itself, where emigration to America
and the expulsion of both Jewish entrepreneurs and Morisco labourers
still further weakened the productive classes while an inflated court lived
largely on foreign tribute. We see it at its most oppressive in Italy, where
the original vigour of the Counter-Reformation was largely spent and its
message, from a new spiritual adventure, had become little more than the
propaganda of a crushing social system. We see it at its best in Flanders,
where the challenge of material desolation, and the proximity of trium-
phant heresy, evoked, for a time, the positive, constructive spirit of the
Counter-Reformation.
Flanders indeed, the Flanders of the archdukes, was the shop-window
of the Counter-Reformation in northern Europe. There the old society
had been dissolved by the war. The great cosmopolitan entrepreneurs who
had made Antwerp the economic capital of Europe had largely emigrated
to Amsterdam, Hamburg, Frankfurt and the Baltic towns. The craftsmen
of the industrial towns had often gone with them. The old democratic
271
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
structure of the cities was broken. The States General were forbidden to
meet. But out of the ruins of the old urban freedom the new bureaucracy,
intellectually formed by the Jesuits, was gradually creating a new form of
society. Industry, destroyed in the towns, was revived on a rural basis.
There was even some rural prosperity. The towns, or some of them, were
compensated for their losses by becoming centres of consumption depen-
dent on the new, lavish, resident court. And the physical gaps in them left
by long years of war and iconoclasm were filled by new baroque churches
and palaces whose building, for a time, absorbed labour and distributed
wealth and whose decoration gave full employment to the greatest genius
of the Flemish Counter-Reformation, Peter Paul Rubens.
Nevertheless, even in Flanders the voice of protest was heard. In 1615
the city of Antwerp sought to recover some of its old prosperity by
drawing to it the English cloth-staple from Middelburg. The English of
course were heretics but they promised to be discreet and, on those terms,
Belgian theologians supported the project. Why then should they not
come? But the Spaniards saw one insuperable reason. What was profit,
they asked, compared with spiritual danger? Had not King Philip
expelled the Moriscos from Spain 'without counting the gains they had
brought him' ? So Antwerp was silenced. But four years later there was an
urban revolt in Brussels. It was a revolt not of city aldermen, the great
merchants converted by office and loans into government officials, but of
the lesser merchants organized in the merchant gilds. The Spaniards
recognized their enemy. ' Sire,' wrote an official to the king, ' this bour-
geoisie is proud and impudent, and this town has always been at the
head of all revolts... If you do not take steps to chastise and break it now,
while the stick is in your hand, it may be that, when you wish to do so, it
will be too late.'
In Italy, though the spirit was spent, the general pattern was similar.
The Spanish viceroys satisfied their distant masters with public donativos
and private bribes, and governed much as they pleased. They defended the
frontiers—Naples and Sicily against the Turks, Milan against Savoy;
smothered the economy of their provinces under top-heavy, predatory
courts; and paid the cost by raising the taxes on industry and transferring
lands, titles and jurisdictions to a growing local baronage. The highest
titles, especially in the kingdom of Naples, went to Genoese financiers,
the mainstay of the system. Most of these Spanish viceroys owed their
posts to kinship with Lerma. Some of them were patrons of art and letters
—though often in the spirit of the Roman Verres: their palaces, both in
Italy and in Spain, were stuffed with the spoils of empire, and the duke of
Osuna, it was noted, left Sicily with twice as much luggage as he had
brought in. Occasionally they sought to correct the financial and admini-
strative dropsy which was inseparable from the system: Lerma's son-in-
law, the count of Lemos, did this in Naples, thanks to the services of a
272
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SPAIN AND EUROPE I 5 9 8 - I 6 2 1
Portuguese Jew. But Lemos was an exception: in general the viceroys
allowed the process to proceed unchecked. In this way growing official
patronage could be used to silence some at least of the critics.
But outside the charmed circle they were not silenced. Voices were
always being raised against the foreign bureaucracy which had extin-
guished the old city republics and ruined the old industry and commerce.
Among the critics were poets like Marino and Tassoni, political writers
like Boccalini and Sarpi. Many of their protests, like Boccalini's Pietra del
Paragone, were not published by their authors. Others, like the famous
Filippiche, directed this time against Philip III, were anonymous. But
sometimes a particular combination of circumstances—a popular revolt
here, a princely challenge there—gave them means of public expression.
The misery of Calabria was the occasion of the messianic revolt in 1601
which brought the Dominican friar, Tomaso Campanella, to torture and
prison; the firmness of Venice under interdict gave Paolo Sarpi his
opportunity; the ambitions of Charles Emmanuel of Savoy released a
spate of anti-Spanish works. And in fact, thanks to the ancient mercantile
traditions of Venice and the random pugnacity of Savoy, it was in Italy,
in these years, that the Pax Hispanica was most frequently disturbed, and
the forces which would destroy it most clearly shown.
The constant opponent of the whole Spanish system in Italy was the
mercantile republic of Venice, the only republic which, by 1610, had not
yet yielded to Spanish pressure. Betrayed after the common victory of
Lepanto, Venice, under the lead of the new 'puritan' generation which
had broken through the old oligarchy, had recognized Spain as the enemy
without, the Counter-Reformation as the enemy within. In 1597 its
ambassador at Rome had contrived to break Philip II's project of a
league of Italian princes which (since he was himself one of them) would
have legalized a disguised Spanish protectorate over all Italy. Between
1605 and 1609 the republic had stood firm against the pope and the
Jesuits. But meanwhile the pressure of Spain had not slackened and
Venice felt it on all sides. By land the threat came from the duchy of
Milan, under direct Spanish rule, and from the Tyrol, now governed by
the most Spaniolized of the Austrian Habsburgs, the Archduke Fer-
dinand of Styria. By sea, the same archduke overlooked the base of the
Adriatic from Trieste and Carniola, and the Spanish viceroy of Naples
overlooked its mouth from Apulia. It happened that, in the reign of
Philip III, these three positions, Milan, Styria and Naples, were all com-
manded by masterful and aggressive men.
The pressure came first from Milan. From 1600 to 1610, the count of
Fuentes, as governor of Milan, had used despotic authority to extend
Spanish power and ensure Spanish communications. He had renewed
Philip II's treaty to ensure the passage of troops through the Catholic
273
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
cantons of Switzerland. He had built a fortress, the fuerte de Fuentes, to
command the even more vital route which linked Milan with the Tyrol,
the Spanish with the Austrian Habsburgs. This route passed through the
Valtelline, a valley whose Catholic population was subject to the Protes-
tant Swiss canton of the Grisons. To improve sea-communications with
Spain and Naples Fuentes had annexed or forced into vassalage a' series
of" petty lordships along the Ligurian coast: Piombino, Finale, Monaco.
He had also annexed Parma, Modena and Mirandola by force, seized
Lunigiana (commanding the inland route to Tuscany), and foreshadowed
Louis XIV's reunions by summoning independent princes to Milan to
account for alleged usurpations. And in the time of the Venetian Interdict
he had not hesitated to offer military force to the pope to crush the
religious obstinacy of the republic.
Fortunately, the republic was able to survive these threats. Without
breaking its own traditional neutrality, it was able to rely on an accidental
ally in north Italy. This was the irrepressible disturber of the Spanish
peace, Charles Emmanuel of Savoy.
Charles Emmanuel's excuse for making war on Spain was a claim to the
duchy of Montferrat, a detached possession of the duke of Mantua. On
the death of the duke of Mantua in 1612, Charles Emmanuel sought to
detach it politically as well as geographically. It was, he pointed out, a
feudo femminile. Spain dissented; but Charles Emmanuel was not
deterred. Ignoring all protests, refusing all mediation, he sent back his
collar of the Golden Fleece, expelled the Spanish ambassador, and seized
most of the duchy. In spite of successive defeats and occasional treaties,
he remained in arms for five years, against two successive governors of
Milan. In this he was sustained by the enthusiasm of Italian patriots, by
open military support from the Huguenot governor of Dauphine, the due
de Lesdiguieres (who paid as little heed to his government as the Spanish
viceroys did to theirs), and by secret subsidies from Venice.
But if Venice avoided a direct military confrontation with Spain in the
West, it was soon indirectly involved in the East. This involvement began
with the war against the Uskoks: Bosnian and Albanian pirates who,
with the encouragement of their overlord, the Archduke Ferdinand of
Styria, issued from Segna (Senj), on the Dalmatian coast, to prey on
Venetian commerce in the Adriatic. By 1613, having disposed of their
domestic enemies, the pope and the Jesuits, the Venetians had turned
their attention to this external nuisance, and made war on the Uskoks.
But one conflict soon led to another, and by 1615 Venice found itself at
war with the archduke on land as well as with the Uskoks by sea. The rest
of Europe recognized both the archduke and the Uskoks as Spanish
agents and acted accordingly: by 1617 there was a general resort of the
enemies of Spain to the Italian front. Dutch Protestant troops under
Maurice of Nassau fought for Venice on the Isonzo; English troops were
274
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SPAIN AND EUROPE 1 5 9 8 - 1 6 2 1
invited to join them; the ambassador of Savoy in London sought to
divert Sir Walter Raleigh from Guiana to Genoa. On the other side the
Spanish ambassador in Vienna, the Spanish governor of Milan, and the
Spanish viceroy of Naples contemplated open intervention not only
against Savoy, the open enemy of Spain, but against Venice. Venice, they
agreed, was the secret source and inspiration of all the enemies of Spain
in the Mediterranean. Venice, said the Spanish ambassador, the marquis
of Bedmar, 'has always sought to harm and depress the name of Spain'.
Fortunately, he added, it was now weak, a mere shadow of itself. With his
network of agents and his corrosive pensions he was ready to undermine
it within; and the new viceroy of Naples, the duke of Osuna, was ready
to strike from without. He had already set out to break the Venetian
control of the Adriatic; he had allied himself with the troublesome Uskoks;
and now he had a fleet poised at Brindisi, flying his personal flag, awaiting
the sign. 'If they resist', he wrote to Bedmar, ' I shall deal with them once
and for all'; he was prepared to strike 'in spite of the world, in spite of
the king, in spite of God'; and in spite too of the relatively unimportant
fact that, in 1617-18, by the treaties of Madrid and Wiener Neustadt,
both Savoy and Venice had made peace with both Spain and the archduke.
In fact Venice acted first. On 18 May 1618 its inhabitants awoke to
find the corpses of two of Osuna's supposed agents hanging on the
public gibbet, upside-down, with the limbs broken, signifying treason. Five
days later a third corpse was exposed, mutilated by torture. No explana-
tion was given, but it was clearly advertised that the republic had acted
just in time. Bedmar, after an attack on his palace, fled from Milan
without waiting for orders from his government. Osuna was burnt in
effigy. So was his most trusted agent, the Spanish poet and satirist
Francisco de Quevedo, who himself escaped from Venice immediately
after the incident but never explained the mystery of his presence there.
It was not the first time that Quevedo had made such an escape. In 1613
he had similarly escaped from Nice where Osuna had employed him in a
plot to seize that town for Spain. From this parallel it was difficult not
to draw certain conclusions.
The reality of' the Spanish conspiracy' has often been doubted. Possibly
there was no precise plan. The complicity of Osuna and Bedmar cannot be
demonstrated. But there can be no doubt that both were contemplating a
coup against Venice even if the particular episode illustrated the suspicion
they incurred rather than the plans they had laid. 1 Osuna in particular
1
The true facts of 'the Spanish conspiracy' are still contested. The latest authority,
Giorgio Spini, 'La congiura degli spagnoli contro Venezia del 1618', Archivio Storico
Italiano (1949-50), shows, from the Spanish archives, that neither Osuna nor Bedmar was
committed to the particular projects revealed by captured spies and conspirators in Venice;
and from this he concludes 'che di congiura spagnola contro Venezia non e possibile parlare
in alcuna maniera, neppure nel senso piu limitato'. But this merely absolves them from com-
plicity in one particular project. It remains certain that both Bedmar and Osuna envisaged
275
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
aroused the deepest suspicions. Though a brilliant sea-captain and naval
organizer, who had delivered some notable blows at the Turks, he was
irresponsible, even disastrous, as a governor. He destroyed the admini-
strative work of his predecessor in Naples, courted popularity by ostenta-
tious demagogy, and ruined the province by his arbitrary rapacity. His
reign has been described, by a modern historian of Naples, as beginning
' the worst period of the Spanish viceroyalty'. After the Venetian fiasco he
was recalled to Madrid in 1620, accused—no doubt falsely—of seeking
to make himself independent king of Naples, and died in prison. Mean-
while, thanks to the quiescence of the Great Powers the Spanish con-
spiracy had had no sequel. It illustrated the international tension, but it
was not this episode that was to break the Spanish peace.
The tension, however, remained and other incidents were soon to
follow. Osuna was not the only fire-eating viceroy, nor Bedmar the only
conspiratorial ambassador. In fact, by 1618, though the Spanish govern-
ment remained quiescent, its European officials were everywhere demand-
ing and sometimes enforcing an aggressive, forward policy. If Bedmar
and Osuna were frustrated in Venice, Gondomar was successful in
England. It was in 1618 that he achieved his most spectacular success: the
execution of Sir Walter Raleigh for invading the king of Spain's monopoly
in America. On the other hand in Bohemia the equally aggressive policy
of successive Spanish ambassadors met a spectacular check. The very
month in which the Spanish conspiracy was announced in Venice saw an
equally dramatic episode in Bohemian history: the Defenestration of
Prague.
Bohemia had long been an advanced post of Spanish power and diplo-
macy. Prague had been the capital of the Emperor Rudolf II, and the
centre of all the intrigues concerning the succession to his throne. Even
after the capital of the empire had moved to Vienna, Bohemia retained its
importance: for whoever was elected as next king of Bohemia would
probably hold the casting vote in the election of the next emperor. At
present both crowns were safely on the same Habsburg head, but in the
some such coup, and it was the knowledge of such ambitions which generated the hysterical
fear of conspiracy in Venice. In their private correspondence and conversations, Osuna and
Bedmar made no secret of their plans: see, for instance, Osuna's letters in Colleccidn de
Documentos Ineditos, Vol. XLIV, and the documents concerning Bedmar printed in I.
Raulich, 'Una relazione del marchese di Bedmar sui Veneziani', Nuovo Archivio Veneto
(1898); P. Negri, 'La politica veneta contro gli Uscocchi in relazione alia congiura di 1618',
ibid. (1909), pp. 370-84; and Lamberto Chiarelli, 'II marchese di Bedmar e i suoi confidenti',
Archivio Veneto-Tridentino (1925). How far Osuna and Bedmar were actually prepared to
go is of course another matter, and one which, in the absence of any record of the Venetian
investigation, is perhaps insoluble. After the debacle, Osuna and Bedmar naturally posed as
injured innocents. Their protests have been repeated by most Spanish historians, but not by
the best qualified among them, Cesareo Fernandez Duro, who regretfully but emphatically
dissents. See his El gran Duque de Osuna ysu Marina (Madrid, 1885) and Armada Espanola,
Vol. in (Madrid, 1897), p. 349.
276
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SPAIN AND EUROPE I 5 9 8 - 1 6 2 I
childlessness of the Austrian Habsburgs the future was far from certain.
If the Bohemian Diet should elect the wrong king, and the empire, in
consequence, pass into the wrong hands, the effect in the Spanish Empire
would be serious; for the emperor was lord of numerous fiefs in Italy,
controlled the Tyrolean passes, and had rights throughout the Rhineland,
including the sovereignty of Alsace. Thus the future of the crown of
Bohemia was an essential Spanish interest, and from the time of Philip II
onward the Spanish ambassadors in Prague had laboured to build up a
strong Spanish and Catholic party. Throughout the reign of Philip III this
party was headed by the chancellor of Bohemia, Zdenek Lobkovic. From
1608 till 1617 the Spanish ambassador to the empire was one of the most
masterful of Spanish statesmen, Balthasar de Zufiiga; in 1617 Zuniga was
succeeded by an even more forceful official, the count of Ofiate. Under
the weak emperors Rudolf and Matthias these men exercised decisive
influence both in Prague and in Vienna.
The ultimate aim of Zuniga and Ofiate was to ensure the succession of a
safely Spaniolized member of the Habsburg family to the crown of Bohe-
mia and the empire. In the uncertainties of the time they sometimes
thought of solving the problem by advancing Philip Ill's own claims; but
as neither Philip nor Lerma welcomed such a prospect, they preferred to
surrender these claims to a reliable Austrian Habsburg in exchange for
solid assets. The reliable Habsburg proposed was, of course, their con-
stant ally the Archduke Ferdinand. The solid assets suggested were Al-
sace, an essential stage on the route to Flanders; the Tyrol, which linked
Italy with Germany and provided an alternative route to the north; and
the imperial fiefs in Italy. In spite of the apathy of Madrid, Zuniga had
already made progress with these plans when he returned to Spain in
1617. His successor Ofiate completed them, in that year, by negotiations
culminating in a secret treaty signed at the Archduke Ferdinand's resi-
dence, Graz. As a result of these negotiations the Emperor Matthias
designated Ferdinand as his heir; to avoid uncertainty, the Bohemian
estates, brilliantly managed by Lobkovic, pre-elected Ferdinand to be
their king on the death of Matthias; and Ferdinand paid for Philip Ill's
renunciation of his claims by the promise of Alsace and the Tyrol to be
given to Spain in full sovereignty. Thus in 1617 the Spanish party had won
a complete triumph in Bohemia and the empire, had secured both for the
future.'and incidentally had guaranteed Spanish communications in Europe.
Unfortunately this paper triumph was too good to last. In May 1618 the
Protestant nobility of Bohemia struck back. They threw the hispanophil
Catholic ministers out of the window of the Hradzany Palace and set up a
revolutionary government whose first act was to expel those constant
allies of Spain, the Jesuits. Having gone so far, it was essential to go
further. To consolidate their position the revolutionary noblemen needed
a revolutionary king: they could not possibly accept the pre-electedpro-
277
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
tege of Spain, the Archduke Ferdinand. They therefore looked around for
a sufficiently radical candidate; and their eyes lit on the boldest Calvinist
prince, the leader, or figurehead, of the Evangelical Union, Frederick V,
Elector Palatine.
The effect of this sudden and dramatic coup in Bohemia was instantly
felt throughout Europe. All the enemies of Spain were roused. Two
months later the Protestant party in the Valtelline murdered their
Catholic enemies, whom they accused of 'Hispanismus', seized control
of the pass, and so cut Milan off from the Tyrol. As the same time, Savoy
and Venice made a formal alliance against future aggression. In August
Maurice of Nassau, the leader of the war party in Holland, overthrew,
arrested and would afterwards judicially murder the Advocate Olden-
barnevelt, the maker of the Truce of 1609, which he was now accused of
seeking to prolong by appeasement of popery and Spain. Next year Venice
and Holland joined in a defensive alliance explicitly directed against Spain.
Meanwhile, in Spain, Lerma himself was at last driven from power by his
domestic enemies. It seemed as if the Pax Hispanica was over.
In fact it was not yet over. In fact it might still have been preserved. As
yet, none of the great powers who preserved it wished to see it broken.
Even when the Emperior Matthias had died and the Elector Palatine had
accepted the throne of Bohemia, the cause of peace was not yet lost; for
two days later the Archduke Ferdinand, at Frankfurt, as yet unaware of
his deposition, helped to elect himself emperor. Thus the empire at least
was safe. The Treaty of Graz would stand. All that was lost was Bohemia.
But Bohemia in itself was not a direct Spanish interest; the successors of
Lerma had no wish to reverse his policy; James I of England refused
to support his usurping son-in-law; French mediation kept both the
Catholic League and the Evangelical Union neutral. The storm was
stayed.
In fact, once the empire had been secured for the Habsburgs, the
Bohemian adventure might even prove an asset to Spain. It opened local
opportunities, supplied local excuses. In 1620, while the Elector Palatine
was being crowned in his new capital, Spinola again marched from Flanders
into the Palatinate and thus neutralized another danger-spot on the
Rhineland route. At the same time the governor of Milan carried out a
successful coup in the Valtelline. Under his patronage the Catholic party
in the valley suddenly rose and in the Sacro Macello [the Holy Butchery],
massacred their Protestant rulers and placed the vital corridor, for a time,
under Spanish protection. The Bohemian affair itself would soon be
locally liquidated. The Battle of the White Mountain would drive the
usurper from Prague. Then there would be a general settlement. The Pax
Hispanica could be restored, and with advantage to Spain.
Why was it not restored ? When we ask that question, we are obliged to
turn away from events to persons. The logic of events did not require a
278
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SPAIN AND EUROPE I 5 9 8 - 1 6 2 I
general war, but the new Spanish rulers, the men who were creating these
events, did. The old Spanish rulers, the men of Madrid, did not create the
events, nor did they want war. Philip III and Lerma, having swallowed the
bitter pill of las Pazes, wished to keep the peace from which, incidentally,
they profited. Lerma's successors also wished to keep it: they were
profiting from it too. The other European great powers who guaranteed
the peace, England and France, also did not wish to disturb it. But the
Spaniards in Europe—the Osunas, the Bedmars, the Ferias, the Ziinigas,
the Ofiates—thought differently. They were convinced that the Spanish
peace had already failed and they looked forward to 1621, when the truce
of 1609 would run out and war could be resumed. That was why they
were pressing on all fronts, provoking incidents, forcing action. They
wished to be ready to deliver the knock-out blow. By 1621 they must be
poised for action on all fronts. Italy, the reservoir of Spanish armies,
must be securely held. Venice, the focus of heresy and discontent in Italy,
the southern ally of Holland, must be crushed. The Valtelline must be
controlled, the Rhineland guaranteed, the danger from the Palatinate
eliminated. Then, when the truce lapsed, the northern war could be
launched and the Netherlands reconquered, this time for good.
In 1617, when Lerma fell from power, this 'war party' won its first
victory. It was not that the new junta in Madrid, a mere court faction,
was on their side. It was because in that year Balthasar de Ziifiiga returned
from Germany to Madrid and sat, as their spokesman, on the Council of
State. Next year the truculent Bedmar, expelled from Venice, appeared as
ambassador in Brussels to overrule the Archduke Albert. And then, in
1621, the year when the truce expired, the archduke expired too. With his
death, the sovereignty of Flanders returned to Madrid. But it did not
return to the pacific Philip III. In the same year he also died, and on his
death the advocates of war, kept hitherto on the periphery, closed finally
upon the centre of power. Balthasar de Zufiiga dictated policy; and
Balthasar de Zufiiga had a nephew who shared his views, followed his
lead, and absolutely controlled his pupil, the young King Philip IV.This
nephew was Gaspar de Guzman, the future count-duke of Olivares, who
would seek to renew, in the Netherlands and in France, even in the Baltic
and against England, the most grandiose ambitions of Philip II.
Why did the viceroys and governors of 1618, the policy-makers of 1621,
regard the Pax Hispanica as a failure? Had they, among the wealth of
Flanders and Italy, forgotten the poverty and bankruptcy of Spain ? Were
they insensitive to all reasons but force? We cannot say this. They in-
cluded able men, and at the Council of State they heard, and uttered,
reasoned views. Their view was that the Netherlands Truce of 1609—
perhaps even the English peace of 1604—though they had seemed so
necessary at the time and had opened up an age of peaceful Spanish
279
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
supremacy, had in fact been a terrible mistake. Philip II had been right.
The war should have been fought to a finish.
For who had really gained by las Pazes ? One after another the Spanish
statesmen expressed their views. In interpretation at least they were
unanimous. In the years of peace Spain, in spite of its superficial magnifi-
cence, had sunk still further into poverty and torpor. In the same years the
Dutch, in spite of their odious heresy and indecent institutions, had
become the richest, most dynamic people in Europe. In 1620 Carlos
Coloma, the governor of Cambrai, wrote a memorandum on the subject.
When the truce had been made, he declared, the Spaniards had supposed
that peace would relieve their treasury and gradually dissolve the spirit and
polity of the Dutch. But had any of these things in fact happened ? They
had not. On the contrary, the Dutch had made covert war on Spain in
Venice and Germany, had captured the trade of East and West Indies,
and had built up in twelve years an empire such as had cost the Portuguese
and Spaniards 120 years. Amsterdam, forty years ago 'an almost un-
known village', had become a world-city eclipsing Genoa for wealth,
Lisbon for merchandise, Venice for situation.' I conclude', wrote Coloma,
'that if in twelve years of peace they have undertaken and achieved all
this, we can easily see what they will do if we give them more t i m e . . . If
the truce is continued, we shall condemn ourselves to suffer at once all the
evils of peace and all the dangers of war.' In Madrid the same view was
expressed in the Council of State by Balthasar de Zuniga. 'If the republic
of these rebels goes on as it is', he said, 'we shall succeed in losing, first
the two Indies, then the rest of Flanders, then the states of Italy, and
finally Spain itself.' If seemed to him as if the Spaniards had shed their
blood only to fill the veins of subject nations: 'we have left our own
country deserted and sterile in order to populate and fertilize the countries
which we have conquered.' Therefore, these men argued, the disastrous
truce must be ended, or at least only continued if the Dutch were effectively
excluded from the East and West Indies, if they re-opened the Scheldt, and
if they gave up 'their ill-founded liberty'. As that was hardly likely, let
there be war. If the social and political system of the Spanish Empire were
to be preserved, the social and political system of the Netherlands must be
destroyed. Amsterdam, like Venice, must be annihilated.
But why had Spain lost the peace ? Was it not precisely because it had
used the peace only to consolidate such a system ? In other words, was it
not because the system itself had failed? A greater man than Zuniga or
Coloma had already pointed that moral. In 1616 Gondomar, at the height
of his success in England—a success which consisted in keeping England
at peace—had set out his views at length in a secret despatch to the court
of Spain. The burden of the despatch was that the Spanish government
was losing the peace and that unless better use was made of the peace,
' I consider that war would be much better for the Catholic religion and for
280
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SPAIN AND EUROPE I 5 9 8 - 1 6 2 I
the state and monarchy of Spain'. For by means of the peace the English
were increasing their trade and wealth and at the same time ceasing to do
very little of what they did in war. They were becoming rich at the expense
of Spain which, for all its mines, was now the poorest country in Europe,
bringing gold and silver from overseas 'only to distribute them among
all the nations of the world whose ships wait to carry it home'. If Spain
wished to profit by the peace, Gondomar insisted that it adopt a new and
positive policy. It was not enough merely to draw breath and meanwhile
to maintain, in repose, a static, aristocratic, bureaucratic system. A radical
change was necessary. The government must invest in commerce, en-
courage shipping, found trading companies, abolish inland tolls, give
honour, status and public facilities to merchants: in short, adopt a com-
plete mercantilist policy. If this were done wealth might be restored to
Spain, shipping would be increased, and sea-power would give ultimate
victory: 'for the world today is such that whosoever rules the sea, rules
the land also'. But if this were not done, then the proper course was war,
and war now: for time was not on the side of those who sat still. King
Philip must send 'invincible Armadas to conquer this kingdom'. After all,
Gondomar went on, the conquest of England was easy (Osuna thought the
conquest of Venice, Coloma the conquest of Holland easy). Only winds
and waves could hinder it. Had it not been for winds and waves, Philip II
would soon have achieved it in '88. History showed that every invader
who had landed in England had conquered it: the Romans, the Saxons,
the Danes, the Normans. Therefore (since expeditions to England and
Ireland had misfired) a fleet should be sent to Scotland; in eight days from
the first battle on English soil, London 'the arsenal for all the enemies of
God and Spain' would fall; and 'England being won, the King our Lord
will be true monarch of the world: for till then we risk the loss of the East
and West Indies and cannot hope to reduce Holland; but thereafter all is
ours and the rest is easy'.
In the midst of these fantasies, these nostalgic dreams of the Empresa
de Inglaterra, Gondomar had touched the heart of the problem. If Spain
was to win the peace, it must undergo a radical, even a structural change.
If it was not prepared for such a change, the empire could only be pre-
served by using force, while its force was superior, to crush its enemies,
and to crush them at their head. Gondomar's prescription of force differed
from that of Zuniga and Coloma. Castilians, landsmen, whose services
had been on the continent of Europe, they urged the conquest of Holland
by land. Their minds dwelt on Italy, the Valtelline, Alsace, the Palatinate:
the essential land-route. England they would have kept neutral: then-
policy was that of the duke of Alba in the 1560s. Gondomar, a Galician
from the Atlantic coast, familiar with the sea, serving in England, believed
in sea-power. He would have conquered England in order to recover sea-
power and open up the sea-route again: his policy was that of Philip II
281
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
in the 1580s. But these were merely tactical differences: the ultimate
objective, now as then, was the same: through peace or through war, by
land or by sea, this way or that, the Carthage on the Zuider Zee must be
destroyed.
So, in 1621, the matter was debated in Madrid. At first, we are told, the
advocates of a forward policy found themselves in a minority. No doubt
the poverty of the crown was more obvious to officials in Madrid that it
had been in spendthrift embassies and viceregal palaces abroad. But soon
the balance was turned. It was turned by the representatives of the East
and West India trades, the Councils of Portugal and of the Indies. These
men were only too well aware of Dutch expansion during the truce, and
now they agreed with Zurliga and Coloma: the heart of Holland should be
destroyed by land in order to loosen its tentacles at sea. So they threw
their weight on his side and turned the scale. The diplomatic conjuncture,
after all, was favourable. France and England, for the moment, would not
stir. A quick campaign would do it. The only protests came—as they
would long continue to come—from Belgium, sacrificed on the altar of
Spanish imperialism. But who now cared about Belgium? On 3 July 1621
the archduke died with the truce he had made, and none heeded his last
feeble protest, 'even if all Europe is destined to be subject to one monarch,
that time is not yet'. 1
Thus, in the end, the truce was not renewed, and Spain found itself,
once again, at war with 'the rebels' in the north. The diplomatic con-
juncture was favourable. The two branches of the House of Habsburg
were united in action as they had never been in the reign of Philip II. It
seemed that, this time, the final blow would be struck. In fact, the merging
of two wars—the war of Bohemia and the war of the Netherlands—
was to engender the worst of all European wars hitherto: the Thirty Years
War in which the European supremacy of Spain would finally founder.
1
Spanish resentment at the economic consequences of the truce can be seen in several
documents printed in H. Lonchay and J. Cuveher, Correspondance de la Court d'Espagne
sur les Affaires des Pays Bas, 1598-1700, Vol. 1 (Brussels), e.g. Nos. 1375, 1466, 1488;
Coloma's views are given in two papers of 1620 and 1621 printed in A. Rodriquez Villa,
Ambrosio Splnola, Primer Marques de los Balbases (Madrid, 1904), pp. 342-8, 382 ff. The
opinions of Zuniga are quoted in J. Carrera Pujal, Historia de la Economia Espanola
(Barcelona, 1943), Vol. 1, 485 f. Gondomar's despatch of 1616 is printed in Pascual
Gayangos, Cinco Cartas Politico-Literarias de ... Gondomar (Madrid, 1869).
282
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER X
THE STATE OF GERMANY (to 1618)
in the early seventeenth century was a land of contrasts.
It was a great and on the whole a prosperous country, even if it no
longer led Europe in either mining or industrial technique or in
financial expertise. In political structure, it was 'the Roman empire of the
German nation'—briefly, the German Reich—at whose apex was
enthroned the Kaiser Rudolf II (1576-1612), the senior representative of
the Austrian branch of the Habsburg arch-house. In 1606 his envoys had
concluded at Sitvatorok in Hungary a peace with the Turkish sultan
doubly unprecedented, alike in its terms and its duration. Further terri-
tories had to be ceded to the Turk, but the Christian prince was for the
first time admitted by the Muslim as a monarch of equal status, and over
half a century elapsed before formal war was resumed between them.
Although the chronic threat of Turkish invasion did not immediately
disappear, the internecine struggles which were soon to devastate much of
central Europe were in fact conducted without interference from the in-
fidel. Yet despite the aura of partly successful achievement that might in
retrospect seem to surround the Sitvatorok agreement, it had been made
only because Turkish government was as incapable as the Austrian. The
plight of the Habsburgs in Germany was never so desperate as in the early
seventeenth century. The kaiser was an elderly and half-demented recluse,
the Reich constitution was being eroded almost to the point of disappear-
ance, political and religious antagonisms within Germany had been mount-
ing towards the point of crisis for a generation and more, while the lack
of a firm central government was a grave disadvantage to the economic
development of the country and made it possible for foreign armies to
prey upon the inhabitants in frontier regions. In this chapter, the main topics
will be considered one by one—first, the family difficulties of the ruling
dynasty, then the political and religious problems which were causing the
breakdown of the Reich constitution, and lastly the condition of German
industry and trade.
G
ERMANY
A major weakness of the Austrian Habsburgs lay in the division of
their patrimony between various members of the family—the fruit of
improvident partitioning in previous generations. Tyrol, Vorarlberg and
the Swabian lands were administered by the Archduke Maximilian, while
his cousin the Archduke Ferdinand independently ruled Styria, Carinthia
and Carniola. Kaiser Rudolf, who resided at Prague, was represented at
Vienna by his brother the Archduke Matthias. Rudolf was now secluded
in the Hradiany Palace, increasingly remote from political realities and
283
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
subject to hallucinations and to long bouts of melancholy during which
he was unwilling either to transact public business or delegate his authority
to others. From 1600, he was seen by few people other than his domestic
servants—creatures who might be bribed to induce him at a favourable
moment to signify his will, to sign a document or even to grant an audience.
Since 1594, he had ceased to attend meetings of the Reichstag. His devo-
tion to the Catholic cause was complete, though owing to the irregu-
larities of his private life he went—in great trepidation—to confession at
Easter only, and he no longer cared even for Jesuits. He was at logger-
heads with all his nearest relatives. He envied his cousin of Spain for his
wealth and power. He had fallen out with his brothers, of whom three
had survived—Matthias, Maximilian and Albrecht. Matthias he dis-
trusted as obvious (though unrecognized) claimant to the succession and
therefore a possible supplanter; Albrecht he never forgave for marrying
the Spanish infanta for whose hand he had himself irresolutely negotiated
for some twenty years. As none of the four brothers had any legitimate
children, the ultimate succession was likely to pass to the young Archduke
Ferdinand of Styria. But much was to happen before this reunion of the
Habsburg lands.
The family bickerings that came near to wrecking the future of the
Austrian dynasty may in their immediate origins be traced to the series
of events that led up to the conclusion of the Sitvatorok treaty. In 1604,
Rudolf had provoked a rebellion in Hungary by an ill-timed disclosure
of his intention to uproot heresy there. Under the leadership of Stephen
Bocskay, the Magyars rose to defend their liberties; before long, Hun-
garian forces with their Turkish and Tartar contingents were under the
walls of Vienna and the invasion of Austria and Moravia seemed im-
minent. The news of disaster brought upon the kaiser a renewed fit of his
distemper: he withdrew completely from contact with the outside world
and allowed public business to come to a standstill. Four of the arch-
dukes, including Matthias and Ferdinand, thereupon met in family con-
clave and combined to force Rudolf in the following year to delegate to
Matthias all his authority in Hungary, and a little later, full power to
conclude a peace with the Turks. The indispensable preliminary for this
was to win over the defiant Hungarian leaders; this in turn involved the
grant to Hungary of distasteful concessions that included complete
toleration to both Lutheranism and Calvinism, together with enlarged
constitutional liberties, a recognition of Transylvanian autonomy and of
Bocskay as prince of Transylvania. Matthias with great reluctance agreed
to these conditions, the Hungarians were won over and the Turks,
deserted by their essential allies and encumbered by commitments else-
where, soon agreed to the peace. Such limited realism as Matthias had
displayed in making the Hungarian agreement and the Turkish treaty was
however incomprehensible to the kaiser, who brooded on the unrighteous-
284
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE STATE OF GERMANY (TO I 6 1 8)
ness of the concessions. There was a grave danger that some sudden asser-
tion of his will might upset the peace and bring all into question again.
Yet only disaster could be expected from a reopening of the war, and it
was evident that a further restraint must be put upon the political au-
thority of Rudolf. At another family conclave the archdukes, with the
encouragement of Melchior Khlesl, Bishop of Vienna, agreed that
Matthias should be recognized as head of the family and that the practical
exercise of power in Bohemia and Austria should be transferred to him,
Rudolf retaining the title only of kaiser.
High responsibilities were thus falling upon Matthias, an elderly man
of mediocre ability who had not yet shed personal ambitions. It was in any
case a difficult task for him to respect the frontier between obedience to the
family behest and the infliction of damage on long-term dynastic interests.
The latter were ill-served by the method now employed by Matthias to
lever himself into power—the invocation of the Estates of the various pro-
vinces, who profited by the struggle between Rudolf and Matthias to
assert their own privileges. The details of the conflict are related elsewhere
in this volume. When in May 1611 Matthias was formally recognized as
the supplanter of his brother by coronation at Prague as king of Bohemia,
his authority was chiefly honorific. In Austria, still more in Hungary and
above all in the lands of the Bohemian crown, power had passed to the
nobles, a class permeated by heresy, whose ascendancy endangered
the liberties of the peasants and the towns. They were in close touch
with the Protestant princes of the Reich, who were interested and hopeful
spectators of the fratricidal struggle. The Calvinists especially welcomed
the apparent crumbling of the chief Catholic monarchy within the Reich.
In January 1612 Rudolf died, still plotting revenge against his enemies,
real and imaginary, and Matthias was formally elected kaiser.
The feeble rule of Matthias, kaiser from 1612 to 1619, was a tense and
unstable period for the Reich and for the Austrian Habsburg patrimony,
and the deluge began before his death. In all his territories the Estates had
the upper hand, and even in Austria his authority was circumscribed.
Reverses at the hands of the prince of Transylvania and of the Republic
of Venice underlined Habsburg weakness. Matthias himself was no
gloomy solitary like his brother. He loved company, hunting and music,
but he had no taste for business, the conduct of which fell chiefly into the
hands of Bishop Khlesl—cardinal from 1616. Khlesl was now an old
man; in his prime he had been the champion of the Counter-Reformation
in Austria, but now, partly because he saw that an inflexible policy would
invite final disaster to the Habsburg dynasty, still the keystone of the
Catholic cause, and partly perhaps with an eye to the maintenance of his
own position in politics, he was prepared to act the statesman and com-
promise with the Protestants. For the inflamed politics of the Reich,
this had some momentary significance. But at home, the conciliatory line
285
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
favoured by Khlesl brought him into disfavour with the younger members
of the arch-house—notably the heir, Ferdinand of Styria, whose in-
fluence in the government grew steadily. The likelihood of children being
born to Matthias decreased year by year, and accordingly the problem of
the succession ultimately came to dominate the scene. The chief external
obstacle to the smooth passage of the Archduke Ferdinand to power lay in
the claims of the king of Spain, whose continued goodwill and support were
indispensable. Philip III was, through his mother, a grandson of Kaiser
Maximilian II, while Ferdinand was no more than a nephew. A Spanish
claim was therefore put forward in 1613 to the Bohemian and Hungarian
thrones, or alternatively in compensation to Tyrol and the hereditary lands
in Swabia and Alsace. Ferdinand finally bought off his cousin in 1617 by a
secret agreement, in which he promised the cession of family possessions
in south-west Germany and of certain imperial rights in Italy. Internally,
there were initial obstructions from Khlesl, on the grounds that the succes-
sion of such a partisan would embitter the relations between Protestant
and Catholic in Germany: but the real problem lay in the attitude of the
Estates of the various Habsburg lands. The complicated manoeuvres
needed to secure their assent were still not completed in 1618 when diplo-
macy was overtaken by events. A revolution had broken out in Bohemia.
Events in Germany did not wait upon the settlement of the family dis-
putes of the arch-house. Throughout the reign of Rudolf II the Reich
constitution was under severe strain, and its component organs were
ceasing to discharge their functions. The troubles in the Rhineland re-
flected the feebleness of the executive. 1 A further ominous development
was the maiming of the Reich chamber tribunal, the supreme organ of
imperial justice. Its competence was admitted by all, and although there were
manifest defects in its working it had some claim to be regarded as im-
partial. But from 1588 onwards the regular annual review of its verdicts by
an appellate commission [ Visitationskommissiori] appointed by the Reichs-
tag had lapsed. Disappointed litigants were thus free to bring their grievances
before the Reichstag itself, where politics alone counted. The 1594 and
1597 Reichstags had both concerned themselves with this situation, and
the latter allotted to its interim committee [Deputationstag] the task not
only of resuscitating the appellate commission and thus restoring to the
chamber tribunal some semblance of impartial authority, but also of
judging the outstanding appeals. Foremost among these was the highly deli-
cate problem of adjudicating the legal position with regard to four religious
houses in south-west Germany that a generation or so earlier had been
secularized by lay neighbours [Vierklosterstreit]. Their fate, by implica-
tion, involved the fate of many other secularizations that had taken place
since 1552. The committee was torn by its regard for strict legality which
1
See Vol. in in this series, Chapter x.
286
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE STATE OF GERMANY (TO l 6 l 8 )
dictated a confirmation of the verdicts of the chamber tribunal that the
houses must be restored to religion, and the conflicting confessional par-
tisanship of its members. In the end, the more extreme Protestants in
1601 withdrew from the committee, which thereupon adjourned without
reaching any decision. Only the Calvinist leaders saw any cause for
pleasure in this final breakdown of the effort to mend the machinery of
Reich justice. Henceforth, however learned the chamber tribunal might
be, there was no hope of earning general respect and acceptance for its
verdicts. Somewhat paradoxically, the sinking of its fortunes helped to
strengthen the rival jurisdiction of the Reich court council, which was
under the control of the kaiser: in the controversies that raged over
Aachen, Strasbourg and Donauworth, its voice alone was heard. But its
competence was flatly rejected by the Protestants.
From the undoing of the Reich supreme law court to the paralysis
of its legislature was not a long step. Rudolf II was no lover of Reichs-
tags; he did not convene one until 1582. But the renewal of the Turkish
war in 1593 made it impossible to avoid this disagreeable necessity, and
accordingly there were meetings of the Reichstag in 1594, 1597, 1603 and
1608. Unhappily, the business of these gatherings was apt to boil down to
the twin topics of voting the subsidies requested by the kaiser to enable him
to keep the Turks at bay, and the ventilation of the grievances felt by one
religious party against the other. After 1594 the kaiser no longer appeared
in person, and the princely habit of sending proxies developed, so that
each assembly was less and less a meeting-place for the German ruling
class and more and more a catalyst for inflaming controversial issues in
politics and religion. In 1594 and 1597 the subsidies were granted, but on
the latter occasion the Calvinist leaders—the 'corresponding princes'—
refused to accept liability to pay taxes they had not personally voted. In
1603, for local reasons, they were more disposed to comply with the
imperial request for aid, but after an harmonious beginning the session
ran into violent storms as soon as the problem of Reich justice and the
ancillary matter of the verdict of the chamber tribunal in the cases of the
four religious houses was raised. No decision could be reached, and the
assembly came to an end with confessional antagonism sharpened. The
Protestants were in a permanent minority, and the Calvinists now took
the logical but catastrophic course of denying the competence of a
majority vote either in Reichstag or appellate commission: they demanded
parity of representation. It is one of the many ironies of German history
in this period that the chief of the corresponding princes responsible for
this momentous fracturing of the Reich constitution should have been
the Elector Palatine Frederick IV (1583-1610), a drunken young Nim-
rod, lavish in his court expenditure and lazily content to have his
policy executed for him by a circle of narrow-minded and pedantic
councillors.
287
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
The next Reichstag, in 1608, opened with the Protestants in full alarm
at the manifest intentions of the kaiser in Hungary, the progress of the
Spanish troops in the Netherlands and their misdeeds in the Rhineland,
capped by the sudden news of the Bavarian intervention in the free city
of Donauworth a few weeks earlier. 1 Tempers were short, and the
Protestants were challenged over the central issue of their acquisitions
since the religious deadline of 1552. In the contentious and stormy
atmosphere thus generated, no constructive business was possible. The
moderate Lutherans, led by electoral Saxony, for a time actually took
their stand beside the palatine and other Calvinist fire-eaters, but in the
end it was the latter alone who disrupted the assembly by their abrupt
departure. The legislature thereupon broke up without the usual for-
malities and courtesies. After this disaster, there might seem to be faint
hope of fruitful achievement from any subsequent assembly. Neverthe-
less in 1613 Khlesl, in pursuit of his policy of compromise, persuaded the
Kaiser Matthias to summon another meeting. It was not quite so forlorn
a venture as might at first sight appear, for both the Catholic League and
the Protestant Union, the contending confessional organizations, were
beset by financial and political difficulties. Khlesl hoped by conciliatory
moves to revive the constitutional organs of the Reich, to bring the con-
tending factions together, to unite them for common aims and finally to
induce them to dissolve their military formations. But the aged prelate
lacked experience of Reich politics. He was personally distrusted by the
duke of Bavaria, and he failed to soften the Calvinist leaders. The old
issues, more burning than ever, soon stalked the stage—Reich justice, the
four religious houses, the Donauworth episode and so forth—and claim was
met by counter-claim. The Catholic and Lutheran leaders finally agreed
to vote the kaiser a subsidy, against which the corresponding princes
promptly protested. The Reichstag was dissolved with no hopes answered.
More than a quarter of a century was to elapse before its successor met.
Since the religious peace had been framed in 1555, the antagonism
of Catholic and heretic had in each generation grown more definite, while
the course of German history had abundantly illustrated the weaknesses
of the compromise—the only partly effective principle of'ecclesiastical
reservation', the hollowness of the imperial assurance that Lutherans
might continue to practise their faith in church lands, the precarious situa-
tion of minorities in the free cities and the defiant establishment of Cal-
vinism in various principalities. Yet virtually no German prince was ready
to face the incalculable consequences of unloosing a religious war, though
the Electors Palatine had become the traditional leaders of a militant group
of Calvinist extremists and their cousins the dukes of Bavaria had come to
the fore as champions of the Catholic cause. It is a commentary on the
1
See Vol. m.
288
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE STATE OF GERMANY (TO I 61 8)
strength of dynastic links that these two branches of the Wittelsbach
family remained on personally friendly terms. Meanwhile, with the break-
up of the 1608 Reichstag the confessional rift in Reich politics reached a
new depth. The Calvinists were baffled and provoked by the solid Catholic
majority in the legislature. They also had their eyes fixed, with mingled
hopes and fears, on the startling developments in the hereditary Habsburg
lands to the east. But it was the seizure of the free and Lutheran city of
Donauworth by the duke of Bavaria—acting nominally on behalf of the
kaiser—that gave them the most violent proof of the vigour of Antichrist.
In the summer of 1608 and under the patronage of the Elector Palatine,
the Calvinist princes with some Lutheran allies—chiefly from Swabia,
where Bavarian power was feared—founded the Union for the Defence
of Evangelical Religion, a military alliance. Its general was Prince
Christian of Anhalt, who had seen service in the French wars and was
now the right-hand man of the Elector Palatine and his lieutenant in the
upper Palatinate. This move was answered in little more than a year by
the formation of the Catholic League—essentially a confederation of the
three spiritual electors, whose lands lay along or near the Rhine, with the
duke of Bavaria and his allies further south and east. Both union and
league were financed by contributions levied in the manner of Reich taxes
and kept in a central war chest. The army of the league was under Bavarian
leadership. In view of the tension in Germany, the formation of the league
had been observed with misgivings at Rome, and old Bishop Julius of
Wurzburg, who united the virtues of a model Catholic prelate with a
great deal of worldly wisdom, hesitated much before joining it.
A long pre-history attaches to both these confessional alliances. Reich
problems for many generations had been formulated in numberless assem-
blies and committees, from meetings of the Reichstag or of the electoral
princes down to the local circle assemblies or the less formal gatherings of
neighbouring princes, and in the ruling class the habit of confederation was
ingrained. There were various local alliances to maintain the peace for
example, the Landsberg League, a Swabian association comprising both
Catholics and Lutherans, which existed during the later sixteenth century
under the presidency of the duke of Bavaria. In the reign of Charles V
there had been the religious alignment of the Schmalkaldic League, and
protestant unity had been resuscitated by the Torgau Alliance in 1591.
Duke Wilhelm V of Bavaria had in 1583 come near to organizing a great
Catholic union. What made the founding of the Evangelical Union and
the Catholic League at this moment so ominous was not only their mili-
tary emphasis but also their connections with foreign powers and, even
more sinister, the domestic political context. This was now dominated
by the breakdown of the Reich constitution. Law court and legislature
had crumbled, imperial authority had evaporated, and whether there would
ever be another kaiser seemed unsure. Electoral Saxony, in its habitual
289
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
role of mediator between the extremists of either side, was powerless to
prevent the princes from rallying to opposing standards.
How close to the brink of general war the Reich had travelled became
clear with the death in 1609 of the mad duke of Jiilich-Cleves. The largest
secular territory in north-west Germany, recently rescued for Catholicism,
was left with no agreed heir. 1 The chief claimants were the elector of
Brandenburg and the palatine count of Neuburg, both Lutheran, who
were quick to lay hands on the principality. Soon the whole Reich was
astir, union and league preparing to act, and even the threat of Habsburg in-
tervention taking shape. In a matter of months there was the further menace
of French invasion, for Henri IV was not prepared to allow the Habs-
burg grip on the lower Rhine to be tightened. Catastrophe was averted
only by the assassination of the French king and the death a little later of
the Elector Palatine: only active diplomacy helped to restrain the hot-
heads. Subsequently, the conversion of the two 'possessing princes'—
Brandenburg to Calvinism and Neuburg to Catholicism—did not prevent
an agreement in 1614 to partition the disputed inheritance. The settlement
was much later made permanent. But the whole episode illustrated how
slender was the thread on which rested the peace of Germany.
While the edifice of German political stability was thus tottering towards
collapse, one formidable prince kept a clear head—Duke Maximilian of
Bavaria (1597-1651). During his long reign he was the most significant poli-
tical figure within the Reich. His duchy though not very large was compact
and administered with a close-fisted efficiency. It was not weakened by any
disunity in religion. Maximilian had been carefully educated, under Jesuit
auspices, but although a very pious man he was by no means priest-ridden.
Within his duchy, the church dovetailed neatly into the secular administra-
tion ; its personnel was appointed and controlled by the ducal government,
while attendance at Mass was compulsory and before each Easter every
Bavarian had to secure a certificate to prove that he had gone to confession.
Indeed, such was the zeal of Maximilian for the salvation of his subjects
that early in his reign he tried to institute a system of public guardians of
morality, beside which the efforts of the English Puritans a little later look
piecemeal and amateur. In Reich politics, he naturally condemned heresy,
but in other ways he was a stout conservative. He disliked the presence
of foreign troops on German soil as much as any Protestant, and he
championed the prescriptive rights of the princely oligarchy. For the
office of kaiser he had a genuine reverence. He took care to remain on
good terms with the Habsburgs and to avoid becoming embroiled in their
family disagreements, though this did not inhibit him, when in 1602
Rudolf was being pressed to name an heir, from toying with the notion
of securing the imperial dignity for himself. The Catholic League was his
special creation, and it soon helped to fortify his leading position among
1
See Vol. m.
290
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE STATE OF GERMANY (TO I 6 I 8)
the princes of southern Germany. But it required careful nursing. Its
members were apt to fall into arrear with their contributions for the
military chest. Worse, after the accession of Matthias, Bishop Khlesl
tried to dilute it into a constitutional confederation under Habsburg
patronage by procuring the admittance of the faithful but Lutheran
elector of Saxony as well as of Austria. For such a merely political
alliance, Maximilian had no taste, and he was too much of a realist not to
be aware of the divergences of interest between himself and his Austrian
cousins. He accordingly withdrew from the enlarged body in 1616, and
set about refounding the religious league as a smaller military confedera-
tion of Bavaria and some of her Catholic neighbours. This reformed
league was a more modest organization than its predecessor, but it was
more flexible and more tightly knit.
While German politics thus plunged fatally towards violence, the eco-
nomic life of the country was by no means so unpromising. Of course there
were unfavourable aspects. Chief among them was the impracticability of
following the economic policy which in the calmer days of Ferdinand I
and Maximilian II the Reichstag had begun to adumbrate. The coinage
statutes of 1559 and 1566, which had been among its major legislative
achievements, were generally flouted, the worst offenders being members
of the Habsburg arch-house itself; German trade suffered accordingly
from the lack of a good standard currency. Another discouragement to
economic life lay in the enforced departure, from Protestant and Catholic
areas alike, of religious dissidents. 1 Tolls were rising both within and
across the frontiers of the Reich, and levies on commerce in transit being
more systematically exacted, though it is not clear how far these burdens
were increasing out of proportion to the rising price level. But there is no
doubt about the clogging of traffic and the insecurity of goods on the
lower Rhine from 1568 onwards, as a result of the fighting in the Nether-
lands, and the readjustment of trade routes eastwards to the Elbe was not
easy. The Rhine valley suffered more from plundering by foreign soldiery
than any other part of Germany in the generation or so preceding the
Thirty Years War, especially during the Cologne conflict in the eighties
and in the subsequent struggles for the control of the duchy of Jiilich-
Cleve. The city of Cologne lost much of its trade at this time. Among
international events, the sack of Antwerp by Spanish troops in 1576
caused great damage to German firms, and the extinction of the world-
wide market there was a disaster for the German mercantile and financial
houses that had dominated it. Augsburg and other southern cities also
suffered when most of their banking houses went out of business in the
* E.g. the departure of the mining entrepreneur Hans Steinberger, a Lutheran, from Tyrol
c. 1570—J. Kallbrunner, 'Hans Steinberger', Vierteljahrschriftfur Sozial—und Wirtschafts-
geschichte, Vol. xxvu (1934), p. 2.
291
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
later sixteenth century. The eclipse of these merchant princes did not
however permanently injure the prosperity of the city, though the mining
enterprises they had sponsored often languished. Germany ceased to be a
major producer of silver, and although the mining of copper was still an
important source of revenue for the Austrian Habsburgs and the electors
of Saxony, Germans no longer led the world in metallurgy. In short, they
had lost their primacy in European finance and technology.
Yet there are other aspects to be considered. The German economy had
not ceased to adjust itself to changing business trends, less favourable
as they may have become. The Rhineland apart, Germany on the eve
of the Thirty Years War still prospered, though there was naturally a great
variety of conditions. Population was growing: rural colonization, both
internally and along the eastern marches, was yet in progress. In some
industries, as gild restraints were jettisoned, production was increasing—
for instance, in the glass manufacture of Hesse and Thuringia. Ruthless
and short-sighted as the princes mostly seemed in Reich politics, some at
least were scrupulous and intelligent rulers at home—Bishop Julius of
Wiirzburg, Dukes Christopher and Ludwig of Wurttemberg, or Archduke
Ferdinand of Tyrol are examples of such. The rise in the consumption of
alcoholic drinks established for the much-taxed duchy of Bavaria can indi-
cate only an increase in well-being. In parts of south-western Germany the
peasants had never been so well off as in the generation before the Thirty
Years War. Some cities were flourishing as never before. Frankfurt-am-
Main, to take an outstanding example, benefited greatly, like Amsterdam
and Genoa, by the arrival of refugees from Antwerp. Many of these were
Jews, but there were also other Netherlanders and Italians, who all con-
tributed to give their new home that peculiar stamp as a financial and
cosmopolitan centre, the home of luxury and elegance, that it was to
retain for centuries to come. Frankfurt in the early seventeenth century
was in process of rapid growth both in wealth and size. The foundation
of the exchange in 1585 betokened that the city was succeeding Antwerp as
the chief money-market within the Reich. Its merchants dealt in all the
luxuries of the age, from jewellery and gold and silver plate to Italian
silks and satins and the drugs and spices of the east. Its bookshops were
the most famous in Europe. The March and September fairs of Frankfurt
were never so opulent as during the period 1560-1630: Thomas Coryat of
Somerset, visiting the autumn fair in 1608, noted that' the riches I observed
at this Mart were infinite' and that the wealth of the goldsmiths in
particular 'was incredible'. 1
But while the flourishing condition of Frankfurt bore witness to the busy
trade of western Germany, there were even more striking developments to
the east. In the lands north of Bohemia, settled in still comparatively recent
times, there existed a broad border zone, able to exchange its cruder products
1
T. Coryat, Coryat's Crudities, Vol. n (Glasgow, 1905), p. 290.
292
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE STATE OF GERMANY (TO l 6 l 8 )
and its raw materials for the traditional manufactures of the west and
even in some measure to fulfil the economic functions of the 'frontier'
that was so significant an element in American history down to the end of
the nineteenth century. The heart of the German economy was moving
away from Swabia and the Rhineland towards these newer regions. The
progress of agriculture and of the linen industry in eastern Germany had
some remarkable features to its credit, and these developments lent a fresh
impetus to the trade of the German coastal cities, especially Hamburg.
The German linen manufacture, like the English woollen cloth trade,
is one of the classic industries of Europe, with its origins far back in the
remote past. Linen cloth was made in many parts of Germany, but the chief
exporting areas at the end of the Middle Ages were the Westphalian region
in the north-west and the upper Danube and Lech valleys, from Ulm to
Augsburg. Throughout the sixteenth century, Westphalian linens were being
sent to Scandinavia, the Netherlands and England, where Osnabriick webs
had a special renown. Swabian linens were consumed chiefly in Mediter-
ranean countries, but with the overseas discoveries from the fifteenth
century onwards they were further rerexported to tropical and colonial
lands, and supply fell short of demand. The merchants of Augsburg and
Ulm sought to supplement their local products by the purchase of linens
made further afield, and so came to act as distributors of the coarser and
cheaper products of Saxony, Lusatia and Silesia. North, east and even
south of the Erzgebirge, the linen manufacture in the sixteenth century
was thus stimulated into higher and finer productivity. This was especially
true of the little industrial towns of Saxony and Lusatia: in Silesia, where
urban life was feeble, the towns were not strong enough to prevent linen-
making from taking deeper root in the countryside, to the profit of the
landed nobles. For the linens produced in this whole region of Germany,
the foremost outlet was traditionally at the Leipzig fairs. But as the cen-
tury progressed, the channels of trade altered. The merchants most con-
cerned with the buying of webs ceased to be preponderantly natives of
Ulm and Augsburg, and tended more and more to operate from Nurem-
berg. These Nuremberg firms by 1600 were distributing great quantities
of linen cloth to consumers at Venice, Milan and elsewhere in northern
Italy, either directly or by sale at the periodic fairs of Bolzano. There was
an important colony of German merchants at Genoa, whose main busi-
ness was the shipment of goods from their homeland to southern Italy,
Sicily, Spain and Portugal. In the last decade or so of the sixteenth
century, linens displaced copper as the leading item of this Genoese
traffic. A lively trade in German linens was maintained there until the
spread of warfare in central Germany interrupted it in the sixteen-twenties.
The Nuremberg merchants did not monopolize the sale of Saxon and
Lusatian and Silesian linens at the fairs of Leipzig, Bolzano and Frankfurt-
293
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
am Main. From the last quarter of the sixteenth century they were being
concurrently purchased by English and Dutch merchants, who not only
attended the Leipzig fairs in large numbers but also established their own
direct contacts with the manufacturers at various centres in the industrial
area—the English for instance had a special headquarters at Gorlitz,
though they also made use of the distributing centre at Nuremberg. They
outclassed as buyers the Dutch, who were more intent on the purchase of
yarn for their own weavers at home. The English were Merchants Adven-
turers or their emissaries, often coming from their 'factory' at Emden,
Stade or Hamburg, and their arrival at these remote Saxon and Lusatian
towns at the foot of the Erzgebirge was an unplanned by-product of the
dispersal of the commerce once centralized at Antwerp. Their presence
serves to illustrate how within a couple of generations a quiet domestic
manufacture had been transformed into one of the great exporting
industries of northern Europe. The weavers of Lusatia and Saxony
learnt to produce finer webs and to adapt these to current market demands;
sales were organized in bulk through little town gilds formed for this
purpose. It was the policy of these gilds to restrict the number of weavers
admitted to mastership, but in fact these rose steadily and reached their
maximum in the decade 1615-25. The nourishing linen industry was thus
an important element in the general prosperity experienced in Saxony
during the half-century before the outbreak of the Thirty Years War, and
it helped to offset the closing of the silver mines of the Erzgebirge owing
to the influx of cheaper American metal.
Nuremberg drew much benefit from its new role as distributing
centre for east German linens. It was one of the important free cities
of the Reich, and ruled an extensive tract of countryside beyond its
well-fortified walls. Its rulers avoided the extremes of religious antagon-
ism, and it remained the centre of a trade network that extended from
Italy to the Netherlands, from Danzig to Lyon. The economic mainstay
of the city lay traditionally in metallurgical products, and the interests of
its leading families were in mining. As has already been mentioned, Ger-
man mining was in difficulties during the later sixteenth century—there
was not only the competition of American silver, but also the need for
sinking shafts deeper and deeper, with the extra outlay of capital this
necessitated. The threatened decline of Nuremberg was averted by the
linen trade. The men who ran it were not connected with the conservative
patrician families of the city—the Welsers, Imhofs and the like. These
latter clung to their customary business: they were complaining of
immigrant Italians in 1571, they were administering the city finances
clumsily, and many of them retired from active trade before the end of
the century. The traffic in linens was handled by new pioneering firms,
sometimes of Swabian origin, who contracted with the town gilds of
Saxony and Lusatia for their webs, checked and re-sorted the latter upon
294
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE STATE OF GERMANY (TO 1 6 1 8)
delivery, and perhaps arranged for them to be dyed and finished before
distributing them to their far-flung markets. The trade-marks of the better
firms were a valuable guarantee of quality—for example, the famous
business of Viatis and Peller, that flourished for a century and a half and
kept its selling agents in all the more important linen markets from Linz
to Seville. The Nuremberg patriciate for long kept at arm's length the
second-class citizens who ran such firms. But their exploitation of east
German products—furs and leather as well as linens—enabled the wealth
of the city to be maintained, though on a new basis, down to the upheavals
of the Thirty Years War.
The richest merchant of Nuremberg—and probably of Germany—
at the outbreak of the struggle was Bartolomaus Viatis, founder of the
firm already mentioned. His remarkable career in many ways personified
the tendencies that were remoulding the economy of the country. Charac-
teristically enough, he was not by origin a German: he was born in 1538
at Venice, where his father had migrated from an Alpine valley above
Bergamo. But he came early in life to Nuremberg as an apprentice to a
local merchant, and although he served his employer subsequently for
four years as a factor at Lyon, he acclimatized himself to German ways
even to the point of remaining a pious Lutheran. He may well have set
himself up as an independent merchant by the time-honoured method of
marrying the widow of his recently deceased master; certainly, the basis
of his fortune was securely laid when in 1590 he entered upon his partner-
ship with Martin Peller. His fortune lay in trading: the purchase and sale
of commodities. There was, first, the ancient and now resuscitated traffic
in spices and luxury textiles bought at Venice; Viatis marketed them not
only at Frankfurt, Leipzig and Nuremberg, but also in Poland and Russia,
where Nuremberg manufactures also had an outlet. But far more impor-
tant were the linens he systematically procured from the town gilds of
Saxony and its neighbours—he had annual contracts with about fifty of
these bodies. The linens were mostly dyed at Nuremberg, where the firm
had an efficient central organization, and then despatched to Italy and
Spain. The contrast with the Swabian financiers of a generation or two
earlier at once catches the eye. Viatis did not deal in mines or metals, and
he steered clear, as far as possible, of pure finance and banking. Such
loans as he allowed were granted with an eye to the advantage of his
trade. It was efficient method and a flair for organization that made him
rich. As he thus rejected the opportunities as well as the snares of court
finance, it is not surprising that his fortune never approached that of the
Fuggers at their zenith: but since it was not sunk in dubious loans to
defaulting princes it was to that extent more solidly based. Despite his
wealth, and his prominent share in the foundation of the Nuremberg
Exchange Bank in 1621, Viatis at his death ten years later remained
outside the select ranks of the city patriciate.
295
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
There were many other wealthy merchants in Germany ready to engage
in the brave venture of lending money to princes. There was, for instance,
Johann von Bodeck, the earliest outstanding merchant of Frankfurt, son
of a migrant from Antwerp, whose interests covered all sorts of activities,
from mining, smelting, money-changing and banking to the despatch in
all directions of both European and tropical goods, and who kept agents
at Venice, Seville, Amsterdam and Hamburg. Even more in the Fugger
tradition was Lazarus Henckel, born in Upper Hungary, who received
his business training in southern Germany. He came to Vienna as factor
for an Ulm firm in 1579 and established himself there permanently two
years later. The basis of his fortune was laid by the sale of kerseys—
presumably from England—that he bought at Nuremberg and sold in
Austria and further east: the troops fighting for the Habsburgs were clad
in them. Wine, scythes and knives were other commodities that he de-
spatched eastwards. In the opposite direction, he was clever enough to
foster—before the outbreak of the Turkish war—a great traffic in cattle
from Transylvania and the middle and lower Danube valley for consump-
tion in Austria and southern Germany: in 1590 alone he sent at least
5,000 beasts to Vienna. Speculation on the exchanges and lending to the
kaiser were already familiar to him; but his greatest opportunities came
with the war in 1593, which brought him virtually to the position of
banker to the imperial government. He underwrote loans raised by the
kaiser in Germany, transmitted subsidies to Sigismund Bathory and other
allies, and gave his help in the payment of troops in the field—far out-
pacing other merchants of Vienna in these services. After 1600 his situa-
tion grew precarious, with the increasing inattention of the kaiser, the
political setbacks to the Habsburg cause and the longer delays of the
imperial treasury. The nadir of his fortunes was reached after the rebel-
lion of Bocskay in 1604, when his trade with Transylvania was cut off, his
Hungarian estates passed out of his control and the Neusohl copper
mines, once leased to the Fuggers and recently acquired by him, lay in
enemy hands. But the profitable sale of Italian and tropical luxuries to the
court continued, his properties accumulated, the tide finally turned and
he died a wealthy landowner and founder of the noble house of von
Donnersmarck.
No less striking than the progress of the German linen industry was the
development of agriculture in the northern European plain, including its
German portion. No doubt the general increase of inhabitants throughout
Germany during the sixteenth century, especially the towns, had something
to do with this. But the increase in population over much of the rest of
Europe, which made it impossible for many Atlantic and Mediterranean
regions to supply themselves locally with sufficient corn, was even more
important. First among these importing areas was the northern part of the
296
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE STATE OF GERMANY (TO I 61 8)
Netherlands. The Dutch were already having to fetch Baltic com to pro-
vide themselves with both bread and beer in the later Middle Ages, and
they were soon carrying it as far as Iberian harbours. In the 1580s, the
food shortage in the Mediterranean became sufficiently acute to impel
some of the Italian princes to seek to import northern com by sea. The
Baltic region was now established as the major granary of Europe, and
the consequent impact on agricultural conditions in north-east Germany
was profound.
The greatest beneficiary from the increasing demand for north German
com was the landed nobility, which was not hampered by any scruples
about soiling its hands in commerce. In Holstein, the nobles seized their
opportunities at an early stage; the never-distant coastline and the many
harbours enabled them to convert their estates into large-scale business
enterprises, employing their serfs to produce not only grain, wool, butter,
cheese and horses, but even to go to sea and catch herrings for them to
market. They owned their own ships and despatched their cargoes to the
Netherlands, England and as far afield as Spain. Peter Rantzau, whose
family took the lead in foreign trade, arranged in the 1580s with the grand
duke of Tuscany for the shipment of corn to feed his subjects. Before the
end of the sixteenth century, some of the Holstein nobles had in addition
established industries on their estates, using for their manufactures the
copper and iron that they imported from Sweden or southern Germany.
Local markets were now available for them at Hamburg and Liibeck, but
they developed their own money exchange at Kiel, where many of them
owned town houses with special privileges. This enabled some of the
richest families to complete a well-known pattern of evolution and
emerge as specialists in high finance, lending money in the seventeenth
century to the crowns of northern Europe.
The peculiar geographical situation of Holstein gave its landowners
special opportunities, and it was not until the middle of the sixteenth
century that their neighbours in Mecklenburg, Pomerania, Brandenburg
and elsewhere were tempted by the rising price of com to extend crop-
raising on their estates so as to increase the surplus available for sale.
This involved far-reaching changes in agricultural organization and in the
social order. In western Germany the normal unit of agricultural produc-
tion was, as in the English midlands and much of France, the open-field
village community, where the peasants possessed variable rights in their
holdings and usually could not be ejected at the order of the landlord
[Grundherrschaft]. In Tyrol, Vorarlberg and parts of Swabia, their
conditions were by contemporary European standards very favourable.
In Baden and one or two other territories, they had risen before 1600
almost to the status of co-proprietors with strictly limited obligations
that could be—and sometimes were—remitted in return for a money
payment. But as a general rule, the further east the less secure was the
II
297
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
MKFDECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
peasant. The German villages east of the Elbe had mostly been founded
in the Middle Ages by free colonists, but forces had long been at work to
depress the position of the villagers, and in the first half of the sixteenth
century the tendency had been to tie them to the soil. From the last
quarter of the fifteenth century corn prices had gradually been rising.
From c. 1550, the rate outstripped the current inflation of the general
price level, owing doubtless to the rapid expansion of the international
corn market. Hence a strong temptation for the landlord to build up his
demesne farm—the beginning of a policy whose logical end was the
ultimate consolidation of the unit of agrarian production into a single
unified undertaking, run by the officials appointed by the landlord, with
the peasants reduced to the position of landless or virtually landless
labourers [Gutsherrschafi].
The later sixteenth century accordingly witnessed over much of north-
east Germany a marked propensity on the part of the landowners first to
enlarge their demesne farms at the expense of the peasant holdings, and
subsequently to abolish the latter entirely and organize the estate as a
single business unit. There were various obstacles in the way of this
policy, and the process was nothing like complete until the devastations
of the Thirty Years War had enabled the landlords, whether by force or
by law or by a mixture of both, to clear their estates of the remaining
smallholding peasants. The major obstacle was the fact that the German
peasant, unlike his Polish neighbour, still had legal rights and could not
be arbitrarily evicted from his holding. Enclosure had to be piecemeal and
gradual; sometimes by purchase from the tenant, sometimes by escheat,
sometimes by direct forfeiture. Much turned on the interpretation of the
local territorial law. A crucial factor was the policy of the electors of
Brandenburg, the dukes of Pomerania and other princes, who in the half-
century before the Thirty Years War whether through weakness or self-
interest did not oppose their nobles but allowed the law to be amended
bit by bit in the direction they required. North-east Germany thus joined
Poland and the lands east of the Baltic in provisioning Spain and the
Mediterranean, and there is no reason to doubt that there was a significant
increase of agricultural output and still more of exports. But while the
townsman of Seville, Florence or Venice was thus provided with his daily
bread, the effects of this enclosing movement on the producer were
socially retrograde. The peasant lost not only his land but his liberty,
becoming the chattel of his landlord, who was also his judge and his
employer. It is not surprising that the traveller Fynes Moryson, writing
in the early seventeenth century, should have considered that the poor
people in the districts nearest to Denmark and Poland were 'more
oppressed than anywhere else throughout Germany'. 1 The political reper-
cussions of this evolution were apparent from the middle of the seven-
1
Fynes Moryson, An Itinerary, Vol. rv (Glasgow, 1908), p. 331.
298
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE STATE OF GERMANY (TO l 6 l 8 )
teenth century onwards. They were visible especially in the rise of the
Hohenzollern electorate, whose sovereigns naturally enough based their
administration upon an alliance with the most experienced business class
in their dominions—not, as in western Europe, the townsfolk, but the
landlords who ran their estates for profit.
By the beginning of the seventeenth century the Hanseatic League was
moribund. The rise of the Dutch Republic, with its exclusive commercial
policy, had cut off Cologne and the other inland members from easy com-
munication by water with the seaports of the Netherlands, and the organi-
zation that once had reached from Novgorod to London had now for all
practical purposes shrunk to a loose entente between Liibeck, Danzig,
Hamburg and Bremen. The commercial interests of these cities were by
no means identical, and they conducted their foreign policies like inde-
pendent republics. Apart from these remaining Hanse ports, there were
other important coastal towns that did not possess even the formal link of
membership of the league—Emden, for instance, or Stade or Elbing. The
rivalries of all the German ports, whether members of the Hanseatic
League or not, had been exacerbated in the later sixteenth century by
their competition to secure the settlement of the English merchants with
their valued imports of cloth, tin and lead, and no attempts either to
persuade them to sink their differences and present a united front, or to pro-
cure the active support of the distant Reich government, had ever met with
more than fleeting and incomplete success. Yet despite the jealousies and
enmities of the German seaports, it is safe to say that their harbours had
never been so busy as they now were in the opening years of the seven-
teenth century, though there had been a great change in the pattern of
trade since the hey-day of the Hanse 300 years earlier. Hansard merchants
were no longer predominant in the countries of northern Europe; most of
the long-range shipping in German ports was now Dutch, and English
and other foreign ships were also regular visitors. These strangers came
chiefly in quest of essential commodities. Although it was possible to
procure timber and other naval stores from Norway and Archangel,
supplies were available in greater quantity and variety from the Baltic.
There was also corn, whether German or Polish, to be shipped for trans-
port westwards and southwards. German linens, as has already been
explained, were another great export, as were copper, iron and brass.
The English still reckoned Germany as their best market for woollen
cloth.
Yet the predominance of foreigners did not amount to a monopoly.
A good deal of trade remained in German hands and was carried in
German ships. For this, the political situation was partly responsible:
especially the fact that Spain, and therefore also Portugal, was at war with
the Dutch until 1609 and again from 1621, and with the English until
299
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
11-aDECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
1604. The state of war did not mean a complete cessation of Dutch or even
English traffic with the Peninsula, though it undoubtedly limited it and
drove it into circuitous and underhand channels. For Dutch shipowners,
one obvious expedient was to transfer their vessels to the flag of some
German seaport, a course of action that led in particular to an enormous
but somewhat spurious increase in the shipping of Emden. From the
Spanish side, the alternative to the usual course of buying Baltic products
fetched by the Dutch was to encourage ships from Hamburg, Danzig or
some other German port to bring them. Thus, from the 1570s onwards,
there was a great expansion of German-Peninsular trade, very welcome to
both parties. Spain direly needed timber and corn, while the return car-
goes included bullion from America as well as tropical produce that would
formerly have gone to Antwerp. As the German ships were manned by
Lutheran sailors, special favour was required to permit their entry into
Spanish ports: this was an uneasy point until in 1607 a wide agreement was
reached, embodying large concessions to the Hansards, who on their
side undertook not to convey Dutch goods. There thus came into existence
a curious Hispano-Hanse maritime association based upon commercial ties
but with a political aspect that was illustrated by the Hanse backing for King
Sigismund Vasa of Sweden and Poland. German seaports throve on the
Peninsular trade—hundreds of their ships were involved—and German
consuls were maintained in the chief Iberian ports. The nastiest threat to this
traffic sprang at first from the enmity of the English and the Dutch, who
were not ready to tolerate the supply of food and munitions to their
enemy. Hanseatic shipping therefore shunned the Channel and risked the
Atlantic route past the Hebrides—though this did not save a German
fleet of some sixty sail from capture by Drake off the mouth of the Tagus
in 1589. Even this catastrophe did not deter the Hansards from plying
so profitable a trade. It continued to flourish into the seventeenth
century, and the Germans lost little business during the twelve years of
truce, 1609-21, between Spain and the Dutch.
The overseas trade of the German coastal cities was not limited to the
Peninsula or even to the Old World in the later sixteenth century. Although
it was not Spanish policy to allow foreigners to participate directly in
traffic with America, the Portuguese were for a time more liberal, and
German merchants resident at Lisbon were able to trade with Brazil and
the Portuguese islands in the Atlantic. From at least 1587, there are indi-
cations that some Germans were actually engaging in a three-cornered
intercourse from Lisbon to Brazil that enabled cargoes of sugar to be
carried direct to Germany. This direct sailing came to an end in 1602—in all
probability there had never been much of it. Although a few German
ships did subsequently visit Brazil from Portugal, the trade with the
Portuguese settlements in America was henceforth conducted through
non-German intermediaries at Lisbon.
300
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE STATE OF GERMANY (TO l 6 l 8 )
More significant than the few and short-lived contacts with Brazil was
the opening of direct communication by sea between the north German
cities and the Mediterranean. This was not an expansion of the Peninsular
trade, but sprang from the shortage of corn in Italy in the 1580s. The
first northerners to trade direct with Italy in the later sixteenth century
had been the English and the Dutch, but their ships were liable to seizure
by the Spaniards, and the Germans were therefore safer carriers. The
grand duke of Tuscany and the Republic of Venice were followed by the
pope and the duke of Mantua in sending envoys to Hamburg and Danzig
to open up a supply of northern corn. Cereals were accordingly being
delivered by German ships to Italian ports from 1590 onwards. The
Venetians found by experiment that it was cheaper and safer to import
corn by sea than transport it overland. A profitable traffic thus began:
grain prices soon responded by sharp rises and freight charges increased
even more. At first the corn was sent chiefly to Leghorn, where the Grand
Duke Francesco of Tuscany was himself the importer. On his personal
order, cargoes were shipped from Hamburg, Lubeck and Danzig. But
Leghorn was the haunt of the English and the Dutch, and the Germans
soon found it more convenient to deliyer their foodstuffs at Genoa. Here
the ruling oligarchy of the republic wisely left the corn trade open and
from 1595 provided a free warehouse for it, so that it was possible to land
shiploads here without awaiting a specific order. Further west, German
ships were also provisioning Marseille. The policy of Venice was far more
jealous than that of Tuscany or Genoa, and at first only Danzigers were
welcomed: they remained predominant even after the relaxation of the
regulations in 1610. Although the worst years of food shortage in Italy
were over by 1593, the north German trade continued on a broader basis;
metals and metalwares, shipbuilding materials and linens were carried
as well as corn. In return the Germans brought home wines, spices, fruits
and oil. The produce of the Greek islands in Venetian possession was
fetched by Danzigers. Further east, trade with Turkish lands was impos-
sible before 1606, since legally the Germans were subjects of the kaiser,
who until that date was at war with the sultan. It was a significant example
of the disadvantage of belonging to the Reich.
The development of the southern traffic in corn and naval materials, and
especially the opening of the Venetian trade, helped Danzig to stave off
any decline and indeed to maintain great prosperity in the later sixteenth
and early seventeenth centuries. An epoch of extensive rebuilding,
especially in the centre of the city, reflected the wealth of Danzig as the
corn staple of the Baltic. But the chief beneficiary of the new commercial
trends was Hamburg, whose rise to a place among the very greatest ports
of Europe demands some examination. Hamburg no doubt owed its
spectacular fortune in the first place to its site at the mouth of the Elbe, a
navigable river less impeded by tolls than the Oder, and less harassed by
301
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
war and politics than the Rhine. Its patricians showed much skill in
fending off the threats of successive kings of Denmark to the freedom of
traffic on their river, though these were never so deadly as the pretensions
of the kings of Poland and Sweden to control the navigation of the Vistula
and thus the essential trade artery of Danzig. Their first efforts to develop
a commerce independent of that of other Hanse cities involved, in the
mid-sixteenth century, the expansion of the Iceland trade and the finishing
of English woollen cloths imported from Antwerp. Then in 1567 the
Hamburg senate managed to lure the English Merchant Adventurers to
fix their cloth mart in the city. This not only meant more business for the
dyers and cloth-finishers, but also attracted other merchants with their
wares, for example the dealers in Hungarian copper and north German
linens. Although the English settlement was very profitable to the city it
lasted only for ten years. It was disliked by the government of Spain, a
customer whom the senate was unwilling to offend, and it was a standing
provocation to Danzig and the other sister cities of the Hanse, who
resented the refusal of the English government to restore their privileges
at London. These latter subsequently mobilized the antique machinery
of the Hanseatic League in a final effort to secure the backing of Reichstag
and kaiser for the expulsion of the English from the soil of the Reich. After
this had failed, the merchants of Hamburg welcomed back the English
settlement in 1611, this time for nearly two centuries. By now, Spanish
opposition had also vanished, since England and Spain had made peace
in 1604.
There had been a trading connection between the north German ports
and Portugal since the later Middle Ages, but it was only with the up-
heaval in the Netherlands in the 1570s that Hamburg began to traffic to
any mentionable extent with Spain. Various fragments of the commercial
heritage of Antwerp, now in process of disintegration, were attracted to
the mouth of the Elbe. By 1580 or so the Welser firm was importing pepper,
sugar and other goods from the Peninsula through Hamburg instead of
Antwerp, and for a period of rather less than twenty years Hamburg
became a major European staple for East India produce. The contractors
who in 1591 agreed with the Portuguese crown to sell pepper in Lisbon
(they were a powerful consortium that included both Fuggers and Wel-
sers) disposed of most of their supplies at Hamburg. The city did not
however inherit the monopoly that Antwerp in its great days had enjoyed.
The oriental traffic at Lisbon was precarious and intermittent, and not
all the spices arriving there were shipped to the Elbe. Further, the weak-
ness of the Portuguese in the Indian Ocean had led in the later sixteenth
century to a revival of the rival Levantine trade route via Alexandria to
Venice. The conquest of the East Indies by the Dutch in the early seven-
teenth century in any case brought to an end this episode in the commer-
cial history of Hamburg, which from then on had to procure its pepper
302
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE STATE OF GERMANY (TO l 6 l 8 )
and spices from the Netherlands. But the Peninsular trade remained. More
than any other German city, Hamburg now provided the essential link
between the Baltic and southern Europe. It was a distributing centre for
all sorts of southern and tropical commodities, from salt and wine to
sugar, brazil-wood and even tobacco. In addition, there were dangerous
though profitable sidelines in the re-export of English lead and tin and the
clandestine shipment of arms and munitions. The primacy of Hamburg
among the German trading cities reached beyond the Peninsula to the
Atlantic islands and the Mediterranean; at Venice alone, as already
mentioned, the Danzigers were specially privileged. But great risks always
attended this whole southward traffic. Even when the Dutch and English
had ceased to wage war on the king of Spain, there was danger from the
Barbary corsairs, who in the early seventeenth century were entering upon
a new and bolder phase of the operations.
The remarkable expansion of the trade of Hamburg in the later six-
teenth and early seventeenth centuries brought with it new occupations,
industries and financial techniques. New enterprises included salt and
sugar refineries, while among other industries shipbuilding and such
ancillary crafts as ropemaking occupied a prominent place. Sometimes
there were generous windfalls of profit: we have it on the word of one
Hamburg merchant that the Italian requests for corn in the 1590s caused
the price to rise by 30%, while freight charges were put up by 70%. The
expanding wealth and the financial maturity of the city were illustrated
by the growth of bill-broking and by the foundation in 1619 of the
Hamburg Exchange Bank. Much was due to the presence of immigrant
merchants, who had brought with them their skill and their capital; the sums
initially handled by the bank provide full confirmation of the extent of their
investment. By this time, the nucleus of indigenous merchants of wealth
was outnumbered in the pursuit of foreign trade by the newcomers. Some
came from Nuremberg, Augsburg or elsewhere in southern Germany,
or even from Italy. But a much more important contingent consisted of
refugees from the Netherlands, especially Antwerp. Some of these were
native Dutchmen or Brabanters, but many were Marranos of Portuguese
extraction, who by the local law were permitted from 1612 onwards to
throw off the mask and openly admit to their Jewish faith. They were
however apt to be cautious and slow to do this, since they mostly had
relatives remaining in the Peninsula whom they were afraid to incriminate.
With these, they kept their trade contacts and also maintained touch with
Marrano colonies in many other ports, from Constantinople to Pernambuco.
Such were the men who directed the large mercantile fleet of small but
up-to-date ships that flew the Hamburg flag, and who by the early seven-
teenth century had enabled Hamburg to become a major purveyor to the
Peninsula of the essential materials of the north, and to function as a
vital junction in the new pattern of trade that was linking London and the
303
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Netherlands with the German and Baltic market on the one hand and the
Peninsular and Mediterranean traffic on the other.
German historians have not paid much attention to the study of their
national history in the epoch before the outbreak of the Thirty Years War. 1
It was an age when the feeble scions of a cosmopolitan dynasty reigned
ineffectively over a nation cleft by deep religious antagonisms; when
German political weakness was illustrated by the final decay of the
Hanseatic League, the unchecked violation of the western frontier by
French and Spanish troops, and the growth of a separatist nationalism
among the Dutch and the Swiss; and when foreign influences overlaid
German art, literature and even language. Intellectual life found its chief
expression in the drab controversies of theology; simple folk were left a
prey to all sorts of superstition, including witch-hunting of the cruellest
sort. Sensibility coarsened, we are told, and morality loosened. We
certainly know that the buoyant population of the countryside helped to
cause overcrowding in the towns, where the real wages of artisans and
other humble folk were falling and reached a depth unsurpassed for
centuries in the years immediately after 1600. In the external field,
Germans failed to take any appreciable part in the enterprises which
were opening up new parts of the world to European settlement and
exploitation. Yet it would be unfair to judge an almost land-locked
country by this last criterion. The foregoing pages contain plenty of
evidence to illustrate the abounding economic vitality of Germany before
1618, from the thriving traffic of Hamburg and Danzig to the hum of
commerce at Frankfurt-am-Main, Nuremberg and Leipzig. In a different
sphere, the generation that saw the building, for example, of the Rathaus
at Augsburg or of such impressive churches as the Michaelskirche at
Munich or the Marienkirche at Wolfenbiittel was capable of high achieve-
ment in architecture. There were some celebrated artists and craftsmen
at work in Germany in the age before the Thirty Years War, and signs of
an incipient revival of the native spirit. 2 Foreign visitors judged the Ger-
mans to be honest and industrious, even if somewhat addicted to tippling.
There was no tragic inevitability with regard to the approaching catas-
trophe. But there was a failure—a failure of the governing class, of the
princes who produced no statesman capable of seeing effectively beyond
the prejudices of religion or the dynastic rivalries of his forefathers. It
was rulers with a local, not to say parochial, outlook who determined the
destiny of their country. No doubt some responsibility lay on the degene-
rate shoulders of Rudolf II: but regionalism and even separatism were
embedded in the cumbrous mechanism of the Reich constitution and it is
more than doubtful whether its collapse could have been averted or even
1
A glance, for instance, at the titles of the contributions to the Historische Zeitschrift
during the last half-century serves abundantly to illustrate this.
2
G. Dehio, Geschichte der deutschen Kunst, Vol. HI (2nd ed. Berlin and Leipzig, 1931,)
p. 182.
304
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE STATE OF GERMANY (TO I 61 8)
much delayed by a kaiser less miserable. The classes that marched in the
van of economic progress—the merchants of the northern ports, the
landowners of the north-eastern principalities, the entrepreneurs of
Nuremberg and Frankfurt—had little or no voice in the government of
the country. They lived in a different world from the blinkered magnates
who dominated the Reichstag, and it is perhaps hardly surprising that its
sessions should have provided occasions for princely strife rather than
constructive legislation. Of the enforcement of the national ideal and of a
statesmanship that should transcend local or sectarian ambitions there
could be no possibility—save in the universally dreaded release of wide-
spread war.
305
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER XI
THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
i
N the early years of the seventeenth century, the Holy Roman Empire
of the German people had the misfortune to be the centre of intense
internal and international rivalries. The authority of the emperor,
Diet and imperial courts had broken down, and there could be no settle-
ment by peaceful means of conflicting claims to territory and title.
Protestant princes feared the loss of church lands secularized after 1552;
the return to the Roman Catholic church of bishoprics, abbeys, cloisters
and countless parishes also meant the enforced re-Catholicization of the
populations involved. Since the Donauworth affair of 1608, not even an
imperial city could feel safe in the worship of its choice. The very existence
of a defensive Protestant Union confronted by an armed Catholic League
was a menace to peace. While the great majority of German princes were
peace-loving, sometimes at the risk of their security, a few were ready to seize
any opportunity to increase their territories and to enhance their prestige.
If there was danger of chaos and civil war, foreign entanglements posed
an even greater threat. England and the United Provinces (the Dutch)
were members of the Protestant Union. The marriage of the Elector Pala-
tine of the Rhine to the daughter of James I added to England's interest
in Germany. In the north there were further foreign involvements. The
king of Denmark was also duke of Holstein, a prince of the empire with
claims on secularized bishoprics. His ambition to control the Baltic coast
was, in turn, challenged by the king of Sweden. Most important was the
close co-operation of Habsburg emperor and Habsburg king of Spain.
Any increase of their power in the empire meant absolutist government
and the suppression of Protestantism.
Two major issues dominated European international politics: French
ambition to break the ring of Habsburg territories surrounding their
state, and the preparations by Spain to reconquer the United Provinces.
They were interrelated, and both involved the empire. To reach the
Netherlands by land, Spain sought a secure passageway from her Italian
possessions through the Swiss Valtelline valley and down the Rhine.
This posed a further threat to France. A vigorous French anti-Habsburg
policy was, however, postponed until the rise of Richelieu. The Dutch had
won a respite by the conclusion of a twelve-year truce in 1609, but a
renewal of hostilities by Spain was certain. Before the expiration of the
truce, a revolt in Bohemia against Habsburg rule and Catholic domina-
tion precipitated the series of wars known as the Thirty Years War.
306
I
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
The German and international situations made it possible for the war
to spread from Bohemia to Germany, and to involve England, Spain,
the United Provinces, Denmark, Sweden, northern Italy, and France.
As the war continued, its character changed. Religious issues, so promi-
nent in the early years, declined, and power politics, never absent, finally
predominated.
It is customary to divide the war into the following sections: the
Bohemian revolt and the conquest of the Palatinate, 1618-23; the Danish
period, 1624-9; the Swedish period, 1630-4; and the French period,
1635-48. The negotiations leading to the peace of Westphalia were
carried on from 1644 to 1648.
Since 1526 the Habsburgs had ruled Bohemia and the adjoining
associated territories of Moravia, Silesia and Lusatia. These lands fur-
nished large revenues, while Bohemia was of particular political signifi-
cance, for its king was one of the seven princes who elected the emperor.
For this reason it was important to ensure the kingship of Bohemia as
a means to the acquisition of the imperial title.
Bohemians had legitimate grievances against their Habsburg king; but
the ingredients for a successful revolt were lacking, namely, a common
ideal, leadership and military strength. Instead, Bohemia was torn by
dissension and suspicion. The great majority of the population were
peasants whose old 'liberties' were being suppressed by a landlord aris-
tocracy. There were numerous towns, of which the capital, Prague, had
the proudest history; but the bourgeoisie were taxed ruthlessly, their
political rights were curtailed by both king and aristocracy, and trade and
industry were largely dominated by foreigners. Power was in the hands
of a small group of great noble landowners. The knights, the lesser land-
owners, were being absorbed into the nobility or, if economically weak,
were forced to become stewards for the magnates or lesser government
officials. Theoretically, at least, there was political representation in the
Diet, a tri-cameral body of nobles, knights and cities; and yet, only about
20,000 of a total population of some 2,000,000 had full political rights.
A revolution which promised satisfaction to oppressed peasants and
dissatisfied burghers would have had some chance of success. There was
no such programme. Instead, the initiative was taken by a strong chan-
cellor, Count Lobkowitz, a Catholic, who since the close of the sixteenth
century was pushing towards the creation of a centralized absolutist state at
the expense of the Diet, and particularly at the expense of the nobility.
Traditionally, religion should have been the common ideal which drew
together the various elements of Bohemian society. But the religious
situation had changed in the two centuries since the days of John Hus.
The disciples of the great Bohemian reformer had won the right to take
communion in both kinds, the wine as well as the wafer, and therefore
307
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
called themselves, Utraquists. With the introduction of Lutheranism and
then Calvinism, the great majority of the population, including the nobi-
lity, had turned truly Protestant, although they retained the name of
Utraquist in order to maintain official recognition. Lacking, however,
was the strong fighting spirit of the old Hussites, at the very time that
it was most needed to combat the Habsburg policy of re-Catholicization.
By the beginning of the seventeenth century, the forces of the Counter-
Reformation headed by the Jesuits and backed by the Catholic hierarchy
had made considerable political headway. The predominance of the
nobility was now seriously threatened not only by the programme of
centralization, but by the supplanting of Protestant high officials with
Catholics.
In 1609 the Protestant majority won a temporary victory by forcing the
ruling king and emperor Rudolf II to grant the so-called Letter of Majesty.
This edict, approved by the Diet, recognized liberty of worship to members
of the reformed Bohemian church, and guaranteed the church properties
of both Protestants and Catholics. Moreover, Protestants lacking a place
of worship in royal cities or on royal domains were permitted to build
churches.
The Letter of Majesty was anathema to the Catholic extremists, yet
neither Rudolf, nor his brother Matthias who succeeded him as king in
1611 and emperor in 1612, favoured a war of religion. The situation
changed radically when the Habsburg princes chose Archduke Ferdinand
of Styria to succeed his cousin, the childless Matthias. The Habsburg king
of Spain was won over to this decision by the promise of the Austrian
Habsburg fiefs in Alsace. These were of the utmost importance as links
in the road for the passage of Spanish troops from Italy to the Nether-
lands. To the Bohemian Protestants the selection of Ferdinand was indeed
ominous, for the archduke was an enthusiastic pupil of the Jesuits who had
ruthlessly rooted out heresy in his domains. Nevertheless, in 1617 Ferdi-
nand was 'accepted' as king-designate by almost unanimous consent of
the three estates. By tacit recognition of the hereditary character of the
kingship, the Diet threw away a golden opportunity to assert Bohemian
independence. Perhaps there was no other choice. No great native leader
rose to seize the crown or to establish a republic. Nor did there appear to
be a foreign candidate to the throne acceptable to the Diet.
Before his return to Vienna after Ferdinand's coronation, Matthias
appointed ten deputy governors to rule in his absence. The membership of
this group is an indication of the growing strength of a belligerent
Catholic party. Seven were Catholics, and of their number, significantly,
were two noblemen, William Slawata and Jaroslav Martinitz, who had
refused to sign the Letter of Majesty. The religious settlement had indeed
never been upheld, and the cases of two towns, Klostergrab and Braunau,
precipitated the crisis. On the pleas that they were not royal lands but
308
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
church properties, the ecclesiastical authorities refused permission to
build Protestant churches in these towns. Matthias supported this posi-
tion, and the deputy governors ordered the imprisonment of a number of
recalcitrant Braunau burghers.
By the Letter of Majesty a committee of defensors had been authorized
to protect Protestant rights, and the defensors now called for a meeting
of delegates from the whole kingdom which met in Prague on 21 May 1618.
Two days later the deputies surged into the royal palace and hurled the
unpopular Slawata and Martinitz, together with an inoffensive secretary,
from a window. The defenestration, a Bohemian custom in times of
rebellion, was intended to kill the victims, but all three escaped with their
lives. To the Catholics this was a miracle, and a contemporary print
shows the drop of about 46 feet eased by the support of angels, while the
rebels declared that the three men were saved by falling on a heap of rubbish.
A provisional government of thirty directors was elected by the estates,
and an army of 16,000 men was voted to be commanded by Heinrich
Matthias, Count Thurn. Everything depended on the army, and the
revolutionary government failed miserably to give it support. The land-
owners and cities, who were held responsible for the soldiers' pay,
shirked their responsibility. In consequence, Thurn's force was miserably
equipped, poorly fed and mutinous. Short of an efficient professional
army, the only alternative would have been to rouse the peasantry against
the foreign enemy. That this was possible is proved by the acts of sabotage
committed by peasants against the invading imperialists. The nobility
could not be expected to lead a popular revolt; but the failure to do so
turned the peasantry against the marauding soldiers of their own nation.
Lack of common ideals and inspired leadership, and deeply rooted social
cleavages were evident from the very beginning of the revolt.
Despite the efforts of three important German princes, Frederick of the
Palatinate, John George of Saxony and Maximilian of Bavaria, to arrange
a settlement, the Bohemian uprising could not be localized. The king of
Spain, influenced by family solidarity and the promise of the Alsatian
fiefs, sent an army from Flanders across Germany to aid Ferdinand. The
Bohemians in turn were aided by Charles Emanuel, Duke of Savoy, an
old enemy of the Habsburgs, who offered a mercenary force under the
command of a well-known professional soldier, Count Mansfeld. Ernst
von Mansfeld, who looms so large in the early years of the war, was the
illegitimate son of a minor German prince. His sole aim in life was to
carve out for himself an independent principality, and he was willing to
fight under any flag to accomplish this purpose. He seldom had sufficient
pay for his soldiers, who therefore roamed the countryside for food and
booty. His name became a byword for ruthless cruelty to the helpless
peasantry. In the immediate circumstances, the condottiere was effective.
He prevented the destruction of Thurn's amateur conscript soldiers and
309
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
captured the city of Pilsen, one of the two Catholic cities in the country.
Neither side had sufficient strength to strike a decisive blow.
Whether the Bohemians would carry a revolt to its logical conclusion
by unseating their Habsburg ruler was at first uncertain. A small group of
nobles favoured this solution, and sought a candidate strong enough to
maintain his crown. The duke of Savoy expressed an interest both in the
Bohemian kingship and in the imperial succession. His Catholicism and
military weakness militated against him. The Lutheran elector of Saxony
would have been the favourite candidate, but he was tied to the Habsburg
by sentiment, and he abhorred rebellion against constituted authority. He
would certainly have refused the offer. Finally, there was the youthful
Frederick V, Elector Palatine of the Rhine. Much seemed to be in his
favour. 1 As head of the Protestant Union, he could presumably enlist
German support. As the son-in-law of James I, he could hope for funds
and armies from England. The Dutch should favour him, for he would
oppose their greatest enemies, the Habsburgs. As for Frederick himself,
he was not a declared candidate for the Bohemian throne. Sincerely con-
cerned for the Protestant cause in Bohemia, he wished only to aid the
rebels so that they could negotiate from strength. For this reason he
sponsored Mansfeld's army, and appealed to the duke of Savoy for
further support. Also he sought, unsuccessfully, to place the Protestant
Union on a war footing.
The chief proponent of Frederick's candidature was Prince Christian
of Anhalt, his most trusted adviser, and administrator of the Upper
Palatinate. Christian and his friends, the princes of Ansbach, Wurttem-
berg and Baden-Durlach, and Camerarius, Frederick's chancellor, were
convinced that there was a papal-Habsburg plot to conquer Europe in the
name of the Catholic Church. Bohemia was but the latest proof of this
design. To meet the threat it was necessary to form a great coalition of
German Protestant states, England and the Dutch Netherlands. France,
as the hereditary Habsburg foe, was also expected to join, even though it
was a Catholic state. To obtain the Bohemian crown for Frederick
would not only deprive the Habsburg of a prosperous province and the
electoral vote, but would strike a decisive blow for Protestantism against
the Catholic menace. While a few Bohemian leaders and Frederick's chief
adviser were secretly planning his future, Frederick does not seem to have
been informed until November. His first reaction to the proposal was
surprise and fearful hesitation. In a letter to the Bohemians he promised
to support their cause, yet modestly disclaimed any desire for the crown.
At the same time he thought it necessary to prepare for possible even-
tualities, and particularly to sound out England and the Dutch.
1
For a good account of Frederick V and his advisers during the period of the Bohemian
crisis, see J. G. Weiss, 'Die Vorgeschichte des bomischen Abenteuers Friedrichs V. von der
Pfalz,' in Zeitschrift ftir die Ceschichte des Oberrheins, New Series, Vol. 53 (1939-40), pp.
383-492.
310
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
The death of the Emperor Matthias on 20 March 1619 brought the
related problems of the Bohemian and imperial crowns to a head. The
extremist party in Prague urged the deposition of Ferdinand and the
election of a new king, and an electoral meeting for the election of an
emperor was called for July. Ferdinand had no doubt of the issue.
Fortified by religious conviction strengthened by Jesuit schooling, he was
certain of his hereditary right to the Bohemian throne, of his election as
emperor, and of his mission to Catholicize his subjects. Ferdinand's calm
assurance was put to severe test immediately after the death of Matthias.
Silesia had already joined the Bohemians. Now Moravia, Lusatia and
Upper Austria revolted against their Habsburg overlord. In June, Thurn
led his army to the very gates of Vienna where Ferdinand was in residence,
and he was saved only at the last moment by the arrival of a small cavalry
force under the command of his brother Leopold. Further reinforcements
for Ferdinand, and frantic calls from Prague that the imperial armies in
Bohemia were being strengthened, forced Thurn to withdraw. In any case,
he was not prepared to conduct a siege. Ferdinand's position was further
improved by Mansfeld's defeat on 10 June near the village of Sablat,
where all but fifteen of his 3,000 men were killed or captured. It was the
first Habsburg victory.
Meantime, while Frederick and Anhalt had won some German support
for the Bohemian cause at the Protestant Union's June meeting at Heil-
bronn, it was not sufficient to influence the course of events. A loan was
made to Bohemia, and an army of 15,000 men was to be raised to protect
the members of the union, and to prevent the passage of troops going to
the aid of Ferdinand. Repeated attempts to win English support failed,
for King James, although expressing sympathy for the Bohemian Pro-
testants, made it clear that his chief interest was to keep the peace. As for
his son-in-law's interest in the Bohemian throne, it would be necessary
first of all to determine whether the kingdom was indeed elective.
Under these circumstances, favourable for Ferdinand, unfavourable for
Frederick, the two elections were held almost simultaneously. On 28
August, Ferdinand II was chosen as emperor at the electoral meeting held
in Frankfurt. Following Ms instructions, the Palatine delegate first made
the useless gesture of voting for Duke Maximilian of Bavaria, and then
made the election unanimous for Ferdinand.
When Frederick heard that the Bohemian estates had finally determined
to dethrone their king, he said to Anhalt: 'I never thought that it would
come to this. This is a risky business; now I believe that the Bohemians
will want to elect a new King. My God! If they elect me, what should
I do?' To which Anhalt replied: 'My lord, in such a case time will bring
advice!' 1 Indeed, Anhalt, much as he wished to make his master a king,
now recoiled from precipitous action. It would be necessary first to make
1
Weiss, 'Die Vorgeschichte . . .', Zeitschrift fur die Geschichte des Oberrheins, p. 456.
3"
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
certain of adequate support, especially from England. An ambassador
was therefore again despatched to James to find out if he would assist
his son-in-law in the case that he accepted the Bohemian crown. There
was little time to bring advice, for on 26 August, two days before Ferdi-
nand's election as emperor, the Bohemian estates deposed him as king,
and elected Frederick almost unanimously.
Frederick was faced with a fateful decision. He first wrote to his am-
bassador in England that he would wait for his father-in-law's answer
before deciding. He then attended a meeting of the Protestant Union at
Rothenburg whose members wished him luck, though only three princes,
Ansbach, Baden-Durlach and Anhalt, advised acceptance of the crown.
Towards the end of September Frederick called upon his council for
advice. The councillors had already sent Frederick a memorial, listing the
reasons for and against acceptance. There were fourteen points against
and six in favour, and certainly the negative ones are the most impressive.
In brief, the councillors warned that the Bohemian venture was beyond the
resources of the Palatinate, that it could not succeed without aid from
England and the Dutch, and that their assistance must be assured before
an answer could be given to the Bohemians. In the discussions at the
council table, most of the members insisted that it was necessary at least
to await the king of England's reply. Since this had been Frederick's
original position, the councillors must have been shocked and surprised
to find that Frederick had already made up his mind. He declared that he
had been called by God to rule Bohemia, and that he would accept the
crown in God's name. There can be little doubt that Frederick sincerely
believed that he was God's instrument to further the cause of Protestant-
ism. It is equally true that his decision was foolhardy. Without outside
assistance the Bohemians would be conquered by Spanish or imperial
arms. Moreover, intervention by Frederick without military support from
foreign powers could only invite Spanish invasion of the Palatinate, and
the interference of German princes, particularly of the duke of Bavaria,
who could benefit by Frederick's downfall. The Holy Roman Empire was
in delicate equilibrium, and any aggressive move made by a German
prince would upset the balance. Frederick made the first move, and trans-
formed a rebellion in Bohemia into a German, and inevitably, into an
international war.
The new king of Bohemia and his charming, vivacious wife Elizabeth
had no such forebodings when they made their triumphant entry into
Prague on the last day of October 1619. As hopes for outside aid melted
away, there was, however, little cause for rejoicing. The Protestant
Union promised to protect the Palatinate, but would not be drawn into
the Bohemian venture. The elector of Saxony refused to attend a meeting
of Protestant German princes suggested by Anhalt. More important still
was the attitude of foreign powers who were counted upon for assistance.
312
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
King James, peace-loving, shocked by rebellion, and pursuing a Spanish
marriage for his heir, refused to support his son-in-law. Instead, he
informed the sovereigns of Europe that he had had no previous know-
ledge of Frederick's election, nor would he recognize it. It was his intention,
he announced, to join with the king of France 'to pacify the present
broils that are on foot in Germany'. The Dutch, much as they feared a
Spanish invasion of the Palatinate, felt that they could not protect it
without support from England and the Protestant Union. The Scandinav-
ian powers, although sympathetic, were busy with their own concerns:
Christian IV of Denmark in a commercial dispute with Hamburg,
Gustavus Adolphus of Sweden in the perennial conflict with Poland. The
duke of Savoy, now that he had been cheated, or so he pretended, of both
the Bohemian and imperial crowns, withdrew his support of Mansfeld.
Another prince, Bethlen Gabor of Transylvania, had taken advantage of
Ferdinand's difficulties, invaded Hungary, and even reached Vienna, when
a revolt in his own lands forced a retreat. It might have been expected that
France would oppose the Habsburgs; but Richelieu was not yet in control,
and the ministers of Louis XIII thought it sufficient to send an embassy
to arrange an armistice between the Catholic League and the Protestant
Union. This came to pass at Ulm on 3 July 1620, when each party agreed
to respect the territories of the other. The French believed that the agree-
ment would ensure the protection of the Palatinate by the union, but in
this belief they were to be sadly mistaken.
While Frederick was steadily losing ground, Ferdinand was gaining in
strength. On 8 October 1619, the day before Frederick left Heidelberg
for Prague, Duke Maximilian of Bavaria signed an agreement with the
emperor. Of all the German princes, Maximilian was the ablest. Like
Ferdinand, he was a pupil of the Jesuits and a devoted son of the church.
Unlike Ferdinand, he was a hardworking administrator and possessor of,
the only efficient German army. His position as leader of the Catholic
League was, therefore, much more than a formality. To win his support,
Ferdinand promised Maximilian full control of the armies which were to
quell the Bohemian revolt, the possession of conquered lands as a pledge
for his expenses, and Frederick's electoral title. In his own eyes, Maxi-
milian was assisting his overlord to put down a revolt of heretical subjects.
It can also be argued that he seized this opportunity to deprive a Calvinist
prince of an electoral title; but apart from the fact that the emperor had no
right to make him the promise of the electorate, this demand was certain
to aggravate the German political situation when it became known.
Another recruit to the imperial cause was John George of Saxony.
Religious considerations here too played a role for, as a fanatical Lutheran,
John George hated the elevation of a Calvinistic prince in Bohemia. He
also stipulated that as the price of his help, the emperor should guarantee
Lutheranism in Bohemia and the secularized church lands in the two
313
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Saxon Circles. Not forgetting himself, John George demanded the pro-
vince of Lusatia in payment for his help.
While the net was being drawn around Frederick in Bohemia, his
patrimony was in the greatest danger. The rulers of the Spanish Nether-
lands, the Habsburg Archduke Albert and his wife, the Spanish Infanta
Isabella (known collectively as 'the Archdukes') were forced by
Madrid reluctantly to plan the reconquest of the Dutch, and a well-
trained army under the capable General Spinola was preparing to take
the offensive. In these preparations the Palatinate played an important
part, for it was the one substantial strip of territory blocking the march
of troops from the Spanish-held lands in northern Italy to the Nether-
lands. The chief obstacle to an attack on the Palatinate would be English
support for Frederick, and English neutrality was now assured by the
Spanish ambassador in London, Count Gondomar, whose influence over
King James was notorious. As soon as Gondomar informed Madrid of his
success, Spinola was given his marching orders. In September 1621 he
crossed the Rhine. The only opposition in the Palatinate was a volunteer
army of 2,000 Englishmen under the command of the experienced soldier
Sir Horace Vere, and a small force from the Protestant Union which
soon withdrew its support.
Meantime, Frederick's Bohemian venture was coming to an end.
Maximilian of Bavaria brought into the field the polyglot mercenary
army of the Catholic League commanded by the able Count Tilly, a
Fleming whose monkish character, according to his enemies, was marred
only by an inordinate love of sweetmeats. In July 1620 the army crossed
into Austria, devastated the countryside, and crushed the resistance of
the anti-Habsburg Austrian Estates. Joined with an imperial force, the
troops of the Catholic League invaded Bohemia at the end of September,
and a few days later the elector of Saxony swept into Lusatia. Out-
numbered, Mansfeld was forced to remain inactive in Pilsen, while
Tilly's armies, although severely reduced by disease, marched toward
Prague.
Early on the morning of 8 November 1620 Christian of Anhalt, in
command of the Bohemian army numbering about 16,000, took a stand
on the White Hill, a plateau overlooking the city. The Bohemians had the
advantage of position and, though inferior in numbers, might have re-
pulsed the enemy, which opened a surprise attack on the hill as the sun
cleared the early morning mist. But, mutinous for lack of pay, Anhalt's
conscripts were overwhelmed by better-trained and well-led soldiers, and
those who survived fled back towards the city. Here, Frederick and his
queen were entertaining two English ambassadors, convinced that the
enemy was too weak to attack. The burghers, who had lost all confidence
in the new government, closed the gates on the fleeing soldiers, which
made impossible any defence of the city. Frederick, on Anhalt's advice,
314
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
escaped with his family, and made his way to Brandenburg. He was never
again to see either of his capitals, Heidelberg or Prague. The fugitive
monarch was henceforth known as the 'Winter King', an epithet be-
stowed by Jesuits who prophesied that his reign would last only a winter
—the rule of an additional summer made no practical difference.
After the Battle of the White Hill, Prague was given over to the vic-
torious soldiers who were permitted to pillage the 'rebels'. On 21 June
1621, after summary trials, twenty-seven leaders of the revolt were
executed. Only a few escaped, most noteworthy being Christian of
Anhalt, who fled to Sweden and then made his abject peace with the
emperor; and Count Thurn, who spent many years of exile in vain in-
trigues against the victorious Habsburg. The landed estates of nobles and
knights accused of rebellion were confiscated, and sold or presented by
the emperor to his generals and to his favourite officials. Thus, nearly
one-half the land of the kingdom changed hands, and a foreign nobility,
German, Austrian, Italian and Spanish, supplanted the old, with the
exception of a few native Catholic families who vastly increased their
holdings. The wealth of the towns declined when the government devalued
the currency. The peasants, already the chief sufferers at the hands of
marauding soldiers, were ground down by ever-increasing services de-
manded by their aristocratic landowners. Ferdinand was pleased with the
results of his victory. The work of Count Lobkowitz was completed by
the establishment of a hereditary monarchy and the destruction of an
independent nobility. The Letter of Majesty was repudiated, the Jesuits
were recalled, and the process of forced re-Catholicization was so successful
that Protestantism was permanently uprooted not only in Bohemia but
in Austria, Moravia and Silesia. Lusatia, in the hands of the elector of
Saxony, alone escaped.
With the conquest of Bohemia, and the Palatinate at the mercy of
Spinola's troops, it might be thought that the war would end. But the
ambitions of the chief actors in the political drama made any peaceful
solution impossible. Frederick stubbornly refused to make a formal sub-
mission to the emperor, and was heartened by a promise of support from
Prince Maurice, the Dutch leader, who gave the Palatine family refuge at
the Hague. The emperor, in order to repossess Upper Austria, held in
pawn by Maximilian of Bavaria for his war expenses, was prepared to
hand over Palatine lands to the duke. Besides, Ferdinand had promised
him the electorate. As a first step, Frederick was put to the ban. After
satisfying his chief German ally, Ferdinand could look forward to the
continuation of hostilities which would lead to the spread of his faith and
of his power in the empire.
The emperor's ambitions were furthered by the accession of Philip IV
on the death of his father, Philip III, in March 1621. The Spanish govern-
ment was bankrupt and corrupt, while a preposterous system of taxation
315
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
and a ruinous fiscal policy stifled the country's economic activities.
Nevertheless, during the next twenty years the Count of Olivares, Philip
IV's chief adviser, vigorously pursued the traditional Spanish policies:
the suppression of heresy and the furtherance of Habsburg hegemony.
The Protestant Union, frightened by Spinola's troops, dissolved in
May 1621, and such opposition as remained played into the hands of
Spain, the emperor and the duke of Bavaria. After the Battle of the White
Hill, Mansfeld moved his troops from Bohemia into the neighbouring
Upper Palatinate, and planned an invasion of the lost kingdom in
Frederick's name. Maximilian of Bavaria, well satisfied with the emperor's
secret promises, marched his army to meet Mansfeld, and on 2 October
1621, in return for a large bribe, extracted an agreement from the condot-
tiere that he would cease to fight for Frederick. Mansfeld callously broke
his word, and a fortnight later appeared with his army in the Lower
Palatinate, where the English troops were holding out in three beleaguered
towns. Mansfeld's treachery gave Maximilian an excuse to despatch his
troops under Tilly's command to the Lower Palatinate. Mansfeld with-
drew to Alsace, where his troops spread typhus and devastated the
countryside for food and booty.
Two more princes appeared to perpetuate the war, the Margrave
George Frederick of Baden-Durlach and Prince Christian of Brunswick.
The margrave, a man in his sixties, was a devout Lutheran who had
read through the Bible fifty-eight times, and had also composed a great
compilation of his readings in military history. He had been one of the
few princes of the Protestant Union who advocated strong military
measures in defence of the Protestant cause. Now his little principality
was endangered by the presence of Spanish troops in the neighbouring
Palatinate, and he determined to take action. In the autumn of 1621 he
raised an army of 11,000 men. Simultaneously Christian of Brunswick
gathered a force of about the same strength. Five years before, at the age of
eighteen, he had been installed as administrator of the important northern
bishopric of Halberstadt through the influence of his brother, the reigning
duke of Brunswick-Wolfenbiittel. Hatred of Catholics and love of warfare
were his passions, and posing as a knight-errant, he wore in his hat the
glove of his cousin, Elizabeth of Bohemia. He vowed that he would
regain the Palatinate for her. Christian's high spirits and dashing cavalry
charges soon won for him the title of the 'mad Halberstadter'.
If the three armies of Mansfeld, Baden and Brunswick could have been
joined they would have created a serious menace to the troops of Tilly
and the Spaniards. Frederick, with his usual optimism, joined Mansfeld,
now back in the Palatinate; but the three commanders did not succeed in
restoring his hereditary lands. George Frederick was defeated by Tilly
and the Spanish general Cordoba while attempting to cross the Neckar
at Wimpfen on 6 May 1622, and the shattered margrave gave up in
316
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
despair. Christian, bringing sorely needed money extracted from bishop-
rics and villages, was intercepted at Hochst on the Main (20 June). In spite
of severe losses he managed to join Mansfeld; but now there was a change
of plans. Mansfeld refused to risk his army in the face of a stronger enemy,
and after first retreating into Alsace and then Lorraine, induced Christian
to march north with him to assist the hard-pressed Dutch. Since the end
of the Twelve Year Truce in April 1621, Prince Maurice could do no
more than carry on defensive warfare, and he was no doubt pleased when
the arrival of the riff-raff Mansfeld-Brunswick army in October 1622
enabled him to save the fortress of Bergen-op-Zoom from capture.
Frederick, sorely disappointed by the failure of his military adventure
and sickened by the burning of villages and the pillage of peasantry, had
left the army during the retreat into Alsace. Making his way first to
Sedan for a visit with his uncle, the duke of Bouillon, and then back to
The Hague, Frederick heard of the subjugation of his native land by
Spain and Bavaria. Heidelberg fell in September 1622, Sir Horace Vere
surrendered Mannheim in November, and the last of the English troops
marched out of Frankenthal in April 1623. Warfare and disease had
ravaged the once prosperous land. As the English ambassador wrote
from besieged Frankenthal in 1622: 'It grieves me to behold the waste
and ruin of so many towns, boroughs and villages which were lately rich
and prosperous, and to hear of the intolerable oppression and rapine
committed upon the poor people that are left, by the soldiers as well of
our own army as that of the enemies. '* Adding to this material misery,
Maximilian was now free to expel Protestant ministers, and to introduce
Catholic worship in the churches. As a final indignity, he shipped the
valuable library of Heidelberg's university to the Vatican where most of
it remains to this day.
Maximilian needed only the title of elector to make his victory complete,
and the emperor was ready to fulfil his promise. Ferdinand first called
an advisory council of princes. The electors, with the addition of an
archbishop, a bishop, the duke of Bavaria and three Protestant princes,
were invited to attend the meeting at Regensburg. Of the Protestants,
only the landgrave of Hesse-Darmstadt appeared in person, and then only
to further his claim to a disputed territory. The electors of Saxony and
Brandenburg, shocked by the suppression of Protestantism in the Austrian
hereditary lands, expressed their disapproval by sending representatives.
Only the elector of Cologne, Maximilian's brother, and of course Maxi-
milian advocated the transference of Frederick's electorate. Despite the
almost unanimous opposition of his advisers, Ferdinand had his way, and
on 25 February 1623 Maximilian was solemnly invested as an elector of
the Holy Roman Empire. Two concessions of little practical value were
1
Chichester to Calvert, 10/20 July 1622. Public Record Office, S.P. German States,
xxvi, f. 75.
317
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
made: Maximilian was to hold the electorate for life, and at his death
other claimants to the title, including Frederick's heirs, would be con-
sidered. The Regensburg meeting was a victory for Maximilian; but it
was an even greater victory for Ferdinand, whose power, based on the
army of the Catholic League, could not be contested.
With the submission of Bohemia and the hereditary lands to the
emperor, and the subjugation of the Palatinate by Spain and Bavaria,
there was again the possibility that the German war could come to an end.
But peace faded with the growing danger that war would engulf northern
Protestant Germany, where important secularized church lands were at
stake. As early as 1620, in order to win the support of the elector of
Saxony in the Bohemian war, the Catholic League and the emperor had
agreed not to interfere with these lands as long as their possessors re-
mained loyal to the emperor. This agreement of Miilhausen was now in
jeopardy. In 1623 the Lower Saxon Circle was invaded by Tilly in pursuit
of Christian of Brunswick. The princes of the circle, after a half-hearted
attempt to defend themselves, submitted to this breach of their neutrality.
After the defeat of the 'mad Halberstadter' at Stadtlohn (6 August),
Tilly's troops remained quartered in the southern portion of the circle.
The secularized lands were endangered not only by direct attack.
Overawed by the proximity of Tilly's troops, the chapter of Osnabruck in
Westphalia, hitherto Protestant, elected a Catholic as bishop, the brother
moreover of Maximilian's chief councillor. The emperor already had his
eye on the bishoprics of Halberstadt and Magdeburg for his second son,
sees claimed also by a son of Christian IV of Denmark. When Christian
approached the emperor to sanction his son's claim to Halberstadt, he
was not only rebuffed. Relying on the letter of the law, Ferdinand de-
manded the return to the Roman Catholic church of certain churches,
lands and cloisters secularized since 1552. Among them was a church in
the bishopric of Halberstadt.
Northern Germany was defenceless, a prey to the emperor's demands
which could be enforced by Tilly's army.
Except for the Dutch, the year 1624 opened with armed opposition to
the Habsburgs at a standstill. This was only a lull, for preparations were
under way to challenge the successes of emperor, Spain and Catholic
League.
In France, the king's ministers were reversing a pro-Spanish policy.
The immediate issue was control of the Valtelline, the strategic valley
which furnished the passageway for Spanish troops and money from
northern Italy to both Austria and the Netherlands. The valley was in-
habited by Catholic communities over which suzerainty was claimed by
the Protestant League of the Grisons. In 1620, after a bloody revolt of
the Catholic Valtelliners against the Grisons, Spain stepped in as pro-
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
tector of her co-religionists, and took control of the all-important pass.
Two attempts by the Grisons in 1622 to recover the valley ended in
disaster. They were forced to renounce their suzerainty over the Valtelline
in favour of Spain, and a portion of the Grisons was seized by Austria.
Alarmed by these Austro-Spanish victories, France signed a treaty
with Venice and Savoy in February 1623 for the recovery of the Val-
telline. Pope Gregory XV, equally alarmed by the prospect of war spread-
ing in Italy, agreed to sequester the disputed territory and despatched
papal troops to take over the fortified places. The French agreed to this
arrangement on condition that the sequestration should come to an end
in four months' time, and that the forts should be razed. Gregory XV
died in July 1623 and was succeeded by Urban VIII. The new pope,
although a staunch opponent of Habsburg dominance, could not, while
under Spanish pressure, remove his troops on the expiration of the four-
months' period. The Valtelline, to all intents and purposes, still remained
under Spanish control.
Even more startling reversals of French foreign policy were a treaty
with the Dutch signed on 10 June 1624, and the negotiations for a
marriage between Henrietta Maria, the king's sister, and Charles, heir
to the English throne.
Cardinal Richelieu, who had been admitted to the king's council in
April 1624 and who became chief minister in August, subscribed fully to
the anti-Habsburg policy which he inherited. Although a more pious
Catholic than Henri IV, he was a true disciple of the great king. The
cardinal's aims were simple: unity within the state, and strengthening the
state to combat the encirclement of France by Spain. Any means were
admissible to accomplish the ends, and Protestant allies were as acceptable
as Catholic. When asked his advice about the Dutch alliance he replied
that it would be understood in Rome, for 'in Rome, more than in any
other place in the world, affairs are judged as much by the criteria of power
and interest as by ecclesiastical argument '.* But the immediate objective was
still the Valtelline, which Richelieu considered 'importantissime'. 2 In
July 1624, he made an agreement with Savoy and Venice to intervene.
In England, too, an aggressive foreign policy supplanted pacific negotia-
tions. King James turned over the making of policy to his favourite, the
duke of Buckingham, a man with grandiose plans, but with mediocre
ability to put them into execution. The powerful favourite and his inti-
mate friend Prince Charles, soon to begin his unfortunate reign, were
deeply chagrined by the failure of the Spanish marriage plan. It was not
only a personal affront; the possibility of recovering the Palatinate with
Spanish aid was for ever gone, and France was therefore to take the
1
J. H. Mariejol, in E. Lavisse, Histoire de France, depuis les originesjusqu'a la revolution
(1911), vi, p t n . p . 227.
2
G. Pages, La Guerre de Trente Ans (1939), p. 106.
319
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
place of Spain both in marriage and in the reconquest of the lost land.
Additional allies were of course needed. Besides the Dutch, who could be
relied upon, it was proposed to bring Denmark, Sweden, Venice, Savoy
and German princes into the great anti-Habsburg coalition. For this
purpose ambassadors were despatched to the continent in the spring
of 1624.
The hope of cementing a firm Anglo-French alliance to regain the
Palatinate by a marriage alliance proved to be a bitter disappointment.
France was interested in Italy, England in Germany, and the result of
this divergence is illustrated by the ill-fated Mansfeld expedition.
In the spring and summer of 1624, Mansfeld, temporarily without an
army, travelled back and forth between France, England, and the United
Provinces seeking an employer. Finally, in November, James I, spurred on
by Buckingham, gave his consent to levy 12,000 conscripts for Mansfeld,
and agreed to pay £20,000 monthly for their upkeep. The French pro-
mised 2,000 cavalry. But when the news arrived that a French army had
expelled the papal troops from the Valtelline, Richelieu lost interest in
the expedition. It was suggested that Mansfeld be used for the relief of
Breda, besieged by Spinola's troops. He would not, however, be permitted
to land in France, for that would involve open war with Spain. Richelieu
was not yet prepared for this drastic step, and would not be for many
years. James I, on the other hand, to his dying day refused permission to
use Mansfeld's army against Spain for the relief of Breda. When the
troops finally arrived on the Dutch coast in February 1625, Prince Maurice
at first refused them permission to land. Cooped up in the cold ships,
eating foul food, and drinking contaminated water, thousands died and
the bodies washed ashore spread pestilence throughout Brabant. Not more
than7,ooo men disembarked, and when the death of King James released
them from the prohibition to assist in the relief of Breda, it was too late.
The city fell on 25 May, a great Spanish victory made memorable by the
celebrated canvas of Velasquez. The Mansfeld expedition was a sorry
prelude to a coalition intended to contain Habsburg ambitions.
A Huguenot revolt in January 1625 made French co-operation even
more remote, and now the success of the anti-Habsburg league depended
on the English negotiations with Denmark, Sweden and the German
Protestant princes.
The king of Denmark, Christian IV, and the king of Sweden, Gustavus
Adolphus, had certain traits in common. Both were energetic, physically
vigorous, brave, and ambitious for the extension of the territory and power
of their states. Both had hitherto been successful in foreign affairs.
Christian maintained a strong position in the western Baltic by control
of the Sound where he collected lucrative tolls, and besides held secular-
ized bishoprics, through his sons, in Germany. Gustavus Adolphus by
wars against Poland and Russia had won territories in the eastern Baltic.
320
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Both were firm Lutherans, and wished to act as the saviours of German
Protestantism. Here the resemblances end. In military affairs the king of
Sweden was a genius, the king of Denmark a talented amateur. Gustavus
Adolphus had built a strong native army. Christian had a militia which
could be used only for home defence, and he would be forced to rely
upon foreign mercenaries in an offensive war. Above all, Gustavus
Adolphus was that rare combination of man of action and careful planner,
while Christian's ambitions were not matched by the ability to devise
means for their accomplishment.
The difference between the two monarchs is clearly revealed in the
plans presented to England for the invasion of Germany. Gustavus in-
sisted that an army of 50,000 men would be required, of which he would
furnish 16,000, the remainder to be provided by his allies. To guard
against possible attack from Denmark or Poland he asked for a fleet of
seventeen vessels to be added to eight of his own. As bases for the disem-
barkation of troops and for magazines of munitions and food, the cities
of Wismar and Bremen should be placed at his disposal. England, Sweden,
and the allied German princes were each to pay one-third of the expenses
of the war; but the conduct of the war must be entirely under his control.
Nor would Gustavus stir a step until four months' pay was in his hands.
Finally, he gave warning that if his offer were not acceptable he was
resolved to renew the war with Poland, which was temporarily suspended
by a truce. No wonder that James, when confronted by the Swedish
demands in January 1625, exclaimed: ' I am not so great and rich a
prince as to be able to do so much. I am only the king of two poor little
islands!' 1 Christian of Denmark's plan was much more to his taste.
When Christian was first approached in July 1624 he gave a cautious
reply, and remarked that one could never be assured that England
wished to do anything until one had seen an English army in the heart of
Germany. Late in January 1625, after much hesitation, Christian pro-
posed that an army of 30,000 should be raised. England's contribution
would be 6,000 foot and 1,000 horse at a cost of £170,000 or £180,000 a
year. The fact that Christian, unlike his Swedish competitor, did not de-
mand payment in advance must have weighed heavily in his favour.
On the last day of February, James accepted the Danish offer. Gustavus,
when asked what he would do if the leadership of the projected army
were given to another, replied: 'Nothing.' At the expiration of the truce,
he renewed his war against Poland.
Christian had good reasons for entering the war. His son had in 1623
been elected bishop of Verden, and he sought to gain for him in addition
the wealthy sees of Halberstadt, Osnabriick, Paderborn, and Bremen.
The archbishopric of Bremen alone would give control of the mouths of
the Elbe and Weser rivers. These grandiose plans would be upset if Tilly
1
S. R. Gardiner, History of England, Vol. v, pp. 297-8.
321
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
conquered the Lower Saxon Circle, and made the bishoprics secure for
the Catholic church. The chief influence in the king of Denmark's decision
was, however, the possible intervention of Gustavus Adolphus. To permit
Sweden to take the leadership in defence of the threatened north German
lands would have meant the loss to Denmark of its dominant position
in the western Baltic. Yet to plunge into war without adequate military
and financial support was as foolhardy as Frederick's acceptance of the
Bohemian throne. English assurances, as Christian himself had said, were
surely not enough; nor were 30,000 soldiers sufficient. He had high hopes
of French support, but no definite agreement had been reached.
Christian was soon to see the consequences of his rash decision. The
death of King James in April 1625 speeded the conclusion of the Anglo-
Danish alliance, and Charles I promised Christian £30,000 monthly
until the English army was sent to Germany. A first payment of £46,000
proved also to be the last, for Parliament refused to grant the necessary
funds. Christian was, to be sure, elected head of the Lower Saxon
Circle. With the assistance of Mansfeld, Christian of Brunswick and
Duke Ernest of Saxe-Weimar, he recruited about 34,000 men. But the
plan for the great anti-Habsburg league failed miserably. Gustavus
Adolphus had withdrawn, and with him his brother-in-law, the elector of
Brandenburg, who had hitherto been willing to lend his support. The
elector of Saxony categorically refused to fight against the emperor. Even
members of the Lower Saxon Circle continued negotiations with the
emperor in the hope of maintaining their neutrality. The Treaty of The
Hague signed on 9 December 1625, by England, Denmark and the United
Provinces was the sole result of the feverish attempts to form a league of
all Habsburg enemies, both Catholic and Protestant. Most disappointing
was the failure of French support. A serious Huguenot revolt forced
Richelieu to withdraw his troops from the Valtelline, and the treaty of
Monzon signed in May 1626 reopened the valley to Spain.
While Christian's hopes were failing, his enemy's strength was increas-
ing. For the first time, a large well-equipped army raised in the name of
the emperor appeared in the field. The commander was Albrecht von
Waldstein, commonly known as Wallenstein. So many books have been
written about him that it is difficult to estimate his aims and achievements.
He seems to have been a mass of contradictions: a loyal servant of the
emperor and a traitor, a soldier who sought peace, a Bohemian patriot
and a good German, a man of powerful will and ambition with strange
periods of inactivity. He showed all these characteristics at one time or
another in the course of his spectacular career.
Wallenstein came of a noble Bohemian family, was educated first as a
Protestant, then by the Jesuits, and ended by believing in astrology and in
himself. Both a professional soldier and an enterprising businessman,
Wallenstein took full advantage of the Bohemian revolt. He served the
322
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
emperor and at the same time became the greatest landowner and pro-
bably the wealthiest man in the kingdom. Military success brought
credit with bankers who loaned money for the purchase of land, some of
them the confiscated estates of the Bohemian nobility. With increasing
wealth, Wallenstein made loans to the emperor, always in financial dis-
tress, and Ferdinand in turn repaid him in lands and dignities. By 1623
Wallenstein possessed a block of territory comprising some 2,000 square
miles in the north-east corner of Bohemia. He was appointed governor
of the kingdom, quartermaster-general of the troops, and created prince
of Friedland.
In the spring of 1625, Wallenstein offered not only to raise an imperial
force of 20,000 men, but undertook to advance the money necessary to
recruit the army. The offer was accepted, and in July he was made com-
mander-in-chief of all imperial forces and raised to the dignity of duke,
the highest title in the emperor's gift. In order to equip, pay and feed his
army, Wallenstein formed what amounted to a partnership with Hans de
Witte, the great international banker and merchant of Prague. 1 De Witte
advanced the needed money, and acted as supply agent and shipper for
military supplies. The farms of the Friedland duchy were one of the chief
sources for provisioning the army. The greatest difficulty was financial.
Little could be obtained from the emperor, and Wallenstein therefore
resorted to 'contributions' for the repayment of de Witte's loans and
of his own outlays. 'Contributions' was the euphemistic term applied to
the forced payments exacted from townsmen and peasants by the colonels
of the invading army. Judged by imperial law, these forced contributions
were clearly illegal; but at least prompt pay made less likely the customary
atrocious activities of the soldiery. This army was remarkable in another
respect: officers were appointed and promoted for merit, and not accor-
ding to social rank or religious faith. Many were indeed Protestants.
On 28 July 1625, three days after Wallenstein received his final com-
mission, Tilly crossed the Weser 'in the name of God and His Holy
Mother'. This marks the beginning of the Danish war. The first opposi-
tion came from the enraged Brunswick peasantry and from hostile towns
which closed their gates on the invading army. In return, the maddened
soldiers took vengeance by plundering and burning towns and villages,
and murdering helpless civilians. Even Tilly, forgetful of his motto, re-
marked that the peasants deserved these horrors. There were no military
encounters. Christian of Denmark was seriously injured by a fall from the
ramparts of Hameln and his army withdrew northwards to Verden. Tilly
did not feel strong enough to pursue.
Early in September Wallenstein marched his army of 20,000 men out
1
For a detailed study of de Witte's relations with Wallenstein see A. Ernstberger,
'Hans de Witte, Finanzmann Wallansteins', Viertaljahrschrift fiir Sozial- und Wirtschafts-
geschichte, Suppl. 38 (1954).
323
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
of Bohemia. He had no intention of joining Tilly in an attack on the
Danish army. His immediate objective was the occupation of the bishop-
rics of Halberstadt and Magdeburg, earmarked for the fourteen-year-old
son of the emperor. Here winter quarters were set up for the raw recruits,
while the colonels collected huge contributions from the near-by cities.
As a defensive measure, Wallenstein fortified the Dessau bridge on the
Elbe to prevent Mansfeld or the duke of Brunswick from crossing into
Silesia.
There was nothing to fear from Brunswick, who failed to raise an
adequate army. Diseased in body and dejected, the ferocious chivalric
prince died at the early age of twenty-eight. But Wallenstein had correctly
guessed Mansfeld's intentions. He appeared at the head of 12,000 men to
storm the bridge of Dessau, and Wallenstein rushed his best troops to
meet the attack. On 25 April 1626 Mansfeld was repulsed with the loss
of one-third of his troops and retreated into neutral Brandenburg. In
July he was again on the move, to join Bethlen Gabor of Transylvania
who was threatening to make one of his periodic attacks on the emperor.
Wallenstein went into pursuit leaving behind eight regiments to strengthen
Tilly. This was indeed necessary, for Christian of Denmark planned to
attack the army of the Catholic League in Wallenstein's absence. Instead,
because of the Wallenstein reinforcements, the king was now forced to
retreat northwards. On 27 August, Tilly caught up with him at the village
of Lutter. The Danish army was routed in spite of Christian's reckless
courage, and its remnants took refuge in Stade near the estuary of the
Elbe.
Meantime, Wallenstein with an army of 30,000 followed Mansfeld into
Hungary where he joined Bethlen Gabor. Neither the wily prince of
Transylvania nor Wallenstein was anxious for battle, and after skirmishes
a truce was arranged in October. It had not been a glorious campaign.
Hundreds of miles from his base of supplies, the imperial commander-in-
chief had lost half of his army by disease, starvation and desertion. The
chief objective had, however, been achieved: the career of Mansfeld was
at an end. Bethlen Gabor had no further use for him, and the unlucky
soldier of fortune set out on his last journey, perhaps with Venice as his
goal. He fell ill, and on 25 November died in the hills near Serajevo.
Step by step the emperor and the elector of Bavaria suppressed the
little resistance that opposed them, and consolidated their gains. In 1626
a fierce peasant uprising in Upper Austria against Bavarian and Catholic
rule was ruthlessly suppressed. The following year Ferdinand promul-
gated a new constitution for Bohemia which made the monarchy heredi-
tary and gave him the power of all official appointments. Protestants in
the kingdom had the choice of conversion or exile. Wallenstein dispersed
the last of Mansfeld's troops in Silesia, and in 1627 only the king of
Denmark was still in arms.
324
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Christian's position after the battle of Lutter was desperate. England
promised an army of 10,000 men, which diminished to about half that
number. The troops were to be paid by the pawning of a royal jewel
valued at £100,000, a sum which was never realized, instead of the
£600,000 owed by the treaty of The Hague. 'Let God and the world
judge', the king wrote to England, 'whether this be answerable or
Christian-like dealing. >x
In fact, just at the time when the king of Denmark's need was greatest,
Buckingham's inept foreign policy threw France into alliance with Spain
against England. The breach with France, and Buckingham's unsuccessful
attempt to relieve the Huguenots at La Rochelle in the summer of 1627,
made it impossible for England to support Christian.
When Tilly and Wallenstein joined forces on the Elbe in September
1627, the Danish forces were vastly outnumbered. The only important
battle was fought at Heiligenhafen on 23 September, where the imperial-
ists defeated an 8,000-man army commanded by the margrave of Baden-
Durlach. Christian fled to Holstein and in October crossed over to the
island of Fiinen. Holstein, Schleswig and Jutland were overrun by the
enemy, and the king retained only his.island possessions and three forti-
fied towns on the mainland.
In the flush of victory, Wallenstein thought of a great crusade against
the Turks; but a more immediate objective claimed his attention: the
control of the northern seas. As early as 1624, Spain's chief minister,
Olivares, had proposed a treaty with the Hanseatic cities. In return for
trade concessions in the Indies, the cities would serve as Habsburg naval
bases. The project was actively discussed in 1626, and now with Denmark's
defeat, it was revived. Meanwhile, Wallenstein extended his conquests
on the Baltic coast. Mecklenburg was occupied, and the native dukes
expelled from their territory. Pomerania was next in line, and its ruling
prince was forced to admit imperial troops. In April 1628 Wallenstein
could add to his titles, General of the North and Baltic Seas [General
der ozeanischen und baltischen Meeres]. Unexpected opposition, however,
came from the Hanseatic cities. They were suspicious of Habsburg, es-
pecially of Spanish, domination, and refused to furnish the fleet essential
for a general of the seas. Wismar was seized; but this was not enough, for
Wallenstein realized that the chief obstacle to the control of the Baltic
would come from Sweden. It was therefore necessary to secure the whole
of the Pomeranian coast, and here the port of Stralsund refused to submit
to imperial occupation.
Gustavus Adolphus had watched Denmark's defeat with great anxiety.
While still deeply engaged in the war against Poland, it was also clearly
evident to the king that the spread of imperial power in north Germany
1
'Statement by the King of Denmark', 26 February/8 March 1627, Public Record Office
State Papers Denmark, vui, f. 14.
325
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
threatened both Sweden's security and the very existence of German
Protestantism. The old rivalry with Denmark was no longer an issue, and
on 8 May 1628 Gustavus Adolphus signed a three-year alliance with
Christian IV. It was none too soon, for three weeks before the signing of
the treaty, Wallenstein's General Arnim began the siege of Stralsund.
Without the arrival of Danish and Swedish troops the town could not
have held out. In July, Wallenstein took charge of the siege, swearing that
he would capture the port 'though it were bound with chains to Heaven'.
Not heavenly chains, but Wallenstein's lack of a fleet, and foreign troops
saved Stralsund. The besiegers withdrew in August, and the town was
garrisoned by a Scottish regiment in Swedish service under the command
of Alexander Leslie, later famous in England's great Civil War. By a
treaty signed on 12 September 1628, Stralsund became the first German
ally of Gustavus Adolphus, who was convinced that it was only a matter
of time before he would find it necessary to launch a full-scale invasion
of Germany.
The siege of Stralsund was scarcely lifted when the king of Denmark
made a final effort to retrieve his fortunes. He landed on the Pomeranian
coast, seized Wolgast and prepared to invade Mecklenburg. Wallenstein
marched to meet him, and on 2 September the Danish army was destroyed.
Christian fled back to his islands and sued for peace. The attempt of
Gustavus Adolphus to hold him to the recently concluded alliance failed.
The Peace of Lubeck, signed on 7 June 1629, was not too harsh. The
German bishoprics, for which the king had entered the war, were re-
nounced, and Christian retained his hereditary lands.
It is not surprising that Emperor Ferdinand thought that the time had
come to use his military preponderance for the benefit of the Catholic
church. His position had, in fact, not changed since 1608, when as imperial
delegate he demanded that all church lands seized by Protestants since
1552 should be restored. On 6 March 1629 Ferdinand, his religious fer-
vour encouraged by his Jesuit confessor Lamormain, issued the Edict
of Restitution. By its provisions, all ecclesiastical properties taken over
by Protestants were to be returned to the Catholic church. The transfers
were to be entrusted to imperial commissioners from whom there was to
be no appeal, and in their decisions they were to confine themselves
simply to the question whether church properties had been seized by
Protestants before or after 1552. Approval was given to the expulsion of
Protestants from the territories of Catholic rulers. Only Lutherans were
given legal recognition, which meant the exclusion of Calvinists. A few
days after the promulgation of the edict, commissioners were appointed
with the right to call in imperial troops for the enforcement of their
decisions.
The edict changed the map of northern Germany. Before the victories
of Gustavus Adolphus turned back the Catholic tide, five bishoprics,
326
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
about thirty imperial and Hanseatic cities, nearly one hundred convents,
and an incalculable number of parishes were recovered. Thousands of
Protestants were subject to expulsion or forcible conversion by their
new rulers.
The edict not only deprived Protestant princes of lands, and subjects
of their religion and homes. It destroyed the unity of the Catholic party.
Pope Urban VIII demanded that the imperial commissioners be replaced
by his own representatives. The religious orders fought each other for the
spoils. Above all, a serious breach was opened between the princes of the
Catholic League, headed by Maximilian of Bavaria, and the emperor.
To Catholic princes, no less than to Protestant, the absolutist rule of an
emperor by decree, rather than through the constitutional channel of a
diet, was a serious threat to their power. Moreover, Ferdinand and Maxi-
milian were in direct conflict. The emperor sought the installation of his
younger son, the Archduke Leopold William, as bishop of Magdeburg
as well as bishop of Halberstadt, Hildesheim and Bremen. Maximilian
claimed Halberstadt for his brother, the archbishop of Cologne, and
Bremen for another Bavarian prince. The Catholic princes gave way to
Habsburg claims on Magdeburg and Halberstadt with great reluctance.
Of equal importance to the edict as a divisive factor in the empire was
Wallenstein. Jealousy, fear and hatred of Wallenstein had been growing
since his appointment as commander-in-chief. Obviously there were great
nobles in Prague and Vienna who were jealous of his wealth and rank.
German princes were not only jealous but fearful when, in March 1628,
the emperor bestowed on him the title of duke of Mecklenburg to replace
the exiled native rulers. This was an act which could have only one
meaning: the absolute power of an emperor to make and break the
highest in the land. Even the transfer of the Palatinate electorate and
lands to Maximilian of Bavaria paled in comparison. Maximilian was a
German prince, while Wallenstein was a mere Bohemian nobleman.
There were besides continual and bitter complaints from both Catholic
and Protestant princes of the contributions and exactions for the imperial
army, which at times exceeded 100,000 men. Wallenstein had dared even
to occupy large portions of Brandenburg and Pomerania despite the pro-
tests of their rulers. To Catholics it was evident that he was not enthu-
siastic in the enforcement of the edict except in so far as it strengthened
imperial power. It was noted that there was no interference with Protestant
worship in the duchy of Mecklenburg, and the many Protestant officers
in the imperial army offered further proof that Wallenstein had no
interest in the furtherance of the Catholic faith. His enemies circulated
wild rumours that he had sought the Danish crown, and that he now
aimed at an elector's title or even the imperial throne. But undoubtedly
the chief reason for the fear and hatred of Wallenstein was the belief,
not without justification, that he was attempting to establish an imperial
327
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
despotism. His own words, spoken in outbursts of temper, could be
quoted against him: 'He would teach the electors manners; they must be
dependent on the emperor, not the emperor on them.' And again: 'I am
accustomed to serve the house of Austria and not to be harassed by
Bavarian servitude.'
While the empire was torn by internal dissension, the foreign situation
became threatening. With the surrender of the Huguenot stronghold of
La Rochelle in October 1628, and the Peace of Alais in the following year,
Richelieu was free to renew his campaign against the Habsburgs. His
foreign policy is clearly stated in the memorandum which he presented to
Louis XIII in January 1629. There was both a long-range and an imme-
diate programme. In the future it would be necessary to open doors into
the neighbouring states. Metz should be fortified, and if possible, French
power should advance to Strasbourg in order to acquire an entry into
Germany. Time, discretion, and careful and covert conduct would be
needed to achieve these ends. Richelieu's fixed aim, as he explained it to
his master, was to arrest' the progress of Spain', and a particular occasion
was presented in Italy where the Gonzaga duke of Mantua and Mont-
ferrat died in December 1627 without a direct heir. Louis XIII, in alliance
with Venice, defended the claim of Charles of Nevers, a prince more
French than Italian, while Spain in alliance with the duke of Savoy
supported another branch of the Gonzaga family. The two provinces
were of military importance for they contained the fortresses of Casale
and Mantua.
The Mantuan war which ensued marks a turning point in the fortunes
of Spain, and tied up imperial troops in Italy, soon to be desperately
needed in Germany. Richelieu's action in the Mantuan affair proved to
be the first permanent check to Habsburg power since the beginning of
the Thirty Years War, and the first in a series of Spanish disasters.
Without a declaration of war against Spain, Louis XIII crossed the
Alps in March 1629, and defeated the Savoyard army. This victory
forced the Spanish army to raise the siege of Casale. The intervention of
the emperor, who maintained that Mantua as an imperial fief was subject
to his jurisdiction, forced Richelieu into further activity. In the summer of
1629, a portion of Wallenstein's army under the command of Collalto
marched through the Valtelline pass and besieged Mantua, while the
veteran Spinola invested Casale. In the dead of winter, Richelieu himself
leading, the troops crossed the Alps, and in March 1630 captured the
fortress of Pinerolo. In June Louis XIII conquered Savoy, but Mantua
fell to the imperialist army in the following month.
While concentrating on military efforts in Italy, Richelieu had not
neglected the northern theatres of war. The Treaty of Altmark (26 Sept-
ember 1629) mediated by the French ambassador Charnace, provided for
a six-year truce between Sweden and Poland. This freed Gustavus Adol-
328
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
phus for the invasion of Germany. In June 1630 France and the United
Provinces concluded a seven-year alliance, which provided the Dutch
a yearly subsidy of a million livres. Dutch successes in the summer and
autumn of 1630 amply repaid this assistance.
On 3 July 1630 the emperor presented a memorial to a meeting of the
Electoral College at Regensburg requesting assistance for the Dutch and
Italian wars, and protection against the threatened invasion of the king
of Sweden. Three days later, Gustavus Adolphus landed on the Pomer-
anian coast, a momentous event which caused little excitement in Regens-
burg. As might be expected, the representatives of the Protestant electors
of Saxony and Brandenburg (they refused to attend the meeting in person)
made vigorous protests against the Edict of Restitution. The Catholic
electors joined the emperor in rejecting these remonstrances, but there
was no further co-operation between them. A solid front was presented
against Ferdinand's plans to involve the empire in the Dutch and Italian
wars which could only be to the advantage of Spain. As for Sweden,
a solemn letter was despatched by the electors to Gustavus Adolphus
asking him to withdraw his troops. Nor would they listen to the em-
peror's plea for the election of his eldest son as king of the Romans, a
title which recognized succession to the imperial throne. The electors were
interested only in curbing the emperor's power, and this they believed
could be accomplished by the reduction of the imperial army and the
dismissal of Wallenstein.
The revolt of the electors against the emperor was further complicated
by Richelieu's intrigues. He sent an ambassador to Regensburg, accom-
panied by his intimate adviser the Capuchin monk Father Joseph,
popularly known as his Grey Eminence, to negotiate an Italian peace,
and to strengthen the opposition against the emperor. One of the electors,
the archbishop of Trier, was favourable to France, and Richelieu hoped
to win over Maximilian of Bavaria.
Faced with such determined resistance to his plans, and fearful of the
Franco-Bavarian negotiations, Ferdinand agreed, on 13 August 1630, to
dismiss Wallenstein. The general retired to his estates in Bohemia, no
doubt confident that his services would again be required.
The emperor and the French ambassador now reached an agreement on
the Italian war. It provided for the recognition of the duke of Nevers
as ruler of Mantua and Montferrat. In return, France was forbidden to
assist the enemies of the emperor. The French ambassador had, however,
exceeded his instructions, and Richelieu repudiated the agreement. The
Treaty of Cherasco, finally signed in March 1631, recognized the duke of
Nevers, but did not tie Richelieu's hands.
While a large imperial army fought in Italy, and the electors still
further weakened the military power of Germany, Gustavus Adolphus
was consolidating his position in Pomerania. A new period of the war was
"
329
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
MHFDECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
beginning. Politically, the country was hopelessly and dangerously
divided. The rulers of Germany, who could not manage their own affairs,
were to have them managed by Sweden and France.
II
Gustavus Adolphus was thirty-five years old when he landed at Peene-
miinde on 6 July 1630. His military campaigns, ending two years later at
Liitzen, changed the course of the Thirty Years War and the course of
European history. In partnership with his friend and constant adviser, the
Chancellor Oxenstierna, he saved German Protestantism and made
Sweden a great power. The king's administrative and military abilities
were inspired by the righteousness of his cause. In the fight for this
sacred cause, there could be only friend or foe. Shortly after the landing,
he had a stormy meeting with the elector of Brandenburg's ambassadors
who pleaded for neutrality. The king replied:
I tell you frankly, I will not listen to talk about neutrality. His Excellency [i.e.
the elector] must be either friend or foe . . . If his Excellency wishes to hold with
God, good; he is on my side. If, however, he wishes to hold with the Devil, then in
truth he must fight against me. There cannot be a third way that is certain . . . [As
for neutrality] it is nothing but rubbish which the wind raises and carries away.
What is neutrality anyway? I do not undertsand it. 1
To Gustavus Adolphus, the security of the realm and the protection
of Protestantism were inseparable. The Polish wars were fought not only
to prevent his cousin King Sigismund from making good a dynastic
claim to the Swedish crown, but to stop a Catholic ally of the Habsburgs
from extending the conquests of the Counter-Reformation. Both Gus-
tavus Adolphus and Oxenstierna were outraged by the pusillanimity of
the German Protestant princes in the opening years of the Thirty Years
War, and yet as early as 1620 the chancellor realized that intervention
in Germany might at some future time be necessary. The failure of the
negotiations for a powerful Protestant alliance in 1624 threw the king
back into the Polish war, which he considered a diversion in the Protestant
interest. The extension of his operations into Prussia in 1626, and the
relief of Stralsund brought him closer to the German war. With the defeat
of Denmark and the ever-increasing imperial and Catholic predominance,
the decision to invade Germany could no longer be postponed. The two
guiding principles of Gustavus Adolphus, Sweden's security and the
Protestant cause, coincided. 2
Before his landing in Pomerania, the king made strenuous efforts to
obtain the support of the German Protestant princes, especially the elec-
1
J. Paul, Gustaf Adolf, Vol. n (1930), pp. 180-1.
For Sweden and Gustavus Adolphus before 1630, see Chapter xm below. Michael
Roberts in Gustavus Adolphus, a History ofSweden 1611-1632 (2 Vols. 1953, 1958), gives a
brilliant account of the king's reign.
330
1
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
tors of Brandenburg and Saxony, but without success. John George of
Saxony made it clear that if Sweden invaded Germany, he would remain
loyal to the emperor. George William of Brandenburg, even though
Gustavus was his brother-in-law, sought only a peace which would
guarantee his lands from further invasion, and attempted to act as
mediator between Sweden and the emperor. Richelieu sought an alliance
during the winter and spring of 1629-30, but the negotiations broke down.
The cardinal's policy was to build an anti-Habsburg league based on
Bavaria, while the king insisted on the headship of the league, and
equality with France. Thus Sweden entered the war with only one ally,
the city of Stralsund.
There were, however, compensating circumstances. As has been pointed
out, there was disunity in the ranks of the enemy, and their greatest
general, Wallenstein, had been dismissed, to be replaced by the septua-
genarian Tilly. The imperial forces in Germany, about 40,000 strong,
although overwhelmingly superior to the small invading Swedish army
of 14,000, were widely scattered. An imperial army of 55,000 was tied up
in Italy. The army of the Catholic League, dispersed from west of the
Elbe to the Rhine, was in poor fighting condition. Gustavus Adolphus
therefore had no difficulty in establishing a bridgehead and by August
the greater part of Pomerania was in Swedish hands. The important city
of Magdeburg declared for Sweden, opening up the possibility of a cam-
paign on the Elbe, and Gustavus Adolphus sent a distinguished officer,
Dietrich von Falkenberg, to take command of Magdeburg's defence. But
there were no further revolts in favour of the invader, while the difficulties
of obtaining adequate military supplies, reinforcements, food, and cash
for the payment of the soldiers, slowed up further military advances.
Finally, on Christmas Day 1630, 1 Gustavus Adolphus won a striking
victory by storming Greifenhagen, followed by the capture of Gartz, and
a chase of the imperialists across the Pomeranian border as far as Kustrin
in Brandenburg. The king established headquarters at Barwalde in his
brother-in-law's territory. He was now in a stronger position to negotiate
for alliances.
The aid of allies was indeed indispensable as the king's practical
programme unfolded. It was necessary, he realized, to acquire German
lands, both for Sweden's security (assecuratio), and as compensation for
the great sacrifices imposed by the war (satisfactio). But he was still unable
to budge the electors of Brandenburg and Saxony from their neutrality.
The most that John George of Saxony would do was to call a conference of
German Protestant princes and cities to meet in Leipzig in February 1631.
More successful were the renewal of the negotiations with France
which had broken down in the previous spring. A five-year treaty of
alliance was signed at Barwalde on 23 January 1631. The terms of the
1
Old style: 4 January 1631 in the new calendar.
331
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
M*DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
treaty were a defeat of Richelieu's diplomacy, and a victory for the king.
The cardinal hoped to break Habsburg power in Germany by a coalition of
Sweden, Bavaria and Protestant German states. An anti-Habsburg league
should fight the battles of France in Germany. Instead, the Treaty of
Barwalde provided Gustavus Adolphus with much-needed financial assis-
tance (400,000 reich dollars annually, and 120,000 for the year 1630),
without tying his hands. Richelieu protected his co-religionists by a
clause in the treaty which permitted Catholic worship in any Catholic
territories conquered by Sweden. In an agreement signed five days after
the treaty, Gustavus Adolphus also promised to respect the neutrality of
Bavaria and the Catholic League, provided that they remained 'sincerely'
neutral. Inasmuch as the king could interpret this sincerity in the broadest
sense, any direct or indirect attack by Maximilian of Bavaria on a Swedish
ally or friend could be considered a breach of neutrality. Gustavus
Adolphus received French support without losing independence of action,
and Richelieu was powerless to influence his decisions.
German aid for Sweden depended on the Leipzig conference whose
proceedings dragged on from February to April 1631. The results were
meagre. John George of Saxony, who dominated the conference, still
hoped that the mere threat of opposition would induce the emperor to
modify the Edict of Restitution, and to prohibit the incursions of imperial
armies into Protestant territories, especially into his own. The convention,
to be sure, agreed to raise a defensive army of 40,000; but it was to be
locally divided and commanded, and could be called into action only by
order of the elector of Saxony. The convention of Leipzig was a blow to
the Swedish king's hope for German support, and a subject of derision
to his enemies.
Meantime, neither Gustavus Adolphus nor Tilly had the military pre-
ponderance necessary for a decisive victory. Both, moreover, awaited the
outcome of the Leipzig conference. The immediate stake was Magdeburg,
since November 1630 besieged by Count Pappenheim, the fiery Bavarian
cavalry officer. Gustavus Adolphus had given repeated assurances of
protection to the beleaguered city, and until April 1631 it appeared to him
that it could be saved by diversionary tactics. But now the combined forces
of Tilly and Pappenheim, twice the size of the Swedish army, threatened
the city. It could be saved only by immediate relief, and this was delayed
by the two Protestant electors. Gustavus Adolphus needed a line of re-
treat in case of failure, and he finally forced George William to grant him
the fortress of Spandau and the use of Kiistrin for this purpose. The
Saxon elector, however, refused permission to march through his terri-
tories, the shortest way to the city, or to support him with troops. In
desperation, Gustavus Adolphus nevertheless prepared to go to the relief
of Magdeburg, when the news reached him that the city had fallen on 20
May. The destruction of Magdeburg by assault and fire, and the death of
332
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
some 20,000 inhabitants, is the greatest single tragedy of the war. Tilly
had won the campaign at a terrible loss to the reputation of his cause.
Magdeburg had both political and military consequences. Gustavus
Adolphus gave up all hope of a militant German league headed by
Saxony. The king's long-term plan was to form a strong German Pro-
testant league under the leadership of Sweden, and meantime he made
alliances with individual princes who would agree to accept Swedish
control. Of these alliances, the most fruitful were with Bernard of Saxe-
Weimar, who now began a brilliant military career in the Swedish service,
and with the Landgrave William of Hesse. The landgrave, a gifted soldier
and statesman, became the staunchest Swedish ally in Germany.
Nor did Magdeburg stop the king's military advance. The disaster
forced him into action to prevent Tilly from pushing him back to the
Pomeranian coast. Another factor which made speed a necessity was the
release of imperial troops in northern Italy after the signing of the Peace
of Cherasco. The first steps in the recovery of the military initiative were
the storming of Greifswald, the last imperial stronghold in Pomerania,
and the conquest of Mecklenburg where the exiled dukes were restored.
While his generals Tott and Baner were engaged in these campaigns,
the king moved the main body of his troops from Spandau to the Elbe.
At Werben he set up a strong system of trenches and breastworks which
effectively blocked the imperialists. Tilly's retreat after fierce skirmishing
(6-7 August) was an important pyschological as well as a military defeat
for the hitherto uniformly successful general.
Checked by Gustavus Adolphus, the old veteran turned his attention
to Saxony. At the end of August he was joined by the long-awaited
imperial troops from Italy. Threatened by this formidable army on his
northern frontier, the elector of Saxony was finally forced into the Swedish
camp. When Tilly ordered John George not only to cease the recruitment
of an army, but threatened him with the loss of his secularized lands, the
elector realized that Swedish aid was indispensable. While Gustavus Adol-
phus prepared to give this support by moving his army toward Saxony,
he at the same time attempted to bind the elector by a firm alliance. But
even now, when the imperialists had invaded his lands, John George
refused to commit himself irrevocably to the Swedish cause. The alliance,
concluded on 12 September, satisfied neither party. Forced to accept
Swedish aid, the elector insisted that future operations must be planned
by agreement between the two parties, and he would accept Swedish
directions only 'as far as possible'.
On 15 September the Swedish and Saxon armies joined at Diiben,
about twenty-five miles north of Leipzig, which on this same day was
occupied by Tilly. Gustavus Adolphus, John George, and Tilly as well,
were ready to risk a battle, and on 17 September the armies clashed at
Breitenfeld near Leipzig. The king had the numerical superiority, 24,000
333
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
of his own men, and 18,000 Saxons, while Tilly's army numbered about
35,000. Compared to the enemy, the Swedes were a ragged lot; as Adler
Salvius, the Swedish diplomat, reported to the council in Stockholm:
Ragged, tattered and dirty were our men (from the continued labours of this last
year) beside the glittering, gilded and plume-decked imperialists. Our Swedish
and Finnish nags looked but puny, next to their great German chargers. Our peasant
lads made no brave show upon the field, when set against the hawk-nosed and
mustachio'd veterans of Tilly. 1
Despite the flight of the Saxons early in the battle, Gustavus Adolphus
won an overwhelming victory after five hours of desperate fighting. His
superior tactics and the discipline of his troops overwhelmed the imperial-
ists who suffered some 20,000 casualties, and lost 3,000 men by capture.
The Swedish losses were only about 2,100. The great cavalry leader
Pappenheim had met his match. Tilly, wounded, fled beyond the Weser.
The victory of Breitenfeld was celebrated throughout Protestant Europe,
and even in Moscow. In popular German verse the king of Sweden was
compared to the Old Testament heroes Joshua, Gideon, David and Judas
Maccabaeus, to Alexander the Great and the Emperor Theodosius. He
was the' Lion of the North' sent by God to save the righteous.
There were now three possibilities open to Gustavus Adolphus: a
pursuit of Tilly, a drive toward Vienna, or toward the Rhine. The first,
perhaps mistakenly, was scarcely considered, and its rejection gave Tilly
the opportunity to rebuild his army. The king decided to march through
Thuringia and Franconia (the 'Priests Alley' as it was called, for here lay
the rich ecclesiastical territories), and so on to the Rhine. This developed
into a great strategic plan to establish a strong position in the west, then
to move south and east for the final conquest of Bavaria and Austria.
Meantime, the Saxon army was to hold Silesia and Lusatia, thus acting
as a hinge for the huge enveloping movement. Gustavus Adolphus could
scarcely have envisaged this mighty plan when he landed at Peenemunde.
To assure the security of Sweden and the safety of Protestantism, it was
now considered necessary to conquer the whole of Germany and the
emperor's homeland!
At the end of September the Swedish army started on its triumphal
march to the west. Two weeks later Gustavus Adolphus entered the
episcopal city of Wurzburg where he remained for a month, setting up an
administration for Franconia, and welcoming the Protestant estates,
princes and cities now willing to ally with the conqueror. Frankfurt-am-
Main, the ancient capital of the empire, was entered on 27 November.
Crossing the Rhine at Oppenheim, where strong Spanish resistance was
overcome, the army marched north along the river to Mainz which capi-
tulated on 22 December. The elector, in precedence the first of German
princes, fled to Cologne.
1
Roberts, Gustavus Adolphus, Vol. 11, p. 537.
334
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
The march to the Rhine was, however, most displeasing to Richelieu.
In pursuance of his long-range programme to obtain entries into neigh-
bouring states, he acquired the fortress of Pinerolo by surreptitious
purchase from the duke of Savoy. This flagrant breach of the Treaty of
Cherasco furnished the necessary entry into Italy, and the cardinal could
turn his attention to the eastern frontier of France. But now he was faced
not only by the old enemy, Spain, but by the new ally, Sweden. His
objective, therefore, was to prevent Gustavus Adolphus, by diplomacy
and by threats, from obtaining permanent bridge-heads on the Rhine.
At the same time he continued his attempts to detach Bavaria and the
Catholic League from the emperor. A truce between Bavaria and Sweden
was, in fact, arranged by Richelieu; but it broke down when Pappenheim,
on Maximilian's orders, continued military operations in the Lower
Saxon Circle. As for the Catholic League, it collapsed when the Swedes
overran the ecclesiastical territories, and when one of its members, the
elector of Trier, signed a treaty of neutrality with both France and
Sweden. By the terms of the Trier treaty, Richelieu gained the rights to
occupy the Rhine fortresses of Ehrenbreitstein and Philipsburg. Ehren-
breitstein was occupied in June 1632^ and by arrangement with Sweden,
Coblenz was also handed over to France. Spanish troops were ejected
from Trier itself. Richelieu thereby gained his coveted entries into Ger-
many. The attempt to build a German anti-Habsburg alliance based on
Bavaria, and dominated by France, had, however, again failed. Riche-
lieu's aim to remove Swedish power from the left bank of the Rhine had,
moreover, strained the alliance with Gustavus Adolphus to the breaking
point. When the French ambassadors foolishly threatened that their king
was ready to march with 40,000 men, Gustavus Adolphus angrily retorted:
'Your king has no need of so many men in order to beat me. Had it
depended on mere numbers, it had not been I who beat the emperor, but
he me. Let your king go where he will; but let him have a care not to
cross the path of my armies, or he may look for a rencontre with me. 51
The Treaty of Barwalde continued in force; but henceforth Richelieu
and Gustavus Adolphus were unfriendly allies.
Relations with France were only one of many difficult problems
facing Gustavus Adolphus in the winter of 1631-2. The organization and
rule of the large conquered areas, relations with the Protestant German
princes, religious policy, military affairs, and above all, the recruitment
and supply of the armies necessary for the final victory, all these matters
demanded the constant attention of the king. Until January 1632, when he
was joined by Oxenstierna, the harassed monarch had the sole responsi-
bility, and even then the few available Swedish administrators could
scarcely cope with the situation. Mainz became the capital of an admini-
stration for the conquered territories, while German princes, assisted by
1
Roberts, Gustavus Adolphus, Vol. n, p. 587.
335
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Swedish agents, acted as governors in the local areas. Fundamentally,
it was a system of controlled exploitation to raise taxes for military pur-
poses and, though harsh, it was not unbearable. To be sure, the soldiery
sometimes got out of hand, ravaged the countryside and committed
atrocities, despite a strict disciplinary code and royal anger.
In religious matters, Gustavus Adolphus showed remarkable toleration.
Catholic church lands were confiscated and handed over to high officials
and military officers, both German and Swedish, as compensation for
their services; but to the surprise of the Catholic inhabitants, their
worship was permitted. The king also saw to the protection of his own
Lutheran faith. When the exiled Frederick V of the Palatinate arrived in
Mainz in high hopes for the restoration of his hereditary lands, Gustavus
Adolphus insisted that there must be toleration for Lutherans in the
Calvinist Palatinate.
The king's military difficulties arose in those regions which were too
distant to control directly. If he had pursued the enemy's army after the
Battle of Breitenfeld some of these difficulties could have been avoided.
Pappenheim, with a force far inferior to the Swedish forces in the area,
pinned down thousands of much-needed soldiers in the Lower Saxon
Circle. The greatest danger lay in the eastern front, assigned to the
elector of Saxony.
The commander of the Saxon army was Hans George von Arnim, a
pious Protestant Brandenburger who changed masters on principle. He
had served with distinction under Wallenstein; but the Edict of Resti-
tution induced him to desert the emperor, and to enter the Saxon service.
He was, however, no friend of Sweden, and acted on his own judgement
of military and political situations. In November 1631 he invaded
Bohemia and entered Prague, in direct contradiction to the strategic
plan of Gustavus Adolphus which called for a holding position for the
Saxon army in Lusatia and Silesia. The invasion of Bohemia endangered
the whole eastern front, if the emperor could increase his military strength.
That strength was indeed forthcoming with the revival of imperial power
wielded by Wallenstein.
The emperor's first reaction to the Battle of Breitenfeld had been so
fearful that he considered flight to Italy. With the consent of his spiritual
advisers, he was ready to make unusual concessions to save his crowns
and lands: suspension of the Edict of Restitution, return of the northern
bishoprics to the Protestant possessors, and temporary possession of
ecclesiastical lands by the electors of Brandenburg and Saxony. Ferdinand
quickly recovered his customary optimism, and determined to raise a
large imperial army to repulse the heretical invader. On 10 December
Wallenstein agreed to return as commander-in-chief, and in April 1632
he received not only complete military authority, but the right to
negotiate with the enemy. The duke of Friedland had guessed correctly
336
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
when he was dismissed in August 1630—his services would again be
required.
Wallenstein's activities during the period of his enforced retirement had
been of a peculiar nature. Ostensibly, he withdrew completely from public
life, even to the extent of refusing to supply food from his great estates for
Tilly's army. At the same time, he carried on secret and complicated
intrigues with the emperor's enemies. Since early in 1631, a group of
exiled Bohemian nobles, headed by Adam Terzka, Wallenstein's brother-
in-law, were in touch with Bohemian officers serving in the Swedish army.
Of these officers, the most conspicuous was Count Thurn, one of the
leaders of the ill-fated Bohemian revolt. Their objective was the establish-
ment of an independent Bohemia with Swedish support and under
Wallenstein's leadership. To the great surprise of Gustavus Adolphus,
Wallenstein, in July 1631, asked the king to supply a force, 10,000 to
12,000 men, to be commanded by Thurn. The proposal was accepted, and
Gustavus Adolphus also promised to appoint Wallenstein as viceroy of
Bohemia, until Frederick V's restoration. So Wallenstein appears at this
period of his life as a Bohemian patriot and a traitor to the emperor.
After the victory of Breitenfeld, Gustavus Adolphus and Wallenstein had
less need of each other. The king was in the full tide of success, while the
duke of Friedland, because of this success, could look forward with some
confidence to his re-employment by the emperor.
Wallenstein's negotiations with Gustavus Adolphus were replaced by
strange dealings with his former companion-in-arms, Arnim. Although
Wallenstein had already signified a willingness to resume command of the
imperial armies, he informed Arnim that Prague would not be defended.
Relations between the two were put on a different footing when the
emperor empowered Wallenstein to negotiate with Arnim in the further-
ance of a general peace. They met at the end of November 1631 and the
negotiations were continued until May 1632, with the connivance of the
Saxon elector. Wallenstein could therefore be considered a man of peace,
although it is more likely that he was merely attempting to wean Saxony
away from the Swedish alliance.
Gustavus Adolphus was already alarmed by the Saxon intrigues of
which he got wind, and by Pappenheim's successes. Now came the news
that Tilly had defeated the Swedish army commanded by Horn, and had
invested Bamberg. Immediate action seemed necessary, and in March 1632
the king left Mainz with an army of 13,000 men in pursuit of Tilly who
retreated east to the Upper Palatinate. Before his military preparations
were completed Gustavus now embarked on the conquest of Bavaria,
the first step in the campaign which he hoped would lead to final victory.
But he was 90,000 men short of the 210,000 planned for the destruction
of his foes.
The Danube was crossed at Donauworth on 8 April. The following day,
337
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
the main army was augmented by the arrival of reinforcements, so that the
total strength came to 22,500 infantry and 15,000 cavalry. Opposed were
not more than 22,000 troops commanded by Tilly. Maximilian of Bavaria,
fearful and depressed by the Swedish advance, called for aid from
Wallenstein, and meantime Tilly placed his army on the east bank of the
River Lech, the western boundary of Bavaria. Against the advice of his
council of war, Gustavus Adolphus determined to storm the strong enemy
position. On 15 April the infantry crossed the river by the use of a huge
floating barge, while the point of attack was hidden by a barrage of cannon
fire and the smoke of burning straw. Meantime, the cavalry crossed at
both ends of the main crossing-point and closed in on the flanks of Tilly's
army. It was a spectacular victory. Maximilian led his beaten troops back
to the fortified city of Ingolstadt. The old veteran Tilly, wounded in the
battle, died two weeks later, attended by a famous surgeon sent by
Gustavus Adolphus. Bavaria was deliberately devastated and its peasants
slaughtered, partly to weaken the enemy, but also in a terrible spirit of
revenge for the ravaging of the Protestant north.
The king's master plan to proceed from the conquest of Bavaria to a
campaign down the Danube into Austria, was, however, ruined by the
news from Bohemia. On 21 May Arnim held his last conference with
Wallenstein. Fully prepared to use his new army if his proposals were
rejected, the imperial generalissimo made the most extravagant promises:
cancellation of the Edict of Restitution, religious toleration, and the
restoration of Germany to the conditions of 1618. With the remark that
these proposals were 'bacon to catch the mouse', the elector of Saxony
broke off the negotiations, and called on Gustavus Adolphus for assis-
tance against Wallenstein's threatened attack.
Greatly disturbed by the possible collapse of the eastern front, Gustavus
Adolphus promised his support to John George. Before moving north,
he could not, however, resist the temptation to capture Munich, which
fell on 16 May. The king was accompanied by Frederick V, jubilant to
enter the capital of the enemy who had deprived him of the Bohemian
crown and electoral title.
Wallenstein acted quickly after the rejection of his peace proposals.
He entered Prague on 25 May, and the Saxon army retreated from Bohe-
mia. Early in June Gustavus Adolphus recrossed the Danube on the way
to Nuremberg. This marked a great strategic victory for Wallenstein. The
king had hoped that by campaigning on the Danube, Wallenstein would
be forced to give up his pressure on Saxony. Instead, Wallenstein had
upset the king's timetable and forced him into a defensive position.
Despite the serious military setback, Gustavus Adolphus optimistically
outlined his plans for the future of Germany to a committee of Nuremberg
burghers. He projected two alliances, a military league to win the war,
and a political league to keep the peace. All the German Protestant
338
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
estates and cities would, it was hoped, join these alliances to be headed by
Sweden. The political league did not, however, contemplate the end of
the empire; it would be a state within the state [corpus in corpore], with its
own-army and legislature. There was much contemporary speculation
about Gustavus Adolphus himself becoming emperor; but there is no
evidence to support these rumours. Sweden's own demands were based
on Grotius, the king's favourite political theorist. On the principle that
the conqueror enjoyed the rights of sovereignty, Gustavus Adolphus
claimed, in theory at least, that Sweden had complete control over all
conquered territory, whether Protestant or Catholic. In practice, this
could mean that Catholic lands would be used as pawns in a final peace
treaty, while war contributions could meanwhile be collected in Protestant
as well as in Catholic states. One territory, Pomerania, was specifically
mentioned as an imperial fief to be retained by Sweden, an arrangement
which would make the Swedish monarch a prince of the empire. This
was the programme of Gustavus Adolphus, a programme to ensure
security for German Protestantism and for Sweden, and to provide
compensation for his country's war efforts.
It was not until the end of June that the king realized that Wallenstein,
after making a juncture with Maximilian's army, was heading not for
Saxony but for Nuremberg, with a force vastly superior to his own. To
meet this danger, the king built fortifications around the city walls, and
sent out orders for reinforcements. Wallenstein did not dare to attack the
king's strong position, and he was thus cheated of a victory while his
army counted some 48,000 to the enemy's 20,000. About three miles from
the city he built his own strongly fortified camp. At one end stood an
old fortress known as the Alte Veste. Here Wallenstein waited to starve
out the Swedish army.
Gustavus Adolphus put Oxenstierna in charge of gathering the relief
forces, and although the operation took two months, the chancellor
accomplished his mission with consummate skill. At the end of August
he joined the king, with about 30,000 men. Now that Gustavus Adolphus
had a slight superiority over the enemy, he decided to attack the Alte
Veste. In the mistaken belief that Wallenstein was in retreat with the main
body of his troops, the attack was made on 3 September, and was re-
pulsed. For the first time, the two famous commanders had met in
combat, and for the first time since his landing in Germany, the ever-
victorious 'Lion of the North' had been checked in battle.
The repulse at the Alte Veste was more than a lost battle; it de-
moralized the Swedish army and it was a strategic disaster. During the
following fortnight the army lost one-third of its strength by desertion
and by disease. Unable to draw Wallenstein out of his impregnable camp,
the king was forced to withdraw from Nuremberg on 18 September.
Three days later, the imperial general destroyed his camp and marched
339
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
north. Wallenstein had the initiative, and the king's plans depended on
the general's moves. Gustavus Adolphus attempted to draw Wallenstein
into open battle by a campaign on the Danube; but was forced to hurry
north when his lifeline to the Baltic seemed endangered by the deter-
iorating military position in the Lower Saxon Circle.
Meantime, Wallenstein invaded Saxony, entered Leipzig (2 October),
and prepared to winter in the electorate. Joined by a contingent from
Bavaria and by Pappenheim, recalled from his successful Lower Saxon
campaign, he now commanded about 19,000 men. The king, still uncertain
of his enemy's plans, built a strong camp at Naumburg on the Saale river
only a few miles from the imperialist outposts, and waited for news and
reinforcements. The news which he heard on 14 November was much to
his liking. Wallenstein was dispersing his army in winter quarters, in the
belief that there was no immediate danger of attack. Pappenheim's troops,
including 3,000 horse, were stationed in Halle, 35 miles from imperialist
headquarters. 'Now in very truth I believe', the king is said to have ex-
claimed, 'that God has delivered him into my hands.' 1
Early in the morning of 15 November, Gustavus Adolphus started out
on his last march, hoping to surprise Wallenstein before Pappenheim
could return. The Swedish army comprised 12,800 men and 6,200 horse,
about the size of Wallenstein's army, but its inferior in cavalry. The ele-
ment of surprise was destroyed by an unexpected encounter with an
advance contingent of imperialists, and Wallenstein was able to rally his
forces. By a prearranged signal, three cannon shots fired at headquarters
brought the scattered units together at the town of Liitzen, about fifteen
miles west of Leipzig. Pappenheim was ordered to return at once and
Wallenstein spent the night of 15-16 November putting his army into
battle array. On its right was the castle of Lutzen and windmills where he
placed his artillery. The left wing was weak, to be strengthened by
Pappenheim's cavalry when it arrived.
Luck was against the king. On the morning of 16 November a thick
mist held up the attack on the left wing until eleven o'clock. An hour later
Pappenheim arrived in time to prevent the certain defeat of the imperial-
ists. But the great cavalry leader was mortally wounded in the counter-
attack, the left flank crumbled, and once more Swedish victory seemed
assured when the mist again descended. Meantime, the Swedish left
commanded by Bernard of Weimar was in serious difficulty, and before
Pappenheim's arrival, the king started to go to his assistance. Leading a
cavalry charge, he was struck by a musket-ball which shattered his left
arm. Carried away from his men, he was shot in the back, fell from his
horse and was killed by a shot through the head.
Bernard of Weimar turned defeat into victory by a desperate successful
attack on the imperialist right wing, and at nightfall Wallenstein withdrew
1
Roberts, Gustavus Adolphus, Vol. n, p. 748.
340
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
his troops to Leipzig. The Swedes lost between 5,000 and 6,000 men, the
imperialists even more. Liitzen was also a strategic victory, for the
Swedish army had not been cut off from the Baltic sea, while Wallenstein
was forced finally to retreat back to Bohemia.
No military victory could compensate for the loss of Gustavus Adol-
phus. He saved German Protestantism, and made Sweden a great power:
to him the two were intertwined. No other leader would again combine
idealism with statecraft and military genius. The last sixteen years of the
war were dominated by power politics and secular aims.
One more death should be noted. A fortnight after Liitzen, Frederick
V, whose acceptance of the Bohemian crown precipitated the German
war, died of the plague in Metz, a broken man at the age of thirty-six.
Christina, the heiress to the Swedish throne, was only six years old
when her father died, and the government was now in the hands of the
royal council acting as regents. The councillors in Stockholm were glad
to turn over full responsibility for the war to Chancellor Oxenstierna,
who considered himself the executor of the late king's plans. The chan-
cellor and the councillors at home were agreed on two points: Pomerania
must be permanently held by Sweden, and the war must be paid for by
Germans. Oxenstierna's first concern was therefore to ensure continued
military support and funds from the German Protestant states.
As might be expected, John George of Saxony, never happy with the
Swedish alliance, hoped to seize the leadership of the Protestant party,
and to arrange either a general peace, or a separate peace with the emperor.
Oxenstierna quickly blocked the elector's bid for leadership by calling
a meeting of the four circles of south-western Germany, Franconia,
Swabia, Upper Rhine, and Lower Rhine.
The deputies of the four circles met at Heilbronn on 18 March 1633,
and after a month of negotiation the League of Heilbronn was signed on
23 April. Oxenstierna was made director of the alliance, but a consultative
council of ten was also created of which seven were to be chosen by the
estates of the circles and three by Sweden. Besides, instead of the sole rule
of Swedish governors, each circle would be administered by a council of
four, one of whose members would be a Swede. The chancellor could not
obtain more than a promise of 2,400,000 imperial dollars for the army,
a quarter of his original demand. As can be seen, Sweden's influence had
been weakened by the king's death; but even so, the Heilbronn Alliance
might have formed the nucleus of an Evangelical Union as it had been
planned by Gustavus Adolphus, provided that Sweden could command
sufficient military strength.
One political decision made by the new alliance sought to rectify a
wrong committed in the early years of the war. The Palatinate was res-
tored to Frederick's heir, Charles Lewis, and during his minority the
'Winter King's' brother, Louis Philip, was installed as administrator.
341
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Oxenstierna also succeeded in renewing the subsidy treaty with France,
and at the same time foiled Richelieu's attempts to take advantage of the
Swedish king's death. The cardinal hoped to dominate the anti-Habsburg
party by forming an alliance with Saxony and Sweden, and clearly showed
his interest in the Rhine region by laying claims to Alsatian towns and the
river bridge-heads of Philippsburg and Breisach. The old plan to neutralize
and protect the German Catholic states was again revived; but the
opposition of both Oxenstierna and his Heilbronn allies, and Saxony's
unwillingness to ally with France, ruined the cardinal's plans, and he was
forced to content himself with the renewal of the Barwalde treaty which
was signed on 19 April 1633.
One more serious problem faced Oxenstierna: the control of the army.
A consummate diplomat, the chancellor did not have the experience
necessary to assume military command in the field. The jealousy existing
between the chief generals, the Swedes Horn and Baner, and the Germans
William of Hesse-Cassel and Bernard of Saxe-Weimar, however, made it
impossible to appoint a commander-in-chief. Bernard, younger scion of
a Saxon house, with a great reputation as a soldier at the age of twenty-
nine, was moreover ambitious to found a principality. Oxenstierna was
forced to grant him the ' dukedom of Franconia', comprising the bishop-
rics of Wurzburg and Bamberg, to be held as a fief of the Swedish crown.
This was the largest bribe paid to a general; but the army could be held
together only by grants of estates to lesser officers, while mutiny in the
ranks was quelled by the partial payment of arrears in pay.
While Oxenstierna was consolidating his position, his enemies were
preparing to renew hostilities. New vigour was infused into the Habsburg
family coalition by the rise of two younger men, the Infant Ferdinand,
brother of Philip IV of Spain, and the emperor's son Archduke Ferdinand,
crowned king of Hungary and of Bohemia, and future emperor. The
Infant Ferdinand, still in his twenties, had been trained for the church
and received the cardinal's hat, so that he was commonly known as the
cardinal-infant. In 1632 he succeeded the aged Archduchess Isabella as
governor of the Netherlands. Worldly, politically ambitious, a close
student of war, he discarded the cardinal's robes for a coat of mail, and
became the ardent leader of Spain's plans for the reconquest of the
United Provinces. The cardinal-infant's chief ally in Vienna was the
Archduke Ferdinand, usually called by his title of king of Hungary. At
the time of Wallenstein's dismissal he had tried in vain to obtain command
of the imperial armies, and failed again when the general was recalled.
The king of Hungary became one of Wallenstein's chief enemies in
Vienna, and he was now joined by the Spanish ambassador, who was
aroused by the general's refusal to co-operate in the war against the
Dutch. The plan, which Wallenstein opposed, was to send an imperial
army to the Rhine which would join forces with a Spanish army coming
342
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
up from Italy under the command of the cardinal-infant. On his way
north to fight the Dutch, he hoped to clear the Rhine country of French
and Swedish troops.
Meanwhile a Swedish army under Horn threatened Breisach, the key
city on the Rhine whose fall would jeopardize the cardinal-infant's cam-
paign. Regensburg fell to Bernard of Saxe-Weimar on 14 November
163 3. The Bavarian peasantry revolted, driven to desperation by marauding
troops and poor harvests. Wallenstein's inactivity in the face of these
disasters, as well as his mysterious plotting, made it increasingly clear
to the statesmen of Vienna and Madrid that the general stood in the way
of an all-out war against the foes of the house of Habsburg.
There can be no doubt that after Liitzen Wallenstein degenerated both in
mind and in body. Following the defeat, he ordered the arrest and execu-
tion of thirteen officers and five soldiers for cowardly conduct, a vindictive
procedure which lost him his popularity in the army. Stories circulated
of his peculiarities and cruelty: accustomed to the sound of gun and
cannon, he could not bear the jingling of spurs, the barking of dogs,
the crowing of cocks, or loud speaking. He ordered the hanging of a
servant for waking him from sleep.
Much more serious were Wallenstein's dealings with the enemy, some
known, some suspected, and others still shrouded in mystery. Although
the general spoke much of peace, the methods by which he hoped to
achieve peace laid him open to the charge of treachery. The negotiations
with the elector of Saxony and his general Arnim, and with the Bohemian
exiles continued. To detach Saxony from the enemy camp would certainly
aid the emperor; but the secret meetings with the Bohemian exiles could
only be interpreted as treasonable. Thurn, Kinsky and Terzka, represen-
tatives of the fallen Bohemian nobility, still hoped to expel the Habsburg
ruler, and if they succeeded, who but Wallenstein would be king? Sub-
stance was given to the general's partiality for the Bohemian rebels when
he released Thurn after capturing him in Silesia. The secret negotiations
with Sweden, broken off in 1631, were renewed. Richelieu, through his
ambassadors in Germany, was in touch with Kinsky who spoke of
Wallenstein's willingness to desert the Habsburg cause. So the Friedlander
plotted for kingship, peace, and revenge for his dismissal in 1630. But no
one line of action was followed with energy and consistency. Reliance on
astrology, fits of depression, and an ailing body overwhelmed the prac-
tical man of affairs and military strategist.
The emperor moved slowly to counter the general's moves. In August,
he assured himself of the loyalty of Wallenstein's chief lieutenants, par-
ticularly Piccolomini and Gallas. Henceforth Piccolomini kept the em-
peror informed of his commander-in-chief's doings. The court clique
opposed to the general meantime lent their support to pamphlets which
openly attacked him.
343
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Wallenstein played into the hands of his enemies. On 12 January 1634
he called a meeting of his officers who signed a document known as the
'Pilsen Revers', in which they pledged their loyalty and swore never to
separate from him. The emperor and even Wallenstein's friends at court
were now finally convinced that treason was being plotted. On 24 January
the emperor signed a patent which was sent secretly to Piccolomini,
Gallas, and Maximilian of Bavaria. It ordered the dismissal of Wallen-
stein and his seizure dead or alive. The order was not made public until
18 February.
Deserted by all but a handful of officers and a small number of troops,
Wallenstein sent out desperate calls for help to Bernard of Weimar and
to Arnim. Then, carried in a litter, he made his way to Eger near the
Saxon border, still hoping for succour. Colonel Butler, an Irish Catholic,
was ordered by Piccolomini to carry out the emperor's wishes. Two
Scotch Protestants, Leslie and Gordon, commanders of the Eger garrison,
joined Butler, together with three Irishmen, another Scot, an Italian and
a Spaniard. On the evening of 25 February the conspirators invited
Terzka, Kinsky, and two officers faithful to Wallenstein to a banquet at
the castle. At a given signal the guests were murdered. Wallenstein, ill
in his quarters on the market square, was killed by the Irishman, Captain
Devereux.
The execution, or murder, of Wallenstein and his accomplices brought
unity to the Habsburg armies. The king of Hungary was granted his long-
desired wish for supreme command, with Gallas as his chief lieutenant.
It was otherwise with Sweden and her allies. While his general Arnim
invaded Bohemia, the elector of Saxony began peace negotiations with
the emperor. The elector of Brandenburg, fearful of Oxenstierna's de-
mand for Pomerania, was unreliable. Despite the chancellor's strenuous
efforts to strengthen his army, the Heilbronn League lagged in its support,
and even diminished its financial contributions.
On the military front, the divided Swedish armies of Marshal Horn
and Duke Bernard were slow in joining to defend Ratisbon, which fell to
King Ferdinand and Gallas on 22 July 1634. On 16 August they crossed
the Danube, laid siege to Nordlingen, held by a small Swedish force, and
awaited the arrival of the cardinal-infant who was marching up from the
Black Forest. There was no longer a Wallenstein to impede the co-
operation of imperial and Spanish armies. Horn and Bernard hastened
to relieve Nordlingen, but were too late to block the cardinal-infant's
arrival with 15,000 trained Spanish troops. The Habsburg troops now
numbered 39,000 men, about one-third more than their enemy. In spite
of this numerical inferiority, the Swedish commanders determined to risk
a battle, and attacked on 6 September. After five hours of fierce fighting,
distinguished by the bravery of the Spanish infantry, the Habsburg
cousins won a great victory. Horn was captured, and Bernard barely
344
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
escaped with about 14,000 men. The rest of the Swedish armies were killed
or captured.
The Battle of Nordlingen was as decisive as the battles of the White
Hill and Breitenfeld, both in military and political consequences. With the
exception of a few cities, the conquests of Gustavus Adolphus in southern
Germany, all the way to the Rhine, the Necker and the Main were lost.
The political and religious conditions as they had existed before 1631 were
largely restored. Nordlingen and the subsequent imperial successes led to
the weakening and final dissolution of the Heilbronn League, to the
Peace of Prague, and to the official entry of France into the war.
Since March 1634 John George of Saxony had been negotiating for
peace with the emperor. In November they made a preliminary agreement,
a truce was arranged in February 1635, and on 30 May the Peace of
Prague was signed. Both elector and emperor made concessions. On the
all-important question of church lands, the determining year was fixed at
1627. Lands held at that time were to be retained for forty years, and
meantime disputes were to be adjudicated by the imperial court composed
of Catholic and Protestant members in equal number. This suspension of
the Edict of Restitution troubled the emperor, and was opposed by
Lamormain: but Ferdinand's conscience was salved when the majority
of his spiritual advisers gave their approval. Calvinists were not specifi-
cally excluded from the treaty, for that would have shut out the elector of
Brandenburg; and yet, Calvinism was not recognized. There was no
general amnesty. The heir of Frederick V was still deprived of his elector-
ate and lands, an arrangement which satisfied Maximilian of Bavaria.
The treaty was open to all belligerents, including Sweden, whose with-
drawal from Germany would be purchased by monetary compensation
contributed by the Protestant estates.
While the Peace of Prague was being negotiated an English ambassador,
the earl of Arundel, was travelling across Germany on a vain mission to
the emperor on behalf of the luckless Palatine family. Only four years
before, Robert Monro, a Scottish officer in the victorious army of
Gustavus Adolphus, was so delighted with what he saw in the march
from Frankfurt to Wurzburg that he wrote: 'no country in Europe is
comparable unto Germany, for fertility, riches, corn and wine, traffic by
land, pleasant cities, fair buildings, rare orchards, woods and planting,
civility as well in the country as in the cities'. 1 Now William Crowne, a
member of Arundel's suite, made his notes on the state of the country,
and the contrast with Monro's report is indeed striking. From Cologne,
the ambassador and his train were towed up the Rhine 'by many villages
pillaged and shot down'. In Bacharach 'the poor people are found dead
with grass in their mouths'. In Rudesheim, the ambassador 'gave some
1
Robert Monro, His Expedition with the Worthy Scots Regiment (called Mac-Keyes
Regiment) (London, 1637), part n, p. 89.
345
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
relief to the poor which were almost starved as it appeared by the violence
they used to get it from one another'. At Mentz, the ambassador found it
necessary to stay on ship-board for his meals, for there was no food to be
had in the city. Starving people pushed each other into the river in their
eagerness to obtain food sent from the ship to relieve their hunger. From
Cologne to Frankfurt 'all the towns, villages and castles be battered,
pillaged or burned'. Passing up the Main through Wurzburg, the ambassa-
dorial party arrived at Neustadt 'which hath been a fair city, though now
burned miserably, here we saw poor children sitting at their doors almost
starved to death'. Travelling through the Upper Palatinate, the English-
men had dinner at a village 'which hath been pillaged eight-and-twenty
times in two years and twice in one day and they have there no water but
that which they save when it raineth'. Reaching the Danube, they con-
tinued the journey by boat to Linz, still meeting with ruined villages,
and with people seeking relief. 1
Small wonder that the eligible princes and cities hastened to sign the
Peace of Prague. The Heilbronn League was dead, and only Bernard of
Weimar and William of Hesse refused to lay down their arms. But the
treaty did not bring true peace to the empire. The choice of the year 1627
as the determining date for the possession of church lands meant defeat
and despair for the Protestants of southern Germany. Nor did the war
end. Sweden fought on for territorial 'satisfaction', and France became
a formal belligerent.
Richelieu had never deviated from the objectives of his foreign policy:
to stop the 'progress' of Spain, and to obtain 'entries' into the territories
of neighbouring states. He had long foreseen that the time would come
when unofficial war must give way to open war. After the disaster of
Nordlingen, the combined power of Spain and Austria threatened France
on its eastern frontier, and to meet this danger French troops took over
the Alsatian cities which had been captured by the Swedes. Lorraine too
was occupied, for its trouble-making Duke Charles had openly joined
the Habsburgs.
The appearance of the imperial armies on the Rhine, the threat to
Lorraine, and finally a Spanish raid on Trier, whose elector was carried
off as prisoner, forced Richelieu to take further action. On 8 February
1635 he arranged a treaty with the Dutch which provided for the joint
conquest of the Spanish Netherlands. On 28 April he concluded a new
alliance with Sweden. On 19 May a herald of arms, standing in the great
square of Brussels, proclaimed that the king of France declared war
against the king of Spain and against the cardinal-infant, ruler of the
1
William Crowne, A True Relation of all the remarkable places and passages observed in
the travels of the right honorable Thomas Lord Howard, Earle of Arundell andSurry . . . 1636
(London, 1637), pp. 5-17.
346
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Netherlands. The king of France was at war with the emperor as well,
although he was not named. From 1635 to the conclusion of the final
peace, the Thirty Years War was predominantly a struggle for power
between the Habsburgs and France in alliance with Sweden.
France, as Richelieu himself knew, was ill-prepared for war. Despite
the country's large population, and greater wealth than any other state
of its day, the government suffered the usual seventeenth-century financial
difficulties. There was not enough money to keep up an efficient standing
army even in times of peace, and when at war, the problems posed in
providing pay and supplies for a great army were immeasurably increased.
In 1635 the French forces had neither adequate training nor organization,
and there were no officers of marked ability.
Besides the Dutch, who would, in any case, be available only for a war
in the Netherlands, Richelieu could count on only two small German
armies commanded by William of Hesse and by Bernard of Weimar.
These the cardinal took into French pay. To compensate for the loss of his
duchy of Franconia, now overrun by the imperialists, Bernard was
granted the landgravate of Alsace and the county of Hagenau. As for
Sweden, her chief concern was to maintain her hold on Pomerania.
Until March 1637, with the death of Duke Bogislav XIV without issue,
Oxenstierna had some hope of making a separate peace with the emperor
which would acknowledge Sweden's claim to the duchy. The chancellor
did not, therefore, wish to tie himself too closely to France. On the other
hand, in accordance with a provision of the peace of Prague, Sweden's
refusal to withdraw from Germany brought the elector of Saxony into
war against his former ally. The elector of Brandenburg followed Saxony's
example.
While the Habsburgs grew stronger, Richelieu, inadequately prepared,
planned to attack Spain simultaneously in the Netherlands and in Italy.
The results were disastrous. After defeating the Spaniards near Liege,
the French army, lacking pay and provisions, disintegrated. In Italy, a
treaty with the dukes of Savoy and of Parma (11 July) to conquer Milan,
was followed by a short fruitless campaign.
In the summer of 1636 the combined forces of Spain and the emperor
took the offensive against France. Reinforced by the Bavarian cavalry
of the distinguished officer Johann von Werth, the cardinal-infant ad-
vanced into Picardy, while the imperialist general Gallas occupied Franche-
Comte and invaded Burgundy. On 14 August 1636 the cardinal-infant's
army seized the fortress of Corbie near Amiens, and Werth advanced to
Compiegne. Paris was in imminent danger, mobs rioted, and it was be-
lieved in court circles that Richelieu would fall from power. The firmness
of Richelieu, and of Louis XIII who joined his army as commander,
quieted the city. Gallas was checked by a French garrison at Saint-Jean-
de-Losne, which won for the town the name of Saint-Jean-Belle-Defense.
347
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Neither was the cardinal-infant able to follow up his initial advantage, for
the difficulty of provisioning the army made a further advance impossible.
Louis XIII recaptured Corbie, and the enemy armies retreated from
French soil.
Meanwhile the Swedes, after a brave start, barely held on in northern
Germany. The Swedish marshals Baner and Torstensson defeated a
Saxon army, reinforced by imperial troops, at Wittstock in Brandenburg
on 4 October 1636. Brandenburg was overrun, and the Swedes penetrated
as far as Leipzig and Erfurt. But in the following year Gallas, with
superior numbers, forced the Swedish army back into Pomerania.
The death of the emperor in February 1637, and the accession of the
king of Hungary as Ferdinand III, made little difference in the conduct
of the war. The new emperor was as pious as his father but less bigoted,
so that religious considerations would be less likely to stand in the way
of peace.
The strengthening of their military power became the immediate ob-
jectives of both Oxenstierna and Richelieu. The chancellor had returned
to Stockholm in July 1636, leaving the conduct of the war in the hands of
his generals, while ensuring financial support and recruits for the Swedish
armies. Before his departure from Germany, Oxenstierna with the assis-
tance of Richelieu also renewed the truce with Poland (Treaty of Stuhms-
dorf, September 1635) which released soldiers for the German war. The
native Swedish forces (they numbered about 74,000 men at the end of the
war) were, however, used mainly for garrison duty and for the defence
of the homeland. Increasingly, Sweden's battles were fought by German
mercenaries supported, as they had been in the days of Gustavus Adol-
phus, by Germany.
After the initial defeats of the French armies, Richelieu worked inde-
fatigably to reorganize the military establishment, to supply food, pay
and munitions for the armies, and to raise the number of effectives. At
the same time he encouraged the rise of vigorous young commanders,
particularly the vicomte de Turenne and the due d'Enghien, a prince of
the blood and later prince de Conde. That the cardinal's efforts were
successful is proved by the mounting success of the French armies.
At least as important for the future, France and Sweden made a firm
three-year alliance, the Treaty of Hamburg, signed on 15 March 1638.
This co-operation was made possible by Oxenstierna's withdrawal of
claims on Rhine territory, and was made necessary when the chancellor
failed to obtain Pomerania by agreement with the emperor. The treaty
provided for a declaration of war by France on the emperor, and for the
rejection of any separate truce of treaty with the enemy. France promised
Sweden an annual subsidy of one million livres.
Even before the signing of the treaty, the struggle for the control of the
Rhine had begun. On 3 March 1638, at Rheinfelden, a few miles east of
348
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Basel, Bernard of Wiemar defeated an imperial army supported by
Werth's famous Bavarian cavalry. Werth himself was captured and re-
mained in captivity until 1642. Marching down the Rhine, Bernard
reached Breisach where he was joined by a French army commanded by
Marshal Turenne. After a long siege, the strategic town capitulated on 17
December. All Alsace could now be occupied. Following his brilliant
military successes, Bernard claimed Alsace as a German principality, a
claim rejected by Richelieu, and the bitter dispute was ended only by
the duke's death in July 1639.
During the Rhine campaign the imperialists were severely handicapped
by the lack of Spanish support. On 10 October the Dutch, under the
leadership of Prince Frederick Henry, re-captured Breda, which had been
held by Spain since Spinola's famous siege in 1625. The cardinal-infant
required all his strength to prevent further Dutch gains. The fall of
Breisach was an even greater blow than the loss of Breda. It cut the Rhine
route for Spanish troops marching from Milan to the Netherlands and
into Germany. In October 1639 the sea route to Flanders was also
severed when the Dutch admiral Tromp destroyed a great Spanish fleet
in the Downs near Dover. In 1640 the very existence of the Spanish
monarchy was threatened. Catalonia revolted and elected Louis XIII as
duke of Barcelona. The Portuguese threw off their allegiance and elected
their own king of the native house of Braganza. The Austrian branch of
the house of Habsburg, which had hitherto depended so much on aid from
the Spanish branch, now found itself saddled with a weak ally calling for
help which was not available. Olivares, exponent of Spain's survival as a
world power, was in despair. In desperation he sought to continue secret
peace negotiations with Richelieu which had begun as early as 1636. In
the earlier years, the cardinal had shown some interest in reaching an
accommodation with his rival. Now, French successes on the field of
battle made him less amenable, and the negotiations came to nothing. 1
Meanwhile, the Swedish army under Baner's command, although not
as successful as the French on the Rhine, harassed the imperialists and
Saxons. In January 1639 the Saxons were driven back to Dresden, and in
May, after defeating an imperialist army near Chemnitz, in Saxony,
Baner reached Prague. Unable to capture the city, he devastated northern
Bohemia. The year 1640 seemed about to fulfil one of the chief purposes
of the Habsburg treaty, namely, the co-operation of the French and
Swedish armies. Baner appeared at Erfurt in May, where he was joined
by French, Hessian, and Brunswick forces. But the imperialists under
Piccolomini refused battle, and the allies parted. The campaign ended in
a stalemate.
Defeated on the Rhine, his empire overrun by Swedish and French
armies, deprived of Spanish aid, Ferdinand III called an imperial Diet,
1
For details of these complicated negotiations see A. Leman, Richelieu et Olivares (1938).
349
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
the first to meet since 1608. Perhaps, if he could obtain the full support of
the empire's representatives, the war could be fought to a favourable
conclusion. The Diet was opened at Ratisbon on 13 September 1640.
In the early sittings, the delegates were sympathetic to Ferdinand, even
though he made the Peace of Prague the basis for a settlement of the
empire's affairs. The death in December of George William, Elector of
Brandenburg, and the accession of his twenty-year-old son Frederick
William, upset the emperor's calculations. The young prince, later known
as the Great Elector, was the very opposite of his weak father. He dis-
missed the Catholic pro-Habsburg chief minister Schwarzenberg, and
immediately took measures to free his lands from the marauding bands
of soldiery. He then dropped a bombshell on the Diet when he instructed
his delegate at Ratisbon to proclaim that the Peace of Prague was an
unsatisfactory basis for a settlement. In July 1641 he signed a truce with
Sweden, another serious blow to the emperor. Inspired by Brandenburg,
the opposition to Ferdinand grew, and when the Diet ended its sessions
in October 1641, he had neither obtained sufficient funds to replace the
dwindling Spanish subsidies, nor maintained his leadership in the empire.
Undoubtedly and understandably, the predominant sentiment at the Diet
was for peace, rather than for war, and there now seemed to be some
prospect of ending hostilities.
In 1635, and again in 1638, Pope Urban VIII had made abortive
attempts to act as mediator for peace. Then, from 1638 to 1641 there were
sporadic meetings in Hamburg between French, Swedish and imperial
ambassadors which finally led to a preliminary treaty which was signed
on 25 December 1641. By its provisions two simultaneous peace confer-
ences were to be opened, one at Miinster where the emperor would nego-
tiate with France and its allies under the mediation of the pope and
Venice, the other at Osnabriick where the emperor would treat with
Sweden under the mediation of Denmark. The preliminary treaty was
accepted by Louis XIII in February 1642, and by the emperor in July;
but the real work of the congress did not begin until two years later.
There was no provision for a cessation of arms, and the diplomats em-
ployed delaying tactics as they waited for favourable military news to
strengthen their bargaining powers.
In 1641 Richelieu renewed the alliance with Sweden, and during the
following year French arms were particularly successful. Taking advan-
tage of Spain's weakness, troops occupied Artois in the north, and
Roussillon in the south. When Richelieu died on 4 December 1642 he
had accomplished his work. Those very territories and strategic positions
which would be acquired by treaty in 1648 and 1659 were in French
possession: Breisach to control the Rhine, Pinerolo the entry into Italy,
Alsace, Artois and Roussillon.
Louis XIII appointed Cardinal Mazarin, Richelieu's own choice, as his
350
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
successor. When the king died on 14 May 1643, the subtle Italian became
the sole director of foreign affairs in the name of the Queen-Regent Anne
of Austria and the boy king Louis XIV. The first great military victory of
the new reign was won by Enghien on 19 May at Rocroy on the border
of the Spanish Netherlands. The flower of the Spanish infantry was deci-
mated, a defeat on land as striking as the famous defeat on sea of the
Armada in 1588.
After Rocroy, the emperor gave up all hope of further support from
Spain, and in the last five years of the war his military strength was
gradually whittled away. He was, moreover, handicapped by a lack of
efficient military commanders. The old veteran Piccolomini was the only
one of any ability. Had it not been for the Bavarian generals Mercy and
Werth, defeat would have come earlier, and Mercy, the abler of the two,
was killed in battle in 1645. In comparison, the French marshal Turenne
was a great strategist, and if Enghien sometime fought battles that cost
more than they were worth, he at least won them. The Swedes, after
Baner's death in 1641, were ably led by Torstensson, trained in the army
of Gustavus Adolphus, and after 1646 by Wrangel. There were, however,
great difficulties in the way of obtaining final victory. Armies were raised,
campaigns planned, and battles were fought; but the victor was usually
unable to follow up his advantage for lack of provisions in a devastated
countryside. Nor was it any longer possible, as in the days of Wallenstein
and Gustavus Adolphus, to levy 'contributions' on wealthy cities, for
the wealth was gone.
In 1644 Werth and Mercy were strong enough to mount an offensive
in the Rhine country, where they captured Freiburg and threatened
Breisach. Enghien and Turenne fought the Bavarian-imperialist army in
a bloody three-day battle near Freiburg (4, 5 and 9 August) which ended
in the retreat of Mercy, who could no longer feed his troops. The French
were then able to occupy the left bank of the Rhine as far as Mainz. A
year later, on 3 August 1645, Enghien and Turenne won the second battle
of Nordlingen, in which Mercy was killed; again the victors could not
maintain their position, and withdrew to Alsace. On the eastern front,
Torstensson's experience was a similar one. He defeated a Bavarian-
imperialist army at Jankau in Bohemia (5 March 1645), and in April came
within thirty miles of Vienna; but he was forced to retreat back to Bohemia.
The emperor's position was finally made untenable by the loss of
Saxony, the defeat of Bavaria, the annihilation of the Spanish army in
the Netherlands, and the imminent fall of Prague. A Swedish invasion of
Saxony induced the elector of Saxony to sign a truce in September 1645.
In July 1646 Turenne and Wrangel invaded Bavaria; and although the
electorate was protected by Werth, the country was so miserably deva-
stated by both friend and foe that Maximilian agreed to a truce on 14
March 1647. In the following September he broke the truce, but in vain.
351
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
On 17 May 1648, at Zusmarshausen near Augsburg, Wrangel and
Turenne defeated the Bavarian-imperialist forces, and Bavaria was again
overrun. At Lens, on 20 August, Enghien's army shattered the forces of
Archduke Leopold, the emperor's brother, now governor of the Spanish
Netherlands. In July a Swedish army besieged Prague, which held out for
three months until the signing of the peace treaties. Ironically, the city
of the famous 'defenestration', no longer Protestant and rebellious,
fought to the end for its Catholic Habsburg ruler. These successive blows
forced Ferdinand III to agree to peace, even though it meant deserting
his ally the king of Spain.
Peace was made at Minister and Osnabriick by a truly European con-
gress at which all the powers were represented save England, Poland,
Russia and Turkey. It was a cumbersome peace conference, for the emperor
treated with France and her allies at Minister, and with Sweden and her
allies at Osnabriick. The two little Westphalian cities were thirty miles
apart and there was the constant necessity of communication between the
two sets of delegates. At Miinster, the papal nuncio Chigi, later Pope
Alexander VII, and the Venetian Contarini, acted as mediators. There was
no mediator at Osnabriick. The smouldering enmity between Denmark
and Sweden, which broke out into open war from 1643 to 1645, made it
impossible for Denmark to undertake this role.
Six months were spent verifying credentials and the powers of the
delegates, and quarrelling over procedure, before the meeting at Miinster
was officially opened on 4 December 1644 by a solemn mass and pro-
cession. The French and Swedish ambassadors at once insisted that they
could not make peace with the emperor alone, and that the estates of
the empire must therefore be seated at the conference tables. Another
eight months dragged on before the emperor made this important con-
cession. Now the congress would settle not only peace between the em-
peror and his enemies, but would also determine the internal affairs of the
empire. This decision also further complicated the work of the congress.
The representatives of the Protestant estates gathered at Osnabriick
where Sweden served as their leader, while the Catholics went to Munster
as clients either of France or of the emperor. Moreover, the Catholic and
Protestant estates acted as two sections of an imperial Diet which would
be forced to agree on all questions. The estates took no part in the nego-
tiations with the foreign powers. They requested only that no German
lands should be alienated, a futile gesture, and that the settlement should
be submitted to them for ratification. Count Trautmansdorff, the emperor's
intimate adviser, therefore had the difficult task of satisfying the demands
of France and Sweden. The chief negotiators for France were the ex-
perienced diplomats d'Avaux and Servien, and for Sweden Axel Oxen-
stierna, the chancellor's son, and the much abler Adler Salvius.
352
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
France and Sweden did not stand alone in the negotiations which now
took place. Maximilian of Bavaria supported France, in return for help
in the retention of his electoral title and Palatinate lands. The emperor
supported Sweden in the demand for Pomerania at the expense of Bran-
denburg as the price for a general peace.
France and Sweden waited on the course of the war to put themselves
in the best bargaining position, and it was not until 7 January 1646 that
they gave the details of their claims. The Swedes demanded Silesia from
the emperor, Pomerania from Brandenburg, Wismar, and the bishoprics
of Bremen and Verden. The French claimed the full sovereignty of Metz,
Toul, Verdun, Alsace, Breisach, Philippsburg, the Breisgau, and the so-
called 'four forest cities' 1 on the Rhine east of Basel.
On 13 September a preliminary agreement was reached between Traut-
mansdorff and the French ambassadors which granted France all her
demands but the Breisgau and the 'four forest cities'. Alsace, however,
posed a difficult problem which was not cleared up even in the final peace
treaty. The territory, divided into Upper and Lower Alsace, was not a
political unit, but rather a conglomeration of ancient rights and holdings,
and free cities. In upper Alsace a Habsburg archduke, the emperor's
nephew, held the title of landgrave, and besides possessed certain definite
small areas. With the title of landvogt a Habsburg prince had ill-defined
rights, particularly over ten free cities known as 'the Decapole'. These
did not include Strasbourg and Miilhausen which were practically inde-
pendent. There were also ecclesiastical principalities, and possessions
of German princes, owing allegiance directly to the emperor.
It was, therefore, no simple matter to arrange the transference of
Alsace to France, and the treaty is obscure and contradictory. According
to the text of the final treaty, the House of Austria cedes to the king of
France the landgravate of Upper and Lower Alsace in full sovereignty;
but the bishop of Strasbourg was landgrave of Lower Alsace. In another
article of the treaty the ten towns of the Decapole, certain monasteries,
and the nobility of Lower Alsace are to retain the same privileges which
they had previously enjoyed in relation to the empire. The king of France
renounces territorial sovereignty over these territories; but then a clause
is added which states that this does not mean that full sovereignty is
denied to the king of France! Both Trautmansdorff and the French am-
bassador Servien wished to bring the negotiations to a conclusion, and
it appears that they were willing to leave these contradictions in the
treaty for the sake of reaching an agreement. Besides, Mazarin might have
hoped that by not breaking all connections between some of the Alsatian
territories and cities with the empire, France could claim a seat in the
Diet. In this peculiar fashion France gained a foothold in Alsace. The
population spoke a German dialect, and German historians have be-
1
Waldshut, Laufenburg, Sakingen and Rhinefelden.
353
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
moaned the seizure of a land German in culture. It should, however, be
pointed out that in the seventeenth century, and in the following century
as well, territories were divided up without reference to the wishes of the
inhabitants. There is also no doubt that the Alsatians became loyal
Frenchmen.
The problem of satisfying Sweden was also difficult, for Sweden de-
manded Pomerania, a duchy to which the elector of Brandenburg had
an undoubted legal claim when Duke Bogislav XIV died in 1637 without
issue. Sweden's demand, and the emperor's willingness to appease Sweden
by the grant of the duchy, or at least a part of it, met with the elector's
fierce opposition. The impasse was finally broken by the joint threat of
the emperor and the Swedish ambassadors that if he did not agree to a
division of Pomerania, he would be deprived of the whole duchy. When
the Swedes again demanded all Pomerania, d'Avaux stepped in on behalf
of Brandenburg, for France had no desire to see her ally become too
strong a power. Despite this intervention, Sweden achieved the hold on
the southern shore of the Baltic which had been one of the chief aims of
Gustavus Adolphus. By a convention signed on 7 September 1647,
Sweden received, as fiefs of the empire, western Pomerania including the
mouth of the River Oder and Stettin, and the islands of Riigen, Usedom
and Wollin. In return for giving up eastern Pomerania, the Swedes ob-
tained the secularized bishoprics of Bremen and Verden by which they
controlled the rivers Weser and Elbe, and the port of Wismar. In com-
pensation for the loss of western Pomerania, Frederick William received
the secularized bishoprics of Halberstadt and Minden, as well as the
expectancy of the archbishopric of Magdeburg on the death of the Saxon
administrator. The elector of Brandenburg, thanks to French interven-
tion, had done very well, for he was now, next to the Habsburgs, the ruler
of the largest territory in the empire.
While France and Sweden were receiving their 'satisfaction', the inter-
nal affairs of the empire were under discussion. In these negotiations, the
two foreign powers took a prominent part, for both held that their kings
had entered the war against the emperor for the protection of the 'liber-
ties ' of the German princes. Besides, Sweden acted as the champion of
German Protestantism. The French even attempted to prevent the con-
tinuance of the Habsburg hold on the imperial title. They failed, but so
drastic a solution was made unnecessary by a clause in the Minister treaty
which determined the practical independence of the German princes.
Henceforth, the princes had' territorial superiority in all matters ecclesia-
stical as well as political'. They had the right to conclude treaties both be-
tween themselves and with foreign powers. To be sure, they were under the
obligation not to make any treaties directed against the empire or against the
emperor, an obligation easily evaded. The old' liberties' of the prince were
thus transformed into sovereignty, even though this word was not used.
354
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
The princes were further strengthened by making the Diet innocuous.
When religious issues were discussed, the Diet would henceforth divide
into two bodies, Catholic and Protestant, and differences would be re-
solved not by majority vote, but by 'amicable agreement'. A unanimous
vote was moreover necessary on all questions which divided the diet.
Inevitably this meant that the Diet would sit perpetually without ever
accomplishing anything of importance.
The ' Westphalian constitution' of the empire contained nothing new.
It only verified and strengthened the power of the territorial princes,
and put an official end to any possibility of the unification of Germany by
the emperor. It remained the fundamental constitutional law of the
empire until its dissolution a century and a half later.
The solutions found for the religious problem and the associated
problem of ecclesiastical territories were essentially a broadening and a
clarification of the Peace of Augsburg. For the first time Calvinism was
officially recognized. This by no means meant toleration, for Protestant
sects, other than the Lutheran and Calvinist, were still illegal. The year
1624 was made the determining date for the holding of church properties.
This concession favoured the Protestants, for the year 1627, fixed by the
Peace of Prague, came after the reconquest of secularized lands following
the defeat of Christian IV of Denmark. The 'ecclesiastical reservation',
strongly opposed by the Protestant princes ever since the Peace of
Augsburg, was accepted with the provision that when either a Protestant
or a Catholic changed his faith he would be forced to resign. In cases
where the chapter of the cathedral was divided between Catholics and
Protestants, the numbers of each would remain the same. By these
measures, the holding of ecclesiastical lands would be fixed as they were
in the year 1624. Another controversy was settled by giving the lay holders
of bishoprics, called administrators, seats in the Diet.
The right of the prince to determine the religion of his subjects, already
granted by the Peace of Augsburg, was again admitted in the clause which
gave them 'territorial superiority in all matters ecclesiastical as well as
political'. Some restrictions were, however, placed on the prince. If he
changed his faith, he could not interfere with the religion of his subjects.
Rights of public worship by dissidents as they existed in 1624, whether by
law or by custom, were to be respected. The clauses concerning dissidents
who were not legally protected are ambiguous. There is a grant of private
worship, and a plea for toleration, but the prince also has the right of
expulsion. Those expelled would be given five years to settle their affairs,
and to take their property with them. With a few exceptions in Silesia and
in Lower Austria, the emperor refused, however, to make any concessions
to his Protestant subjects in the hereditary Habsburg lands.
The year 1618 was fixed as the date of restitution and amnesty. This
meant particularly the restoration of the princes excluded by the Peace
355
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
of Prague: the duke of Wiirttemberg, the landgravine of Hesse-Cassel,
widow of William V, and the margrave of Baden-Durlach. A special
arrangement was made for Charles Lewis, the heir of Frederick V, the
unfortunate 'Winter King'. It was impossible to deprive Maximilian of
Bavaria of his electoral title, and an eighth electorate was therefore
created for Charles Lewis. Maximilian moreover retained the Upper
Palatinate, while the Lower Palatinate was restored to Charles Lewis.
Here again the emperor refused to be bound by the general law, for to
go back to the year 1618 would have completely upset the great confis-
cations in Bohemia and in Austria after the battle of the White Hill.
Ferdinand therefore declared that there would be complete restitution in
his domains only to those who had taken up arms against the emperor
after 1630.
By the spring of 1648 peace seemed to be in sight, but there were still
outstanding difficulties to be overcome. The French delegates insisted on
the emperor's neutrality in the war between France and Spain, a demand
vigorously rejected by Ferdinand. This question became even more impor-
tant when, on 30 January 1648, Spain and the United Provinces of the
Netherlands signed a peace treaty. To the French, the withdrawal from
the war of their staunchest ally against Spain made the emperor's neutra-
lity all the more necessary. France wished also to exclude the duke of
Lorraine from the peace treaty, in the hope of incorporating his duchy
in the French monarchy. Finally, the Swedes demanded the payment of
the huge sum of twenty million imperial dollars to pay off their armies.
These last obstacles to peace were overcome after months of wrangling.
The disputes could finally be settled because both Mazarin and the em-
peror found it necessary to end hostilities, while Sweden could not con-
tinue the war without French assistance. Mazarin needed military forces
at home to cope with the Fronde. Ferdinand's intransigence was overcome
by military defeats. The chief German princes, Catholic as well as Pro-
testant, also brought pressure to bear on the emperor to give up his ties
with Spain. In the words of the Brandenburger delegate, the German
people and lands must not be forced to endure the further horrors of war
'until Spain and France finished their game'. The elector of Mainz de-
manded the exclusion of all 'exotic' interests, especially those of Spain.
Maximilian of Bavaria fully agreed with his fellow electors. Compromises
were finally made. The emperor agreed to neutrality in the current war
between Spain and France. In future wars between the two powers, in-
dividual German princes, including the emperor, were entitled to assist
either belligerent power. The problem of Lorraine was postponed to later
negotiation. Sweden's demand for twenty million imperial dollars was
reduced to five million.
On 24 October 1648 the plenipotentiaries of France, Sweden, the em-
peror and the estates of the empire signed the treaties of Miinster and
356
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Osnabruck, commonly known as the Peace of Westphalia. A popular
ballad tells of the ringing of church bells and the lighting of bonfires
when the postilion from Miinster rode through the land to proclaim the
end of thirty years of suffering.
Indeed, scarcely a region had been spared the sufferings inflicted by
invading armies and undisciplined bands of marauding soldiers, and even
more by starvation and pestilence. There are many contemporary
accounts of atrocities, some no doubt exaggerated to attract popular
attention. The engravings of the Lorraine artist Callot give the most
graphic picture of burning peasant houses and tortured peasants. There
are not sufficiently accurate statistics to calculate the loss of life and the
material damages. A modern historian has estimated that the population
of Germany sank 40% in the countryside, and 33% in the cities. 1 The
material damages of war, at least until the present time, have been quickly
repaired, and the Thirty Years War was no exception. The peasants
rebuilt their houses and again tilled their fields, commercial activities
were resumed and the population increased rapidly. It has been estimated
that the population of Germany in 1750 was 75% higher than at the end
of the war. 2 A more lasting effect of the war is to be seen in the increase
of serfdom in eastern Germany. The noble landowners needed labour
for their huge estates, and overcame the difficulties of a decreased labour
supply by binding the peasants to the soil, a process which had, to be sure,
begun long before the war.
Some of the political consequences of the peace for Germany have
already been mentioned, particularly the impotence of the emperor and
the diet, and the independence of the princes. For the future, this meant
that the emperors would turn their attention to the hereditary Habsburg
possessions in the east, while the few powerful princes established states
which could compete in the European state system. The elector of
Brandenburg became the most successful in this competition. The old
controversies which combined territorial and religious interests were for
ever settled.
In its international aspect, the Peace of Westphalia marked the victory
of France and Sweden over the Austrian Habsburg. The territorial gains
of the two powers proved, however, to be of unequal importance. The
Swedish conquests on the Baltic were soon lost to the growing power of
Brandenburg-Prussia, while the French hold on the Rhine was maintained.
Richelieu's work was not yet completed. The task of stopping the 'pro-
gress' of Spain was continued until the Treaty of the Pyrenees of 1659.
The Thirty Years War is the last European war in which religious
motivation played a role, and Gustavus Adolphus was the last great
1
Gunther Franz, Der dreissigjiihrige Krieg und das deutsche Volk (2nd ed. Jena, 1943),
P-53-
1
Ibid. p. 54.
357
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
statesman who equated religion and power politics. His ally, Richelieu, on
the other hand, furthered the notion that the interest of the state formed
the basis for political and military actions. This attitude was strengthened
when Catholics as well as Protestants ignored the pope's solemn protest
against the clauses of the peace treaties which were injurious to the
Catholic church. The claim of a supranational religious authority to inter-
fere in affairs of state was rejected.
Until the days of the French Revolution, the Peace of Westphalia was
considered to be the basis of the European state system. The recognition
of the independence of two states, the United Provinces of the Nether-
lands and of the Swiss Confederation, could give some sanction to the
belief that only a European congress could ratify the creation or extinction
of states. Many years later, Edmund Burke protested that the partition
of Poland was a breach of the Westphalian treaties. The Treaty of
Utrecht of 1713 was considered to be a rectification of the Peace of West-
phalia. One final conclusion can be drawn. The Thirty Years War and the
peace which ended it prevented the establishment of Habsburg hegemony,
and prepared the way for the aggressions of Louis XIV. In this sense the
Thirty Years War may be called the beginning of modern power politics.
It brought into being a new awareness of the danger involved in the domi-
nation of Europe by any one power, a danger which could be met only by
concerted diplomatic action, or if necessary by war.
358
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER XII
THE LOW COUNTRIES
T
HE truce of 1609 which for the time being terminated Spain's
attempts to reconquer the northern Netherlands was in fact a
defeat of the southern Netherlands, although the Archduke Albert
and his principal minister Spinola had done so much to bring it about.
It was a defeat because until further notice the independence of the rebel
provinces was recognized and the split in the seventeen provinces con-
firmed. The period now starting is indeed one of growing estrangement
between the two parts of the old Burgundian state. In 1609 the northern
republic had not yet reached its full territorial extent. The parts of Bra-
bant, Limburg and Flanders which were finally to belong to it were con-
quered only after 1621. But in principle this northern state was already by
1609 what it continued to be until the French Revolution. Already in
these early years of the seventeenth century it was getting used to its
status of sovereign independence and was adopting the character of a
nation. In the southern provinces a parallel development took place.
Religious, social, economic and political contrasts seemed inevitably to
lead to the growth of two different, indeed hostile national feelings.
This should not, of course, be exaggerated. The national factor did not
yet possess much influence. Far more important was religion. When
studying the attitude of the Jesuits who had such a predominant im-
portance in the history of the southern Netherlands and of the Calvinists
in the north who had comparatively much less influence but nevertheless
set their seal upon Dutch political and social life, it is evident that both
these groups in this period had not yet given up the idea that the north
and south fundamentally formed a unity; they even sought to restore it.
But they wanted this reunification to be brought about on their own con-
ditions only, that is to say, through the establishment of exclusive supre-
macy of their own particular creed in both parts of the Netherlands. Since
this obviously could not be achieved by either group, both were by the
sheer force of circumstances driven back into their own provinces. There
their influence was unchallenged or, if they were Calvinists, at any rate con-
siderable. As the hope of reconquering the other part faded both Jesuits
and Calvinists developed a rather resigned hatred of the other group, now
regarded as irretrievably corrupted, and as a complete stranger. The stu-
pendous polemics of Jesuits against Calvinists and vice versa (an immense
literature in Latin and Dutch) which passionately contrasted heretical
Holland and popish Belgium, helped to break the national unity of the
religiously divided Netherlands.
359
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
A characteristic instance of this process of drifting apart of two groups
of provinces which had been brought into close contact by political
events and, partly, by the common language was the divergence in the
historical interpretation of the revolt of the Netherlands. Two contrasting
myths were developed. In the north the struggle for liberty of religion and
for national independence was described in a series of major historical
works: by Grotius, in his beautiful Latin, or by the Renaissance poet
P. C. Hooft, in a vigorous Dutch inspired by Tacitus, full of delightful
innovations. In the south, on the contrary, the writers considered reckless
pursuit of gain, ambition, criminal lust to be the motives of the revolt.
William 'the Silent', praised as the pater patriae in the north, was in the
south an egoistic, ambitious tyrant whereas Philip II, in the eyes of
Belgian authors a prince distinguished by his careful love of his subjects,
remained for the northern historians and pamphleteers the personification
of evil. So the most recent past lost its character of common history and
was made to fit into two hostile mythologies. North and south seemed to
become an antithesis of widely diverging principles. The north, a maritime
power, governed by a bourgeoisie and its commercial interests, looked
fundamentally different from the continental south with its Spanish court
at Brussels, its Jesuits, its loyalty to the monarchy, its nobility growing in
number and social importance.
There is, however, some danger in overstressing these differences. For
although the north developed at an amazing pace into the leading com-
mercial power of Europe it is (as we shall see) by no means certain that the
economy of the south declined. The tendencies, moreover, which made the
southern Netherlands into a society dominated by a court and a nobility
were not altogether absent in the northern republic. It is significant that
precisely at the moment when the archducal court at Brussels withered
away after Isabella's death in 1633, Stadholder Frederick Henry was
building up at The Hague a court life and a regal style which, had not the
regents and a series of unpredictable events prevented their development,
might well have transformed the character of Dutch society. A compari-
son of the development of the political institutions in both parts of the old
Burgundian Netherlands would also suggest the need of caution. In the
southern Netherlands the traditional structure, with its complicated
pattern of local rights and privileges which Charles V had been unable or
unwilling completely to destroy, was preserved, although the spirit
running through the central government was more absolutist than ever
before. In the northern provinces only the names and the forms of the old
institutions were maintained, while they acquired new contents. Both in
the south and the north, however, federalism, provincial autonomy, local
particularism remained the leading principles of everyday political life.
And if southern monarchism is, in a general way, to be contrasted with
northern republicanism we should, on the other hand, overlook neither
360
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE LOW COUNTRIES
the monarchical tendencies apparent in Frederick Henry's stadholdership
nor the remarkable fact that the main trend of Dutch political theory
remained, throughout this period, monarchical. During several decades
in the early seventeenth century professors of Leiden, Utrecht and
Groningen universities taught their pupils that monarchy was the oldest
and the best form of government. The endlessly repeated Calvinist
doctrines of the sixteenth century, moreover, seemed to take for granted
a limited monarchy in which the States as representatives of the people
were by no means the sovereigns but only the protectors of the old con-
stitution. A truly republican political ideology was not developed in the
northern Netherlands before the 1650s.
The state which had come into existence in the north was not built
according to any constitutional programme nor was it felt or recognized
by its inhabitants as a new, revolutionary creation. Yet it obviously was.
When Grotius tried to prove in his book De Antiquitate et Statu Reipubli-
cae Batavicae (1610) that Holland's government had fundamentally always
been what it was in his own time, he completely misinterpreted history.
Although traditional institutions were preserved their meaning and func-
tion were transformed with the result that a political system emerged
which created great and often very critical amazement in contemporary
Europe. It seemed so unworkable a mixture of all forms of government
and so devoid of any leading organizational principle that its near collapse
was confidently predicted. It did not collapse, of course, and its supple-
ness, though often causing dangerous uncertainties, proved on the whole
more beneficial for the stability of the nation than did the contemporary
absolute monarchies for theirs. It should, moreover, be noted that within
this structure it was possible during the early seventeenth century to build
upon the ruins left by the revolt a very coherent and efficient system of
local government and local or provincial jurisdiction. This work was
directed or commented on by a school of jurists who, thanks to their
humanistic outlook, not only participated in the rapid development of
their science in its international context but often even acquired a leading
position among their colleagues in north-west Europe.
The federation of the northern Netherlands was based on the Union of
Utrecht of 1579. This was not a constitution but an alliance made by some
provinces in order to carry out a number of specific purposes, in the first
place the continuation of the war against Spain which the States General
representing the whole of the seventeen provinces did not pursue with
sufficient determination. The course of events consolidated this alliance
and detached from it those provinces which eventually formed no part
of the northern republic. The Union of Utrecht became in this way the
nucleus of what might be called the Dutch state (although the usual expres-
sion was the Republic of the United Netherlands) as it was the only formal
bond which held the provinces together. The central organ of this union
13
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
was the States General. Not the entire territory of the Dutch Republic
was represented in this assembly. Gelderland, Holland, Zeeland, Utrecht,
Friesland, Overijssel and Groningen sent delegates to the States General
but Drente (indeed a backward and unimportant province) was not
represented in the central government although it had a sort of provincial
States of its own. The slices of Flanders, Brabant and Limburg which
finally were appended to the republic did not possess any kind of regional
representation or administration and were governed by the States General
as conquered territories with complete disrespect of their traditions and
wishes.
Each of the seven provinces sent as many representatives to the States
General as it wanted or as the limited space of the meeting room at The
Hague permitted. But each possessed only one vote and the representatives
were bound to vote as instructed by the States of their respective pro-
vinces. In important matters there was no question of outvoting the
minority since unanimity of the seven sovereigns was required for taking
a decision binding on each of them. The States General met every day,
even on Sundays, for a couple of hours. Their importance was consider-
able. They acted as the representative of the union, conducted foreign
affairs, controlled defence and the federal taxes which were apportioned
among the provinces according to a strict scheme. Holland paid about
58 % (half of which was contributed by Amsterdam), Overijssel not quite
4%
Another federal institution was the Council of State, no longer as in the
old days an advisory body to the ruler but a committee of about twenty-
five persons in which the seven provinces were represented and which was
entrusted with much military, financial and other business. It was perhaps
better equipped for acting as the central government than the States
General because its proceedings were not hampered to such a degree by
the principle of provincial sovereignty. Yet this very fact caused the States
General to leave only minor questions for it to deal with, although by its
instruction of 1588 it was designed to be the central executive of the
union. The Chamber of Accounts of the Generality did not possess much
power either. It is significant that there was a federal mint chamber
exercising some control over the mints of the various provinces but no
federal mint.
Although the fleet lay under the control of the States General and the
admiral-general, the daily direction of naval affairs was referred to the
so-called Admiralty Colleges. These five colleges (three in Holland, one
each in Zeeland and Friesland), the members of which were appointed
by the States General on the recommendation of the provinces, provided
for maritime defence including the collection of the taxes for this purpose
(the Convooien and Licenten, in fact import and export duties). The trading
companies also depended on the authority of the States General because
362
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE LOW COUNTRIES
these had the right to grant monopolies. Yet the actual direction for
example of the East India Company consisted of the so-called chambers,
local administrative bodies which exercised supervision on company
affairs. Membership of these chambers was lucrative and as the govern-
ment of the towns in which they were established took care of the appoint-
ments they were exclusively composed of members of the group of munici-
pal regents. The body of seventeen members [De Heeren Zeventien],
representing these local chambers, acted as central administration. It
should be clear from this survey that the federal government only pos-
sessed a severely limited authority. There was no federal court of justice,
no federal church government, no federal internal administration in
general. Provincial sovereignty was carefully respected and it was difficult
for any of the federal organs to encroach upon provincial rights. If in
practice the republic possessed a far greater unity than this federal system
would seem to allow this was due to the overwhelming power of the pro-
vince of Holland. For it was Holland which provided the money, the
ships, the leading ideas and the leading statesmen.
Holland's system of government was rather complicated. Legally
sovereignty resided undoubtedly in the States. But there was some dis-
cussion about the way in which they had acquired it. Because it was often
and officially stated that they acted as the representatives of popular
sovereignty it might perhaps be concluded that ultimately the members
of the States, as a personification of the people, possessed sovereignty
individually rather than corporately. For these members were indeed
supposed to be the people themselves. There were nineteen of them; one
vote belonged to the nobility, eighteen votes belonged to the towns (it
should be noted that The Hague had no vote). In important matters
unanimity was required. The States met four times a year for a few weeks.
The daily work was done by a standing committee of ten members
appointed for three years. As the urban delegations to the States were
composed of men belonging to the urban regent families it is clear that
provincial government was largely in control of this small group. The
States of the other six provinces were composed in totally different ways.
Those of Gelderland, for instance, were in fact only the joint meeting of
representatives of the three parts into which the province was divided and
which each sent two deputations, one of the nobility and one of the towns.
It is easy to see that the nobility played an incomparably more important
part here than in Holland. The States of Utrecht were composed of three
'members'. Besides the nobility and the towns the chapters (which were
of course no longer Roman Catholic but which, unlike the other institu-
tions of the Catholic church in the republic, had not been abolished), also
sent a deputation; the other two 'members' however had the right to
elect the deputation of the 'first member' out of the body of Protestant
canons. It was a highly anomalous situation which led to much friction.
363
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
13-2DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
The main characteristic of the States of Friesland, to mention still another
example, was the predominance of the rural interests. The whole organi-
zation of the Friesland States, moreover, was remarkable because, unlike
the other provinces, representation was more than mere theory here.
The thirty groups of villages [grietenijen] into which the province was
divided, had the right to appoint members of the States; they were
elected by the owners of houses to which the right of voting was attached.
The members of the States, appointed for one year—besides the rural
representatives there were the deputies of eleven towns—were true pleni-
potentiaries. There was no need in Friesland to refer matters back to the
constituents. The States really exercised sovereignty on behalf of a fairly
large electorate. It should however be added that because of much corrup-
tion and highly oligarchic practices this government lost its democratic
character during the seventeenth and eighteenth centuries.
Holland's most important official was the land's advocate, whose title
was changed after 1618 into council pensionary (foreign contemporaries
preferred to use the term grand pensionary to distinguish him from the
legal advisers of many of the towns equally called pensionaries). Thanks
to the cumulation of duties with which he was charged he was able to
exercise great influence in all the various spheres of provincial and federal
government. He acted as chairman of the States of Holland and of their
committees and as the leader of the Holland deputation to the States
General; he carried on the correspondence of the republic with the Dutch
ambassadors abroad and received their communications, while the official
despatches they sent to the Greffier of the States General were merely
formal. And through his knowledge of all current affairs, though officially
only a paid servant of the States of Holland, he sometimes wielded
decisive power not only in his own province but in the whole republic.
Much, however, depended on his own capacities and energy. At no time
were either the States of Holland or the States General really subject to
him. Nor was there any possibility of the office developing into a more or
less permanent presidency of the union. It was personal qualities which
enabled some of its incumbents to assume the role of leading statesman
of a republic which sometimes needed this leadership but which was
never willing permanently to adapt its institutions to what was ultimately
regarded as an anomaly.
The position of the Stadholder was still more complicated. As he was
appointed by the States of the various provinces his was legally a provin-
cial function dependent on the sovereign will of his principals. Several
elements, however, bestowed on the incumbent of the office a far higher
status. The dignity derived great importance from the fact that in Holland,
Zeeland and most of the other provinces only the princes of Orange, heirs
to the immensely popular tradition of William the Silent, were appointed
as stadholders (whereas in Friesland and sometimes also in Groningen
364
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE LOW COUNTRIES
and Drente the office was held by the counts of Nassau). Moreover, thanks
to his being stadholder in various provinces at the same time the prince of
Orange, though not a member of the States General, naturally partici-
pated in the making of federal policies. As he also often held the functions
of captain-general and admiral-general of the union his activities were,
in fact, never confined to merely provincial matters. The stadholdership
itself included several truly sovereign rights which had formerly belonged
to the stadholders of Burgundian times who often acted as the substitutes,
the locum tenentes, of the distant sovereign. The stadholders of the republic
possessed the right of electing urban magistrates and appointing several
provincial officials. They equally had the right of granting pardon or
remission of penalties. Often the stadholdership was regarded by con-
temporaries as the monarchical element in a state with a mixed constitu-
tion. This was certainly an inaccurate way of describing the structure of
the republic but it had the merit of indicating that notwithstanding the
legal supremacy of the States actual practice as well as its theoretical
rationalization needed the help of different powers and conceptions. From
a sociological point of view it is clear that the presence of this princely
tradition helped to mitigate the absolute character of the ruling oligarchy,
though it should be added that the princes of Orange were rarely willing
and never able to supersede the Holland plutocracy—from whom they and
the republic ultimately received the money they needed and the directives
motivating their policies.
It would, indeed, have been disastrous for the republic as a whole if
Holland's power had been eliminated. For Holland was the mainspring
of all Dutch activity whether commercial, industrial or cultural. There is
perhaps no other example in history of a complete and highly original
civilization springing up in so short a time on so small a territory. It is, of
course, true that the conditions necessary for its development were
already beginning to be fulfilled a century before when the Amsterdam or
the Holland staple market started functioning. It is also true that the
newly won independence imbued the inhabitants with self-reliance and
optimism and prompted them to find their own forms in all the spheres in
which they moved. National or patriotic pride made them transform the
vernacular into a rich and precise language to be used as easily in literature
as in science. The University of Leiden rapidly acquired international
fame and certainly owed much of its resilience to the inspiring force of
Protestantism and the lack of medieval tradition which enabled it to break
through the old curriculum. It should, moreover, not be forgotten that the
many thousands of Calvinist south-Netherlanders who found refuge in the
north (totalling, according to a modern estimate, 60,000) contributed their
fortunes, their skill, knowledge and dynamism to the development of
Dutch economy and civilization. But all this makes the phenomenon of
this small people (the population of Holland, half of the total population
365
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
of the Republic, amounted to not yet 700,000) unexpectedly rising to such
a height hardly less unaccountable an event.
The growth that is most easy to measure is economic growth, though we
do not possess enough data to provide our description with an adequate
statistical basis. The mechanism of the staple market was no innovation
of this period; but it was refined and elaborated. No doubt Amsterdam
derived inestimable benefit from the fact that since 1585 Antwerp was cut
off from the sea. Yet the differences between the Brabant market in the
sixteenth century specializing in small and expensive merchandise and
largely dependent on foreign freightage as well as capital and the much
more varied Holland staple based on its own immense merchant fleet and
it own capital are obvious. The removal of the staple in western Europe
from Antwerp to Amsterdam is symbolized by the building of the Amster-
dam Exchange in 1611. The development of the central goods market in
Holland created the urgent necessity of improving the monetary situation.
By bringing money exchange under municipal control and opening the
possibility for a transfer system the discount banks in Amsterdam (1609),
Middelburg (1616), Delft (1621) and Rotterdam (1635) tried to meet this
need. It is remarkable that the Bank of Amsterdam soon started granting
credit, although this went against the original intention.
Amsterdam grew rapidly. About 1600 it had perhaps 50,000inhabitants;
about 1620 the figure rose to 100,000, about 1650 to 200,000. In 1610 the
work of extending the city boundaries and the construction of the three
famous concentric canals with their elegant houses was started. At the
same time large warehouses sprang up where the staple goods, above all
grains, could be stored, early examples of highly satisfying aesthetic
utility building. No firm figures illustrating the expansion of trade are
available. But we know that in the 1640s it reached its climax and that
throughout the whole period Amsterdam left the other growing towns of
Holland far behind. We also know the rapidity with which enormous
amounts of assets were gathered by some Amsterdam families and the
amazingly quick rise of foreigners on the social ladder. Banningh Cocq,
the central figure of Rembrandt's Night Watch (he died in 1655) was the
son of a poor German who started his career in Amsterdam as a beggar,
made a fortune and contracted a very successful marriage. The son rose
to the rank of knight and burgomaster. These upstart families, eager to
acquire titles of nobility (as there was in the Dutch Republic no authority
which could ennoble them they asked for favours of foreign princes) soon
adapted themselves to the humanistic culture of the universities, and
though few of them may have been able to write Latin they all exag-
gerated their pride by adopting the classicist prejudices concerning the
lower orders and democracy.
The nucleus of the entrepot business continued to be the Baltic trade.
The most important articles transported to the Baltic were salt, herring,
366
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE LOW COUNTRIES
wine and colonial products. In addition to cereals, wood and wooden
products which formed the bulk of their homeward cargoes and for which
they found a large market in western and southern Europe, the Dutch
ships carried iron and copper. On their outward voyages they sailed
partly in ballast, loaded with the Dutch bricks with which the Baltic
countries built their Renaissance architecture. It is clear that one of the
essential tasks of Dutch statesmanship was to keep the Sound open.
During this period also trade to Norway in ships specially equipped for
transporting timber and to Archangel increased. The Dutch merchants
began to be successful in competing with the English Muscovy trade. It
is equally characteristic that France and the French colonies, in matters
of trade and shipping largely dependent on Holland, had to tolerate
Dutch trading-posts often to the detriment of their own population. Trad-
ing with the enemy continued to be a fundamental element of Dutch eco-
nomy. Not only did the Holland merchants after 1621 go on trading to the
southern Netherlands and Spain, but probably this trade actually
increased because Amsterdam had during the previous years become the
centre of the traffic in weapons and ammunition. It is ironic that even the
hated Dunkirk privateers, who waged so unrelenting a war against the
Dutch, sometimes were provided with ammunition by the Dutch them-
selves, notwithstanding a sharp prohibition by the States General but
with the connivance of the Amsterdam admiralty.
It was a long way from these more or less tolerated activities to the
actual privateering business in the Mediterranean though there are indi-
cations that Dutch patricians did not always shrink from financing it.
More important was the ocean-going trade of the East India and West
India Companies, not however because during these years it already
formed an essential part of the Dutch economy but because it led to new
developments in the field of commercial organization and to the founda-
tion of what later became a Dutch colonial empire. The East India Com-
pany of 1602 owed its existence to the initiative of the grand pensionary of
Holland, Oldenbarnevelt, who realized that the numerous companies
trading to the East, now unnecessarily weakening each other, would in
the long run be unable to carry on their struggle with Portugal if they did
not collaborate. In comparison with these older companies the new
elements of the organization of 1602 (essentially a federation of them)
were twofold. It was, in the first place, designed to be permanent whereas
formerly the merchants merely pooled capital to finance a single journey.
All the inhabitants of the republic, moreover, were free to buy shares in
the new company. This was the motive for the States General to grant the
company the monopoly of Dutch trade in the area east of the Cape of
Good Hope. Thanks to the enormous capital of 6,500,000 guilders
brought together in 1602 and the concentration of ships and armed forces
now made possible, the Dutch position in the East Indies was con-
367
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
siderably strengthened. Yet the profits were small during the first decades.
Dividends could be paid but seldom (1610/11: 162^%; 1619: 37i%;
1623: 25%). Only from 1634 was it possible annually to pay a dividend
fluctuating between 12^% and 50%. By that time the capital stock which
in 1602 had been shared by all classes of the population was already con-
centrated in the hands of relatively few capitalists.
The West India Company had a less satisfactory development. Its
immediate purpose was totally different from that of the East India Com-
pany. The fact alone that it was founded only in 1621, after the end of the
truce, although it had been under discussion for many years, indicates
that its essential function was to wage war against Spain. It enjoyed the
support of the orthodox Calvinist war party, but throughout its history
the less orthodox patricians felt sceptical or even hostile towards the
company, and though it achieved useful results in its piratical war against
Spain (as for example the capture of the Spanish Silver Fleet in 1628) lack
of money and indifference towards the establishment of colonies rampant
among the regents prevented its developing to an instrument of lasting
importance.
Colonial trade, it has already been said, was of secondary importance
within the framework of Dutch economy. The tonnage of the fleet
trading to the East Indies amounted to no more than 0-2% of the total
Dutch merchant fleet. Industry was in comparison a considerably more
essential element of Dutch economic life. There was however, generally
speaking, a fundamental weakness inherent to Dutch industry (as well
as to the Dutch staple) because industry, instead of providing the staple
with Dutch products, was largely dependent on the staple. Finishing or
merely improving semi-manufactured articles imported from abroad
was its main activity. There were notable exceptions. In some fields
industry indeed worked up the raw material and produced the finished
article itself. The textile manufacture of Leiden, for example, developed
rapidly during the early seventeenth century thanks to the introduction
of some mechanization and of industrial capitalism, but on the whole
such industries as the sugar refineries, the tobacco factories, the sawmills,
the cloth-dressing and the whitelead works were most typical of Dutch
industrial enterprise. Another important branch of Dutch economy was
fishing. It is worth noting that herring fishing was organized in a system
which later became characteristic for the mechanism of the whole staple
market: a group of ship-owners ('the first hand') took care of the supply
of the products and a group of capitalist wholesale dealers ('the second
hand') brought them on the market. Agriculture, finally, was of only
limited importance but the abundance of available capital made it possible
to start the expensive and very risky work of reclaiming the numerous
lakes of Holland.
The social structure of the various provinces of the republic showed
368
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE LOW COUNTRIES
striking differences. In Friesland it was the gentlemen-farmers, in Gelder-
land and Overijssel the noblemen, in Holland the urban patricians who
formed the ruling class. The most important feature in the growth of
Dutch society was the formation of the group of urban patricians, of
bourgeois gentilshommes who, though belonging to and indeed acting as
the 'regents' of the towns, gradually withdrew from business. This
development was as yet only in an early stage and it was not completed
before the end of the seventeenth century. Nevertheless the tendency was
clear for the urban plutocrats to form a semi-noble, aristocratic governing
class sometimes not shrinking back from taking advantage of government
with the same ruthlessness with which former generations had enriched
themselves in trade. But despite many examples of corruption, narrow
class egoism and shortsighted pride, on the whole this government by
unsalaried and legally unprivileged regents worked fairly efficiently. It is
perhaps symptomatic that so few social disturbances were really directed
against the governing class. The substantial and petty bourgeoisie, though
rigidly excluded from the ruling oligarchy, generally seem to have
accepted their position. It is not surprising that the mass of the people
whose poverty increased in these years of growing prosperity (the price
revolution and other factors may explain this phenomenon) did not put
forward any workable plans of social and political reorganization. But in
what way must the absence of any major social conflict—there are, how-
ever, examples of local riots often caused by the heavy indirect taxation—
be explained? Does confidence in the government or rather lack of docu-
ments or lack of research account for this ? In this connection the advanced
forms of private charity organized by the patricians and of the work-
houses or the houses of correction organized by the urban governments
and imitated throughout Europe should be taken into consideration by
the historian trying to assess the benefits due to this peculiar oligarchy.
How do the form of government and the economic development of
the southern Netherlands compare with this? The political system of the
southern provinces is often described as tempered absolutism and the
south Netherlanders were proud of being governed as subjects, not as
inhabitants of conquered territory. They were indeed perfectly justified in
contrasting the despotic government by the States General of the slices of
Brabant and Flanders belonging to the republic with the civil government
prevailing in those parts of these provinces which were ruled by Brussels.
They also took it for granted that the government of the southern Nether-
lands was less absolute than that of Spain. The provincial States con-
tinued to exercise the right to vote benevolences and subsidies; local law
was preserved notwithstanding the legislative activity of the central
government. As far as internal government in the southern Netherlands
was concerned, the Spanish crown carefully kept up the principle that only
369
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
a personal union linked the provinces with the Spanish Empire. Even in
the international field it was made clear that the state of the southern
Netherlands was supposed to continue the sovereign state of the Burgun-
dians. The governors of the southern Netherlands were represented
abroad by their own ambassadors and foreign ambassadors were accredited
to the Brussels court.
It is difficult to decide how far legal forms reflected actual practice.
From different points of view different interpretations concerning the
relative autonomy or the relative dependence of the southern Netherlands
are possible. Studying the situation on the plane of local government and
jurisdiction, of church government, of intellectual life in general, nothing
can be found but autochthonous elements bearing the responsibilities and
spreading the directive ideas. The fact that the privileges were newly
established (the gilds reorganized themselves more rigidly); the phenome-
non of a rural nobility which thanks to the ambition felt by rich patricians
to be ennobled, grew in number without becoming a court nobility (for
after 1633 there was no court life of any importance) or possessing valu-
able tax privileges, assumed a great position in local and provincial
government; the appeal of the Jesuits, relatively more numerous and
influential than anywhere in Europe (the order had in 1630 about 1,700
members in the southern Netherlands as against about 2,200 in France,
2,300 in Germany, 3,000 in Spain); all this can perhaps be explained by
the circumstances which deprived this society of the possibility of urban
expansion and made it into an outpost of the Counter-Reformation, but
it is by no means to be regarded as a Spanish import. A different picture,
however, presents itself when the policies of the central government are
taken into consideration. The part played by the Archdukes Albert and
Isabella who from 1598 to 1621 were in theory the sovereigns of the
southern Netherlands—after Albert's death sovereignty reverted to the
Spanish crown—or that of the governors succeeding them, the large
number of Spanish officials working at the Brussels court and the stiffness
of the ruling etiquette, the role of the southern Netherlands in inter-
national politics or the sad history of the States General in 1632 (we shall
describe it later) indicate so overwhelming a measure of Spanish influence
that but for some short moments no real autonomy seems to have
existed.
A general judgement on the economic development of the south needs
to be equally cautious. There can be no doubt that compared with the
enormous expansion of the north and (as far as this expansion was due to
the closure of the Scheldt) precisely in consequence of the great achieve-
ments of the republic, economic growth in the south was slow and
restricted. But was there, on the whole, absolute decline ? In some fields
this seems undeniable. It is true that the closure of the Scheldt, though
excluding Antwerp and the old Flemish towns from direct openings to the
370
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE
LOW
COUNTRIES
sea, did not prevent their trading to Zeeland and Holland. It is equally
true that thanks to the important trade it continued to carry on along
overland routes Antwerp was by no means an exhausted and dead city;
yet the central, radiating force which had distinguished it before 1585 was
broken. Also for Bruges and Ghent, already in the sixteenth century no
longer the important industrial and trading towns of the Middle Ages,
it was extremely hard to achieve some measure of recovery. But there was,
on the other hand, so much activity and expansion in agriculture as well
as in rural industry that it is better to describe the development of this
economy as a renewal and a transformation rather than a decline. On the
whole the early seventeenth century presents the picture of recovery. The
disasters of the sixteenth century were gradually overcome and new solu­
tions were being found for the difficulties of the present.
The society of the southern Netherlands makes the impression of being
very homogeneous. It was Roman Catholic. Thanks to the emigration of
the most convinced Protestant minorities, to the astounding energy dis­
played by bishops and priests in preaching and education, to their suffo­
cating censorship and the extreme care with which everything in the life
of the south Netherlanders from birth to death was given the seal of the
church; thanks, finally, to the close collaboration of the civil and the
ecclesiastical authorities, the Counter-Reformation achieved a complete
success. Heresy disappeared, not through force (the bloody placcaten of
Charles V and Philip II though not abolished were no longer applied and
there was no question of persecutions) but through making it impossible
for those who refused strict outward conformity to Roman Catholicism
to find a place in this society. The whole civilization of these years seems
to be organized in the service of the triumphant religious ideal. How
vigorous and lively that could be is shown by Rubens and his school
whose genius, however, possibly makes us forget too much of the tensions
and the counter-currents which were not altogether absent. But on the
whole the south formed until Rubens' death in 1640 undoubtedly an im­
pressive intellectual unity and, as such, a sharp contrast with the northern
republic where theological and political disruptive forces seemed to con­
firm the often repeated prophecy that as soon as it would no longer be
united by the war with Spain, this state would irretrievably disintegrate.
It was in the first place religious disputes which shook the northern
provinces when, after having signed the truce, they had the opportunity
to concentrate on them. In the reformed church tensions became apparent
that after a lapse of only a few years came to dominate the political
situation. Gomarus, professor of theology at Leiden University—he was
born at Bruges in 1563—opened shortly after 1600 an attack on the dog­
matic views of his nearest colleague Arrninius who was three years his
elder, reproaching him for deviating from the Calvinistic tenets especially
371
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008D E C L I N E OF S P A I N A N D
THE THIRTY YEARS
WAR
those concerning predestination. This is not the place to examine these
doctrinal disputes. The question which has to be put here is in what way
they became involved with the purely political contrasts in the republic.
There is indeed reason for astonishment here. For though these discus­
sions could only be regarded as fundamental by those who were directly
concerned and who tried to push the arguments of their adversaries to
their last consequences in order to combat them the more easily, they did
in fact nearly bring about a civil war. How was this possible? It was not
because so many people were involved. The conflict was entirely confined
to Holland as the Arminians hardly got any support outside this province.
Within Holland the groups were small; probably only a very tiny majority
of the Holland population belonged to the reformed church at all and
among its members many felt indifferent about these incomprehensibly
complicated theological issues.
The government tried in 1607 and 1609 without success to bring about
a reconciliation. In 1610 the Arminians, aware that their minority position
was becoming untenable, addressed to the States of Holland a request for
protection couched in a document called Remonstrance (hence they were
called Remonstrants). The Grand Pensionary Oldenbarnevelt was
probably informed beforehand of this step; he might even have suggested
it. The majority of the States responded favourably to the Remonstrance.
By no means all the urban patricians were Calvinists. Most of them did
not belong to the reformed church but were either Mennonites, Lutherans,
Roman Catholics or religiously indifferent. Few only were attracted by
Gomarus' severity. Among these few were some leading families in
Amsterdam. Most regents, however, reacted to the conflicts in the church
with feelings of amazement and fear. One thing was obvious to them: it
was intolerable that the majority in the church should drive a minority
into the wilderness, closing the official church to people with slightly
diverging ideas and increasing the already considerable number of sects.
After many fruitless attempts to find a solution the States decided to
intervene. By a resolution supported by the majority (but what legal
validity did such a non-unanimous decision possess ?) the ministers of the
church were forbidden to deal with the doctrinal points in question and
more or less advised to accept an intermediate point of view on pre­
destination and salvation (1614). The Gomarists, now commonly called
the Contra-Remonstrants, refused to submit to this arbitrary ruling with
the result that they were driven out of those towns where the urban
administrations were in favour of Arminianism. This happened, for
example, in Rotterdam where no less a man than Hugo Grotius, fervent
adherent of Oldenbarnevelt's religious policy, acted as pensionary.
1
In Amsterdam, however, the burgomasters supported the Gomarists,
partly because of the genuine convictions of some of the leading men in
1
See above Chapter v, pp. 176-81.
372
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE LOW COUNTRIES
the town council but for the other part because of their aversion to
Oldenbarnevelt's policies in general, Oldenbarnevelt having in 1609
forced through the conclusion of the truce in the face of Amsterdam's
vehement opposition. Amsterdam had at that time been supported by
Stadholder Maurice. It was perhaps only natural for him now to act once
again as a supporter of Amsterdam's cause and to side with the Gomar-
ists. He took his decision in July 1617. A month later, Oldenbarnevelt
answered with a resolution backed by the majority in the States, by which
the towns were advised to engage troops of their own for the preservation
of order. The commanders of the regular army were ordered to co-
operate with the States of the province or the administrations of the towns
where they lay in garrison, notwithstanding any orders to the contrary.
This meant that the States withdrew the army stationed in Holland from
the authority of the captain-general, Stadholder Maurice, if he refused to
support them.
In this way the religious disputes developed into a conflict between two
political parties, each provided with a kind of political programme. This
was a development quite unforeseen by Gomarus, when he objected to
Arminius' supposed latitudinarianism. On the one hand was the party of
Oldenbarnevelt, supported by the majority in the States of Holland, that
is, by the majority of the urban administrations. They defended the right
of the secular government to control the church, they rejected the sugges-
tion frequently made of summoning a national, that is inter-provincial,
synod and they seemed to claim that they could deprive the captain-
general of the exercise of his authority as far as provincial troops were
concerned. It was therefore—or so it seemed—erastianism, latitudin-
arianism and provincialism which they were defending. The other group,
supported by Maurice, by Amsterdam and some other Holland towns, by
all the other provinces and the majority of the States General, stood or
proclaimed to stand for the opposite: severe orthodoxy, the right of the
church to decide about its own dogma, submission of the provinces to the
wishes and the authority of the majority in the States General. Much
however in all this was mere appearance. Principles, no doubt, were
involved, but old resentments, obstinacy, constitutional uncertainties
help to explain the tragedy. From a strictly legal point of view both
opponents were able to refer to law and precedent so that both, in their
blind pursuit of what they regarded as right, exaggerated views equally
defensible.
In fact the conflict was more than anything else a conflict between two
rival, personal powers: that of Oldenbarnevelt and that of Maurice, both
supported by small groups of adherents. It had taken many years before
this position was reached. As soon as it was arrived at the result could be
predicted. Maurice had the best cards: the army, the immensely powerful
city of Amsterdam, the large majority of the States General. Tactfully and
373
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
slowly preparing his charges as though he were leading a military cam-
paign, he isolated Oldenbarnevelt's party. Then, supported by the States
General, he had its leaders put into prison: Oldenbarnevelt himself and,
among others, Hugo Grotius (1618). His party confirmed its victory by
means of what might be called two lawsuits. An extraordinary tribunal
sentenced Oldenbarnevelt to death (on 13 May 1619 the great man was
executed) and some of his collaborators, among them Grotius, to im-
prisonment for life. The famous national as well as international Synod
of Dordrecht condemned the Remonstrant doctrine in the presence of
the elite of Calvinistic scholarship and drove its adherents out of the
church and the country (1619). If the practice of those times is taken into
consideration both sets of sentences, although obviously partisan, seem
from a formal point of view unobjectionable.
The result of these conflicts determined the history of the republic for
the next thirty years but it did not fundamentally change its course.
Prince Maurice, now in possession of nearly unlimited power, did not
frame a new, more workable constitution. He was a soldier rather than a
statesman and his personal ambitions (he had contracted a morganatic
marriage) did not include dynastic glory. He did not even make a deter-
mined effort to break the power of the urban aristocracies in Holland,
though some of them remained Remonstrant. During the years that
immediately followed the government of Amsterdam was gradually
taken away from the Contra-Remonstrant leaders, and the town which
had helped to undermine Oldenbarnevelt's authority pursued in face of
the stadholder an independent and self-willed policy. The victory of the
Gomarists of 1619 was no more lasting than Maurice's successes. The
leaders of the Remonstrants were driven away but not beaten. Their
doctrine increasingly developed in an anti-Calvinistic direction and it got
so much hold of large groups of the regents and the intellectuals as to
become a dominating element in Dutch civilization. In the 1620s the
Remonstrants were able once more openly to preach their doctrine. In
1630 they founded a church in Amsterdam and in 1632 a semi-academic
institution, the Athenaeum Illustre. The vitality of the church of Dor-
drecht was not strengthened by the stiffening of its doctrine and its disci-
pline.
Maurice's only political act of importance after 1619 was his decision
not to allow an extension of the truce in 1621. But the war against Spain
and the southern Netherlands which was consequently resumed (in fact
against the will of Archduke Albert) became another disappointment for
him. Financial difficulties, uncertainties in his foreign policy, military
setbacks and a Spanish offensive overshadowed his last years. One month
after his death in April 1625 the important town of Breda was captured
by the Spaniards. His brother Frederick Henry, who was pressed by the
dying stadholder to marry Amalia of Solms for the sake of perpetuating
374
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE LOW COUNTRIES
the dynasty, took over a heavily charged inheritance when he was
appointed to all the functions held by his predecessor. Yet his time of
office (1625-47) became one of the most brilliant periods in the history of
the republic.
In many respects Frederick Henry resumed the ideals and the political
style of his father William the Silent rather than those of his brother
Maurice. He was religiously tolerant; he was possessed by the ambition to
reconquer the southern Netherlands and especially Antwerp (we shall
later study its frustration) and more clearly than Maurice he strove after
a position raising him above the status of a mere civil servant and general.
He succeeded indeed in becoming the actual leader not only of the army
but of the whole Dutch domestic and foreign policy. The federal organs
of the union, the Council of State and the States General, were made
dependent on him. From 1630 onwards foreign affairs were administered
by a standing committee of the States General to which he managed to
get appointed only those men who were prepared to follow his directives.
No longer did the grand pensionary (after 1636 the office was held by the
docile Jacob Cats whose glory is founded on his abilities as an indefati-
gable versifier) dominate the republic and the centre of possible opposition
to the new state of affairs seemed to be eliminated. The prince and his
wife took delight in displaying their semi-royal position by building up a
fashionable court at The Hague; though it drew numerous international
visitors, it stood outside Dutch life in general.
About 1640 Frederick Henry reached the pinnacle of his power. The
remaining years until his death in 1647 witnessed a gradual but inexorable
decline. This was due to different sets of factors, of which the most impor-
tant was the resistance springing up against the triumphant achievements
of his personal policies. In 1641 his son William II was married to Charles
I's daughter Mary. Consequently Frederick Henry embraced the Stuart
cause and one of the preoccupations of his later years was to make the
republic support the English Royalists. But the province of Holland was
not prepared to let itself be drawn into a war which only could be a
maritime war against the Parliamentary party including London, the
merchant fleet and the navy. In 1643 the States of various provinces,
among them those of Holland, refused further to collaborate in the
government by the standing committee of the States General. It was
therefore matters of foreign policy which undermined Frederick Henry's
so carefully built up, semi-monarchical position. However, the general
character of his foreign policy can only be properly understood after an
analysis of the history of the southern Netherlands during the years
1621-48.
The homogeneity of the southern Netherlands during this great and
creative period was apparently so complete that the tensions which arose
375
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
seem only superficial disturbances. Yet about 1640 the intellectual unity
of the country broke up. And during the years when this cultural crisis
was slowly maturing, political conflicts occurred which were not without
significance.
The year 1621 had made remarkably little impression upon the southern
Netherlands although it was of such incomparable importance for the
country. The experiment begun in 1598, when the southern Netherlands
were made a formally independent state governed by the archdukes,
ended in failure. Albert died in 1621 without issue. Sovereignty reverted
to the Spanish king. Albert's widow, Isabella, carried on the government
of the southern Netherlands until her death in 1633, but she was an old,
disillusioned lady in deep sorrow, quite unable to check the gathering
momentum of Spanish influence. Albert had lived just long enough to
witness the breakdown of another experiment. In April 1621 the truce
came to an end and once again the war which he knew would be disastrous
was resumed. But he was too weak to resist the Spanish king, Philip IV,
who had in March 1621 succeeded his father and who was completely
dominated by his minister Olivares, an ambitious man who wanted to
revive the most ambitious Spanish traditions. The Dutch Republic, more-
over, also preferred to resume the struggle.
After 1621 power in the southern Netherlands belonged in fact to the
Marquis of Bedmar, Cardinal de la Cueva, who had in 1618 come to
Brussels as Spanish ambassador. It was he who directed the work of the
two extraordinary juntas—a Spanish and a Belgian one—which governed
the country over the head of old institutions like the Council of State.
Resistance to this system was slow in developing. But in 1629 Belgian
dislike of the new regime was so strong that Isabella felt obliged to give in
and to withdraw her support from Bedmar. For some time to come the
situation looked tlangerous. After the initial Spanish successes Frederick
Henry's genius turned the fortunes of war. In 1629 he took Bois-le-Duc.
The finances of the southern Netherlands were in a most miserable condi-
tion. It was apparently beyond Isabella's power any longer to meet her
liabilities by increasingly inadequate expedients; she even pawned her
jewels. But although Bedmar's successor, the marquis of Aytona, radi-
cally altered the system and restored the Council of State, he could not
prevent indignation and defeatism from growing rampant. The conclusion
of peace was, in fact, the only possible solution of the problems that beset
the masters of the southern Netherlands. Isabella had seen this for long
and her general, Spinola, fully agreed with her. When he found in 1627
that Madrid was not prepared either to provide the necessary funds or to
start on a peace policy, he refused any longer to remain in command
of the army.
The crisis which shook the southern Netherlands dominated Isabella's
last years. She did not see the end of it but when she died (December 1633)
376
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE LOW COUNTRIES
the desperate weakness of the opposition against the Spanish regime
had become apparent. In 1632 the so-called conspiracy of some young
magnates failed miserably. Their intentions are not altogether clear. They
probably wanted with French aid to overthrow Spanish authority. But
these haughty and incompetent aristocrats found no support among the
masses of the population nor were they capable of determined action.
General attention was directed elsewhere. Against Philip IV's will Isabella
had decided to call the States General, which had not met since 1600.
They had but one task: to negotiate a peace with the Dutch Republic.
When these negotiations (they will be discussed later) broke down,
Philip IV ordered the States to disperse (18 June 1634). Obviously the
southern Netherlands—in fact one immense army camp—were unable
to thrust their will upon the Spaniards.
After 1634 the Spaniards recovered their authority thanks to the labours
of Aytona and the staunch royalist Antwerper, Pieter Roose, president
of the secret council at Brussels. The Cardinal-Infant Ferdinand,
Philip IV's brother, became governor-general. He was an excellent soldier
but a poor statesman and after Aytona's death in 1635 it was, ironically,
Roose's lot to further the Hispanization of the southern Netherlands.
Ferdinand's death in 1641 inaugurated a period of clumsy emergency
measures which was only terminated in 1647 by the appointment of
Leopold William, a brother of the Emperor Ferdinand III, as governor.
But Belgian dependence on Spain was now so complete that in 1648 he
took no part in making the peace which put an end to the meaningless,
exhausting war. And we shall see that this peace was just as catastrophic
for the southern Netherlands as had been the war.
Just as in the political life of the country conflicting tendencies lay
behind the brilliant fagade of the Counter-Reformation, so the baroque
civilization possessed its conflicts and fissures. The year 1640 is memo-
rable in the cultural history of the southern Netherlands. It was the year of
Rubens' death. It was also the year of publication of two important
books: the Imago Primi Saeculi Societatis Jesu in which Belgian Jesuits
described the triumphs of the first century of their order (and it was not
by accident that Belgians wrote this proud survey) and the Augustinus
by Cornelius Jansenius (the bishop of Ypres, originating from Holland,
who had died in 1638)—an extremely controversial work already in 1643
condemned by the papal bull In Eminenti. The disputes which arose about
Jansenius' theses—his emphasis on the decisive role of God's mercy, his
moral rigorism, his mystical tendencies and his preference of national
ecclesiastical autonomy to Roman centralization—do not belong to the
period here under review. But it is remarkable that this book, in a way a
protest against Counter-Reformatory optimism, immediately found
influential supporters in Belgium, made the famous University of Lou-
vain, for so long a stronghold of Rome, turn against Rome, and drew the
377
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
attention of the clerical and secular intellectuals who had become in-
terested in the most modern philosophical development, Cartesianism.
The powerful art of Rubens and his school, the promise of rich theolo-
gical and philosophical discussion cannot take away the impression that
the early seventeenth-century civilization of the southern Netherlands
was one-sided. Erudition was mainly historical and the study of history
produced compilations and critical investigation of material rather than
historiography; a good example is the monumental Acta Sanctorum of
which the first volumes appeared in 1643. Literature, however, whether in
Flemish or in French, withered away. Here the contrast with the sur-
prisingly rapid development in the northern provinces is striking. The
separation of south and north deprived the language of Flanders and
Brabant, in the Middle Ages the best medium for literary expression in
all the Netherlands, of the vitality which could have made it grow to the
clarity, the richness and the delicacy of northern Dutch. It is this struggle
between north and south which calls for attention because the war of
1621-48, in some respects a civil war, was of such crucial importance for
the development of both countries.
The international position of the republic was determined by tradition
and by the course taken by the revolt. Spain was the enemy; France the
ally. According to a treaty of 1624 France supported the States General
with subsidies and the republic provided France with ships—ships
which were used (with permission of the States but to the indignation of
the Dutch Protestants) at the siege of La Rochelle, the fortress of the
Huguenots. Yet French support during these years was relatively unim-
portant. Until 1625 the Spaniards achieved surprising military successes
but soon after that date their offensive power became exhausted. It is
significant that already in 1628 Philip IV declared himself prepared to
grant the republic peace with preservation of its sovereignty but requiring
the Dutch (in vain of course) to recognize the Spanish king as then-
eternal protector and to improve the lot of the Roman Catholics. Tenta-
tive negotiations, however, continued to accompany the military opera-
tions. But although Philip IV reduced his pretensions, the war which
neither Holland, nor Brussels, nor Spain really wanted to continue, could
not easily be terminated. The extremely complicated international situation
as well as hesitations and contradictory tendencies among the belligerents
rendered a rapid solution impossible.
The great fact in the first decade of the war was the capture of the
important city of Bois-le-Duc in Brabant by Frederick Henry (1629).
Thanks to this feat he carried the war to the provinces south of the big
rivers. The character of the struggle changed. From 1621 to 1629 the
Dutch were defending their small territory against the Spaniards, now
they penetrated southward. This complicated their policies, for suddenly
378
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE LOW COUNTRIES
the conquest of the southern Netherlands became a practical possibility.
The relations between north and south, which the truce of 1609 seemed
to have defined by recognizing for the time being both parts of the
Burgundian Netherlands as independent countries, once again became an
acute problem. The reaction in the southern Netherlands was vehement,
as we have already seen. But immediately a grave disappointment was in
store for those who hoped for a southern revolt—for Frederick Henry did
not exclude this possibility from his plans. The influence of the orthodox
Calvinists on the policies of the republic prevented the stadholder from
granting religious freedom to the Roman Catholics in Bois-le-Duc.
Voetius himself, the formidable leader of the Gomarists, soon a professor
of Utrecht University, a man of encyclopaedic knowledge and strict
dogmatism, came to Frederick Henry's army camp to point out the com-
mander's duty. A religious revolution took place in the homogeneously
Roman Catholic town.
The year 1630 went by without important decisions being taken. But in
1631 tension in the southern Netherlands grew. Count van den Bergh, the
native commander-in-chief of the southern Netherlands and a first cousin
to Frederick Henry, was relieved from his function and replaced by a
Spanish general. In conjunction with another personality of considerable
influence, the president of the Council of Finances at Brussels, the count of
Warfusee, he entered upon secret negotiations with the States General at
The Hague. Their plans are not quite clear, but so much is certain: that
they wanted in the case of a general uprising in the southern Netherlands
—an uprising which they were trying to start—French help for the
Walloon and Dutch support for the Flemish-speaking provinces. In May
1632, before Frederick Henry began his summer campaign, the States
General issued a proclamation addressed to the southern Netherlands
summoning them ' to liberate themselves from the heavy and intolerable
yoke of the Spaniards . . . and to join themselves unto these United
Provinces' and promising the preservation of their privileges as well as
the right publicly to exercise the Roman Catholic religion. Frederick
Henry's campaign started successfully. He took Venlo and Roermond in
Upper Gelderland and, after a siege of more than two months, Maastricht
(August 1632). But then nothing happened. The French king had given no
effective support whatever to the plans of the Walloon nobility. The
Flemish-speaking provinces did not stir. And Frederick Henry, who was
expected rapidly to march on Brabant, stayed cautiously near Maastricht.
We have already seen that Isabella called the States General of the
southern Netherlands, allowing them to negotiate with the States General
of the northern Netherlands. In December 1632 the negotiations started
at The Hague; they lasted a year. But they were meaningless from the very
beginning. In December 1632 the military situation was fundamentally
different from the position during the summer months. At that time not
379
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
only Frederick Henry but also Gustavus Adolphus' army in Germany
had pressed the Spaniards hard. But Frederick Henry did not exploit his
victories and Gustavus Adolphus was killed in the Battle of Liitzen
(November 1632). The south Netherlands representatives finally did not
negotiate in The Hague as persons wanting to join the Dutch Republic or
to build up, with northern aid, a state independent of Spain, but as spokes-
men of the Spanish king. The possibility of north and south collaborating
on the basis of religious peace and with the aim of founding either one
united state or an independent state had not materialized. It is extremely
difficult to assess how real this possibility may have been. But so much is
certain: although the northern Netherlands had shown interest in this
co-operation, formidable obstacles soon became apparent. The religious
question weighed heavily with the Contra-Remonstrants in the north as
well as with the Roman Catholics in the south. In Holland, moreover, and
especially in Amsterdam, it was being realized that the freedom of the
southern Netherlands, whatever form it might take, would inevitably
entail the opening of the Scheldt. And was not the prosperity of Holland
dependent precisely on the Scheldt remaining closed?
After 1633 Dutch policy towards the southern Netherlands changed
once again. This is very clear from the treaty with France concluded,
after long negotiations in 1635. Originally this was an initiative of the
French, who saw Dutch war-weariness growing to alarming proportions.
But finally the States General took over the initiative and persuaded
Richelieu by means of a tempting project at last to abandon French
neutrality and to declare war on Spain. The project concerned the
southern Netherlands. In fact it was no longer expected that they would
liberate themselves. In the case of their being indeed incapable of rising
spontaneously France and the republic agreed jointly to conquer them.
France was promised the right to occupy the Walloon provinces and
Flanders (consequently Flemish-speaking areas including such towns as
Ghent and Bruges!) whereas the republic would acquire Brabant. From
the point of view of international power-politics this treaty meant a
success for the republic. Thanks to its ruthless attitude towards the
southern Netherlands it obtained precious French help in the war against
Spain. There was, however, one dangerous concession the Dutch had been
forced to make; they had agreed with France not to conclude peace other-
wise than 'jointly and by common consent'.
This alteration of Dutch policy concerning the southern Netherlands
did not imply a real turn of Dutch international policy in general. Also
after 1635 the Dutch took care lest their war with Spain should be
absorbed into the Thirty Years War—a characteristic proof of their refusal
to pursue power-politics in the grand style. And if the French had really
relied upon a rapid conquest of the southern Netherlands they must
have been greatly disappointed. The joint Franco-Dutch campaign of
380
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE LOW COUNTRIES
1635 started successfully but ended in disaster. The campaigns of the
following years did not produce any more important results. In 1637
Frederick Henry recaptured Breda, but Venlo and Roermond were lost.
An attack on Antwerp in 1638 failed. At sea the Dutch gained an impor-
tant victory in 1639 when the Dutch fleet under Tromp beat a strong
Spanish fleet in English home waters. But the land war brought no victory
during the early 1640s. Frederick Henry, prematurely ageing, was no
longer capable of vigorous enterprise. At the same time his dynastic
schemes and his loyalty to the Stuarts were undermining his position in
Holland where resistance to the whole tendency of his foreign policy was
stimulated by the fear which his semi-monarchical status and ambitions
inspired.
Gradually in Holland a well-defined peace party, strongly opposed to
the stadholder, came into being. Meanwhile the great peace congress at
Mtinster and Osnabriick, intended to terminate the Thirty Years War,
had opened in 1643. It took several years before the Dutch statesmen,
paralysed by their immensely complex system of government as well as by
their equally complicated internal conflicts, were able to determine their
own course of action. Only in January 1646 Dutch ambassadors left for
Westphalia, to find there a highly peculiar situation. For in fact only
one obstacle blocked the road to an immediate Spanish-Dutch peace: the
Franco-Dutch alliance. France was not prepared to make peace with
Spain and according to the treaty of 1635, renewed in 1644, the Dutch were
not allowed to act independently in this matter. Consequently there was
no need for the Spanish diplomatists to persuade the Dutch of the
necessity of at last concluding peace; their preoccupation was to make it
possible for their enemy to violate his agreement with France. In the
republic Holland was perfectly willing immediately to reach a final settle-
ment with Spain. Zeeland, however, which got more than any other pro-
vince out of the piracy practised by the West India Company, wanted to
continue the war. Frederick Henry himself, who notwithstanding all his
disappointments still hoped to conquer Antwerp and who knew that
peace would in no case be advantageous to him personally, supported the
war party until shortly before his death in 1647. Despite all this resistance
Holland had its way. On 30 January 1648 at last the Dutch Republic
made peace with Spain at Mixnster. This was clearly a violation of the
treaty with France, a violation, however, which from the Dutch point of
view was justifiable because the only alternative was carrying on the aim-
less war till the French would be good enough to terminate it.
The Peace of Miinster repeated and extended the settlement of 1609.
It meant a triumph for the republic, now recognized and feared as a
sovereign great power. The republic kept the slices of Flanders, Brabant
and Limburg which it had conquered but it did not acquire Upper
Gelderland. Spanish efforts to obtain religious liberty for these homo-
38i
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
geneously Roman Catholic territories failed. During the whole Ancien
Regime these regions were to be arbitrarily governed as conquered terri-
tory by the States General. The peace confirmed the humiliation of the
southern Netherlands. Brabant and Flanders lost valuable parts of their
territory. The Scheldt was kept closed. The northern provinces, quite
aware of their cynical egoism, continued their policy of crippling the
prosperity of the southern Netherlands. The north was not only the victor
in the war against Spain but also in the civil war which for so long had
raged in the Netherlands.
In March 1647 Frederick Henry died. In the 1630s his son William II,
born in 1626, had been secured the succession to all his offices. The three
years during which he indeed performed the traditional functions of the
princes of Orange form an extremely peculiar period in the history of the
republic. William II, a brilliant but badly educated and frivolous man,
tried to pursue his father's policies. However, they were rendered out of
date by recent events and it was reckless to resume them. Already in
November 1648 William II informed Mazarin—whose blunders were at
that time bringing about the Fronde—of his unwillingness to resign him-
self to the Peace of Minister. Apparently his purpose was to start a new
war against Spain on France's side and, having forced Philip IV to conclude
peace rapidly with Louis XIV, to intervene in conjunction with France in
the English Civil War on behalf of the Stuarts. Fundamentally such a
plan was perhaps not altogether fantastic in the extremely complicated
and adventurous international politics of those years. But there is little
doubt that William II was mistaken in his assessment of French politics
as well as of his own position in the republic. He seems to have thought that
French help would enable him to perpetrate a coup d'etat directed against
Holland and intended to force the recalcitrant province to come into
line. Yet even if this had met with complete success, it is difficult to see
how he could, in the end, have obliged Holland to finance his adventures.
His own position, moreover, would have come to depend on French help
with the result that Dutch policies would have had to obey French
orders. It is clear that William II's dynastic policies meant a most
dangerous and prejudicial overstraining of Dutch forces.
William II of course did not publicly propagate his ultimate aims. For
his more moderate policies, which seemed to go along the lines laid down
by Frederick Henry, he easily found supporters among the groups of
people traditionally hostile to the preponderance of the province of
Holland. The contrasts which had existed during the truce came once
again to the fore. Some Contra-Remonstrant ministers and those parts
of the population which listened to their word, the army, most of the
provinces and consequently the States General were prepared to support,
on behalf of union and religion, William II's fight against Holland with its
382
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE LOW COUNTRIES
latitudinarian regents and its concentration on the interests of commerce
and shipping. Holland's position was stronger however than that of
Oldenbarnevelt thirty years before, for Amsterdam which had already
resisted Frederick Henry now had the lead in the opposition to William II.
It is improbable that the so-called Orangist party would have been willing
to accept William II's wilder schemes. In fact it hardly was a party at all.
The only sentiment which kept the component groups of the party
together was aversion to the province of Holland. During the whole course
of the seventeenth century this aversion did at certain moments when
great decisions were to be taken unite large portions of the population,
but never was the Orangist party capable of putting forward a positive
social or political programme intended to break the power of the oli-
garchy, to improve the organization of government and to alter the direc-
tion of Dutch foreign policy. Although the prince of Orange could rely on
the unswerving loyalty of certain specific groups, the struggles which he
pursued remained his personal affair and the conflicts dividing the
republic did not develop into civil wars.
The conflict which broke out in 1649 is proof of this. It was brought
about by a discussion on the reduction of the army. In June 1648 the
States General reduced the size of the army from 55,000 to 32,000 men,
thus saving 3,000,000 guilders yearly. This was most welcome since the
republic was deeply in debt; Holland alone owed 140,000,000 guilders at
5%. But when Holland wanted in 1649 to reduce the army further the
prince of Orange and, thanks to his influence, the States General, refused.
Tension grew in 1650. After long but useless negotiations Holland cut the
knot and informed on 4 June 1650 a certain number of commanders of
companies paid out of Holland's contribution to the States General that
they could no longer expect to receive their pay. On 5 June William II
appeared before the States General and had himself ordered to prevent
disturbances by all means considered necessary by him. The authority
which he acquired in this way amounted in fact to dictatorial power and
is comparable to that bestowed on his uncle Maurice in 1618. From 8 to
27 June William II, accompanied by an impressive suite of noblemen and
army officers, made a journey to the various towns of Holland, but he
could not persuade the majority among them to obey his orders. By the
end of July he imprisoned six Holland regents, among them the father of
the later grand pensionary, John de Witt. On the same day he made his
troops march on Amsterdam but the town was warned in time and
closed its gates. On 3 August 1650 a compromise was reached. The troops
withdrew but Amsterdam dismissed some of its regents and promised not
to obstruct William II's policies in the States of Holland. The six prisoners
were set free. It is not quite clear why Amsterdam did not take further
action as it was becoming apparent that even the States General did not
approve of the prince's aggression. This unwillingness of the States
383
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
General to follow the prince any longer was explicitly expressed in their
refusal to support William II when he at last tried to bring about the
alteration of Dutch foreign policy for which he had for so long striven.
They left no doubt that notwithstanding Amsterdam's humiliation they
were not prepared—any more than the States of Holland—to declare war
on Spain and revolutionary England. But suddenly after an illness of ten
days, William II died of the smallpox (6 November 1650). Did he take
secret plans with him into his death? Were there still real possibilities for
his projects to be carried out? We know nothing about it. The only thing
we know is that for two decades to come his so-called party had no
power and but little influence. When in November 1650 the spectre of a
new war vanished the men who came into power hoped at last to enjoy
peacefully the achievements of half a century of hard efforts and tremen-
dous decisions.
384
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER XIII
SWEDEN AND THE BALTIC 1611-54
N the first half of the seventeenth century two states established themselves
for the first time as great powers. The one was the United Netherlands;
the other, Sweden. The period of their greatness was almost equal, and
for both it was brief; each expanded into an empire of sorts; and each,
perhaps, reached its zenith about the year 1660.
As far as Sweden was concerned, this rise to greatness was certainly
unexpected. At the opening of the century it would have seemed doubtful
whether the country could maintain its independence, and most improbable
that it should ever become the leading power in the north. With the
waning of the political ascendancy of the Hanse towns in the sixteenth
century, that position appeared likely to fall either to Denmark or to
Poland. There had, indeed, been a moment, in the 1560s and 1570s, when
it looked at least possible that Muscovy might emerge as a formidable
challenger: in the political convulsions which followed the collapse of the
Livonian state of the Order of the Knights of the Sword, Moscow for a
time won great successes, and the tsars came near to securing an extensive
coastline on the Baltic; but the anarchy of the Troublous Times postponed
for more than half a century any resumption of the plans of Ivan IV.
The major portion of the lands of the knights fell to Poland; while
Sweden maintained a precarious hold upon Reval and the northern
coastlands of Estonia. It was the first of Sweden's overseas possessions,
a nucleus around which other possessions would gather, and the need to
defend it led Sweden step by step to ever deeper commitments in the
politics of this region; but if it turned out to be in fact the springboard
for imperial expansion, this was a development probably unforeseen in
Stockholm, and certainly unlooked-for in Europe: in the years around
1605 it must have seemed much more likely that Estonia would soon be
reunited to Polish Livonia. There was, indeed, a further possibility: the
possibility that the rivalry for the control of these lands might be resolved
by the renewal of that personal union of Sweden with Poland which had
lasted from 1592 to 1599. It was always possible, and occasionally it
appeared probable, that Sigismund III might still recover his hereditary
kingdom of Sweden, and dislodge his usurping uncle, Charles IX. The
papacy, the Jesuits, and the Habsburgs all earnestly hoped so: a Sweden
re-converted to Catholicism, a Spanish base in Gothenburg (convenient
for attacks on Dutch shipping) were advantages worth some effort to
secure.
I
From the point of view of Sweden's traditional policies, however,
385
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Poland was a new, and almost an accidental, enemy. It is true that their
quarrel was not simply dynastic or religious, the mere consequence of
the disputes provoked by Sigismund'srule; for over Estonia neither side
could compromise. But the real danger to Sweden in the east was not
Polish, but Muscovite: Muscovy had for a century and a quarter impended
menacingly over Swedish Finland; and fear of Muscovy's expansion
to the west was deeply ingrained in the minds of Swedish rulers. And
apart from this defensive determination to press back the Muscovite,
Swedish kings had latterly developed an ambition to gather into Swedish
hands the trade between Muscovy and western Europe, and so to channel
it that Dutch or Hanse or English merchants must do their business at
Swedish-controlled entrepots, and thus enrich with their dues the meagre
revenues of the Swedish crown. Certainly no Swedish ruler could con-
template with equanimity the conquest or absorption of Muscovy into the
Polish-Lithuanian realm, and the consequent reinforcement of Russian
barbarism by Polish technical skill; nor could Charles IX stand idly by if
Sigismund seemed likely to possess himself of the back door to Finland.
When, therefore, Sigismund began to manoeuvre for the election of himself
or his son Ladislas as tsar, 1 Charles was dragged into the confusion of
the Troublous Times, and as a Russian partisan fared almost as ill as in
his open war against Sigismund in Livonia.
If Russia was the perennial enemy in the east, Denmark was the historic
foe in the west. In 1611 it was still less than a century since Gustavus
Vasa had broken the old Scandinavian union: Sweden's final emergence
as an independent state dates from 1523. The Danish monarchs of the
later sixteenth century were not prepared to accept that verdict as final.
When belligerently inclined, they were still prone to display in their
coat of arms the three crowns of Sweden; and in the context of the
times this implied a more precise political programme than (for instance)
the retention of the French lilies in the arms of England. The southern
provinces of the Scandinavian peninsula—Blekinge, Skane, Halland—
were still part of Denmark, separated from independent Sweden by a
frontier that took no account either of geography or of economics; and
the Danish kings had some justification for feeling that the dissolution
of the Scandinavian union was a political aberration from the natural
order of things. Certainly the two countries were more closely bound to
each other, even yet, than to any non-Scandinavian state. Similarity of
language and institutions, identity of religion, aristocracies ramifying
on either side of the border, a dim feeling of the separateness of 'The
North' from the rest of Europe—these things drew them together, even
while political interests divided them; so that their relationship oscillated
violently between feud and fellowship, alliance and war. They had their
own precisely formulated devices for settling their disputes by peaceful
1
See below, Chapter xix, Pt. 1.
386
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SWEDEN AND THE BALTIC l 6 l I - 5 4
means. They permitted freedom of trade between each others' subjects.
Already they upheld for each other—and denied to the rest of the world—
the jus classis immitendae, the right to maintain a fleet of war within the
Baltic sea. And, not least important, the kings of Denmark exempted
Swedish ships and goods from payment of dues on passage through the
Sound.
The Sound dues were among the most important financial assets of the
Danish crown. They were, indeed, properly the private revenues of the
king; but he used them to maintain a navy which at the beginning of the
seventeenth century was probably one of the best and most modern
in Europe. But they were more than this: they were the signs of political
pretensions which the navy existed to make good. The kings of Denmark
claimed a dominium marts Balthici, a vague sovereignty over the waters
of the Baltic; and in the Sound, at least, they were able to assert that
claim effectively. For both sides of the Sound were Danish territory;
and Christian IV could maintain that the Sound was no more than a
stream flowing through Danish lands: in no sense to be regarded as an
international waterway. In that claim the Hanse had perforce to acquiesce;
and though the English first, and the Dutch afterwards, found a way to
Russia's back door at Archangel, the great bulk of their trade to north-
east Europe must pass the Sound also. It was certainly an advantage
to Sweden, therefore, to be exempt from the Sound dues, even though her
mercantile marine was still negligible, and even though she possessed,
in Alvsborg, a west-coast port lying outside the Baltic altogether. But the
Danish claim to dominium maris could not be admitted in Stockholm;
and the strategic handicaps of Sweden's position with regard to Denmark
were such that it was unlikely that they would be suffered indefinitely.
Sea-communication between Sweden's east and west coasts was possible
only by Denmark's favour; Sweden's solitary window to the Atlantic,
at Alvsborg, was so hemmed in by Danish and Norwegian territory to
south and north that it could easily be blocked, and in wartime could
hardly be defended; Denmark's outlying islands—Bornholm, Gotland,
Osel—were strung out eastwards across the Baltic, cutting across the
main Swedish trade-routes to the Hanse towns.
It was these fundamental causes of disagreement which underlay the
recurrent crises in Swedish-Danish relations. In Charles IX's time they
assumed special forms: a Swedish insistence on excluding Danish ships from
Riga, which Charles was blockading; Swedish concessions to west-coast
merchants which Christian IV considered to be an infringement of his
sovereign rights; above all, a provocative forward policy in the Arctic,
designed by Charles to put him in possession of an Atlantic port near
the modern Narvik, with the hope of collecting toll from Dutch mariners
en route to Archangel. Christian IV, on his side, revived the controversy
over the Three Crowns, and skilfully used Swedish pinpricks to carry
387
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
a reluctant council with him into a declaration of war in 1611. His ob-
jective was not merely victory, but reconquest; and if he succeeded, he
might well make dominium maris Balthici a reality. It was not a prospect
which was much relished in Amsterdam.
Thus it happened that when Gustavus Adolphus succeeded Charles IX
in 1611, he inherited from his father three wars—against Denmark,
against Poland, and in Russia—and small prospect of success in any of
them. The dynastic quarrel with Sigismund III, indeed, was for the
moment languishing, at least on the Livonian front; but that was only
because the struggle had been transferred to Muscovy. There, Charles
had been aiding the boyars' tsar, Basil Shuiskij, against the attempts
of Ladislas to secure the crown—a political speculation which ended
disastrously when the Poles routed Basil and his Swedish allies at Klushino
in 1610. This catastrophe, which was followed by Basil's enforced abdi-
cation, had constrained Charles to consent to the candidature of his
younger son, Charles Philip, as the best remaining hope of countering
the menace of a Polish tsar. And for a moment, at the end of 1612 and
the beginning of 1613, there seemed a real chance that this move might be
successful: Charles Philip was adopted by Pozharskij and the Second
National Rising as their candidate; and if he had made a timeous appear-
ance he would probably have been elected. But the election of Michael
Romanov in February 1613, and the consequent elimination of both
Swedish and Polish candidates, was by no means the end of the affair,
either for Poland or for Sweden. Both Gustavus Adolphus and Sigismund
felt that the opportunity presented by Russia's weakness must not be let
slip: if they could not impose their candidates, they could at least use the
occasion for extorting territorial concessions. Sigismund coveted Smolensk
and much of White Russia; Gustavus Adolphus sought to safeguard
Sweden from a Muscovite irruption into the Baltic by acquiring territory
which would provide a firm land-bridge between Finland and Estonia,
would shut off Moscow from the sea, and would buttress Sweden's
position against future Polish attacks. And he may have hoped too, as
some of his predecessors had hoped, that territorial gains here would
put him in a stronger position to tap—perhaps to control—the trade
between Muscovy and the West. This hope, if it existed, proved chimeri-
cal : there were too many end-ports for merchants to choose from. But in
other respects both Sweden, and to a lesser extent Poland, were successful
in getting what they wanted. The Treaty of Stolbova, concluded between
Sweden and Russia in 1617, was justly regarded by Gustavus as a major
success: the tsar ceded Ingria and Kexholm; the second stone of Sweden's
Baltic empire was laid; Moscow was thrust back from the sea; and the
emergence of Russia as a Baltic power was deferred for nearly a hundred
years. Two years later, by the Truce of Deulino (1619) Sigismund gained
large strips of land on his eastern frontier, including Smolensk. Thereafter
388
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SWEDEN AND THE BALTIC 1 6 I I - 5 4
the perennial feud between Poland and Muscovy was for a time damped
down; but it was by no means extinguished. Obviously Sweden's interest
was to foment it; and obviously it must now be Sweden's policy to keep
on good terms with the tsar. The Peace of Stolbova was accordingly
followed by a period of nearly forty years of cordial relations between
Stockholm and Moscow; and when in 1632 the Russian attack on Poland
was renewed, it was launched with Sweden's connivance and goodwill.
Already, perhaps, it was beginning to be clear that Polish-Russian hostility
was one of the preconditions for Sweden's existence as a great power.
Meanwhile, Gustavus Adolphus had been defending himself with
difficulty against the assaults of Christian IV. The so-called War of
Kalmar (1611—13) went very badly for Sweden. The Danes captured
Kalmar; and what was worse, they captured Alvsborg, and so shut off
Sweden from direct access to the Atlantic. The Swedish navy proved
incompetent; the Swedish army, inadequate. Gustavus was forced in 1613
to accept the peace of Knared, which provided for Alvsborg's retention
by Denmark pending the payment of an indemnity so large that there
seemed little prospect of its being raised within the stipulated time. But
though Gustavus had thus been defeated and humiliated, in a longer
view the loser was Christian IV. For the peace left Sweden still inde-
pendent; and never again would Denmark find so favourable an oppor-
tunity to revive the Scandinavian union. The extent of Denmark's
military and naval success, moreover, alarmed mercantile interests in the
west: to the Dutch, in particular, Sweden began to appear as a necessary
counterweight to Danish arrogance. The Wendish towns of the Hanse
viewed the question in the same light. Christian IV had dynastic interests
and ambitions in north Germany, as well as in the Baltic; and for much
of his reign he made unnecessary difficulties for himself by his attempts
to obtain secularized bishoprics in the area for one or other of his sons.
It was a policy which brought him many enemies, and in the coming
struggle for Baltic supremacy it acted as an appreciable handicap. It was
felt by many Protestants, moreover, that Christian was not as much
concerned for the cause of religion as he ought to be: just at this time
he was showing a disquieting inclination to friendship with Spain. He and
Gustavus were the only Lutheran kings in Europe; and in a decade
when a religious war in Germany appeared imminent, it was natural that
German Lutherans should look to Denmark for possible aid and comfort.
But Christian seemed preoccupied with secular ambitions, and indisposed
to subordinate them to the interests of the evangelical cause. Gustavus
was at least more tactful and sympathetic. It was true that his father,
Charles IX, had in his day been suspected of Calvinist leanings; and the
Vasas had certainly close dynastic links with the Calvinist dynasties of
Hesse and the Palatinate. But it was perhaps an advantage thus to have
a foothold in each of the two Protestant camps; and it was certainly
389
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
an advantage even greater, that nobody could suspect Gustavus of
territorial ambitions in Germany. The combined effect of all these
considerations was that though Christian won the war against Sweden,
he lost the peace. Gustavus was able to conclude an alliance with the
Dutch in 1614; the war indemnity was paid off, and Alvsborg redeemed
(in 1619) by Dutch financial assistance; Gustavus scored what seemed at
the time to be a significant political success by his marriage with Maria
Eleonora of Brandenburg in 1620. His relations with leading German
Protestants were good; and when in 1617 the war with Poland—which
had latterly been put into cold storage by a succession of truces—revived
for a season, he had some success in persuading his friends that the
dynastic feud with Sigismund was but an aspect of the general struggle
of Protestants everywhere against the Counter-Reformation.
By 1620, when the first great disasters fell upon German Protestantism,
there could be no doubt that Sweden had made a remarkable recovery
from the desperate position in which she had found herself in 1611. The
events of the next few years made this very plain. Gustavus seized the
occasion of Poland's preoccupation with a Turkish invasion 1 to renew
the war in Livonia; and in 1621 he startled Europe, and alarmed Christian
IV, by his capture of the great trading city of Riga. It was, indeed, an
event of some importance. The Swedish possession of Estonia had not
been a matter of much concern to the mercantile world: Swedish attempts
to constrain the trade to Novgorod or Pskov to go by way of Narva or
Reval had never had much success; and even after the Treaty of Stolbova,
when the tsar's rival port of Ivangorod passed into Swedish hands, the
situation was not much altered. But Riga was one of the great cities of the
Baltic, and one-third of Poland's exports had passed through it. It was
also a great fortress; and its capture revealed a startling transformation
in Sweden's military efficiency, as compared with the lamentable weakness
of 1611-13. The event therefore made a considerable impression on
contemporaries; and that impression was reinforced by what followed.
In successive campaigns Gustavus overran much of Livonia; and in
January 1626 a remarkable victory at Wallhof seemed to make these
conquests sufficiently secure for him to risk transferring the main theatre
of war to Polish Prussia and the valley of the Vistula: he calculated that
the resulting disruption of Polish grain exports would force Sigismund
to accept terms upon which a lasting settlement could be based. Two
years earlier, in 1624, a sharp crisis in his relations with Christian IV had been
resolved by an agreement in which it was Denmark that made all the
concessions, and Sweden that took all the gains. This too was a significant
development. In 1624 Christian had not dared to risk a war: Sweden
was already too powerful, the Danish army and finances too weak.
Gustavus' victories in Livonia, remote and obscure as they were, an-
1
See below, Chapter xix, Pt. 1.
390
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SWEDEN AND THE BALTIC l 6 l I - 5 4
nounced the arrival of a new and considerable military power; and the
invasion of Prussia in 1626 gave ample opportunity to confirm this fact
at closer range.
In these altered circumstances, Sweden came to be regarded not merely
as a necessary counterpoise to Denmark in the Baltic, but as a real
alternative to Denmark in the calculations of Protestant strategy: Lud-
wig Camerarius, for instance, soon perceived that Gustavus, rather than
Christian IV, must be the sword of any effective Protestant league. It took
time and tribulation to convince other Protestant leaders of this: the
League of The Hague (1625) chose Christian rather than Gustavus to
lead it, merely because Christian offered help on easier conditions. But
by 1625 it was plain enough that to existing causes of friction between
Sweden and Denmark had now been added another—competition for
the position of director and commander of the evangelical coalition.
Christian, sore at the diplomatic reverse of 1624, embittered by the disa-
sters that followed his defeat at Lutter (1626), certainly viewed Gustavus'
successes in Prussia with a jealous eye; and only extreme need was likely
to persuade him to political collaboration with his rival. But in fact the
pressure of events forced him to swallow his pride. The whole of Jutland
was overrun by imperial troops. 1 The fall of Stralsund was imminent.
Sigismund Ill's creation of a fleet seemed to imply a real danger that
Poland might become the third naval power in the Baltic. There was no
doubt that Olivares and Ferdinand II had designs for the foundation of a
Habsburg navy in the Mecklenburg ports; and when Sigismund agreed
to transfer his squadron to Wismar, it appeared likely that the two
projects might coalesce. By 1628 the League of The Hague was politi-
cally bankrupt, ruined by the feebleness of England, the preoccupations
of the Dutch, the timidity of Brandenburg, and the necessary caution of
Richelieu. Faced with the threat of Wallenstein's violation of the jus
classis immitendae, the Scandinavian monarchies were constrained into a
brief alliance, whose main effect (and it was no small one) was to have
saved Stralsund. In that alliance there could be no doubt (however galling
it might be to Christian) that Sweden was the stronger partner. But there
could be no doubt either that Christian hoped to use the alliance in order
to extract tolerable peace terms from his victorious enemies. Wallenstein
was ready enough to oblige him: it was the emperor's interest to be
lenient, if thereby he could detach Denmark from Sweden. In 1629,
therefore, Christian made all haste to desert his ally, and accepted at
Lubeck terms of peace which were indeed astonishingly moderate. And
Denmark thereupon withdrew into a neutrality which to Swedish eyes
appeared increasingly malevolent; and by doing so left Sweden indisput-
ably the leading power in the north, and the only prospective deliverer of
German Protestantism.
1
See above, Chapter xi, pp. 325-6.
391
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
At the time of the peace of Lubeck, however, it was by no means
certain that Gustavus would be able or willing to stand forth as the
Protestant champion. His war with Poland still dragged on; and the
economic sanctions which its transference to the Vistula had been designed
to apply seemed to have no other effect than to produce strong irritation
in the Dutch. He could not interfere in Germany until a peace or a long
truce gave him security on the side of Poland. He considered his war with
Sigismund as essentially defensive; and if as it progressed it brought
ever-greater stretches of Baltic coastline into his hands, they were occupied
as a means of constraining the enemy to peace, and in order to deny the
use of their ports to the infant Polish fleet, lest they become the bases for
an invasion of Sweden. In return for a renunciation of Sigismund's claims
upon the Swedish throne, and a firm peace, Gustavus would have been
willing to retrocede almost all his conquests: certainly he had not hither-
to proceeded with any plan in mind for the creation of a Baltic empire,
or the systematic control of all the rivers emptying themselves into that
sea. In so far as he was barring the way to a re-catholicization of Sweden—
which, it was arguable, would necessarily follow Sigismund's restora-
tion—he could represent his war to be an aspect of the general European
struggle; but in truth it was a national struggle too. Yet intervention in
Germany, if it came, would represent a new direction for Swedish policy,
which had concerned itself very little with German politics in the past.
It might well engage the country's efforts for objects far removed from the
narrow world of Baltic affairs; and to some Swedes it seemed that if such
a venture were undertaken Sweden's own interests might be postponed
to others that were foreign to her, or prejudiced for the sake of that
vague notion 'the Protestant cause'—while the old enemy Denmark
(whose burnt fingers might well serve as a warning) waited for a Swedish
disaster, or Swedish exhaustion, to resume her former supremacy in the
north.
Gustavus Adolphus thought otherwise. He convinced himself (and
skilful propaganda convinced his people) that an imperialist occupation
of Mecklenburg and Pomerania would imply direct danger to Sweden,
since the combined Polish and imperial fleets, if left undisturbed, might
one day be powerful enough to ferry over a legitimist invasion. Thus
the Protestant cause became Sweden's cause too; and the north German
coastland became a Swedish interest: 'better prevent than be prevented'.
And at this point, in September 1629, the diplomacy of Richelieu (who al-
ready cherished the illusion that he could make Gustavus his tool) succeeded
in arranging a truce between Sweden and Poland at Altmark. Its effect
was to transfer to Swedish control, for the next six years, a number of
places of great commercial importance: among others, Memel, Pillau
and Elbing; and to secure to Sweden the right to levy tolls at these places
for so long as the truce should last. As a result of this provision, between
392
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SWEDEN AND THE BALTIC 1 6 1 I - 5 4
1629 and 1635 every port of any consequence on the southern shore of the
Baltic, from the Neva to the Pregel, was in Swedish hands. Danzig,
indeed, had resisted Gustavus' attacks, and was obstinately loyal to
Poland; but a treaty supplementary to that of Altmark ensured to
Sweden a share of the tolls levied at Danzig also. It might be supposed,
on the face of it, that these arrangements represent one further step in the
king's plans for the creation of a Baltic empire, a new stage in a long-term
scheme of expansion. But in fact they were nothing of the sort. They
were the accidental result of a compromise proposed by George William of
Brandenburg, in a desperate effort to save the negotiations from deadlock.
The conclusion of the truce liberated Gustavus from an imbroglio which
had become of secondary importance. At the moment when Christian IV
turned his back on Germany in despair, Gustavus was free to address
himself to the great question of the hour, free to pursue the victorious
career in Germany which ended at Liitzen. But, once again, there lay no
far-reaching political project behind the intervention in Germany:
the acquisition of extensive tracts of territory there was no part of the
king's original scheme, still less any involvement in German domestic
politics. Stralsund (which already had a Swedish garrison) he intended
to retain as a defensive outpost, until the emergency should be at an end;
and since Wismar was the base of the nascent imperial navy, it might be
politic to secure that too. But his real aim was security from invasion;
and if the pursuit of that aim led him far from Sweden's frontiers, that
was no part of the plan with which he embarked: his object rather was
so to animate the German Protestants that they should be able in future
to take care of themselves. The expansion of the Swedish Empire, in
Germany as in the Baltic, was in the beginning unplanned, and in a sense
it was as much the result of accident as of design.
Nevertheless, whether planned or no, the Swedish Empire became a
reality before the Thirty Years War was over, and it may well be asked
how Sweden was able to acquire it, and subsequently to maintain it.
In comparison with Denmark, for instance, Sweden was sparsely populated,
backward, and poor: the court and capital of Gustavus Adolphus com-
pared unfavourably, in point of wealth, luxury and taste, with the court
and capital of Christian IV; and the Danish aristocracy lived more
fashionably, and probably more expensively, than their Swedish cousins.
The revenues of Gustavus Adolphus were modest, by English standards;
and though they might have sufficed in peacetime to meet the running
costs of a highly personal monarchy and a still-rudimentary civil admini-
stration, they were obviously unequal to the financing of massive military
operations sustained over many years beyond the seas. The fiscal system
was in any case unsuited to provide resources on this scale, since a great
part of the royal revenues was still paid in kind; and though some of it
could be allotted to crown servants by way of wages, and some could
14
393
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
MHFDECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
be eaten by a voracious and peripatetic court, it was not convenient for
the payment of armies operating abroad. Sweden had, indeed, rich mineral
resources; but hitherto her rulers had lacked the requisite capital for their
proper exploitation.
The reign of Gustavus Adolphus brought important changes in these
matters. In an effort to convert revenues in kind into cash, the king began
to sell or pawn the royal domains, or the income that came from them.
New direct and indirect taxes were levied, payable in coin; and some of
them were paid by the nobility, despite their privilege of exemption from all
ordinary taxation. A more important measure was the systematic attempt
to induce foreign capitalists to come to Sweden, and to invest in Swedish
mining and industry. The attempt was remarkably successful: Gustavus
succeeded in attracting, in the person of Louis de Geer, one of the ablest
of Dutch entrepreneurs; and de Geer was only the most famous of many
financiers and armourers who came from the Netherlands or Germany,
followed or accompanied by trained workmen or specialist technicians.
They came the more readily, because the opportunities were really great:
cheap fuel, low labour costs, and abundant waterpower—to say nothing
of lavish privileges dangled by Gustavus as bait—gave the promise of
competitive prices; and the deposits of ore were exceptionally rich and
extensive. The Flemish immigrants, though their numbers were counted
in hundreds only, did much to transform Swedish industry. They brought
new manufacturing processes to old industries, and new subsidiary
industries (brass-founding and large-scale arms-manufacture, for instance)
in association with the old. It was in the iron and armaments industries,
perhaps, that their influence was most marked; and by 1630 this latter
had so far developed that Sweden was virtually self-supporting, and had
even begun the export of cannon. In regard to copper, their contribution
was rather to the technique of marketing and mining: the great copper
mine at Falun remained in the hands of the small miners, and did not
pass into those of the new capitalists. Nevertheless, until the middle of
the century, copper was even more important to the Swedish finances
than iron. The accident of war had produced a situation in which the
main European competitors in the production of copper were either put
out of action by hostilities, or cut off from their main markets. Until
the mid-twenties (when Spain abruptly ceased to mint vellon coins) it
was a sellers' market for copper, and the price rose sharply; and though
it fell thereafter, Sweden for many years had a virtual monopoly of supply
save for a distant threat from Japan. Every effort was made (not always
wisely or successfully) to exploit this situation to the utmost. The income
from copper, and the booming arms industry, gave Sweden two assets which
were denied to Christian IV; for Denmark was a wholly agricultural
country, and the foreign market for her products underwent no such
favourable conjuncture as was the case for Swedish copper.
394
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SWEDEN AND THE BALTIC I 6 1 I - 5 4
Christian had, indeed, the revenue from the Sound dues; but by 1630
it seemed likely that Sweden might draw not much less from tolls of her
own. During the closing years of the war in Prussia, the Swedish navy
had begun to enforce the collection of high duties at the ports of the south-
ern Baltic which were under Gustavus' control. It was one of the most
important provisions of the truce of Altmark that their collection at the
Prussian ports was sanctioned for the duration of the truce; while separate
treaties with Brandenburg, Kurland and Danzig not only gave Sweden
a share in the tolls which they levied, but also ensured that they should
not undercut Swedish-controlled ports by conceding lower rates. As
Gustavus' armies conquered the coasts of Pomerania and Mecklenburg,
in 1630 and 1631, the same system of 'licences' (the term was borrowed,
by false analogy, from the Dutch, in the vain hope of parrying Dutch
objections) was applied there; so that by the time Gustavus fell at Liitzen
there was scarcely a port, from Wismar to Ivangorod, from which the
Swedish crown did not derive what was in normal years a very large
revenue. 1
The 'licences', indeed, were not less important to Swedish finances
than the state monopoly of the sale of copper. And to these two sources of
income was soon added a third, in the form of French subsidies, the
payment of which (at the rate of 400,000 riksdaler a year) was one of the
terms of the Franco-Swedish treaty concluded at Barwalde, in January
1631. After Gustavus' death, and especially after 1638, the subsidies
became of prime importance; but in Gustavus' time, though they were
undeniably useful, they were of minor consequence only, without much
effect on policy or strategy. The difference is to be explained by the fact
that Swedish war finances balanced or failed to balance according to the
ability or inability of the Swedish armies to live on the country. While
Gustavus was alive, his extraordinary military successes made this
comparatively easy: vast areas of Germany were in the occupation either
of Sweden or of her allies; much of the country was still unravaged;
and it was perfectly reasonable to think in terms of maintaining armies
of 150,000 men. Ten years after Liitzen, the position was radically
altered. Germany had been plundered and devastated from end to end;
the area under Swedish control had at times shrunk to the merest wisp
of Pomeranian coastland; an army of 15,000 or 20,000 men was as much
as a prudent commander would expect to be able to feed—and that only
if they were not kept together in one place for any length of time. In these
circumstances, the French subsidies might make all the difference between
a spirited offensive and open mutiny. But from about 1632 one financial
1
One other source of supply may have had a temporary importance, especially in 1630.
This derived from the permission given by the Russian government to buy grain at very
advantageous prices (free of the internal duty levied on other foreign merchants). For a
time, at least, this concession may have enabled Sweden to sell grain on the Amsterdam
market at a considerable profit.
395
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
14-2DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
principle was accepted by all Swedish statesmen and generals as axio-
matic: whoever paid for the German war, it must not be Sweden. The
heaviest burden of war expenditure, therefore, fell upon the Swedish
taxpayer before, and not after, Breitenfeld. The finances of the German
armies were kept quite distinct from the domestic finances; and though
the Swedish exchequer defrayed the cost of the navy, and of the home
garrisons, the German armies must finance themselves elsewhere—from
well-timed sales of copper in Amsterdam, from tolls extorted from the
outraged Dutch, from loans in Hamburg on the personal security of
Swedish agents, or against the next instalment of Richelieu's subsidies,
or, finally, from heavy ransoms levied on captured cities or occupied
enemy lands. The remarkable measure of success with which this principle
was applied does much to explain how the cost of the creation of the
Swedish Empire was sustained.
It is obvious, however, that wars are not won with money only, nor
empires acquired by contriving a corner in copper. Sweden's rise to
greatness came as the consequence of military successes, and those suc-
cesses were themselves the consequence of a sound system of military
organization and administration, better tactics than the enemy, and the
accident that in two generations Sweden produced an unprecedented
constellation of great generals. Gustavus Adolphus himself was included
by Napoleon in his brief list of the great commanders, and few will be
found to dispute that verdict; but Baner and Torstensson, in their several
ways, were not by much his inferiors, and each had achievements to his
credit of a type that Gustavus did not attempt. And after them came
Charles X, who was certainly no ordinary commander. But the victories
they won were not merely the product of their genius: they were based on
reforms which together had made the Swedish armies for a time the best
in Europe. These reforms were essentially the work of Gustavus Adolphus,
and most of them were carried through in the years between 1617 and
1630. They based the Swedish army on a properly organized system of
conscription, each regiment being assigned to a particular province; they
assimilated the administrative to the tactical unit; and they thoroughly
trained the forces in a drill designed for the battle-field rather than for the
parade-ground. Gustavus adopted many of the tactical principles of
Maurice of Orange: his armies, for instance, fought in line, rather than
in the deep formations of the Spanish tercios. But he designed his forma-
tions, as Maurice had not done, for offensive purposes, and gave them the
necessary power to attack with success. He rehabilitated the pike (for the
last time) as an offensive weapon. He exploited the salvo to give increased
concentrations of fire. He armed his infantry with light two-pounder
guns which could be freely moved in battle to give support to pikemen
and musketeers. Under the influence of the Polish examples which he
had observed in the Livonian wars he restored the cavalry to its true
396
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SWEDEN AND THE BALTIC l 6 l l ~ 5 4
function, forgotten in most western armies, of breaking the enemy by
impact, rather than firing ineffectively at him with short-range pistols.
In both infantry and cavalry he contrived that the shock of intense fire
should pave the way for, and alternate with, the shock of mass-impact.
His field artillery was of unprecedented mobility; and retained its super-
iority in this respect until its achievements culminated in Torstensson's
great victory at Jankow in 1645. Gustavus proved, in fact, what con-
temporaries had refused to credit, that a native conscript army could be
trained to be better than an army of hired professionals. The vast demands
of the German war made it necessary to supplement the purely Swedish
and Finnish troops by large levies of German and Scottish mercenaries:
before Gustavus fell the mercenary regiments were already in a majority,
and by the end of the war the Swedish field-armies were usually over-
whelmingly non-Swedish in origin, for it was felt prudent to husband
native resources, and politic to put them to garrison key fortresses which
they could be relied upon to defend to the last. But the mercenaries
learned the Swedish methods under Swedish commanders soon enough.
And indeed, Sweden's enemies were not long in attempting to imitate
them too.
These were important factors in the Swedish successes; yet it is per-
missible to think that Sweden's greatness might have been more difficult
to achieve without some other assets of a less material kind. One such
asset was certainly religious uniformity. Despite occasional lapses to
Catholicism by scholars and clerics who had assimilated dangerous ideas
at foreign universities (and whose conversion was sometimes associated
with political activities as Sigismund's agents), despite too a grudging
tolerance accorded to the handful of immigrant Calvinist workmen and
entrepreneurs, Sweden was a solidly Lutheran country; and, as in Spain,
a monolithic religious structure gave strength in an age of religious
strife. A foreign policy in which obvious national interest went hand in
hand with championship of the Protestant cause was therefore under-
stood and approved by the nation at large; and despite the heavy sacri-
fices of manpower, it was on the whole accepted as inevitable and right,
at least so long as the great king was alive. Gustavus could appeal to
the Diet for moral support, for endorsement of his policies, or for sup-
plies of men and money, in the justified confidence that they shared his
outlook, and were ready to shoulder burdens in order to carry his policy
into effect, since in general it was their policy too. It happened, moreover,
that the severe internal tension which had marked the reign of Charles IX
had since 1611 been greatly relaxed as a result of the joint efforts of
Gustavus and his chancellor, Axel Oxenstierna. The constitutional
struggle between king and aristocracy, which had been raging with varying
degrees of intensity for the previous half-century, was in Gustavus' time
followed by a period of harmony and mutual trust; while the social
397
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
struggle which was to reach a crisis in 1650 and again in 1680 was still in
the background. One result of this state of affairs was that the nobility
under the stress of war proved ready to forgo its privileges and tax-
exemptions to an extent which would hardly have been tolerated by the
aristocracy of Denmark. There were, indeed, periodical riots and distur-
bances, arising from local abuses or local distress; but on the whole
it may be said that the Sweden which intervened in Germany was a nation
of remarkable unity of temper and purpose; and the absence of any
major crisis at home, in the last decade of Gustavus' reign, was certainly
a factor which contributed to the success of Swedish arms.
The victories of Gustavus transformed Sweden within the space of two
years from the leading power in the Baltic into one of the two or three
leading powers in Europe. As long as Gustavus lived it was he, not Riche-
lieu, that was the dominant partner in the alliance with France. Swedish
diplomacy suddenly extended its scope, to match the new position which
the king was winning: intrigues with the Tatar khan or with the Greek
patriarch, negotiations with George Rakoczy of Transylvania, liaison
with the revolted Protestants of the Habsburg hereditary lands. Swedish
armies roughly jostled their French allies for control of strongpoints in
Alsace; Swedish recruiting agents tried in vain to compromise the neut-
rality of the Swiss; and the Roman Catholic world feared for a moment
that the new Goths might emulate their forefathers and strike south-
wards across the Alps for Rome itself. At the head of a coalition of
German Protestant princes, Gustavus and his armies effectively occupied
half Germany. His war-aims expanded with success: from an assecuratio 1
at first conceived as a territorial outpost on the Pomeranian shore, into a
Germanic league (with himself as caput) which should provide a political
security of a semi-permanent character. And just as in the course of time
assecuratio changed its nature, so satisfactio 2 developed from a simple
claim to an indemnity for the expenses of a rescue-expedition into the
demand for a cession of territory as a reward for services rendered.
Military success, in fact, tempted an appetite which had not hitherto
been particularly sharp: by the time of Lutzen Gustavus had accustomed
himself to the idea of Sweden as a German power. His servants and
allies canvassed the possibility of his election as emperor; while he
himself was thinking of modifications in the constitution of the Reich.
In the last year of his life he was putting forward plans for a joint Russo-
Swedish campaign against Poland, of which the objective was to be the
partition of that country, and the incorporation of the Ukraine into
Russia. The imperialist age of Swedish history had come with a rush;
and soon Axel Oxenstierna would be debating the expediency of pro-
viding the new Swedish Empire with a second capital—a northern
Byzantium—at Narva; while Salvius would urge the transference of
1
See above, Chapter xi.
• Ibid.
398
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SWEDEN AND THE BALTIC 1 6 1 I - 5 4
the Swedish foreign office to Hamburg. Nor would it seem inappropriate
that the chancellor of so great a monarchy should aspire to the electorate
of Mainz, as a dignity commensurate with the political power and per-
sonal prestige which he commanded.
This great enlargement of the horizons of Swedish policy had obvious
effects upon the balance of forces within the Baltic. The German venture,
after all, had implied only the postponement of a final settlement of the
long controversies with Denmark and Poland. There was more than one
moment, even in the last two years of the king's life, when the danger of a
stab in the back from Denmark seemed so imminent that he seriously
debated the expediency of a preventive war. When Sigismund III died in
1632, Gustavus sought to confuse Polish politics, and make trouble for
the Polish Vasas, by putting himself forward as a candidate for the
vacant throne; and when the news of Liitzen reached Warsaw, Ladislas
IV did not allow his genuine admiration for the dead king to prevent him
from asserting his hereditary claim to the crown of Sweden. Against each
of these dangers—from Poland or from Denmark—the victories in Ger-
many gave increased security. The occupation of the ports of Pomerania
and Mecklenburg put Sweden in a strong position in the rear of Denmark
and on the flank of Poland; while Swedish armies and Swedish allies in the
Lower Saxon Circle did much to neutralize Christian's attempts to meddle
in north Germany. The occupation of Pomerania, it is true, brought
difficulties; for George William of Brandenburg had strong claims to the
succession to Pomerania when the reigning duke, Bogislav XIV, should
die. Relations between Gustavus and his brother-in-law in Berlin had
been strained since 1626, when Sweden had violated the neutrality of
George William's duchy of Prussia; and the king's expressed intention
of retaining Pomerania for himself made them worse: the hostility of
Brandenburg was to prove one of the most fateful legacies bequeathed by
Gustavus to his successors. Yet in 1632, and for some years afterwards,
it seemed that the problem might be resolved by a marriage between
Queen Christina and the electoral prince. Such a marriage opened up
the prospect of a great new northern state, straddling the Baltic, over-
topping all possible competitors in that sea, able to assert—in Saxony's
despite—a permanent leadership of German Protestantism, and (who
could tell ?) even to aspire to the imperial crown itself.
To Axel Oxenstierna, as he took up Gustavus' task in the years after
Lutzen, Swedish power in Germany seemed in fact to be the basis for
Swedish domination in the Baltic. Already, within a year or two of
Gustavus' death, there were those in the council in Stockholm—and even
among the regents—who began to be uneasy at the implications of imperial
expansion: 'the branches spread outwards, but the tree dies at the heart'.
Oxenstierna had no such qualms. He frankly accepted his country's
imperial destiny; he had no idea of curtailing Swedish pretensions in
399
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Germany unless he were forced to do so; and he hoped to exploit the
position which his master's victories had won to settle in Sweden's
favour the outstanding quarrels with her Baltic neighbours. Gustavus'
plan for a Protestant union under Swedish leadership took shape in 1633
as the League of Heilbronn; there was no bating of Sweden's demands
for assecuratio and satisfactio; and though Gustavus' death made a re-
newal of the French alliance necessary, Oxenstierna at first showed few
signs of softening the intransigent attitude which the king had always
adopted towards France.
The disasters of the years 1634 and 1635, however, made it very difficult
to stick to this programme. 1 The catastrophe at Nordlingen (27 August
1634) put an end to the hope of carrying out Gustavus' grand strategic
plan of ending the war quickly by an encircling attack upon the heart
of Habsburg power; and by forcing the League of Heilbronn to run for
shelter to France it made nonsense of the idea of a Swedish-controlled
evangelical union as a standing assecuratio. The terms upon which Riche-
lieu now offered alliance were such that Oxenstierna would not accept
them; indeed, relations with France grew so strained that Richelieu
seriously considered ordering the seizure of Oxenstierna's person. The
union with France was broken; and the subsidies stopped. South Ger-
many seemed for ever lost as a quartering-area for Swedish armies; the
north German Protestant princes—whom Oxenstierna had never managed
to cajole into a meek acceptance of his leadership—were moving fast
towards peace with the emperor. In 1635 they made it, at Prague; and
one after another Sweden's former allies and clients accepted the Prague
terms. Some, like John George of Saxony, or George William of Branden-
burg a little later, became open enemies. Henceforward Sweden's position
in Germany rested on no basis of kindness of feeling or community of
ideals; it rested on naked force. And force now seemed wanting. The
Swedish armies found themselves engaged in a desperate attempt to
hang on to the Pomeranian coastlands, fighting against numerical odds
in supply-areas which, as they grew narrower and narrower, were less
and less able to provide the troops with the contributions which they
required. The old enemy Denmark was offering a mediation which
Oxenstierna was rightly chary of accepting. In 1635 Swedish fortunes in
Germany sank to their lowest ebb. Oxenstierna was driven to a vain
effort to buy off Brandenburg's hostility by offers to hand over Pomerania
when the war was over; he was for a time almost a prisoner of his own
mutinous troops in Magdeburg; he was even reduced to making a humilia-
ting appeal to the emperor to open direct negotiations for peace—an
appeal which Ferdinand contemptuously ignored. The peace-party at
home became vocal; and Oxenstierna had to endure sharp censures
from his co-regents in Stockholm. And at this juncture, when the position
1
See above, Chapter xi.
400
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SWEDEN A N D THE BALTIC
161I-54
in Germany was at its worst, the Truce of Altmark ran out, and Sweden
faced a renewal of the war with Poland. Something not far short of
panic in the home government, a disastrous indiscretion which allowed
their minimum terms to leak out, and the bungling of the Swedish
negotiators, enabled French mediation to patch up an arrangement with
Poland at Stuhmsdorf in 1635. The truce was indeed extended for a
further twenty-six years; but Sweden paid a heavy price for the respite:
evacuation of her holdings in Prussia and, worst of all, an end to the
Swedish 'licences' at the Prussian ports. The news came near to breaking
Oxenstierna's courage. At the moment when the armies in Germany were
least able to make war support war, when the resources of French sub-
sidies were no longer available, a great part of the income from tolls was
cut off: in 1634 the 'licences' had yielded some 800,000 rdr. (or double the
amount of French subsidies); in 1637 the figure had fallen to 250,000 rdr.
The crisis was surmounted. The Truce of Stuhmsdorf made possible the
transfer of 10,000 troops from Prussia to Germany, and so enabled Baner
to take the offensive against the Saxons; and his classic victory at Wittstock
in 1636 did much to restore the prestige of Swedish arms. Poland and
Brandenburg did not (as they might have done) destroy the whole structure
of the Swedish toll-system by lowering the rates at their own ports:
necessity or greed prevailed over policy. Oxenstiema, returning to Sweden
in the summer of 1636, took the government into his strong and capable
hands and infused fresh spirit into a regency which had latterly been
inclined to be defeatist. It was clear to him that without the financial
support of France the war could not long be carried on; but it was
equally clear that he must not bind himself to France if by his diplomacy
and Baner's victories he could get out of Germany on reasonable terms.
The revival of Sweden's fortunes in the year of Wittstock made this at
least a possibility: it needed Baner's celebrated (but disastrous) retreat
from Torgau in 1637 to persuade Oxenstiema that the French alliance
was not to be evaded. It was concluded, at Hamburg, in February 1638;
the subsidies began to flow again; and in 1639 their effect was duly seen
when Baner was victorious at Chemnitz. In June 1641 the treaty of Ham-
burg was renewed, this time for the duration of the war, and the amount
of annual subsidy raised to 480,000 rdr.—a figure about equal to one-
third of Sweden's domestic revenue. The renewal did not come a moment
too soon. Baner's death in March had been followed by a crisis of
discipline which very nearly led to the complete disintegration of the
Swedish forces in Germany; for the mercenary colonels demanded a
settlement of the arrears due to them, and the government in Stockholm,
uncertain of the outcome of the negotiations with France, had been
forced to raise money by the sale of crown lands. The resumed influx of
French money made it possible for this emergency, too, to be surmounted;
it paved the way for Torstensson's victory at Breitenfeld in October 1642;
401
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
and that victory in turn produced 150,000 rdr. for the war-chest, paid
by the city of Leipzig to buy off a Swedish attack. Once Richelieu's sub-
sidies had primed the pump, the financial machinery of war began to
operate with something of its old automatic ease: Torstensson and Wrangel
were able to move into the Habsburg hereditary lands, and stay there for
long periods; and henceforward until the end of the war they could
claim, with more truth than at any time since Nordlingen, that bellum se
ipsum alit.
The crisis of the thirties had not gone unobserved by Christian IV. He
had neither the resources, nor perhaps the wish, for overt hostilities with
his neighbour, but he was very ready to add to Sweden's embarrass-
ments. His proffers of mediation in Germany were intended to do that;
and also to recover for himself, if possible, some of the political influence
which he had forfeited in 1629. Towards the end of the thirties and in the
early forties he was engaged in obscure intrigues with England and
Spain, with Brandenburg and Poland and Russia, out of which he
hoped that an anti-Swedish coalition might be born. One result of these
manoeuvres was that the great fleet which Spain sent to the Channel in
1639 had, as its secondary objective, an attack on Gothenburg; and it
might have gone on to make the attempt, if the Dutch had not destroyed
it in the Downs. The Swedish regency considered that the aid and comfort
given by Christian to Gustavus Adolphus' widow, when she made a
hurried and clandestine departure from Sweden in 1640, was a provo-
cation; and when Christian began once again to collect tolls off Ruden
(as he had earlier done, in 1630 and 1631) that was felt to be a provocation
too. There was no doubt, either, that Christian had played some part in
exacerbating the crisis which convulsed the Swedish army after Baner's
death, by offers to take discontented colonels into his service. Oxenstierna
expressed a general feeling when he said in 1639 that Christian had
'repeatedly chucked us under the chin to see if our teeth are firm in our
heads.' The Danish maritime pretensions were not abated; and in the
Sound itself Christian was exercising his admitted rights in a fashion which
was felt to be oppressive and capricious.
In the years between 1629 and 1639 the Sound dues were varied eight
times: and their general tendency was to grow heavier. This drew upon
Denmark the ill-will of the Dutch, who contended (probably incorrectly)
that as far as they were concerned the level of the Sound dues had been
for ever fixed by the treaty of Speyer in 1544. They were by very much the
largest users of the Sound; and many of their skippers met Christian's
exactions by sailing under Swedish colours, since Swedish ships and goods
were exempt from toll. Christian tried by more stringent visitations to
check this fraud, and inevitably there were 'incidents' with genuine
Swedish ships and cargoes. Moreover, the emergence of Sweden's Baltic
empire posed an important problem of interpretation: were ships and
402
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SWEDEN AND THE BALTIC 1 6 H - 5 4
goods from Swedish-occupied ports on the continent—from Wismar,
Stralsund, Stettin, Pillau, Riga—to be entitled to exemption from the
toll? It is not surprising that Christian IV should have felt that the ex-
tension of Sweden's territory could not be permitted to carry this con-
sequence, nor that Sweden should have felt the imposition of toll on ships
from these ports to be vexatious. Ten years earlier, the Dutch had directed
their protests mainly against the Swedish 'licences'; by the beginning of
the 1640s, when the Prussian tolls were no longer in Swedish hands,
and when the whole mercantile community was suffering from Danish
exactions, they were drawn by common grievances to Sweden's side.
In 1640 they concluded with Sweden an alliance for the maintenance
of freedom of trade in the Baltic, which in effect was an alliance with a
point against Denmark.
It was under cover of this alliance, and with the tacit goodwill of the
Dutch, that Oxenstierna sent Torstensson to attack Jutland, without a
declaration of war, at the close of 1643. The surprise was complete, the
initial successes great; and though the later course of the war did not quite
fulfil the promise of the beginning, Sweden was able to impose very hard
terms of peace at Bromsebro in 1645. Christian IV was forced to cede the
Norwegian provinces of Jamtland and Harjedalen (both of which lay
on the Swedish side of the mountains, and geographically and ecclesiasti-
cally could be considered part of Sweden), together with the islands of
Gotland and Osel; while the secularized bishoprics of Bremen and Verden,
which had been the property of Christian's second son, Frederick
(afterwards Frederick III), were left in Swedish occupation. Exemption
from the Sound dues was henceforward to be accorded to Swedish ships
from all ports in Swedish possession. And, most important of all, as
a guarantee of this exemption Denmark was to hand over Halland for
thirty years, with the stipulation that Sweden should be entitled to terri-
torial compensation upon its retrocession. This was a mere form of words
devised to soften the blow to Christian's pride; for everybody knew that
the cession was intended to be permanent. It represented a portentous
alteration in the political geography of the Baltic. The transference of
Halland to Sweden meant that the Sound was no longer controlled by a
single power, since the two sides of the narrows were now in different
hands. It destroyed for ever the Danish theory that passage through
the Sound was a transitus through Danish dominions. And in another
aspect it marked the first step towards that expansion of Sweden
to her natural frontiers which was to be the permanent achievement of
Charles X.
The Danish war showed very plainly that the rulers of Sweden had now
passed the stage at which an empire is acquired by accident, or by force of
circumstance. The aggression against Denmark was deliberately planned—
it had been predicted as early as 1640 by the Danish ambassador in Stock-
403
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
holm—and it was popular with the nation, as the German war no longer
was. In the intoxication of early success there were some who talked of
annexing the whole of Denmark. For such men Bromsebro was a disap-
pointment: the work was half-done; and some day Skane and Blekinge
must be Swedish too. Yet even this result, unsatisfactory as it might
appear to the Swedes, could hardly have been achieved without Dutch
aid. The Dutch had at first been officially neutral, and for a time even
acted as mediators; until in the last stage of the peace negotiations they
had thrown off the mask and applied unscrupulous pressure to Denmark
to extort concessions for themselves. Dutch merchantmen had passed
through the Sound without paying toll; a Dutch fleet had cruised in
Danish waters to protect them; and Dutch warships and a Dutch admiral,
chartered for the Swedish service by Louis de Geer, had given Sweden the
crushing naval superiority which really decided the issue. The Swedish
Empire was by nature a maritime empire: without command of the sea
it could hardly hope permanently to maintain itself. Oxenstierna fully
appreciated this. The blow to Danish naval power inflicted by the anni-
hilating victory of Femern in 1645 gave Sweden a temporary naval
superiority so great that the government could afford in 1647 to sell
warships to France, or dispose of them in settlement of the claims of its
creditors. But Charles XI's war 1 would show that only constant naval
ascendancy could guarantee Sweden against a Danish revanche; and on
the whole it may be doubted whether the Swedish fleet was ever con-
sistently powerful enough to make the Swedish Empire really secure.
Naval strength was the more necessary, because by 1645 the mercantile
marine was beginning a period of fairly rapid expansion. Hitherto
Swedish ships had played only an insignificant part in Swedish com-
merce: the main carriers, as everywhere in the Baltic, had been the Dutch.
But already in 1645 the Swedish government had introduced a system of
graduated duties designed to encourage the use of Swedish bottoms and
to stimulate the enterprise of Swedish shippers; and it was significant
that the peace of Bromsebro contained a clause abrogating the old
freedom of trade between Sweden and Denmark: Sweden wished now to
be able to discriminate against the foreigner. At the end of the thirties
there had been discussions with the Dutch about the possibility of making
Gothenburg the staple for Eastland products, and plans for a canal through
Sweden which should enable skippers to evade the Sound. Such projects
were evidences of a renewed determination that Sweden should have her
share of the trade between east and west; and another sign of the times
was the establishment in 1651 of a new government department, the
College of Commerce, with an instruction drafted by Axel Oxenstierna
himself. And the growth of Swedish shipping, and the efforts of the
government to foster it, were in the nature of the case a challenge to the
1
See Vol. v in this series, Chapter xxn.
404
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SWEDEN AND THE BALTIC l 6 l I - 5 4
commercial ascendancy enjoyed in the Baltic by Sweden's recent allies
the Dutch.
The peace of Bromsebro was followed by a diplomatic revolution in the
Baltic, just as the peace of Knared had been, thirty years before; but this
time it was in the reverse direction. It was now Sweden that appeared
truculent and insatiable, while Danish diplomacy adroitly exploited its
opportunities, and made political capital out of weakness and defeat.
Mazarin had not relished Oxenstierna's use of French subsidies for an
attack on Denmark. It was not in France's interest that Sweden should
allow her attention to be distracted from Germany at a moment when the
terms of peace which could be extorted at the Congress of Westphalia
were so directly related to military success or failure. Mazarin, therefore,
had offered mediation in the north; and to his ambassador, de Thuillerie,
fell the main credit for arranging the Peace of Bromsebro. But the war
was hardly over before Mazarin realized, and realized with misgiving, how
the situation in the Baltic was changing. It was not now so much a matter
of ensuring 'the tranquillity of the North' (as the diplomats of the next
century would have phrased it) in order that every effort might be con-
centrated against the Habsburgs. It was a question rather of ensuring
that the north should not be dominated by a single overmighty power.
Danish diplomats—and especially Christian IV's able and unscrupulous
son-in-law, Korfits Ulfeld—harped persistently on this string; and soon
after the peace they had their reward. In November 1645 France signed
a treaty of alliance with Denmark. It was to last for six years; and by its
terms French ships were granted the same rates for the Sound dues as
had been accorded to the Dutch, while Denmark was promised diplomatic
support for her efforts to recover Bremen and Verden for Prince Frederick.
And thus began a policy, destined to be pursued by so many French
statesmen in the course of the next hundred years—a policy of trying to
run the two Scandinavian powers in double harness, and be the ally of
both at once, flattering each in turn with nicely graded evidences of French
goodwill, and restraining both (as far as possible) from beginning hostili-
ties; a policy expensive in the article of subsidies, and doubtful in the
returns it yielded. In 1645, at all events, it was a policy that came too
early: the smart of defeat was too keenly felt in Denmark to be assuaged
by French plasters. A decade later Mazarin would be driven to make
choice between Denmark and Sweden; and political tradition, as well as
present interest, would lead him to choose Sweden. But for the moment
the Franco-Danish alliance seemed the first significant indication of
changing times.
It was soon followed by others. The Swedish triumph had evoked
similar misgivings in Oxenstierna's Dutch accomplices. At Bromsebro
their plenipotentiaries, once they had abandoned the pretence of mediation,
confined themselves rigorously to blackmailing Denmark for their own
405
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
advantage: to Sweden's territorial demands they gave little or no support.
The alliance with Sweden was indeed renewed immediately afterwards;
but relations were far from cordial. In order, as the Dutch alleged, to
cover the cost of their naval activities in the Sound, their fleet was levying
a toll (the so-called veilgeld) on vessels going into the Baltic, and not only
was this imposed upon the ships of their ally Sweden, but it was levied
at double rates on ships to German and Livonian ports in Swedish
possession. It was not until a full year after the conclusion of peace that
Swedish protests and reprisals obtained the cessation of this imposition.
The Dutch were beginning to be alarmed at the measures taken to protect
Swedish monopoly companies, and at the expansion of the Swedish
mercantile marine, which was in fact proceeding so fast that by the middle
of the next decade almost all Swedish exports would be carried in Swedish
ships. In short, the state of Swedish-Dutch relations in 1646 offered an
opportunity for a statesman who might be concerned to separate the two
powers. This opportunity Korfltz Ulfeld adroitly seized. In February
1647 he was able to sign a treaty with Their High Mightinesses which
settled outstanding claims from the period of the recent war; and in
September 1649 he brought off a remarkable diplomatic coup by conclud-
ing two further treaties with them. One was a treaty of alliance and mutual
aid; the other—the so-called Redemption Treaty—was a financial agree-
ment, whereby the United Provinces bound themselves to pay Denmark
140,000 rdr. a year in return for the exemption of Dutch ships from the
Sound dues.
Economically, the Redemption Treaty was an excellent bargain for
Denmark, and the Dutch were glad enough to be allowed to cancel the
arrangement (by the so-called Rescission Treaty) in 1653. Politically it was
even more advantageous. It secured Denmark against further Swedish
aggression. It virtually ended the Dutch alliance with Sweden. It seemed to
ensure that the balance of power in the Baltic would not be tilted further
in Sweden's favour. And almost inevitably it led to a further deterioration
of Sweden's relations with the Dutch; for in order to compensate them-
selves for the annual payment to Denmark, the States General now
proceeded to levy a duty, not only on the Dutch skippers who were
now relieved of the Sound dues, but on all ships engaged in the Baltic
trade that might put into Dutch ports. This, as the Swedes complained,
was in effect to transfer the Sound dues to Dutch waters, and so to destroy
the exemption from those dues which Swedish ships had so long enjoyed.
And when to this provocation is added, that the Dutch had given diplo-
matic support to Denmark at Westphalia over Bremen and Verden, and
that they had sympathized with Brandenburg in the bitter controversy
over Pomerania, then it is clear that by 1650 the brief period of Swedish-
Dutch friendship was quite over. Dutch feeling in the fifties would be
decidedly hostile to Sweden; and in 1659 and 1660 De Witt and Mazarin
406
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SWEDEN AND THE BALTIC I 6 1 I - 5 4
would collaborate to impose a settlement on Scandinavia which was
entirely in the spirit of Dutch policy.
If in the Baltic French statesmen were now showing signs of a disposi-
tion to hedge, in Germany (as Mazarin realized) the Franco-Swedish
alliance was still indispensable to both partners. There were moments,
it is true, of intense irritation, when the military or diplomatic collabora-
tion appeared about to break down, and the one ally or the other for a time
threatened to strike a bargain with the enemy; but on the whole the
alliance held firm. This solidarity, in the field and at Westphalia, explains
the magnitude of the gains made by each at the peace. In the closing years
of the war, Sweden's essential aims were, first, Pomerania; and, secondly,
an indemnity large enough to permit the disbandment of the mercenary
armies. Peace without indemnity would be ruinous; for, lacking the French
subsidies, Sweden could neither keep her troops nor dismiss them. Peace
without Pomerania would be disgraceful; for in Pomerania were now
conflated the last vestiges of satisfactio and assecuratio. But in addition
to these two indispensables, the Swedish diplomats fought hard for
indemnity to Sweden's most faithful German ally, Hesse-Cassel; and
did their best to obtain reasonable guarantees for those Protestant
states who had been excluded from the benefits of the Peace of Prague.
Religious feeling still counted for a good deal at Westphalia; and the fire
of the Protestant cause was not yet quite extinguished. How long it would
survive the ending of hostilities was perhaps another matter.
The terms which Sweden ultimately obtained at the peace did, on the
whole, satisfy these demands. After long haggling, an indemnity of five
million rdr. was secured for the 'contentment of the soldiery'—a sum
which the ravaged lands of Germany found great difficulty in raising—
and by 1650 it was possible to bring back the army to a peacetime footing.
The landgrave of Hesse-Cassel obtained his indemnity too; the Calvinist
states were put on an equality with the Lutherans; and Sweden could feel
that she had done her duty by her friends in Germany. It proved im-
possible, indeed, to obtain the whole of Pomerania (though both Oxen-
stierna and Christina in the final stages believed that it could have been
got, if the negotiators had shown a little more firmness); but eastern
Pomerania—impoverished, unfertile, with a single third-rate port at
Kolberg—was no great loss: all that was worth having of Pomerania
lay west of the Oder, and all of it became Swedish. Stettin itself, with all
the Oder-mouths, passed into Swedish hands. In 1653, after protracted
and embittered negotiations, the great elector was compelled, in order
to obtain the evacuation of the Swedish troops from his half of Pomerania, to
accept a very disadvantageous frontier, and to concede to the Swedes a
half-share in the tolls—such as they were—levied in eastern Pomeranian
ports. In addition, Sweden not only obtained at Westphalia the cession
of the Mecklenburg towns of Wismar and Warnemunde, but continued
407
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
(in defiance of legality) to take toll at other Mecklenburg ports also.
And, finally, the secularized bishoprics of Bremen and Verden, which
had been in Swedish occupation since the Danish war, were now for-
mally transferred to Swedish ownership.
By the Peace of Westphalia Sweden emerged, in law as well as in fact,
as a German power. Queen Christina became, in virtue of her German
possessions, a member of no less than three circles of the empire. Hence-
forth Sweden had a permanent seat in the Diet: permanent, because the
emperor granted the Pomeranian fief not to Christina and her heirs, but
to the Swedish crown. The great rivers of north Germany were now under
Swedish control; the trade from Silesia down the Oder could be milked
at Stettin (hence the great elector's construction of the Hohenzollern
canal, in the sixties, to circumvent this obstacle); a substantial proportion
of the war-time system of 'licences' remained intact; and the threat to
Denmark from Wismar was now reinforced from Bremen, which Per
Brahe rightly pronounced to be 'a bridle for the Jute.' The gains at
Westphalia, therefore, though they might seem to risk involving Sweden
for many years to come in eccentric questions of German politics, were
welcomed at home as a strengthening of her position against her most
dangerous Baltic rival. It was not apparent, in 1650, that the Swedish
dominions were already too extensive to be adequately defended. Swedish
statesmen did not as yet realize that the favourable financial conjunctures
of the years from 1631 to 1648 were unlikely to recur, nor appreciate
how difficult it might prove to maintain a straggling empire from Sweden's
own resources. It was expected that Sweden would resume, after the
peace, her historic role of leader and champion of German—indeed,
of European—Protestantism against the Habsburgs and the papacy;
and old Oxenstierna, like many others of his generation, would have
wished that it should be so. Together with France, Sweden was joint
guarantor of the Westphalian settlement; and that settlement had among
other things given new security and a new status to evangelical Germany.
But this expectation ignored the implications of Sweden's membership
of the Germanic body, and forgot that she had thereby inevitably acquired
a share of that same particularist selfishness which Gustavus Adolphus
in his day had so loudly condemned. Like electoral Saxony, or the
Brunswick dukes, Sweden had now her own petty ambitions and private
quarrels in Germany, for the realization or prosecution of which she
needed the goodwill of the emperor. So, for example, in regard to
Brandenburg; so in regard to Bremen and Verden. For Bremen and
Verden Queen Christina still lacked that imperial investiture which
would make her possession of these territories legally unassailable;
and the city of Bremen in 1654 forcibly resisted Sweden's attempts to
destroy its status as an immediate vassal of the emperor. Christina,
moreover, like many another German ruler, had personal and dynastic
408
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008SWEDEN AND THE BALTIC l 6 l l ~ 5 4
problems, and hoped to solve them more easily with the emperor as a
friend rather than as an enemy: her intended abdication, and her con-
version to Catholicism, both drew her to the side of Ferdinand III. In
the early fifties, therefore, Europe saw with astonishment a sharp veering
of Swedish foreign policy towards friendship with Austria and Spain;
and the Swedish representative at the imperial Diet even supported the
election of Ferdinand IV as king of the Romans in 165 3. It may be doubted
whether, after 1650, there was in any case sufficient Protestant solidarity
in Germany, and still less sufficient goodwill towards Sweden, for any
revival of Gustavus' corpus evangelicorum to be conceivable: Sweden's
bullyings of Brandenburg and Bremen had made the most deplorable
impression among her former well-wishers. The day for a foreign policy
of Oxenstierna's type was passing, if it had not already passed; and Salvius
and the new men perceived this. But this implied no obstacle to Sweden's
entering into combinations with other German states to maintain
particular interests, or safeguard the public peace, or oppose imperial
pretensions—combinations in which religion would be a secondary,
if not an insignificant, element. The League of Hildesheim, with Hesse-
Cassel and the Brunswick dukes (1652), matched the analogous efforts of
John Philip von Schonborn of Mainz to organize the Rhineland states for
mutual protection against the unamenable armies of Charles of Lorraine;
and the fusion of these two initiatives, under French guidance, would
produce the completely undenominational League of the Rhine. And the
coalition which was formed to fight Charles X in 1658 would include
(besides Catholic Poland and Austria) Lutheran Denmark, Calvinist
Brandenburg, and Orthodox Muscovy.
In August 1654 Axel Oxenstierna died at the age of seventy-one. It
was nearly fifty years since he had entered the public service; it was
forty-five since his admission to the council; and he had held the office
of chancellor in unbroken tenure since 1612. His working life had thus
covered the whole astonishing chain of events by which Sweden became a
great power; and few, certainly, had done more to forge that chain than
he. He had been the chief negotiator for Sweden of the humiliating
Peace of Knared; and thirty-two years later he had had the satisfaction
of being the chief negotiator of the triumphant Peace of Bromsebro. He
had lived long enough to see Denmark depressed into a position of
inferiority, and he would willingly have seen her weakened still further:
to the end of his life he retained his full share of that national hatred for
'the Jute' which the sufferings of the War of Kalmar had so strongly
reinforced. Over the other arch-enemy, Poland, there had been no such
clear victory to establish, despite the successes of the twenties, and nothing
better than a long truce to be had: a determined effort by Mazarin to
arrange a settlement in 1651 had come to a stop before the unshakable
refusal of John Casimir to renounce his hereditary claim to Sweden. Yet
409
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
though some of the old problems were thus unresolved, and though
Denmark was by no means finished with, Oxenstierna's death does mark
an epoch. The age of expansion—based on especially favourable financial
and military circumstances, and the close identity of Swedish national
interests with the general interests of Protestantism in Europe—was at
an end; from about 1650 Swedish copper production began to show a
progressive decline, and Oxenstierna's financial policy of converting
crown lands and revenues into cash was seen to have reached its limit of
safety, if it had not passed it; Swedish advances in the art of war had
become more or less common form; the Protestant cause was already
little more than a memory or a dream. The reign of Charles X was to be—
as the fifties in so many countries were—a transitional period, leading
to the very different world of Louis XIV. And though in Charles' time
the process of expansion continued and reached its limit, it was only in
the matter of the completion of Sweden's geographical unity that his
military exploits made a lasting effect. Already in the fifties it was possible
to discern the emergence of dangers and problems different from those
with which Oxenstierna had been familiar; and there are some grounds
for thinking that Charles X perceived this. The inexpiable offence of the
seizure of western Pomerania was to make Brandenburg Sweden's most
dangerous enemy in the immediate future; and the great elector was to
devote his life to the effort to undo that wrong. The catastrophes of 'the
Deluge' 1 not only removed Poland as a serious challenger in the Baltic
(at Oliva in 1660 the Polish Vasas finally abjured the crown of Sweden)
but created a vacuum of power which sooner or later Muscovy would be
able to fill. It was already plain that Sweden need not hope to rest un-
disturbed upon her arms, in placid enjoyment of her territorial booty.
The empire would have to be defended, if it were to be held; and defence
would somehow have to be paid for. Henceforward, in peace no less than
in war, Sweden would be, characteristically, a subsidy-hunting power.
1
See below, Chapter xix, Pt. 1.
410
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER XIV
INTERNATIONAL RELATIONS AND THE ROLE
OF FRANCE 1648-60
T
HE evolution of international relations dominates the entire history
of the period between the Peace of Westphalia (1648) and the
Treaties of the Pyrenees (1659) and of Oliva (1660). These few years
saw the termination of the Thirty Years War, of the war between France
and Spain and of the war in the north. But, apart from some territorial
adjustments arising from the Treaty of the Pyrenees, these conflicts
appear to be of minor interest; they did not transform the map of Europe.
The appearance is misleading, for this short period, when the first indica-
tions of French supremacy emerged to view, witnessed a change in the
relations between the European powers. It saw the end of the Franco-
Swedish axis which had dominated the history of the Thirty Years War,
the final downfall of Spain and the decline of Sweden and Poland, the
entrance of Russia into European politics and the rise to power of the
little state of Brandenburg. Finally, with the first Anglo-Dutch War, came
the confident assertion of English sea-power in an alliance—albeit epi-
sodic—with France. The shifting of power, the emergence of new forces
or rather of new ambitions, the breakdown of the old European equili-
brium which was everywhere in a state of collapse—these are the themes
it is proposed to elucidate, taking as a guiding thread the policy of France
which gives unity to the whole.
Although it brought peace in Europe, peace in Germany and a consti-
tutional charter, the achievement of the Peace of Westphalia remained
incomplete. It had provided a lasting solution to some of the problems
from which it stemmed, notably to the religious question on the basis of
a reciprocal tolerance between the Catholic, Lutheran and Calvinist
faiths; it also assured the exercise of territorial sovereignty to princes and
cities; finally, it gave the victorious states substantial 'satisfactions': yet
it was, above all else, a 'potentiality', calling for careful surveillance by
France if all its rewards were to be reaped.
The immediate military result was certainly achieved. '[We must]
fortify ourselves in Metz and advance, if possible, as far as Strasbourg, to
secure an entry into Germany', Richelieu had written in 1629 in his Avis
au Roi. He was concerned to destroy the power of the House of Austria
by preventing the strategic and political union of the two branches of the
Habsburgs, in Vienna and Madrid. Did not the publicist Fancan remark
at the time: ' If Germany is lost, France cannot survive' ? In the ' satis-
411
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
faction' obtained by France, the two landgraviates of Alsace and the
Sundgau were less important than the fortress of Breisach on the right
bank of the Rhine. As an 'open gateway to the Empire' Breisach had
replaced Strasbourg, which was not to become French until 1681. A
former possession of the archdukes, Breisach lay across the road from the
Low Countries to Italy which, for Spain, remained a road carrying mis-
sionaries, treasure and tercios rather than merchants. An equally impor-
tant provision, instigated by the French, was the guarantee of the con-
tracting powers, in particular of France and Sweden. These powers had the
right to be represented by an ambassador at the Diet, to form themselves
by alliances into a party within the empire and, finally, to intervene in its
affairs in defence of the' German liberties' whose affirmation sealed the em-
peror's impotence and destroyed his dream of religious and political unity.
This outcome appeared satisfactory; but it had now to be consolidated
and there was another side to the picture. Despite the skill of the French
negotiators, the German princes came to feel certain misgivings about an
alliance or protection which, though disinterested in theory, was in
practice concerned with territorial advantages. Again, though the
emperor was defeated and his ambitions stood condemned, he was not
deprived of all authority in Germany. He shared legislative power with the
Diet; he commanded an important following and continued to figure as
the hereditary defender of the Catholic faith against Protestantism; he
remained suzerain of all the estates of the empire and, through his patri-
monial dominions, the enemy of the Turks—the kingdom of Hungary
was but a narrow strip of territory bordering Ottoman Hungary. The
emperor's prestige on the Rhine was to depend upon his success on the
Danube. Finally, the decline of the emperor encouraged the rise of the
princes. The Treaty of Westphalia empowered them to conduct an inde-
pendent foreign policy and to conclude any alliances they pleased. A
newcomer, Brandenburg, appeared on the political scene: treated by the
Swedes with scant respect, she was obliged to leave them not only
Stralsund, 'the German Calais', but also the mouth of the Oder and
Stettin, contenting herself with the eastern extremity of Pomerania,
burdened by Swedish customs dues, with the reversion of Magdeburg and
with the territories of Camin, Halberstadt and Minden. But these last
were thrice as valuable as the lost province and joined together the ancient
possessions of the Hohenzollerns. Frederick William, now the most im-
portant of the Protestant electors, 'with more lands and revenues than
the two most powerful kings of the North had possessed thirty years
earlier', improved his position through the play of European politics and
endowed his country with a fine army.
Since 1635, when France declared war on Spain, a European conflict
had been grafted on to the German war. There were, in fact, two separate
wars which frequently became confused. Each theatre of operations,
412
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRANCE AND INTERNATIONAL RELATIONS 1 6 4 8 - 6 0
whether in the Low Countries, the Iberian Peninsula, or Italy, had its own
laws and its intrinsic development. The conflict in the Low Countries,
which first arose with the revolt of the former Spanish provinces against
Philip II, had moved towards the establishment of two separate territorial,
religious and political regimes: in the north, the Protestant and republican
United Provinces; in the south, the provinces which remained Catholic
and Spanish. Though in 1635 the alliance concluded between the France
of Richelieu and the United Provinces had envisaged the possible division
of the Spanish Netherlands between their two neighbours, the situation
had changed by 1648. The capture of Dunkirk by the due d'Enghien on
11 October 1646, an exploit celebrated by Voiture and Corneille, as well as
Sarrazin, Mademoiselle de Scudery and Balzac, had alarmed the United
Provinces, who viewed the French advance into Flanders with some
anxiety. They were afraid of being confronted by a powerful and vic-
torious nation carrying all before it. They also feared the commercial
rivalry of Dunkirk, a mighty naval arsenal, the haunt of pirates and the
scourge of the French coast. At the same time, arising from the projected
marriage between the young king and the infanta of Spain who was to
bring the Belgian provinces as dowry, the idea was abroad that Spain
might exchange these provinces for Catalonia. All these reasons had led
the United Provinces to break the alliance which formerly linked them to
France. On 30 January 1648 they signed a separate peace with Spain
which transformed the truce of 1609 into a definitive treaty and marked
the capitulation of Spain in the spheres of politics, religion and, above all,
commerce. Mutual freedom of trade was granted in Europe, without
opening the Spanish colonies to the Dutch; Spain recognized the closing
of the mouths of the Scheldt; Antwerp was sacrificed for the benefit of
Amsterdam. This separate peace, sought by Spain, who was anxious to
devote all her strength to the struggle with France, and desired by financial
and mercantile circles in Holland and Zeeland, had a twofold result. On
the one hand, by confirming the role of the United Provinces as a great
colonial and sea power, it led them into conflict with England, where
Cromwell had seized power after the fall of Charles I; on the other hand,
it raised the territorial problem of the Spanish Netherlands, closely linked
to the destiny of Spain, condemned to economic strangulation, in the grip
of clerical despotism and coveted by France. But 1648 did not see the
last moves in the game. The arrival of the Archduke Leopold William,
brother of the Emperor Ferdinand III and appointed governor-general
of the Spanish Netherlands in 1647, led to an appreciable recovery of
Spanish authority. The Battle of Lens, won by Conde on 20 August 1648
with the help of German troops brought in by Erlach, the governor of
Breisach, re-established the situation in favour of France, but in a manner
more spectacular than decisive.
Two problems less pressing for France, but agonizing for Spain, were
413
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
those of Portugal and Catalonia. Portugal, linked unwillingly to the des-
tiny of Spain since 1581, had revolted in 1640. Despite the opposition of
the Dutch who were anxious to continue exploiting Brazil, Richelieu had
concluded an alliance with John IV. This alliance, which remained largely
a dead letter, had the effect of paralysing Spain at sea and of retaining
Spanish troops in the Peninsula. The struggle was not to end until 1668
with Portuguese independence. In Catalonia, where the Cortes in revolt
against Olivares had appealed to France, the French government saw a
pawn or an object for eventual barter with Spain and a means of waging
war with Philip IV on the frontiers of the provinces of Valencia and
Aragon. Perpignan had capitulated on 19 September 1642, but the
difficulties of climate and terrain, together with the lack of men and
money, had led, despite the efforts of Pierre de Marca as visitor-general,
to the inaction of La Motte-Houdancourt and to the failures of Harcourt
and Conde himself before Lerida. The appointment of the cardinal of
Santa Cecilia, formerly Michel Mazarin, as viceroy of Catalonia was merely
an interlude. On 13 July 1648 Schomberg, who had reorganized the army,
took Tortosa, a success which accompanied that of Conde in the north.
Finally, Italy with her anarchic constitution, a mere geographical
expression, remained a notorious sphere of war and intrigue, where
French and Spanish factions were at grips. Though Spain had political
control of the two Sicilies and the Milanese, France still held in Pinerolo,
which belonged to the duke of Savoy, a door opening into the peninsula;
she also controlled, like two advanced posts against the House of Austria,
Casale and Mantua, the most important strongholds in the Po valley. On
1 September 1647 Francis d'Este, Duke of Modena, had signed an offen-
sive and defensive alliance with the king. But, although an expedition in
October 1646 had led to the capture of Piombino on the coast and of Porto
Longone on the Island of Elba, the invasion of the duchy of Milan by
Prince Thomas of Savoy and the duke of Modena was a failure. In Rome,
whose support was necessary for the success of French plans, the result
was no better. The election of Innocent X in 1644, in spite of Mazarin's
opposition, was significant: 'the whole court', he wrote, 'and the parle-
ments of the kingdom believe that we have now a Spanish Pope'. His
hope of obtaining a cardinal's hat for his brother Michel was now less
bright, and the long-cherished dream of a league of Italian states united
against the common oppressor was shattered. There remained the
question of Naples, whose chequered history was entirely characteristic of
this highly coloured period; her population was restive under the Spanish
yoke. Mazarin had hopes of installing there a member of the House of
Savoy, Prince Thomas. In the draft treaty which he prepared with the
latter Mazarin provided that, if the elder branch of the House of Savoy
should die out and Prince Thomas, already king of Naples, became duke
of Savoy and sovereign of Piedmont, he would cede to France Savoy and
414
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRANCE AND INTERNATIONAL RELATIONS 1 6 4 8 - 6 0
the county of Nice, 'everything on this side of the mountains bordering
France'. These fine hopes were not realized. The revolt led by Tommaso
Aniello (Masaniello) broke out in Naples. It was followed by the pro-
clamation of the republic on 24 October 1647, and by the arrival of the
Due de Guise—an exponent of kid-glove warfare. Mazarin's policy of
delaying until 'the fruit is ripe and the Neapolitans themselves ask for the
help of France', coupled with internal rivalries, facilitated the return of the
kingdom of the two Sicilies to Spain, on 6 April 1648.
If peace was to be securely established in Germany and the war against
Spain pursued on the various fronts, the French government needed
unity, firmness and a stable policy. These it entirely lacked, in appearance
at least. There is a striking contrast between the broad sweep of the inter-
national scene, with war everywhere except on the Rhine, and the paltry
intrigues which disturbed France. The death of Louis XIII had been
followed by a minority. A child, Louis XIV; a woman, the Spanish-born
regent, Anne of Austria, who had been granted full sovereign powers by
the Parlement; a foreigner, Cardinal Mazarin, chosen as chief minister by
Louis XIII and retained by the regent—these were the protagonists in the
drama in progress at court. They had to grapple with problems arising
from shortage of money, opposition in the Parlement, intrigues of the
nobles and unrest in the provinces.
As early as the beginning of 1647, the Venetian ambassador had drawn
attention to the chaos in financial administration: 'Such are the methods
in practice in the confused state of financial administration that the king
has never a penny in his purse.' Financial difficulties delayed the ending
of the war; the lack of funds encouraged the desertion of the troops, dis-
gruntled at not receiving their promised pay in due time. Once a battle
was won, the army halted or disbanded for lack of money. The horrors of
war grew apace, and the' soldiers lived on the country. Taking advantage
of the fiscal situation, the opposition in the Parlement attempted to call in
question the whole organization of the kingdom. 1
To what extent had these opposition groups, active until 1654 and
adding a veritable civil war to the foreign war, a foreign policy different
from that of the government ? They were in general much given to propos-
ing the ideal of peace as an alternative to the war. Some, for reasons of
political and religious opinion recalling the choice which Louis XIII had
to make between Richelieu and Marillac, favoured a separate peace with
Spain. The duchesse de Chevreuse, and Chateauneuf, a man who had
suffered at Richelieu's hands, hoped to put an end to an impious war
'in which brother and sister contend, and Catholics take up arms against
Catholics to the advantage of the Protestant powers'. They wanted to
abandon the alliances contracted in the reigns of Henri IV and Louis XIII,
to adopt a Catholic policy and to sign a peace based on a status quo
1
See below, Chapter xvi, pp. 496-9.
415
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
favourable to Spain. The majority, however, wanted an end of the war for
reasons of internal politics. After thirteen years of conflict, the peace
party drew into its ranks all those who had smarted under the demands of
Richelieu and suffered by the prolongation of the war: the provincial
nobles humiliated in the previous reign, the legal middle class whose
distrust and resentment were expressed by Guy Patin, and finally, the
masses in Paris and the provinces who, though still loyal to the monarchy,
accused Richelieu's successor of opposing peace with Spain in 1648 and
took up in unison the current slogan: 'Away with Mazarin!'
Cardinal Mazarin remained the mainspring of home and foreign
affairs, which were closely interlocked. At a time when Frenchmen gave
themselves over entirely to the preoccupations of the moment, expressed in
outbursts, sometimes reasoned like those of the Parlement, sometimes
sparking spontaneously from the throng like the reactions of the people
on the Day of the Barricades, this Italian, who became a naturalized
Frenchman in 1639 and a cardinal in 1641 (he received the biretta from
Louis XIII on 25 February 1642), showed an acute awareness of the
greatness of France and reverted, though with other methods, to the
policy of Richelieu. He was the man for the hour, for this period when
diplomacy and war went hand in hand. His faults are well known: the
passion for money which led him to confuse the state coffers with his
private purse: the love for his family, for the nieces he dowered and
married into the highest aristocracy, or for his brother Michel, made
cardinal of Santa Cecilia and viceroy of Catalonia; his genius for intrigue,
so much in evidence in his Cornets, which justify the epigram of La
Rochefoucauld, a good judge of the human heart, that 'he was a man of
limited vision, even in his greatest schemes'. He remained pre-eminently
a diplomat who moved with relish in the network of alliances, who knew
his Europe, the general interests of the powers and particular appetites
of their rulers, who discerned all men's weaknesses, which he used, and
even abused, in the belief that every man has his price. In this way, he
pursued his task through the troubled atmosphere of the Fronde and the
Mazarinades from 1648 to 1653, rinding his most effective support in the
regent, who was anxious to convey the heritage of monarchy intact to
her son. Though economically—despite the popular outcry—the burden
of the war was not crushing, politically the continuing struggle en-
couraged the development of the institutions of absolute power and
aroused opposition of various kinds. The conflicting policies proposed
by the different camps reveal Mazarin's terrible loneliness. Frenchmen
were incapable of understanding that a foreigner—that 'rascally
Sicilian', as the due d'Orleans called him—could excel them in discerning,
beyond the tribulations of the moment, the permanent interests of the
country. Mazarin's first concern was to safeguard the benefits conferred
by the Peace of Westphalia, to consolidate the situation now obtaining
416
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRANCE AND INTERNATIONAL RELATIONS 1 6 4 8 - 6 0
in Germany by using the guarantee accorded to France and Sweden. In
the short term also, he strove to secure strong frontiers for France,
particularly in the north and east. In a letter dated 20 January 1646 he wrote:
The acquisition of the Spanish Netherlands would provide an impregnable bulwark
for the city of Paris; it might then truly be called the heart of France, and would
stand in the safest place in the kingdom. Our borders would have been extended as
far as Holland, and, on the German side, a quarter from which there is also much
to be feared, as far as the Rhine, by the retention of Lorraine and Alsace and the
possession of Luxemburg and the County of Burgundy.
The war against Spain was less an end in itself than a means of safe-
guarding the influence of the monarchy in Europe. In the long term, bold
investments were made in the future—in the Spanish succession, for
example. In less skilful hands they were to lead to the mistakes of the end
of the reign. With these basic themes there were blended, in mid-century,
new interests arising from the commercial revolution and the discovery
of new continents in the preceding century. War was impending between
England and Holland, not for political supremacy—now no longer an
objective—but for control of the seas and colonial trade; there was also a
struggle in the north for control of the Baltic, where the ambitions of
Scandinavia, Poland, Brandenburg and Russia were in conflict. Here
once again, Mazarin made his choice: unlike Richelieu, he was neither a
sailor nor an economist. He was to use external wars as a source of indis-
pensable alliances, or as a theatre in which to intervene as arbiter. Under
his government, from 1648 to 1661, the choice of the monarchy was for
France as a European power, with territorial and political pretensions.
It would be tedious to enter into the chronological details of events.
Each problem on the international scene impinged upon the next, might
have moments of quiescence, of unforeseen resurgence, of swift develop-
ment, according to the internal situation in each state. Four questions
appear to call for examination, in terms of the role played by France:
relations with the empire, relations with the maritime powers, the conduct
and conclusion of the war with Spain, and France's intervention in the
war in the north. The tireless diplomatic activity of Mazarin forms the
close weft of international relations.
Once the German war was over, there immediately arose the problems
of the peace. Some were pressing and concerned the carrying out of the
Treaties of Minister and Osnabriick; others, perhaps more important,
but less urgent, raised the question of France's future policy in the empire.
The first stage was the evacuation of the German towns by allied garrisons
and armies. The solidarity of the victors was now put to the test. Circum-
stances were not favourable for France. The loyalty of Turenne, whose
prestige was still high in Germany, was wavering; Harcourt, the governor
of Alsace, was intriguing at Breisach, which he wanted to make the capital
417
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
of a buffer state between France and the empire; the ten free imperial
towns of Alsace were unwilling to ascribe more than a restricted meaning
to the term 'protection' and claimed to owe allegiance only to the empire.
'From every quarter', wrote Vautorte, the French envoy in Niirnberg, to
Mazarin in 1649, 'there come complaints against France.' This was a
galling situation for the conqueror, arraigned and impotently watching the
manoeuvres of Austria. It was useless to attempt, as Mazarin wished, to
obtain recognition of the cession of Alsace as an imperial fief instead of
in full sovereignty. A curious paradox, explained by Mazarin's desire to
see the king of France seated in the Diet of Ratisbon as landgrave of
Alsace. This claim, already advanced in 1646, met with the same resistance
in 1653: 'I have sure proof, declared Vautorte, 'that the Emperor, and
those of the Estates which share his views, are opposed to Alsace becom-
ing an Estate of the Empire.' In the three bishoprics, held by France as
vicar-general of the empire since 1552, the king's full sovereignty had been
recognized by the Treaty of Miinster. How far did this sovereignty extend ?
The plenipotentiaries claimed that it covered ' the temporal dependencies
of the bishops as well as the places within their spiritual jurisdiction'. It
should be noted that, after 1679, this interpretation was to authorize the
procedures of the Chambre de Reunion of the Parlement of Metz.
The end of the Fronde and the arrival of La Ferte's army in Alsace
reversed the situation. The Estates dropped their complaints, but the
plan for holding Alsace as a fief was not broached again, nor was the
reform of the imperial institution brought about at Ratisbon. At Miinster,
Mazarin had tried to set the democracy of the towns up against the aristo-
cracy of the electors and the oligarchy of the princes. He described the towns
as then being' the most important [force] in Germany . . . it is principally
they who have the money, the lands and the munitions of war . . .'. This
was an interesting theory, but no longer valid: the towns emerged from
the Thirty Years War as a group lacking both unity and a corporate
existence. It was only the great territorial princes who could, if not oppose
the emperor, at least manoeuvre skilfully enough to obtain a following
which had confidence in them. France urgently needed to find an alter-
native policy in the empire. The defence of German liberties, so attractive
to the Valois and Richelieu, seemed like an outworn slogan at a time
when no one threatened them. Sweden claimed to lead the Protestant
states, the most dynamic element in the empire, but Brandenburg, con-
fronted by the elector of Saxony at the head of the evangelical community
owing allegiance to Austria, also aspired to the leadership. France's policy
could not fail to be based upon dynastic, federative and interconfessional
considerations.
Mazarin remained, above all, intent upon depriving the Habsburgs of
the imperial crown. It had become customary to elect the emperor's eldest
son king of the Romans during his father's lifetime. This was how the
418
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRANCE AND INTERNATIONAL RELATIONS 1 6 4 8 - 6 0
Habsburgs had succeeded, over the centuries, in monopolizing the im-
perial crown. The legitimacy of the procedure had often been challenged,
and France and Sweden had secured the insertion in the peace treaties of
a clause providing that the election of a king of the Romans would not be
permissible during the emperor's lifetime, except in case of necessity.
France would have liked to add the following provision, which was not
adopted: ne ex familia Imperatorum regnantium Rex eligatur. But the
value of written agreements depends entirely upon the strength of those
who enforce them. On 31 May 1653, taking advantage of the decline in
French prestige and the disunity of the victors, Ferdinand III succeeded
in having his son, Ferdinand IV, elected king of the Romans at Augsburg;
he was crowned at Ratisbon on 18 June. But Ferdinand IV died on
9 July 1654, and his brother Leopold, only fourteen years old, could not
immediately succeed him. On 2 April 1657 the emperor followed his son
to the grave, and there now ensued a veritable interregnum. The time
seemed ripe to wrest the imperial crown from the Habsburgs, and the
electoral horse-dealing began. 'The Electors', said the instructions sent by
the French government to its ambassadors at the Diet of Election, Mar-
shal de Gramont and Lionne, 'have a unique opportunity of showing all
Europe that the Imperial dignity is not the patrimony of a single house
and in the gift of the council of Spain, as it has been until now, but does
in fact depend upon their votes.' Now came the search for a suitable
candidate. The French court would doubtless have been delighted to see
the choice of the electors fall upon the young king, the heir of Charle-
magne, now potential heir to the throne of the Caesars! If need be, they
would have married him to a German princess, either a Catholic or a
convert from Protestantism! Mazarin, who did not a priori exclude any
stratagem, was ready to make the necessary financial sacrifices. But there
was swift opposition to such a plan, which was never officially avowed.
There remained two possible candidates: Ferdinand Maria, elector of
Bavaria, son of Maximilian the Great who had died in 1651, and husband
of Louis XIV's cousin, the spirited Henriette Adelaide of Savoy; and
Philip William, count of Neuburg, who had a fine palace at Dusseldorf
and had aspired to the hand of a French princess. But, while agreeing that
the powers of the future emperor should be limited, the majority of the
electors still supported the retention of the crown by the House of Habs-
burg; they believed that the elevation of a new house to the imperial
throne would inevitably lead to civil war and foreign oppression. The
election of Leopold, king of Bohemia, took place at Frankfurt on 18 July
1658; he had all the votes, including his own. He was crowned on
1 August, under the title of Leopold I, at the age of eighteen. Even before
the election, Mazarin had been striving to confine his power behind a
double barrier, formed by the juridical restraints of the capitulation and
the political restraints of the League of the Rhine.
419
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
A normal though illegal procedure, emanating from electors anxious for
safeguards against the master they were setting over themselves, the
capitulation imposed upon Leopold I reflected rather the prevailing pre-
occupations in the field of foreign affairs than the defence of the privileges
of the electoral body. Its foundations lay in an international act, the
Treaty of Miinster, which had become, on the same footing as the Golden
Bull, part of the constitution of the empire. French armies were then
threatening Flanders, reputed to be the bulwark of the empire, and the
Milanese, its historic centre. Yet articles 13 and 14 of the capitulation
forbade the emperor to give any help whatever to Spain. This provision
was in accordance with the wishes both of the Germans and of Louis XTV.
'No nation is more abhorred in the Empire than the Spanish nation',
wrote the Venetian ambassador. By an additional provision, the emperor
and his Austro-German house were assured of French neutrality, but the
princes and Estates were left complete freedom to seek French help in the
event of aggression. Finally, the emperor undertook to encourage the
restoration of peace between Spain and France, ' principally within the
confines of the Circles and patrimonies of the Empire'. This part of the
test reflected an attempt at mediation by the archbishops of Mainz and
Cologne. The Spanish ambassador, Penaranda, at first reticent, intimated
on 23 July 1658 his master's desire to see the formation of 'an assembly
in the Pyrenees, on the common frontier' to discuss the peace. This was
the first step towards the treaty which, in the following year, was to bring
peace to western Europe.
Mazarin was anxious to strengthen French influence in the empire. The
attempt, in 1649, to achieve an entente with the emperor, by the projected
marriage of Ferdinand III and Mademoiselle de Montpensier, had
failed: Spain had raised obstacles, and the court in Vienna had actually
proposed that 'France should substitute Breisach and Alsace for the
possessions of Mademoiselle, in order to deliver them into the hands of
the Emperor'. Leopold I did not notify the king of France of his election;
the king did not recognize him and avoided 'styling him Emperor in
public documents, as if unaware of the existence of such a personage'.
Imperial aid continued to flow to the Spaniards in Italy. Mazarin organ-
ized the defence of the region of the Rhine on the basis of the Treaty of
Miinster and the existing agreements. Already in 1651, the spiritual elec-
tors had formed a league for their common defence; they had been joined
by the Bishop of Miinster and the count of Neuburg. On the Protestant
side, a similar league had been formed by the king of Sweden as duke of
Bremen and Verden and overlord of Wismar, the three dukes of Bruns-
wick-Liineburg and the landgrave of Hesse-Cassel. Repudiating exclusive
confessional alignments, John Philip von Schonborn, arch-chancellor of
the empire and elector of Mainz, known as 'the Solomon of the North',
undertook the task of welding the two leagues together, for the protection
420
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRANCE AND INTERNATIONAL RELATIONS 1 6 4 8 - 6 0
of the common fatherland and the maintenance of peace. Mazarin,
attracted by the idea of uniting the two faiths in a single political body,
kept a watchful eye on this project, which would have been embarrassing
had the emperor been 'of French making', as was to be the case in 1742,
but seemed admirable after the election of Leopold I. Difficulties arose
because it was impossible to bring in both Sweden and Brandenburg, who
were hostile to one another. Sweden was included on account of her
German possessions, and Brandenburg was provisionally excluded. The
treaty, concluded for three years, was signed at Frankfurt on 14 August
1658 by the representatives of Sweden, the bishop of Miinster, the count
of Neuburg and the electors of Cologne, Trier and Mainz. On 15 August,
Gramont and Lionne signed on behalf of France. The king formed a
defensive alliance with the confederated electors and princes, on the
basis of the Peace of Westphalia. The Franco-Spanish war remained
outside its scope, but the signatories were to close their territories to the
passage of troops 'sent to Flanders or, elsewhere, against the Most Christ-
ian King and his allies'. The king undertook 'not to bear arms against
Germany; to recognise the freedom of the electors and princes to remain
loyal to the Empire, to their fatherland and to the Emperor; and to place
at the disposal of the League both infantry and cavalry, with the appro-
priate number of cannons'. In return he laid claim to their help in defend-
ing the possessions he had obtained from the Treaty of Miinster.
This was a success for French diplomacy which must be recorded, but
not unduly acclaimed. We are far from the suspicions of the conference at
Nurnberg or the Diet of Ratisbon; Mazarin had been able to win the
confidence of the German princes. Personal relations were at the root of
the agreement: the courtesy of the chief minister, his shrewdness in
eliciting the views of John Philip von Schonborn and, even more, in
heeding them. His careful handling of his allies was more than the adop-
tion of a correct attitude; it amounted to a veritable policy, or rather a
'style', which was to be absent from the diplomacy of Louis XIV after
the death of Mazarin's disciple Lionne. On the Rhenish side, John Philip
had no illusions, but he had managed to arm the league with the spearhead
which it lacked, in the form of men and money. The League of the Rhine
was a memorable phase in Franco-German relations, when there was
mutual confidence in a community of interests and in a common will to
peace: a meeting of two minds, a conjunction of two necessities, a symbol
of religious tolerance and reciprocal understanding, it was founded upon
the Treaty of Munster and stood for the established order. The league
would not be a party to any and every policy, as Louis XIV was to dis-
cover. Its strength was revealed in the episode of the 'translation':
angered at finding that the meeting-place of the ordinary deputation
coincided with that of the council of the alliance, the emperor decided to
transfer the former to Nurnberg. John Philip, supported by France,
421
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
opposed this move. The tussle was doubtless of minor importance, but it
served to confirm that there was henceforward a legal force in Germany,
distinct from that of the territorial princes, capable of resisting Austria.
At the close of the period the scene of anxiety shifted; it was no longer
a question of internal struggles and legal intrigues, but of the defence of
the empire. In the spring of 1660 the Turks had defeated Rakoczy at
Klausenburg and invaded Transylvania. They were threatening the
empire which now sought a protector: was this to be Leopold I or Louis XIV ?
Considerations of foreign policy explain the relations which Mazarin
deemed it expedient to maintain with the sea powers. The need to loosen
the Spanish vice compelled France to secure alliances with them, or at
least to be assured of their neutrality. Richelieu had already, with mixed
results, prepared the way by instructing Blainville, appointed ambassador
in London in 1625, to seek an alliance with England, and to approach the
envoys of the United Provinces 'who have', he declared, 'the same
interests and the same enemies as ourselves and whose independence we
have applauded and assisted'. The aim was 'to counterbalance the might
of Spain which, on various religious pretexts, had so increased . . . that
she was lording it over Europe and subjugating the Empire . . .'. Though
the separate treaty of 1648 with Spain, concluded by the United Provinces
in spite of their alliance of 1635 with France, had cast a shadow over
Franco-Dutch relations, there were no such obstacles between France and
England. The indispensable English alliance remained a fundamental
aim of Mazarin's policy. To achieve it he was to surmount the difficulties
and make the necessary sacrifices.
First, there were political difficulties, arising from the successive changes
of government in England. On 30 January 1649 Charles I, the uncle of
Louis XIV, had been beheaded in London, whereupon France had given
refuge to Charles II. The Commonwealth's insistence that recognition
must precede any negotiations raised a moral rather than a legal problem.
For Mazarin it was less a matter of overcoming his own scruples—he had
very few in this domain—than of conciliating public opinion. The
emergence of Cromwell, to whom he was instinctively drawn, and the
strength of the Protectorate reassured him. Spain had set the example:
His Most Catholic Majesty had been the first to recognize the Common-
wealth of England.
There were also economic difficulties, connected with the attacks by
Prince Rupert's privateers on French merchant shipping in the Mediter-
ranean and Atlantic. In the summer of 1649 a customs war broke out
between England and France. The Declaration of Saint-Germain had
prohibited the importation into France of English cloth. England retaliated
by refusing to admit French beaver hats, scarlet dyes and haberdashery;
the prohibition was later extended to red and white wines and woollen
422
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRANCE AND INTERNATIONAL RELATIONS 1 6 4 8 - 6 0
and silk cloth. To the allegation that they could not do without the wines,
the English replied 'that men grow accustomed to all things; that, con-
trary to the general expectation, they were managing well enough without
a king, and would also be quite able to dispense with French wines'. On
9 October 1651 England passed the Navigation Act, which came into
force on 1 December of the same year. This warlike measure against
Holland emphasizes the important expansion, between 1580 and 1640, of
overseas trade—involving English ships—a trade centred upon the
exporting of textiles and the importing of iron, timber and wool.
Finally, there were religious difficulties. Cromwell set himself up as the
defender of European Protestantism. He wished to protect the French
Protestants—whereupon Mazarin proved to him that they lived peacefully
under the protection of the law—and he fulminated against the duke of
Savoy's persecution of the Vaudois. In response to these representations,
the Most Christian King interceded with the duke on behalf of the victims.
These difficulties did not appear insuperable to Mazarin who, already
in 1652, had entered upon talks with Cromwell. He had need of England
for his Scottish and Irish recruits, for the books and pictures which he
bought from the Royal collections, on show at Somerset House; above
all, he wished to prevent her from falling into the arms of Spain, which
dangled the magnificent bait of trade with the Indies.
At first, until the beginning of 1653, relations were cool. Spain pursued
her negotiations in London. In January 1652, her ambassador, Cardenas,
proposed an agreement whereby Dunkirk, Gravelines and Calais were
to be captured by armies of the two countries, and Calais then handed
over to England. At Dunkirk, besieged by the Spaniards since September
1651, the governor, d'Estrades, was visited by an English envoy, Fitz-
james, seeking an accommodation which would save the fortress. Mazarin
would gladly have acquiesced, but the negotiations failed. A French fleet,
sent to the aid of Dunkirk, was seized by the English fleet commanded by
Blake. This was a reprisal for privateering; the crews were released, but
the vessels were retained. On 16 September 1652 Dunkirk capitulated to
the Archduke Leopold, Gravelines having surrendered on 19 May. The
Spanish threat increased; Barcelona and Casale had fallen. Civil war was
raging, with Conde in command of the enemy forces. By 1650 Mazarin
was already convinced that, as he wrote in his Carnets, 'it is important to
establish close relations with England or, if this cannot be brought about,
with the States of Holland'.
At first it seemed that the second alternative would be the easier to
achieve. The Anglo-Dutch War was at its height. In October 1653 the
French envoy, Chanut, was sent to convince the States General that the
king of France, while not wishing to take up arms against England, would
welcome an invitation to act as 'mediator and arbiter'. The Dutch were
asked to reject Cromwell's 'specious' proposal for the union of Great
423
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Britain and the United Provinces in a single republic, on the grounds that
' this coalition of the two Republics would be a leonine partnership which
would devour their liberty'. Mazarin attempted to secure the inclusion of
France in the Anglo-Dutch treaty, but he met with refusal. Though the
provinces of Friesland and Groningen voted in favour, that of Holland,
at the instance of De Witt, expressed categorical opposition: 'their bark is
too small to tow such a great vessel as France'. On 6 April 1654 the peace
was signed between England and the United Provinces.
In England, Cromwell was now Protector, having taken the oath on
16 December 1653. The time seemed ripe for an understanding between the
two statesmen. Mazarin's instructions of 16 July 1654 to the president de
Bordeaux recalled the common aim—the defeat of Spain—and specified the
conditions for an agreement: an annual subsidy of 1,500,000 livres and
8,000 men to help recapture Dunkirk which would be handed over to
England. Any conquests which might be made in the West Indies were
to be retained by the conqueror. On 3 November 1655 the president de
Bordeaux signed at Westminster a commercial treaty in French and Latin;
it was of modest scope, but excluded the possibility of a rapprochement
between England and Spain: 'There will henceforth be a lasting peace,
friendship, association and alliance between the Kingdom of France and
the Republic of England, Scotland and Ireland.' Hostile actions at sea
came to an end; outstanding questions were to be settled by arbitration,
with the Republic of Hamburg as referee. War with Spain was made
inevitable by Penn's attack on Santo Domingo and the seizure of
Jamaica. On 23 March 1657 Sir William Lockhart, sent to France as
ambassador, signed in Paris with Brienne and Lionne a closer alliance,
which was renewed the following year and had a specific objective: the
two countries were to attempt 'some spectacular feat of arms' in order to
force peace upon Spain. Charles II, having fled to Brussels, had now
rallied to the side of Spain, who had promised substantial assistance for
the reconquest of his kingdom. On 14 June 1658 Turenne, after investing
Dunkirk, defeated Don Juan of Austria, Conde and the duke of York
(later James II) at the Battle of the Dunes. Dunkirk capitulated on 24
June and, in accordance with the terms of the treaty, was handed over to
the English, who appointed Lockhart as governor. Mazarin's enemies
exploited this cession, alleging that, in spite of the precautions taken, the
Catholic faith was in peril in a stronghold delivered to the heretics by a
prince of the church!
On 3 September 1658 the Protector died, and there followed a short
period of political instability in England. The alliance was maintained
with Richard Cromwell, but when, on 8 May 1660, the monarchy was
publicly proclaimed in London and Charles II returned to power, rela-
tions with France were far from cordial. The president de Bordeaux, who
had negotiated the Treaty of Westminster and thus forced the exiled king
424
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRANCE AND INTERNATIONAL RELATIONS 1 6 4 8 - 6 0
to leave France, was obliged to leave London. Neither Charles II nor
Mazarin wished for a break. A friendly welcome was given to Ruvigny,
leader of the French Protestants, whose visit preceded the sending of an
official mission under the comte de Soissons, husband of Olympe Mancini.
Charles II did not allow his mother, Henrietta Maria of France, to inter-
fere in the government and refused to fall in with her plan for a marriage
between himself and Hortense Mancini, a plan to which Mazarin was
also opposed. Anxious to keep Charles as their ally and, at the same time,
to help Portugal, which had been abandoned at the peace, the French
government encouraged his marriage to Catharine of Braganza, who
brought her royal spouse Tangier, the key to the Mediterranean, and
Bombay. On 31 March 1661 Louis XIV's brother, the due d'Anjou, later
the due d'Orleans, married Henrietta of England, who was destined to
play an important part in maintaining the alliance between the two king-
doms. In 1662, Charles II was to sell Dunkirk to Louis XIV.
Peace had been preserved with the United Provinces, in spite of a
threatened break provoked by Ruyter's capture of two French vessels in
the Mediterranean. The States General had supported French mediation
in the north. The Treaty of London, signed on 6 August 1661, settled the
war which had broken out between Portugal and the United Provinces
after the rising in Brazil in 1654. The Dutch were to sign an alliance with
France on 27 April 1662.
Thus, despite differing systems of government and unforeseen events,
Mazarin's cherished dream of an alliance between France and the sea
powers was realized. His final advice to Louis XIV, as reported to
Charles II, is alleged to have been 'to create a community of interests
between the two states [France and England], so far as should be humanly
possible'. To Mazarin their interests appeared complementary. But how
long were they to remain so ?
In spite of the various conflicting events on the European scene, in both
the diplomatic and military spheres, the war against Spain was the real
hub of international relations. Its evolution was itself a function of the
internal evolution of France. There were two phases: the first, lasting
until 1654, was a period of defeat for France, when Spain, allied to the
Frondeurs, won back some of her advantages; the second was a period of
recovery for France, when she took the offensive on the various fronts;
in both periods negotiation and war went hand in hand.
After 1648 came a series of defeats on both land and sea. In Italy the
Spaniards took Casale, the Tuscan strongholds and Porto Longone; in
Spain they seized Barcelona; finally, in the Low Countries, they reoccupied
Ypres, Gravelines, Mardyk, Dunkirk and Rocroi (1653). In these cir-
cumstances Mazarin, twice forced into exile, showed admirable tenacity.
He gradually succeeded in re-establishing the internal situation; in
15
4 2 5
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
MHFDECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
August 1653 the royal army entered Bordeaux. On the eastern front, a
bold winter campaign (October to November 1653) led to the recapture
of Sainte-Menehould. Harcourt, the governor of Breisach, threatened by
La Ferte's armies and won over by Mazarin's offers, surrendered the
fortress. But these local successes were not decisive. Despite the king's
coronation at Rheims, Mazarin's enemies had not disarmed. Conde was
sending envoys to London to win over Cromwell; Bordeaux rallied to
Spain; Arras was besieged. At this time two diplomacies were claiming
to speak for the king and France: the one, directed against Mazarin,
reverted to the idea of an immediate peace with Spain; the other, inspired
by the cardinal, relied upon the coming victories to induce Spain to
make an honourable peace.
Following upon these setbacks, the siege and capture of Arras in 1654,
in a struggle between Turenne and Conde, marked the beginning of French
recovery. In Catalonia, Conti held Cerdagne and Conflans for France.
Spain had profited by the Fronde to consolidate her domination of Italy,
robbing France of the support of the dukes of Modena and Mantua. As
early as 1653, however, Mazarin sent the lieutenant general du Plessis
Bezancon on a journey through the peninsula to conciliate the princes and
counter Spanish influence in Mantua, Modena, Florence and Venice. A
fresh expedition was sent to Naples in 1655, in spite of unhappy memories
of the affair of 1647; entrusted to the due de Guise, it miscarried and con-
firmed Spanish control of the kingdom of Naples.
In Rome the situation was complex, owing to the impact of internal
political events on the attitude of the Holy See to France. Relations
between Mazarin and Innocent X, who was sympathetic to the Spanish
faction, were far from cordial. They had been embittered by the pope's
reception of Cardinal de Retz. On the death of his uncle, the archbishop
of Paris, on 21 March 1654, the coadjutor, imprisoned for his intrigues
during the Fronde, had relinquished the archbishopric in return for
financial compensation. He was transferred to the prison at Nantes, but
escaped and fled to Rome, where Innocent X gave him the cardinal's hat.
The pope's death, in the midst of the affair, raised a twofold problem:
how to bring about the election of a pope sympathetic to France, and
how to ensure that he should adopt, in regard to Retz, a policy acceptable
to the French government. After a conclave lasting for eighty days, France
waived her objection to Cardinal Chigi, who became Pope Alexander VII.
Despite the accusations of Jansenism hurled at the fugitive prelate—was
it not the period of the Lettres Provinciates!—Alexander VII, though un-
der pressure from Lionne, showed prudence and moderation; he was not
disposed to condemn Retz, but persuaded him, in December 1655, to
place the administration of the diocese of Paris in the hands of a vicar-
general. When he soon afterwards withdrew the powers he had delegated
to the vicar-general, Retz deeply offended the peacemaking pope. He was
426
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRANCE AND INTERNATIONAL RELATIONS 1 6 4 8 - 6 0
obliged to leave Rome and thereafter shared the life of those wanderers
through Europe so beloved of the period. Like Charles IV of Lorraine,
Christina of Sweden, or Conde, they come on to the stage of history, play
their part, and disappear. The antagonism to Rome engendered by this
episode was the prelude to the incidents which, in the second half of the
century, were to bring Louis XIV and the Holy See into conflict.
The Retz affair was but one example of the struggle in progress between
French and Spanish influences in the courts of Europe. Though there
was not always, as in Rome, a 'flying squadron' to decide the final out-
come, there were frequently strange alliances of sympathies and interests.
Negotiations followed the successive phases of the war. At first they
seemed no more than a continuation of the talks at Miinster, broken off
by the Spaniards in their pleasure at the defection of the Dutch. In
February 1649 Pefiaranda, the plenipotentiary of Philip IV, demanded
from Vautorte, sent as envoy to Brussels, the return to Spain of the French
conquests. The court in Madrid hoped to profit by the internal dissensions
in France and sent the archduke two mandates, one to treat with the king
and the other to treat with the Parlement of Paris. The Treaty of Rueil,
signed on 12 March 1649, foiled these subtle calculations. In 1656 serious
negotiations began; order had been restored in France and the Treaty of
Westminster now allied her with England. By choosing this moment to
treat with Spain, Mazarin would avoid having to cede Dunkirk—still to
be recaptured—to the English. Lionne arrived in Madrid on 4 July and
met Philip IV's minister, Don Luis de Haro. Three groups of questions
were discussed: first, which of the French conquests were to be retained
and which ought to be relinquished, in what form and within what limits;
next, the guarantees to be given to the allies, Portugal, Catalonia and the
dukes of Lorraine, Modena and Mantua; finally, the interests of Conde,
allied to Spain by the private treaty of 6 November 1651. This last ques-
tion led to a breakdown in the talks, for the Spanish government de-
manded the restoration of Conde's possessions, offices and dignities. The
French government agreed to restore possessions, but not offices. Conde's
success in raising the siege of Valenciennes, at the head of the Spanish
army on the night of 15-16 July, increased Philip IV's demands. Lionne
left Madrid in September and the French government signed the Treaty
of Paris with England. On 25 June 1658, after the Battle t>f the Dunes,
Dunkirk capitulated. The campaign of 1658 was disastrous for Spain:
she was defeated in Flanders, threatened in the Milanese by the duke of
Modena, and routed by the Portuguese near Elvas in Alemtejo. To humble
the pride of Philip IV, Mazarin pretended to be negotiating, at Lyons, a
marriage between the young king and Margaret of Savoy, daughter of
Christina of France and sister of the electress of Bavaria. Pimentelli was
thereupon sent from Madrid to offer the French court both peace and the
infanta.
427
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
15-2DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Twofold negotiations ensued; at first political and territorial, and later
dynastic. The first treaty, signed in Paris on 4 June 1659, reverted in
substance to the dispositions made in the Madrid conversations. Of her
conquests, France retained Artois, Roussillon and part of Cerdagne.
Spain relinquished the rights she had held in Alsace (from the treaty
concluded by Ofiate in 1617). Various strongholds in Luxembourg,
Hainault and Flanders were handed over to France. On the other hand,
France restored to Spain a large number of strongholds in Catalonia,
Italy and Flanders. On the subject of the allies, discussion was brief.
Mazarin undertook, by a clause in the secret articles of the treaty, not to
support Portugal if, within three months, she had not made peace with
Spain. An amnesty was stipulated for the Catalans. The arrangements
made at Cherasco were ratified in regard to the House of Mantua. The
question of Conde's return to France was settled to the satisfaction of
both parties. Heavy sacrifices were demanded of the duke of Lorraine,
now released after imprisonment by the Spaniards in Toledo since 1655:
he was required to cede the duchy of Bar and Clermont in Argonne, and
to allow French armies the right of passage through his duchy to Alsace.
The duke refused these conditions. By a new treaty, signed 28 February
1661, he regained his estates, but remained under French suzerainty.
The dynastic aspect of the negotiations had its element of romance in
the young king's infatuation with Marie Mancini, an obstacle overcome
by reasons of state. The question of rights to the Spanish succession had
been changed since 1656 by the birth of another infante. Don Luis de Haro,
demanding complete renunciation, prevailed over Mazarin who would
have liked to retain the infanta's right in regard to the Low Countries
and Franche-Comte. Her renunciation was to be conditional upon the
payment of a dowry of 500,000 gold crowns.
The 124 articles of the Treaty of the Pyrenees were signed by the two
ministers on 7 November 1659. On 9 June 1660 Don Luis de Haro, as
proxy for the king of Spain, introduced the infanta Maria Teresa, and on
26 August the young couple and the court returned to Paris. Though it
brought a happy ending to twenty-five years of war, the peace gave rise to
recriminations; the most celebrated protest was Saint-Evremond's
pamphlet. Why did the cardinal abandon his original ambition, the com-
plete conquest of the Spanish Netherlands, on the threshold of a cam-
paign which promised to be easy ? This is a delicate psychological problem
to which we can only suggest possible solutions. Was it the secret and
earnest desire of Anne of Austria, the possibility of securing the Spanish
inheritance, fear of the Austro-Spanish alliance, or the exhaustion of a
France threatened by famine ? In fact, the conquest of the Spanish Nether-
lands would have been neither swift nor easy, and would have meant a
war of some length. Northern Europe was in turmoil and the time had
come for France to intervene in the wars encircling the Baltic. Also, the
428
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRANCE AND INTERNATIONAL RELATIONS 1 6 4 8 - 6 0
Turks were still threatening Venice. The Treaty of the Pyrenees, coupled
with the marriage contract, represented a shift in activity from the terri-
torial and military to the dynastic and diplomatic spheres, and though it
confirmed the victory of France, it left the door open for many conflicts.
Article 101 of the Treaty of the Pyrenees provided for the joint inter-
vention of France and Spain to obtain 'a swift and satisfactory settlement'
for the powers engaged in the war in the north.
After the conclusion of the peace, the Franco-Swedish alliance had
survived only in a very limited form. The great Franco-Swedish period,
which dominated the first half of the century, had closed with the abdica-
tion of Christina. When Charles X ascended the throne of Sweden, other
political groupings were formed in the course of the wars. The new king,
fiery, bellicose and envious of the laurels of Gustavus Adolphus, was less
concerned with the observance in Germany of the provisions of the Peace
of Westphalia than 'to sow discord in the Empire' in order to consolidate
his control of the Baltic. He precipitated Sweden into a series of wars of
an extreme complexity owing to the interventions and volte-faces of neigh-
bouring powers, but in which it is possible to distinguish two main orienta-
tions, involving Poland and Denmark.
At the time of Queen Christina's abdication John Casimir, king of
Poland, also of the House of Vasa but of the Catholic branch, protested
against the accession of Charles X. The latter took advantage of Poland's
trouble with the Czar Alexis, who had responded to the appeal of the
rebellious Cossacks, to send his army to Warsaw and later to Cracow.
John Casimir fled to Silesia. When Charles X began upon the conquest
of Prussia, Poland revolted against his occupation, for religious as well as
political reasons. Frederick William, elector of Brandenburg, then allied
himself to Sweden. By the Treaty of Konigsberg (7 January 1656) he
broke the bond of homage uniting him to Poland in respect of the duchy
of Prussia and, despite the anger of the Dutch, declared that he held his
duchy from the king of Sweden, the new king of Poland. The Treaty of
Marienburg (15 June 1656) prescribed the aid which the elector and the
king were to give one another and outlined a first partition of Poland.
The allies re-entered Warsaw, which Charles X had been forced to aban-
don but, owing to the size of the country and the extreme mobility of the
Polish cavalry, military victory was slow to materialize. A new treaty
signed at Labiau (10-20 November 1656) put an end to Swedish suze-
rainty in Prussia.
The second act of the war was heralded by a reorientation and the entry
of Denmark into the struggle. Relations between Denmark and Sweden
had not been good. In 1645 Christian IV had been obliged by the Peace of
Bromsebro to make various concessions to Sweden: exemption from all
passage dues and right of search in the Sound and the Belts and on the
429
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Elbe; the cession of two Norwegian provinces, of the island of Gotland
in the middle of the Baltic and the island of Oesel at the entrance to the
Gulf of Riga. Taking advantage of Charles X's departure for Poland,
Christian IV's successor, his second son Frederick III, laid hands upon
the duchy of Holstein-Gottorp, which belonged to Duke Frederick, the
father-in-law of the Swedish monarch. Angered by this aggression, Charles
X crossed the Belts over the ice in January 1658 and laid siege to Copen-
hagen. Peace was signed at Roeskilde on 28 February, Sweden retaining
the provinces of Halland, Scania and Bleking, and half the customs dues
from the Sound. Dissatisfied with this treaty, Charles returned five
months later to besiege Copenhagen, with the intention of establishing
himself in Scania and closing the passages of the Sound. The reaction of
the Dutch, who had no wish to see Sweden dominate the Baltic, was
prompt: a fleet of thirty-five vessels relieved Copenhagen. Charles X's
position became critical, for a coalition against Sweden emerged from the
conjunction of the war with Denmark and the war with Poland.
After an unfortunate attempt at intervention in support of Charles X
by Rakoczy, prince of Transylvania, a vassal of the Turks who aspired to
the throne of Poland, the last act of the war was marked by the entrance
of Austria upon the scene. By the treaty of 1 December 1656, the emperor,
who had promised the Poles 4,000 men, attempted to detach the elector
of Brandenburg from his alliance with Charles X. By the Treaty of Wehlau
(24 September 1657), John Casimir conceded the sovereignty of Prussia to
Frederick William and freed the Prussian towns and nobles from their
oath of allegiance, swearing an eternal alliance between Prussia and
Poland. He also ceded to Brandenburg the town of Elbing, greatly to the
annoyance of Danzig and the Prussian nobility. The Treaty of Bromberg
(8 November) completed these arrangements; at Berlin, Austria, Branden-
burg and Poland concluded an offensive treaty against Sweden (Febru-
ary 1658).
Despite the distraction of the war with Spain, Mazarin had continued
to keep a very careful watch on events in the north. He remained faithful
to the policy of close alliances which had imposed the Peace of Westphalia
on the empire; as early as 1655, the French ambassadors d'Avaugour and
de Lumbres attempted to restore peace between the kings of Sweden and
Poland, each equally the friend of France. On 24 February 1656 Louis
XIV signed a treaty of alliance, including a guarantee, with Brandenburg;
Mazarin was at that time less concerned with the Baltic than with the
empire, where the imperial election was pending. The various attempts
at mediation failed. When, after Warsaw had fallen for the second time,
d'Avaugour and de Lumbres waited upon John Casimir, the Poles
refused to 'abandon Prussia for which they had fought for three hundred
years' and to treat with the elector of Brandenburg, 'a recreant vassal'.
At this very moment, in Konigsberg, the elector was receiving from a
430
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRANCE AND INTERNATIONAL RELATIONS 1 6 4 8 - 6 0
Russian ambassador the demand that he should agree to declare himself
the vassal of the czar in respect of Prussia.
These manoeuvres came to nothing on account of conflicting ambitions,
swift changes in the situation, the impetuous nature of Charles X, the
duplicity of Frederick William and the difficulties which beset France.
The alliance with England enabled Mazarin to intervene. In February
1659, by the Treaty of London, France and England undertook to restore
peace in the north on the basis of the Treaty of Roeskilde, slightly modi-
fied in favour of the Danes and the Dutch. The belligerents were given
six weeks to accept the mediation, with which Holland reluctantly
associated herself; when this period had elapsed, action was to be taken.
Charles X refused the offers of the mediators; Ruyter defeated the Swedes
at Nyborg (24 November 1659). For his part, the elector of Brandenburg
joined forces with the Austrians, invaded Swedish Pomerania and laid
siege to Stettin. But on 7 November the Treaty of the Pyrenees was signed,
and Mazarin informed Frederick William that Sweden was to retain
Pomerania. The League of the Rhine threatened to intervene in support
of Sweden; the Turks, who had punished the fickleness of Rakoczy,
protested against the entry of Austrian garrisons into certain fortresses on
the Hungarian frontier; the czar was once again threatening Warsaw.
A double congress opened in 1660, with the western powers as media-
tors. At Copenhagen, under the direction of the Chevalier de Terlon who
had replaced d'Avaugour, were Sweden and Denmark, with the repre-
sentatives of England and Holland; in the monastery of Oliva, near Dan-
zig, Sweden, Poland and Brandenburg met under the presidency of de
Lumbres. A double treaty concluded a conflict which had flared up in
many successive forms. The Treaty of Copenhagen (27 May-6 June 1660)
confirmed the terms of the Treaty of Roeskilde: Sweden retained the three
southern provinces of the Peninsula; the provisions excluding foreign
warships from the Baltic were abrogated. At Oliva the mediator had a
hard struggle to reconcile the interests of the three rival powers. The death
of Charles X on 13 February 1660 made an agreement easier. On 3 May
the last difficulties raised by Brandenburg, concerning Elbing and the
Pomeranian customs dues, were swept away. Poland renounced her claim
to the crown of Sweden; Livonia was partitioned, the northern half going
to Sweden and the southern half to Poland; Sweden relinquished Polish
Prussia and Kurland; Brandenburg evacuated Pomerania. Circumstances
had favoured the peacemaking efforts of the king of France, who was
declared guarantor of the articles concerning the interests of the various
powers. The Czar Alexis, to whom Louis XIV had sent as envoy a
certain Desminieres, having in December 1659 concluded with Sweden,
at Valiessar near Narva, a three years' truce which left him Dorpat, finally
signed the Peace of Kardis (July 1661), by which he renounced all his
conquests in Livonia. He was to be more fortunate with Poland, for when
431
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
he signed with her the Truce of Andrusovo (1667) he retained part of the
Ukraine or Little Russia, namely the left bank of the Dnieper, Kiev on
the right bank, and Smolensk—the first victories of the Muscovite
Empire in the face of the barrier in the east formed by Sweden, Poland
and Turkey, all traditional allies of France.
When Mazarin died, on 9 March 1661, a certain number of the prob-
lems which arose in European relations after the Peace of Westphalia had
been resolved. First, the great duel between France and Spain for con-
tinental ascendancy was now over. Spain was moribund. Her decadence
which began in the reign of Philip II, had been sealed by the Treaty of the
Pyrenees. Under Louis XTV the process of dismemberment was to
continue, and her very monarchy, as the result of marriages it was
unable to avoid, was to fall into the hands of a French dynasty. The
decadence of Spain was accompanied by decadence, though of a different
order, in the Holy Roman Empire. The concept of the empire as Austrian,
absolutist and Catholic, which the reforms of Maximilian, on the one
hand, and the aggressive tactics of Ferdinand II, on the other, had tried
to impose on the German lands, was now finally dead. The end of the
imperial dream was accompanied by the disintegration of Germany.
The country split up into several hundred autonomous states, each
jealous of its independence. In these conditions of general anarchy,
Mazarin had been able to take full advantage of the provisions of the
Treaty of Minister, but the League of the Rhine, a conservative body and
an obstacle to any return of imperial authority, remained a fragile creation
which required careful handling.
Too much stress is laid on the divisions in Germany during this period.
It is not sufficiently realized that there existed at the time what might be
called a feeling of nationhood; this declared itself, during the imperial
election of 1658, in favour of the Habsburg of Vienna. After 1660 a dis-
tinction must, of course, be made between the history of the empire and
that of Austria. But, while the strength of the Habsburgs lay chiefly in the
territorial importance of their possessions, the value of the title of
emperor must not be underestimated. Though it did not raise its holder
above other sovereigns, this title did designate him as the indispensable
bulwark against the Turkish menace and as the defender of Christendom.
Now, with regard to Turkey, the position of France was ambiguous.
Since 1645 the Venetians had been struggling against the Turkish invasion
of Crete. Mazarin secretly supported the republic and the French ambas-
sador was imprisoned in Constantinople. Blondel's mission of 1658 was a
failure. At this time we are again aware of the contradictions in French
policy in the Levant, which prevailed from the sixteenth century until the
end of the Ancien Regime. The Most Christian King, who in 1649 had
proclaimed himself the defender of the Maronites, not daring to make
either a friend or an enemy of the Turk, never reaped the full benefit of
432
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRANCE AND INTERNATIONAL RELATIONS 1 6 4 8 - 6 0
either the capitulations or the crusade. For Mazarin, the Turks were only
a pawn in the game of maintaining a balance of power in the Mediter-
ranean and the East, a counterweight to the might of the Habsburgs of
Vienna and Madrid.
In 1648 the alliance between France and Sweden was the keystone of the
European system established by the Treaties of Westphalia. These agree-
ments had made the northern state into a German power, playing in the
empire the role later to devolve upon Brandenburg—that of the natural
enemy of Austria, the leader of the Protestant party in Germany, dis-
posing of considerable material power and of a seasoned army always
ready for action. But by 1659 the alliance with France was no more
than a facade. Preferring to adopt an independent policy, Charles X had
attempted to wrest from Denmark and Poland the provinces required to
complete the Swedish encirclement of the Baltic. Though the war in the
north had, thanks to French mediation, maintained the status quo ante
bellum, it had at the same time confirmed the new hierarchy of the powers:
to confront a declining Sweden and a Poland now given over to anarchy
and a prey to the policy of partition which was to reach its climax in the
eighteenth century, there emerged two new powers—Brandenburg and
Russia. Though Frederick William had been obliged to yield on the
territorial question—over the acquisition of Pomerania—he had triumphed
on the question of sovereignty in Prussia. It had, admittedly, been laid
down that if the male line of descent from the elector should die out,
Prussia would again become a Polish fief; admittedly, the privileges of the
Prussian nobles and towns were still guaranteed by Poland; but the prin-
ciple had been established. There remained but a step from here to the
crown, and Fehrbellin was to make that step possible. French diplomats
had been astounded when, in the instrument of peace in 1648, Queen
Christina had caused the name of the grand duke of Muscovy to be in-
cluded among those of her allies. The French court knew little about the
court of 'the barbarous Emperor with the light eyes'. When a Russian
embassy visited Paris in 1654, Louis XIV had spoken of his distress at the
war between the czar and Poland and had offered to mediate between the
two powers. In the north, where the struggle for supremacy had begun,
France, the general peacemaker, had acted as arbiter, pending the fulfil-
ment of the plans of Colbert, who was eager to supplant the Dutch in the
Baltic trade, 'the most profitable trade of all'.
It was, in fact, the modifications caused in the European equilibrium by
the actions of the sea powers which proved the more important. These
powers were less concerned with territorial gains than with the develop-
ment of their colonial establishments, quite as common a cause of war as
European possessions. 'Trade is a war for money', as Colbert, the faithful
servant of Mazarin, was soon to remark, and money is the sinews of
war. It has often been suggested that the United Provinces were in decline
433
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
from 1660. This is untrue. They remained a great power, thanks to their
naval, colonial and banking strength. They were, nevertheless, to meet
the fate which had befallen Venice a century and a half earlier. While
maintaining their key positions—losing Brazil, but gaining Malacca,
Ceylon and the Cape from Portugal—they yielded before the upsurge of
British commerce. The death of Cromwell, the incompetence and retire-
ment of his son Richard and the recurrence of internal disputes, admit-
tedly led to the brief eclipse of England, an eclipse which perhaps chiefly
accounts for French supremacy at this time. But after 1668, and above all
after 1688, the recovery of England was to challenge Louis XIV's policy
of strength and prestige.
From the middle of the century there were signs, beneath their apparent
friendship, of the opposition between the two powers. The one, turned
towards the continent, fascinated by the mirage of the Spanish inheritance,
involved in the empire by the League of the Rhine, faithful to the disap-
pointing Swedish alliance; the other, looking towards the open seas, in
pursuance of a policy which was still symbolized by the Navigation Act
of 1651 and had in Jamaica, as well as Bombay and Tangier, laid the
foundations of her future greatness. It is in this context that the Anglo-
Dutch war of 1654 assumes a vital importance. Cromwell's dilemma was
clear: the choice lay between the federation desired for reasons of religion
—and destruction. There was direct opposition, in both scope and signi-
ficance, between this naval and colonial war, looking to the future, and
the Franco-Spanish war, the events in Germany and, to a lesser extent,
the war in the north. Thanks to Mazarin's intelligent handling of affairs,
the foundations of French continental supremacy had been laid but,
even more clearly, there now emerged to view, strengthened by popular
support and surviving the hazards of the Restoration, the guiding prin-
ciples and future objectives of British policy in the world.
434
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER XV
THE SPANISH PENINSULA 1598-1648 1
\ SPAIN without Philip II was difficult to imagine. For forty years every
Z-\ sudden alteration in the affairs of Europe had somehow seemed
•L JL connected with the man who sat alone at his desk in the Escurial,
surrounded by mountains of paper. 'When he goes', a Spanish noble had
remarked a year before his death, 'we shall find ourselves on another
stage, and all the characters in the play will be different. ' 2 In the event,
not only was the cast changed, but the play itself turned to tragedy.
The king died on 13 September 1598, leaving an aimless son and an
empty treasury. In 1596, for the third time in his reign, the crown had
repudiated its debts to the bankers. Financial exhaustion made peace
essential: peace with France in 1598 and with England in 1604. As
Spain slowly abandoned its militant imperialism, and the glorious pageant
of notable victories slipped quietly from the memory, the grim reality
could no longer be ignored. The nation which, for the extent of its empire
and the reputation of its arms, ranked as the greatest power in the world,
was visibly in a state of ruin, and its ruin demanded explanation. At once
came a spate of books, questioning, analysing, suggesting remedies. All
were devoted to explaining the paradox of Spain: the paradox that it
was poor because it was rich, that it had gold and silver in abundance
and yet it had none.
The very number of schemes and projects suggested a deep anxiety
about the condition of Spain. The years 1598 to 1621 were pre-eminently
years of national introspection, the first of those recurrent moments in
modern Spanish history when the country turns inward upon itself in an
agony of self-appraisal. They were years not only of crisis but also of the
awareness of crisis—of a sharpened sense of impending catastrophe. The
tragedy of Philip Ill's reign lay in the failure of the government to match
the words of the arbitristas—the economic writers—with corresponding
action. Court and arbitristas might have been living in different worlds.
But the contrast between a heedless court and anxious arbitristas was only
one among the many contrasts and paradoxes which gave to the reign
of Philip III its distinctive character: the contrast between the ostentatious
extravagance of a handful of aristocrats and the famine that haunted the
people; between the fervour of popular religion and the corruption of
moral standards; the paradox of the flowering of the arts in the autumn
1
The typescript of this chapter was completed in the summer of 1959.
Duque de Feria to Thomas Fitzherbert, 28 February 1597. Archive of the archbishopric
of Westminster, MS E.?., f. 15.
a
435
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
and winter of Spain's economic life. In the words of Gonzalez de Cellorigo,
Spain had become 'a republic of the bewitched, living outside the natural
order of things'; 1 a republic whose creation and whose symbol was Don
Quixote.
While the mood was to change, there was no breaking the enchantment.
Where the first twenty years of the seventeenth century were passive years
of governmental inactivity and national self-preoccupation, the following
twenty were to be years of renewed energy and action. In the field of
administration, lethargy gave way to feverish activity; after more than a
decade of pacifism, the aggressive imperialism of Philip II's later years
again became the order of the day. Some of the lessons of the arbitristas
were taken to heart, and attempts were made to correct the more glaring
defects in the economic and constitutional structure of the state, while
simultaneously restoring it to the position of European predominance it
had enjoyed in its prime. But too much was attempted, and not enough
achieved. The conde duque de Olivares, striving to attain what perhaps
was unattainable, drove his country too hard. After 1640 it was no more
than a broken relic of its former self, a defeated, disintegrating country
compelled by its own weakness to seek peace in 1648 with its most per-
sistent and dangerous enemies, the Dutch. In the space of fifty years, the
world empire of Philip II had sunk to the level of a second-rate power.
The reasons for this drastic alteration, the specific importance to be
attached to each of the circumstances surrounding Spain's collapse, have
long ranked among the most disputed of historical questions, raising as
they do the perennially absorbing problem of the rise and fall of empires.
The idea of 'decline' was inherent in the cyclical concept of history
favoured by the seventeenth century. States, like human beings, reached
their peaks and then declined in accordance with those inflexible laws that
governed the life of all living organisms. Of this universal process the
'decline of Spain' provided a classic example. But a purely determinist
explanation was neither fully satisfying nor universally acceptable. It was
tempting to search for specific causes of decline, and the explanations
of these varied with the preconceptions of different ages and nations.
Inside Spain, from as early as 1600, the causes of the country's decline
[declination] were being passionately discussed, while, outside the Penin-
sula, a 'Protestant' explanation was gradually taking shape. As the pros-
perity of the United Provinces came to be attributed in particular to their
policy of religious toleration, so Englishmen and Dutchmen of the seven-
teenth century came to regard Roman Catholicism as incompatible with
commercial success, and seized upon Spain as the proof of their thesis.
Their views were to find wide acceptance in the world of the Enlighten-
ment. To Protestants and rationalists of the eighteenth and nineteenth
1
Martin Gonzalez de Cellorigo, Memorial de la Politico necessaria y util restauracidn
a la Repiiblica de Espana (Valladolid, 1600), p. 25.
436
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SPANISH PENINSULA I 5 9 8 - 1 6 4 8
centuries, the decline was primarily to be explained by the intellectual
and religious history of Habsburg Spain; it was the outcome of the sup-
pression of free enquiry by the Spanish Inquisition, of Spain's cultural
isolation, and of that religious obscurantism which drove the industrious
Moriscos from the Iberian Peninsula. In the twentieth century, these pre-
dominantly religious explanations have been relegated to the background,
in favour of a closer concentration on purely economic conditions; on
the inherent weaknesses of Spanish trade and industry, on the fiscal
policies of the crown and on the effects of the price revolution.
Although the modern emphasis on Spanish economic conditions has
produced valuable work, it has been restricted in its scope. Under the
influence of Hamilton's pioneering study, 1 the greatest attention has been
devoted to problems of trade, finance and coinage, and little more is
known than was known fifty years ago about conditions of land tenure
and cultivation, or about population changes or the economic circum-
stances of individual classes of society. Until these subjects are examined
in detail, the current 'economic' interpretation will remain incomplete
and distorted. At the same time, the very concentration on certain aspects
of Spain's economic misfortunes has helped to encourage the assumption
that Spanish conditions were unique, and has prompted a search for
their origins in the dubious realm of supposedly unchanging national
characteristics. But if, as seems possible, the first half of the seventeenth
century was a period of economic crisis not only for Spain but for most of
Europe, the alleged characteristics of Spain in decline may neither be
necessarily confined to the Iberian Peninsula, nor be attributable solely
to the Spanish temperament. The 'idleness' to which the seventeenth-
century Spaniard was considered particularly prone, is often seen simply
as a failing in the national character. But idleness was a feature also of
English and French society in the same period and, allowing for variations
of emphasis from nation to nation, it might more correctly be regarded in
all three countries as the consequence rather than the cause of a backward
economy: the inevitable outcome of the inability of a predominantly
agrarian society to offer its population adequate or regular employment.
Yet even if Spanish conditions prove on closer examination to have
more in common with conditions in other contemporary societies than
is sometimes allowed, there is no escaping the fact that in the seventeenth
century Spain's international power declined. The country which domi-
nated Europe in the reign of Philip II fell into a secondary rank among
the European states in the reign of his grandson. But how far does this
loss of international status reflect the economic 'decline of Spain'? The
Spanish peninsula was not a single economic or administrative unit, but
1
Earl J. Hamilton, 'The Decline of Spain', Economic History Review, Vol. v m (1938),
and American Treasure and the Price Revolution in Spain, i$oi-l6so (Cambridge, Mass.,
1934)-
437
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
a complex of kingdoms and territories: Castile, Aragon, Valencia, Cata-
lonia, Navarre, Vizcaya, Galicia and Portugal. Spain is often equated
automatically with Castile, but many of these regions of the peninsula
were separated from Castile by different economies and monetary systems,
different forms of government, and even different languages. The rhythm
of life varied from one to the other. Agricultural decline in central Castile
was perfectly compatible with agricultural prosperity in the east of
Catalonia, monetary stability in Portugal or Valencia with violent fluc-
tuations in the coinage of Castile. If large tracts of the economic history
of Castile have been neglected, the life of the other Iberian kingdoms
during the seventeenth century has almost been forgotten. Enquiry into
the administrative and economic conditions of the various regions may
represent the most enlightening of all new approaches to the problems of
seventeenth-century Spain, in so far as it is likely to show that the 'decline
of Spain' consists of two connected, but not identical, processes: the
ending of Spain's predominance in Europe, and the ending of Castile's
predominance in Spain.
Spanish power in the later sixteenth century had primarily been Cas-
tilian power. Many of the best troops fighting for the king of Spain on
foreign battle-fields were Castilian; the officials who governed the Spanish
Empire were Castilian; the capital of the empire was located in the heart
of Castile, and the crown's revenues were provided largely by Castilian
taxpayers and by the mines of an America which belonged to Castile by
right of conquest. The resulting dependence of the Habsburgs on Castile
naturally gave the Castilians an advantage over the other nationalities
ruled by the dynasty, and helped to accelerate the transformation of the
Spanish into a Castilian Empire. The other dominions of the king of
Spain, and especially the realms and territories within the Iberian Penin-
sula, were uneasily aware of this transformation: 'the King is Castilian
and nothing else, and that is how he appears to the other kingdoms'. 1
But however much they might grumble at Castile's predominance, it
was too firmly established in the sixteenth century to be effectively
challenged. Castile's primacy derived from the vitality of a population
which far outnumbered that of the other kingdoms of Spain; from its
fiscal resources, greater and more easily exploited; and from its monopoly
of the trade and wealth of the New World. As long as it could keep these
assets, Castile would remain the natural head of the Spanish monarchy.
The years 1590 to 1620 were to prove crucial for the future of the Spanish
Empire precisely because they saw a drastic diminution of each of these
three assets. During the sixteenth century the sharp rise in food prices
1
In order to save space, no references will be given to the MS sources of quotations
which are to be found in the author's The Revolt of the Catalans; a Study in the Decline
of Spain (1598-1646) (Cambridge, 1963).
438
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SPANISH PENINSULA I 5 9 8 - I 6 4 8
and Castile's increasing dependence on supplies of foreign grain suggest
that, in spite of losses through emigration, foreign military service and
entry into the church, the population of Castile had been increasing faster
than the capacity of Castilian agriculture to feed it. In a country where
the sheep industry was officially favoured at the expense of arable farming,
and where the yield of the soil was restricted by lack of irrigation schemes
and by poor methods of cultivation, this swollen rural population natur-
ally drifted to the towns for work and sustenance. A population tightly
packed into a few large towns was terribly exposed to disease. In 1599
and 1600 famine and plague swept across Castile and Andalusia, and
ravaged the land. This great plague of 1599, with its long, dreary after-
math, was a catastrophic event in the history of Castile. While exact figures
do not exist, the epidemic may have claimed some half a million victims.
Its ravages brought the demographic upsurge of the sixteenth century
to a sharp halt, and left Castile with a population of around six million,
as compared with one million in Portugal and one million in the crown
of Aragon.
The decline in population inevitably affected Castile's capacity to meet
the fiscal demands of the crown. A village called Villatoro reported that
only eighty inhabitants had survived out of a population of over 300. In
response to the village's request for tax relief, the Council of Finance
agreed to reduce by 15,000 maravedis a year for two years, the annual
quota of 135,000 maravedis which it paid in the alcabala. 1 While the
example may not be typical, the inadequacy of the tax reduction in
relation to the village's loss of inhabitants gives some indication of the
crown's reliance on the fiscal contributions of Castile. While the other
kingdoms of the peninsula were shielded by their Cortes from excessive
fiscal demands, the Cortes of Castile had proved to be too weak to resist
the insistent requests of a king who lived on Castilian soil. Philip II had
therefore been able to place a heavy financial burden on a country whose
economic life was naturally precarious. The production of wool, on which
Castile's economy traditionally rested, had suffered since the middle of
the sixteenth century from a decrease in the number of migratory flocks
which had not been counterbalanced by the growth of sedentary grazing.
Agricultural production had proved insufficient to meet the country's
needs. Industry, crippled by high prices, the lack of capital investment
and the restrictive practices of the gilds, had found it hard to meet the com-
petition of cheaper foreign goods. Now, with the plague, there came an
acute shortage of labour, reflected in a 30 per cent rise in Castilian wages
in the next three years. This rise in wages coincided with the return of
European peace, which stimulated competition for international markets.
It is doubtful whether Castilian industry ever really recovered from the
1
Consulta of Council of Finance, 27 August 1601. A(rchivo) G(eneral de) S(imancas)
Hacienda, leg(ajo) 409, no. 222.
439
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
setback it suffered at this moment. High labour costs combined with the
loss of foreign markets to ruin native industries, until by the middle of
the seventeenth century even the great traditional cloth centres, like
Toledo and Segovia, had fallen into decay.
The collapse of urban industries in Castile left Castilian markets wide
open to foreign manufactures. Their increasing importation worsened an
already adverse balance of trade. Traditionally the trade deficit was made
up with the silver that came to Seville from America, but the stream
was gradually beginning to run dry. In 1597 Spanish merchants began for
the first time to realize that the American market was overstocked. 1
Although the record year for Seville's trade with America was to be 1608,
and the trade figures fluctuated around a high level until 1620, the whole
pattern of Spain's commerce with the New World was changing in the
reign of Philip III, to the detriment of the national economy. As Mexico
developed its industries, and Peru its agriculture, the colonies' dependence
on the traditional products of the mother country diminished. There was
less demand in America for the Spanish cloth, and for the wine, oil, and
flour which had bulked so large in the trans-Atlantic shipments of the
sixteenth century. Instead of the traditional Spanish goods, the ships
that set out from Seville carried an increasingly large proportion of foreign
products; so large, indeed, that Sancho de Moncada, writing in 1619,
believed that nine-tenths of the American trade was by now in foreign
hands. This fateful loss of the American market undermined the confi-
dence and credit of the merchants of Seville, and still further reduced the
chances of industrial revival in Castile. Less American silver was now
entering Castile; less was coming into Spanish hands, and there was less
to bridge the widening gulf between Castile's imports and exports.
With a declining population, diminished national wealth, and de-
creasing revenues from the Indies, the foundations of Castile's primacy
were crumbling in the years between 1590 and 1620. Beneath a surface
which, to all outward appearances, remained the same, the character of
the Spanish Empire was changing. Castile, which for so long had taken
the lead, was growing weary. It still asserted its absolute superiority over
all the other parts of the Peninsula and Empire, and would continue to do
so with increasing determination; but the solid backing for its claim was
far less apparent in the seventeenth century than it had been before. It is
this which makes the opening years of the seventeenth century a decisive
moment in the fortunes of the Spanish Empire. It was primarily the
period of Castile's decline; of an absolute decline in wealth, population
and productivity from the level attained in the mid-sixteenth century,
and a relative decline in comparison with some other parts of the Iberian
1
See the detailed study of American trade by H. and P. Chaunu, Seville et VAtlantique
(Paris, 1955-9), especially Vol. vin,2,ii, for this and later comments.
440
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SPANISH PENINSULA I 5 9 8 - I 6 4 8
Peninsula. Where, under Charles V and Philip II, the central kingdom
of the Peninsula, Castile, had been strong, and the peripheral kingdoms
weak, some of those kingdoms in the first decades of the seventeenth
century escaped certain of the worst misfortunes that afflicted Castile,
and consequently improved their relative standing within the Peninsula.
As a result, Spain was faced with a period of delicate adjustments, since
Castile's absolute political preponderance was no longer accompanied
by the overwhelming economic preponderance it had enjoyed in the
sixteenth century.
The adjustments would never have been easy, but the crown's financial
problems made them immeasurably harder. The extravagant enterprises
of Philip II's later years, leading to the bankruptcy of 1596, had involved
the crown in heavy debts. Not only did it owe an enormous sum of
accrued debts to the bankers, but an investigation of the royal finances in
October 1598 suggested that the annual deficit would still be as high as
1,600,000 ducats in 1601 and succeeding years. 1 This figure must be seen
in the light of an annual expenditure of some 9,000,000 ducats in the
opening years of Philip Ill's reign. During these years, the ministers in
charge of the crown's finances had to work with the knowledge that only
three major sources of income remained to them, now that most of the
crown's traditional supplies had been mortgaged to the bankers in per-
petuity, and the secular revenues of all the king's European possessions
other than Castile were consumed on the spot. These three major sources
of income consisted of the taxes paid by Castile, the dues collected from
ecclesiastics and laymen in the various kingdoms of the monarchy by
papal authorization, and the annual supply of silver brought by the
treasure-fleet. Their nominal annual yield was as follows: 2
Taxes paid by Castile
Akabala (10% tax on sales)
Millones (tax on articles of consumption)
Servicios (voted by Cortes)
ducats
2,800,000
3,000,000
400,000
6,200,000
Dues collected by papal concession
Cruzada
Subsidio
Excusado
912,000
420,000
271,000
1,603,000
Treasure-fleet
2,000,000
In reality, the crown received nothing like so large a sum each year as
these figures suggest, since some of the taxes were already pledged to the
bankers two or three years in advance. As an indication of the crown's
1
Relacion of 21 October 1598. AGS Hacienda, leg. 380, no. I.
These figures are taken from various papers of the Council of Finance in AGS Hacienda
for the years 1598-1607, and must be treated as rough estimates.
2
441
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
real annual revenues they are therefore misleading. Their value lies in
their revelation of the relative contribution made to the crown's finances
by each of its remaining sources of supply. In particular, they show how
great was the crown's dependence on the assistance of Castile. But Cas-
tile's depopulation and its economic prostration meant that its contri-
butions were increasingly uncertain: by 1606, for example, the millones
yielded less than 2\ million ducats.
At the same time the crown's supplies of American silver were also
beginning to fall, probably because of declining production in the mines,
and the withholding of larger sums by the viceroys in America for their
own needs. In 1598 the treasure-fleet had brought 3,347,000 ducats. This
was an exceptional figure, and 2,000,000 ducats was nearer the average
during the first years of the new century. The figure fell to some 1,800,000
in the middle of the second decade, and the fleets of 1619, 1620 and 1621
brought only some 800,000 ducats each. There was a recovery after
these unusually poor years, but between 1621 and 1640 1,500,000 ducats
represented a very good year, and not more than a million ducats a year
could be expected with any degree of confidence.
It is against this sombre background of the slump in silver supplies
from America and the diminishing fiscal returns from Castile that the
crisis of Spanish imperialism between 1600 and 1640 must be seen. Con-
fronted by the vast debts of its predecessor, a large annual deficit, and the
threatened failure of traditional revenues, Philip Ill's regime would either
have to make a drastic cut in expenditure, or find and exploit alternative
sources of supply. A reduction of expenditure would entail the further
retreat of Spanish imperialism, and the renunciation of spending habits
that were deeply engrained, but the exploitation of new sources of supply
offered still more obvious difficulties. For political as well as economic
reasons it would be inadvisable to impose any new direct taxes on Castile.
Perhaps more money could be obtained from the king's other dominions,
and especially from those within the Spanish peninsula.
Kingdoms like Aragon and Valencia did not pay the two heaviest
taxes paid by Castile, the millones and the alcabala, and their Cortes,
unlike those of Castile, were summoned infrequently and voted subsidies
at irregular intervals. A memorandum presented to Philip III at the be-
ginning of his reign dwelt at some length on this fiscal anomaly: 'in all
other states, all the parts contribute to the maintenance and greatness of
the head, as is only j u s t . . . But in ours it is the head which does the work
and sustains the other members. n In other words, Castile, the head of the
monarchy, had for too long borne the full weight of the burden imposed
on the country by Habsburg imperialism, and could legitimately expect
the other kingdoms to offer more effective help. It was easy, however, for
those who argued like this to overlook something which the other king-
1
Alamos de Barrientos, L'Art de Gouverner, ed. Guardia (Paris, 1867), p. 67.
442
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SPANISH PENINSULA I 5 9 8 - I 6 4 8
doms could never forget: that if Castile contributed more than the rest
to the preservation of Spain's Empire, it also enjoyed the most lucrative
offices in that empire, and a preponderant role in the formulation of policy.
These conflicting points of view contained the seeds of an angry dialogue
which was to develop during the coming decades between a Castile
desperate for help and realms which felt themselves under no obligation
to pay for the defence of an empire in which they had no share. The very
existence of this dialogue suggested that far more was involved than a
simple fiscal problem in any attempt on the part of the crown to spread
taxes more evenly over the Peninsula. Such an attempt would raise the
whole question of the constitutional structure of the monarchy; of the
relation of the various kingdoms to Castile and to their king. Since they
were notoriously sensitive to any governmental action which threatened
their traditional laws and constitutions, attempts to reorganize long-
standing fiscal arrangements would need the most cautious diplomacy.
Yet the crown was heavily in debt, and Castile in urgent need of relief.
If, as was not impossible, the constitutional obstacles to the achievement
of greater fiscal parity between the various kingdoms were too formidable
to be hastily brushed aside, alternative means of relief must quickly be
found. Otherwise the precarious fiscal foundations of Habsburg imper-
ialism were in danger of collapsing beneath the strain.
Those who hoped for bold fiscal and constitutional measures from the
new regime were rapidly disillusioned. Philip III himself was a nonentity.
Personally incapable of governing, he set the pattern for his seventeenth-
century successors by placing his confidence in a single minister entrusted
with all the important affairs of state. The presence of this omnicompetent
minister, known as the privado or favourite, was to cast a long shadow
over the government of Spain throughout the century, and perplex a
nation which, by instinct and tradition, expected its kings to be kings.
The privado of Philip Ill's choice was a well-intentioned but indolent
Valencian aristocrat, the marques de Denia, soon to be created duque de
Lerma. Nothing in Lerma's character would have led his acquaintances to
expect in him a capacity for ruthless action, and in his twenty years of
personal rule he never deceived expectation. This, as he himself was fully
aware, was the explanation of his survival. He was a prisoner in a gilded
cage, the pawn of a small group of Castilian and Andalusian magnates.
He lived, and knew that he lived, upon the sufferance of about thirty-two
grandees, the inner circle of a Castilian aristocracy of some 120 dukes,
marquises and counts. A study of these powerful territorial magnates is
yet to be made, but there are signs that they enjoyed increasing political
influence during the reign of Philip III. Excluded from the inner councils
of the realm by Charles V and Philip II, great magnates like the duques
del Infantado had preferred to hold a court of their own in the isolated
443
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
grandeur of their family seat, rather than humble themselves in constant
attendance upon an ungrateful monarch. On the death of Philip II their
long years in the wilderness came to an end. Attracted by the alluring
prospects of entry into a world of political influence and lucrative offices
hitherto denied them, they moved to Madrid, thereby contributing both
to the magnificence of court life and to the troubles of Lerma. Afraid of
offending the powerful interests that surrounded him, he found that the
best means of retaining power was to refrain from exercising it, and con-
tented himself with a lavish bestowal of patronage on friends, relations
and potential rivals alike.
A minister with such limited abilities and such heavy obligations to
those around him was not the man to undertake radical reforms. Crown
expenditure continued at a fantastically high level. There was never enough
money either to pay the troops regularly, or to meet the daily expenses of
the royal households. In his determination to escape the unpopularity of
imposing new taxes or extending existing ones to social groups and geo-
graphical regions at present exempt, Lerma fell back upon what appeared
to be more painless methods of increasing the crown's revenues, such as
the sale of offices and privileges of nobility, and the alienation of royal
jurisdictions. The inadequacy of these measures compelled him to have
recourse also to the manipulation of the coinage. In 1599 a vellon coinage
of pure copper was authorized. In 1603 this was returned to the mints to
be stamped at double its face value. Although the Cortes in 1607 made
their vote of taxes conditional on the suspension of vellon production,
it was resumed in 1617 and continued, with interruptions, until 1626.
Lerma introduced his fiscal experiments into a country which was just
beginning to draw breath after the long price rise of the sixteenth century.
Between about 1600 and 1615 the Castilian price level was stationary,
and the premium on silver in terms of vellon stood at about 4 per cent.
Although inflation during these years was still relatively insignificant,
the increasing circulation of vellon in Castile added to the economic ad-
vantages already enjoyed by the nations of northern Europe in their
trade with Spain. The vellon was largely minted from Swedish copper,
sold at high prices on the bourse at Amsterdam. The purchase of copper
itself constituted a drain on Castilian silver, but the loss was inevitably
increased by the practice indulged by the Dutch and their agents along
the Spanish coast of introducing counterfeit coins into Castile and taking
silver in exchange. The influx of these smuggled coins, and the growing
quantity of legal vellon in circulation, eventually played havoc with
Castilian prices. The fall in real prices, which began about 1620, was con-
cealed by the rapid inflation of Castile's debased coinage. The premium
on silver reached nearly 50 per cent in 1626. In the following years in-
flation, alternating with sudden deflationary measures, caused Castilian
prices to fluctuate violently, and put Castile's economy at a grave dis-
444
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SPANISH PENINSULA I 5 9 8 - I 6 4 8
advantage both to that of other regions of the Peninsula and of other
parts of Europe.
The relief that debasement brought to the royal finances was short-
lived. Lerma was lavish in the granting of offices, pensions and privileges;
his confidants, adventurers like Don Pedro Franqueza and Don Rodrigo
Calderon, used their positions to accumulate vast personal fortunes out
of public funds; and the court, which at Lerma's behest was transferred
at great expense from Madrid to Valladolid in 1601 and remained there
till 1606, displayed a degree of ostentation remarkable even for that age
of court magnificence.
While the regime's inability to curb expenditure prevented any reduction
of Castile's taxes, the inadequacy of the existing taxes to meet the annual
deficit compelled a resort to credit which placed a growing strain on the
crown's bankers. By the summer of 1607 they were professing themselves
unable to make further advances, and in November of that year the crown
was forced by the stringency of credit to default on its obligations and
announce a total suspension of payments. It was the repetition of an old
story; but this time, instead of a period of twenty years between one royal
bankruptcy and the next, the gap was reduced to ten.
Although, as always, a settlement was finally reached with the bankers,
the royal accounts remained sadly unbalanced. The sum available for the
year 1608 was expected to be 6,410,104 ducats (of which 2,241,942 ducats
had come from the Indies). The expected expenditure until the end of
October 1608, excluding the inevitable extraordinary expenses in Flanders,
Italy and elsewhere, was calculated as 7,272,173 ducats:
Pay for the Flanders army
Pay for frontier guards and garrisons
Atlantic fleet
Troops of the guard
Arms manufacture
Ambassadorial expenses
Ordinary expenses of royal households ducats
2,000,000
794.063
650,000
200,000
100,000
100,000
620,000
Two years pay for servants of royal households, in part payment for three
years' arrears
Mediterranean fleet and Genoa squadron
Arrears payable to bankers
Urgent outstanding expenses
Sundry lesser expenses 200,180
400,000
1,000,000
250,000
957,93°
7.272,173
This implied a deficit of 862,069 ducats, in addition to outstanding obliga-
tions to the bankers and general arrears which indebted the crown to the
extent of more than 7,000,000 ducats, 'the exact figure not being given
since its liquidation will be impossible without long delays and diffi-
culties'. 1
1
Consulta and relaciones, 22 December 1607. AGS Hacienda, leg. 536, no. 405.
445
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
There seemed only one way of escape. The war in Flanders had been
slowly grinding to a halt, as scarcity of money reduced the Spanish armies
to defensive warfare. At the end of 1606 the first tentative moves were
made towards the negotiation of a truce with the Dutch, but questions of
prestige made progress slow. The bankruptcy of 1607, however, showed
that a settlement in Flanders was essential. Lerma seems to have handled
his more bellicose colleagues with skill, but it was sheer financial necessity
which finally produced the Twelve Years Truce signed with the Dutch
in April 1609. The majority of the king's ministers accepted it with reluc-
tance. According to one of them, writing a few years afterwards: "The
truce in Flanders was considered an indispensable measure because of
the shortage of money. 51
However unenthusiastic the reception accorded to a truce made with
heretics and rebels, Spain was at last at peace with all the world. The
return of peace did not, however, bring the expected advantages. Even if
expenditure on the army in Flanders could now be halved, new emer-
gencies were always occurring to absorb any money saved on military
expenditure in the Netherlands. It also became clear that the Dutch stood
to gain even more from peace than war. Already before the truce they had
broken into the Caribbean and had started to make inroads into Portugal's
Far Eastern Empire; and they had long been supplying Spain itself, either
legally or under cover of Hamburg flags, with manufactures from northern
Europe and with grain and naval stores from the Baltic. The coming of
peace removed the last obstacles from their path. Northern products
carried in Dutch vessels flooded into Spain, either for home consumption
or for export to the New World. Since Spain could not offer in exchange
sufficient goods to provide a full cargo for the return journey, the balance
was made up in American silver.
The constant loss of silver to foreign countries, the domination of
Spain's economic life by foreign merchants, and the unsatisfactory
character of a trade which exchanged native raw materials for foreign
manufactures, caused deep concern among the arbitristas. In their opinion
the sole cure for Castile's troubles lay in the encouragement of native
industry and agriculture. But how was this to be done? Although each
had his own special remedy, leading arbitristas like Sancho de Moncada,
Fernandez Navarrete, Lison y Biedma, were generally agreed on both
the diagnosis and the principal features of the cure. They applied them-
selves in particular to two points: Spain's economic relations with the
outside world, and the necessity for a programme of internal reform.
Almost without exception the arbitristas when considering the first of
these points advocated protectionist measures. It was essential to break
the hold of foreign merchants and bankers on Spain's economic life, and
1
Don Fernando Carrillo to king, 17 June 1616. AGS Hacienda, leg. 536, no. 162.
446
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SPANISH PENINSULA I 5 9 8 - 1 6 4 8
to forbid the import of foreign goods. Once the country ceased to be
dependent on foreigners, there was a real chance of economic revival.
But such a revival demanded a radical programme of internal reforms.
The root causes of Spain's troubles were diagnosed by the arbitristas as
the high rate of taxation, the love of luxury, the pursuit of idleness, and
the diversion of the population into economically unproductive occupa-
tions. They saw at the heart of their country a vast court, a monstrous
tumour swelling larger and larger, and relentlessly consuming the life of
the nation. The court and the swollen bureaucracy were crying out for
reform. Let the king reduce the size and expenditure of the royal house-
holds; let him forbid the prodigious expenditure of his wealthy subjects
on costly jewels, clothes and buildings; let him call a halt to the lavish
outpouring of gifts and favours at the expense of a bankrupt royal
treasury; let him stop the sale of offices, send back the nobles to their
estates, and clear the court of the hordes of servants and suitors which
infested it. Let him reform the thirty-two universities and four thousand
grammar schools, the breeding grounds of scribes, tax-collectors, and
government officials, and forbid new foundations of colleges and con-
vents. Finally, let him give special privileges and tax concessions to labour-
ers and married men, so that the fields might be brought back to cultiva-
tion, and the countryside be repopulated.
The spur to this ambitious programme of reform was a hatred which
was not confined to Spaniards: the hatred of the vast, extravagant,
inefficient apparatus of government which in Spain, as in other nations
of western Europe, was growing more expensive and more powerful until
it threatened to squeeze all the life out of the nation. But a large bureau-
cracy and a parasitic court were not to be reformed out of existence by
the stroke of a pen. In advocating their reforms of Spanish government
and society, the arbitristas were in effect challenging the most powerful
forces in Spain. On one side they were confronted by the inertia of the
masses; on the other by the vested interests of the powerful oligarchy of
landowners, churchmen, office-holders and courtiers determined to pre-
serve the established order.
This established order drew its strength from the social organization
of Castile and from the administrative processes developed under Habs-
burg government. The complexity of the task awaiting anyone willing
to challenge its customary practices can be seen from the character of
Spanish taxation and the fate of seventeenth-century attempts at its re-
form. The operation of the Spanish tax system in the early seventeenth
century could be criticized on the double count of social injustice and
economic inefficiency. It contained at least two striking anomalies.
Within Spain, Castile paid much more proportionately in taxes than the
other kingdoms of the Peninsula; and within Castile itself the more im-
poverished classes of society paid incomparably more than the rich.
447
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
The duque de Lerma, after the failure of a half-hearted attempt to extend
the millones to Vizcaya, decided to leave the first of these fiscal anomalies
severely alone. He showed himself no more courageous in his approach
to the tax structure within Castile, although it was visibly operating to
the prejudice of the more industrious sections of the community.
Unassisted by the other kingdoms, Castile was expected to provide
over six million ducats a year in taxes for the crown. Evenly distributed,
this would have come to about a ducat a year for every man, woman and
child in the kingdom, at a time when a Castilian labourer's annual in-
come was about eighty ducats. But the distribution was extremely uneven,
and methods of collection created the maximum inconvenience. Hidalgos,
who probably accounted for some io per cent of the population, were
exempt from the servicios voted by the Cortes, and the wealthy had
methods of escaping payment of the alcabala and the millones which were
not available to the poor who bought retail.' There is extreme inequality
between the contributions of the poor and the rich', declared a would-be
reformer of the tax system, who calculated that, in a poor man's daily
expenditure of 30 maravedis (there being 375 maravedis to the ducat), 4
went in the alcabala and the millones. 1
Lerma's government did nothing to redistribute contributions on a
more equitable basis, and was unwilling or unable to use tax concessions
to stimulate economic activity. Many powerful interests would have been
antagonized by a thorough fiscal reorganization, even if this had been
administratively possible, and the poor had no friends in high places to
speak for them. Nominally this was the duty of the Cortes of Castile, but
by the seventeenth century the procuradores of the Cortes represented
little more than the interests of the exclusive municipal oligarchies from
which they were drawn. As hidalgos they did not pay the servicios which
they voted, and their own social background aligned them with those
groups in Castilian society interested in the continuation of the present
system. By placing the bulk of the taxes on essential articles of consump-
tion, this system automatically discriminated against agricultural workers
and artisans, who found themselves at the tax-collector's mercy.
Foreign travellers in seventeenth-century Castile ascribed much of its
misery and depopulation to its peculiar tax system. They saw nothing but
desert: a monotonous, boulder-strewn landscape, with here and there a
half-deserted village. Although the value of their testimony is to some
extent reduced by their unfamiliarity with methods of cultivation in a
countryside more reminiscent of Africa than of Europe, many of their
comments can be confirmed from other sources. A Castilian village was
easy prey, with few means of natural defence. It was exposed not only to
the unwelcome attention of the quartermaster and the recruiting sergeant,
1
Actas de las Cortes de Castillo, Vol. 39, p. 142.
448
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SPANISH PENINSULA I 5 9 8 - I 6 4 8
but also to the depredations of the tax-collector, and to the exactions of
powerful nobles who encroached on the common lands, pressed hard for
their feudal dues and passed the taxes for which they were liable on to the
shoulders of their vassals. When a village was oppressed in this way, it
was compelled to have recourse to loans, often with disastrous conse-
quences. In the little village of Sanzoles, for example, a succession of bad
harvests prevented the villagers from paying the annual interest on the
censo or rent-charge with which they had raised their loan. As the arrears
mounted, the creditors moved in and seized their property. Eventually,
out of ninety householders no more than forty were said to remain. 1
This was the story of many villages. Rural life had become so insecure that
many villagers abandoned their homes for the shelter of some town which
offered better protection against an endless succession of fiscal demands.
On the one hand, Castile was a land of deserted villages, abandoned
by peasants who had run into debt as a result of bad harvests, ceaseless
fiscal exactions and the fixing by government decree of artificially low
prices for agricultural products. On the other hand, it was a land of vast
latifundia, in the inalienable possession of the church or of great aristo-
cratic families uninterested in the improvement of their estates. If agri-
culture were ever to recover, it seemed that absentee landlordism must
first be abolished. In a consulta of September 1609 Lerma's government
attempted to tackle the problem of rural depopulation by suggesting that
absentee landlords leave the court and return to their estates. This, it was
hoped, would encourage their vassals to remain on the land. But the
measure was inadequate and totally ineffectual. The whole fiscal and
social structure of the country was such that towns and court proved
irresistible magnets to a population which could find neither adequate
security nor remunerative employment in the countryside.
Although the movement of the rural population to the towns might
have provided cheap labour for industry, an industrial revival depended
upon the availability both of personal enterprise and capital resources.
Here again, Castile found itself prejudiced by methods of government
finance which had given birth to a highly organized system of credit. The
crown's persistent need for money had led to the wide circulation of
juros or government bonds yielding a fixed annuity. These juros, together
with censos, were bought by all those with money to spare or to save—
by government officials, by members of the powerful municipal oli-
garchies, by wealthy middlemen in the villages, and by convents and
pious foundations anxious to invest their funds. The result was the crea-
tion in Castile of a vast rentier class living comfortably off its yearly dues.
The investment habits of this class diverted large sums of money from
channels which might have enriched the nation's economic life. According
to the Council of Finance, censos and juros offered better interest rates
1
Consulta of Council of Finance, 25 March 1607. AGS Hacienda, leg. 473.
449
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
than those to be gained from investment in trade, agriculture or industry,
and as long as this continued, there was no hope of reviving the Castilian
economy. 1
If this striking statement by the Council of Finance is correct, or
accurately reflects contemporary opinion, at least some of the backward-
ness of economic enterprise in Castile can be satisfactorily explained. A
detailed study of the social and economic consequences of the censos
and juros would in any event be extremely valuable, since the oppor-
tunities which they provided for the safe investment of capital may help
to account for one of the most remarkable features of seventeenth-
century Castilian society: the complete absence of a vigorous urban class
actively engaged in commercial and industrial enterprises. Such a class
had in fact existed in Castilian towns like Burgos and Medina del Campo
during the first half of the sixteenth century, but by the seventeenth it was
gone, and its place in the Castilian economy had been taken by well-
established communities of foreign merchants who dominated the com-
mercial life of a passive society. Its disappearance left an obvious gap.
According to Gonzalez de Cellorigo in 1600:
Our republic has come to be an extreme contrast of rich and poor, and there is no
means of adjusting them one to another. Our condition is one in which there are
rich who loll at ease or poor who beg, and we lack people of the middle sort,
whom neither wealth nor poverty
prevents from pursuing the rightful kind of busi-
ness enjoined by Natural Law. 2
'People of the middle sort', with the enterprise and the resources to
invest in trade or industry might one day, as in the Netherlands or
England, have succeeded in transforming a society dominated by a tra-
ditional outlook and traditional habits. In their absence, Castilian
society stood still. Church and aristocracy, the two most influential forces
in medieval Castile, were, if possible, more powerful in the seventeenth
century than they had been in the fifteenth. Already in possession of
some 95 per cent of the soil of Castile at the start of the sixteenth century,
they had continued to accumulate lands, the church by acquisition of
lands in mortmain, the great magnates by establishing mayorazgos [en-
tails] and building up vast entailed estates.
Church and aristocracy were therefore admirably placed for the con-
tinued propagation of their traditional ideals. These ideals, martial and
crusading, were already deeply engrained in a society which for many
centuries had devoted its energies to the waging of a Holy War against
the Moors, and they acquired further life and prestige from the mira-
culous discovery of America. The persistence of these ideals into the
sixteenth century helped to perpetuate in Castile a social outlook ill-
equipped to cope with the economic problems which the acquisition of
1
2
Consulta of Council of Finance, 3 September 1617. AGS Hacienda, leg. 547, no. 58.
Memorial de la Politico, p. 54.
450
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SPANISH PENINSULA I 5 9 8 - 1 6 4 8
empire brought in its train. It was natural to disregard the dictates of
financial prudence when one could rely upon an annual shower of Ameri-
can silver to replenish the national coffers. Equally, it was hard for a
nation imbued with aristocratic and religious ideals to abandon its
traditional contempt for manual labour.
It was, of course, true that the contempt for manual labour was far
from being an exclusively Castilian characteristic. Castile only shared a
common European ideal of nobility and the impoverished Castilian
hidalgos who haunted the court in pursuit of royal favour and scorned to
work for a living differed little from the hobereaux of France and the
gentry of England. Castile seems to have been remarkable less for any
great originality in its national ideals than for the tenacity with which
they were held, and for the way in which the political, social and economic
circumstances of the age conspired to favour them. If manual labour and
economic enterprise were at a discount in a society which glorified the
ideals of church and aristocracy, the harsh realities of seventeenth-
century Castilian life worked to the same end. The proportion of hidalgos
to the rest of the population was very high, especially in north Castile;
the laws of landownership and inheritance kept the land market tight,
and left the control of the soil in the hands of a class of powerful land-
owners uninterested in agrarian improvements; chronic underemploy-
ment in an ill-organized agrarian economy made idleness inevitable;
sudden monetary changes, an arbitrary tax system, and the profits to be
gained from the purchase of censos and juros removed all incentive to
financial enterprise; and if church, army and a parasitic bureaucracy
absorbed a considerable proportion of the population into economically
unproductive occupations, the economy itself was incapable of providing
alternative outlets.
The exaltation of military and religious ideals therefore to some ex-
tent made a virtue of necessity, but it also helped to create a climate little
conducive to fundamental changes in social and economic attitudes. The
aristocracy naturally set a pattern of life which the rest of the nation
aspired to imitate.
The natives of these kingdoms, each in his own sphere and station, desire honour
and estimation above everything else,
wrote a minister of the crown in 1641.
Each tries to advance himself, and so all apply themselves to those jobs which are
held in the highest esteem. This is apparent in the fact that no son follows in his
father's footsteps. The shoemaker's son abhors that particular calling; the merchant's
son wants to be a caballero, and the same is true of all the rest. 1
This craze for hidalguia, for a title of nobility, dominated the social
aspirations of the inhabitants of Castile. Anyone who became rich would
1
Paper by Jose Gonzalez. AGS Guerre Antigua, leg. 1378.
451
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
acquire land, buy a title, found a mayorazgo. His younger sons, like those
of the aristocracy, would join the army, or be sent to the university as the
first step towards a career in the bureaucracy or the church. Salamanca
and Alcala, although they had lost the intellectual vigour which dis-
tinguished them in the sixteenth century, swarmed with students who saw
in a university education and in the recommendation of their college the
sole hope of future employment. There were too many students, too
many lawyers, too many clergy. Yet however great the number of posts,
there were always more candidates. The councils in Madrid were bom-
barded with petitions for mercedes or favours, for pensions and offices.
The search for jobs was the disease of the age.
The unsuccessful joined the great army of the idle, which was swollen
by recruits from above and below. The penurious student and the dis-
placed peasant travelled the same road. Fiscal oppression, poor harvests,
bad trade could turn the artisan or the peasant of today into a pauper
tomorrow; it was easier, and in the long run no more unprofitable, to
live in idleness and trust to native wit and the charity of the church.
The beggar, the vagabond, the picaro, living on their wits, constantly
on the move, defeated one day, triumphant the next, were the symbols of
Philip Ill's Castile. Round the corner lay the miracle—or the disillusion-
ment. The contemporary addiction to games of chance was particularly
suited to a nation which, almost as a matter of course, had come to stake
all that it had on the fall of a single card.
This predominantly medieval society, uneasily poised between an ex-
alted concept of its own high mission and an increasingly bitter sense
of disillusionment, was fickle and easily swayed. Sometimes an appeal to
traditional values provoked no more than a shrug of the shoulders. At
others it could whip the nation into a sudden frenzy of almost mystical
fervour, as Lerma's government discovered when it found itself under-
taking the most drastic action of its inglorious career: the expulsion of
the Moriscos.
It was natural that the advocates of expulsion should make a bid for
the widest possible popular support by presenting their case in terms
of the national ideal. The Moriscos, they proclaimed, must be driven from
the Peninsula because, as infidels, their continued presence constituted a
grave offence in the sight of God and was liable to call down His justified
wrath upon the heads of the Faithful. Their expulsion would be at once
an act of national expiation and of renewed dedication to the formidable
tasks that still awaited the chosen nation of Castile. Although this was
the most publicized argument for expulsion, there were others of equal or
greater cogency. Ever since the Granada revolt of 1568-70, the Moriscos
presented a complex and possibly insoluble problem. They formed a
widely scattered racial minority which Spain had failed to assimilate.
452
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SPANISH PENINSULA I 5 9 8 - 1 6 4 8
The Moriscos driven from Granada spread northwards into the towns
and villages of Castile, to create a rootless and potentially revolutionary
element in Castilian life. The rootlessness of the predominantly town-
dwelling Castilian Moriscos differentiated them from their brethren in the
kingdom of Valencia, who enjoyed an acknowledged position in the
economic structure and agrarian life of the realm. But the very cohesion
of the Valencian Moriscos seemed as threatening in its way as the disper-
sion of the Granada Moriscos through Castile. Sporadic efforts made in
the sixteenth century to woo them from their traditional customs and
religious practices had proved fruitless. They continued, as New Chris-
tians, to form a close-knit racial community which the Old Christians of
Valencia proved unable to absorb.
Madrid could never forget that there existed in Spain a community
bound by ties of kinship and religion to the national enemy, the Turk.
Fears of a Morisco rising in conjunction with a Turkish invasion were
never far away, and as late as 1601 arms were distributed in Valencia
against a possible attempt at revolution by these 'domestic enemies'. 1
However ill-founded these fears may have been, many were ready to
magnify them. Certain groups would have been well pleased to see the
last of the Moriscos. Landowners without Morisco labour on their estates
were jealous of their more fortunate neighbours; those, like Lerma him-
self, who had estates near the coast, were haunted by forebodings of an
invasion from the sea timed to coincide with a revolt on land; and many
owners of lands occupied by the Moriscos in return for small fixed rents
would have been glad to recover the direct use of their properties. Above
all, the lower orders of Valencian society, whose numbers had been
swollen by the population increase of the sixteenth century, were hungry
for the land at present occupied by Morisco communities. There was,
therefore, a genuine popular movement in Valencia against the Moriscos.
The same was true of Castile where, during the last thirty years of the
sixteenth century, the Moriscos had made a corner in many of the
humbler trades, as small craftsmen, carriers and muleteers, and had
become unpopular for working too hard, spending too little and breeding
too fast. These combined Castilian and Valencian popular movements, re-
inforced by arguments at higher levels about religious unity and national
security, and abetted by certain influential groups, eventually carried the
day. Lerma's ministry, yielding to the pressure of an excited public
opinion, decided that total expulsion was the only solution to an intract-
able problem and, by decrees of 1609 and 1610, ordered the Moriscos of
Castile, Valencia, Catalonia and Aragon to leave the country forthwith.
The expulsion of the Moriscos has given rise to much controversy. For
long it was considered one of the principal causes of the 'decline of
Spain' until Hamilton, observing that Valencian prices and wages showed
1
Conde de Benavente to king, 22 December 1601. AGS Estado, leg. 190.
453
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
no marked change after the expulsion had occurred, concluded that it
cannot have possessed the economic importance generally attributed to
it. This conclusion has recently been subjected to several criticisms and
qualifications. 1 The points at issue are the number of Moriscos expelled,
their economic role in the community before the expulsion, and the
effects of the expulsion on the general level of prosperity. As far as num-
bers are concerned, it is now clear from the investigations of M. Lapeyre
that Hamilton's figure of 100,000 was a serious under-estimate. A figure
of some 275,000 would be much nearer the mark. The geographical dis-
tribution of these 275,000, in round numbers, is as follows:
Valencia
Catalonia
Aragon
Castile, La Mancha, Extremadura
Murcia
Andalusia
Granada
117,000
4,000
61,000
45,000
14,000
30,000
2,000
the exact figures for the last three regions probably being a few thousand
above the actual figures given.
If Hamilton's figures have not stood up to the test of later investiga-
tions, his views on the economic activities of the Moriscos before their
expulsion, and his low estimate of their status, have, on the other hand,
been generally confirmed. The Valencian Moriscos were not, on the whole,
very wealthy members of the community. Most of them were carriers
and hawkers, or labourers on seigneurial estates; they traded only on a
small scale, and their participation in the textile industry did not rival
that of the Old Christians. They were not, therefore, a dynamic economic
group, and it has yet to be proved that their expulsion deprived Spain
either of technical inventiveness or of vigorous commercial enterprise.
Their value to the country's agrarian life is, however, less easily assessed.
Hamilton's thesis, that the impact of the expulsion on both wages and
prices was negligible, deserves more careful scrutiny than it has so far
received. No conclusions on this subject can be really satisfactory until
a detailed study has been made of the neglected problem of the resettle-
ment of the deserted areas by Valencian Old Christians and by colonists
from neighbouring regions. But since so many Moriscos worked in the
fields, and Hamilton provides no wage figures for agricultural labourers
in Valencia, he can hardly be said to have substantiated his claim that
wages were unaffected. As for prices, the failure of certain products to
rise in price may well be explained by the decreased demand after a
quarter of Valencia's population had disappeared. In any event, the in-
1
See J. Regla, 'La Expulsi6n de los Moriscos y sus consecuencias', Hispania, Vol. 13
(1953); the articles on the Valencian Moriscos by Tulio Halperfn Donghi in Cuadernos
de Historia de Espana (1955), pp. 23-4, and in Annales, Vol. 11 (1956); and, for statistics,
Henri Lapeyre, Geographie de VEspagne Morisque (Paris, 1959).
454
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SPANISH PENINSULA I 5 9 8 - 1 6 4 8
ference from price statistics that the expulsion had little effect on agri-
culture is not borne out by recent work on Valencian land values after
1609. During the sixteenth century, in Valencia as elsewhere in Spain,
those who acquired a small amount of capital would commonly invest it
in censales: loans on the security of the borrower's land, and paying fixed
annual interest from its yield. The nobles in particular had borrowed
large sums, the interest on which they paid from the incomes of estates
worked by their Morisco vassals. Immediately these vassals were expelled,
they found extreme difficulty in continuing the payment of interest at the
agreed rates, since the income from their estates had disastrously slumped.
This tends to counteract the evidence drawn from prices and wages, and
suggests that the impact of the expulsion on the life and economy of
Valencia, was, after all, sharp. It was made sharper still by the policy
adopted by Lerma's government. Inundated by complaints from nobles
who were harassed by angry creditors and saw themselves threatened
with ruin, it eventually yielded to their pressure and greatly reduced the
rate of interest payable on the censales. This action shifted much of the loss
from the nobles to their creditors, drawn from the middle and poorer
classes of Valencian society, who had invested their money in censales
and now found their annual incomes much diminished. The Lerma
regime had again conformed to its traditional practice of favouring the
privileged at the expense of the less privileged. All classes of Valencian
society suffered from the expulsion, but the nobles, who had stood to
suffer most, escaped more lightly from the general wreckage than those
other groups which had few friends at court.
At least for Valencia, then, the expulsion of the Moriscos was an
economic disaster. The sudden loss of one quarter of the population,
accompanied by an inevitable dislocation of the country's economic and
social structure, would take long to repair. For Castile, however, the
economic consequences of the expulsion are more difficult to gauge,
Since Valencia's economy was not integrated with that of Castile, the
expulsion of the Valencian Moriscos seriously affected Castile's future
only in so far as it reduced the wealth of a kingdom on which the crown
would one day make heavy fiscal demands. Long after the Moriscos had
gone, the Valencians would continue to make their departure an excuse
for their inability to vote the king larger subsidies. But the crown of
Castile had also lost some 90,000 Moriscos of its own. If their place in
Castilian society was not comparable to that occupied by their brethren
in Valencian society, this does not necessarily warrant the conclusion that
the economic effect of their departure was insignificant. The disappearance
of Morisco artisans and craftsmen must have played its part in prolonging
the labour crisis begun by the plague of 1599, although only local studies
could show how far the continuation of the crisis can be specifically
attributed to the expulsion. In the light of what is known about the chosen
455
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
fields of activity of the Castilian Moriscos, the effects of the expulsion are
more likely to have been felt in the towns than in the country, but with
considerable variations from town to town. Seville in particular was hard
hit. A twelfth of its population was Morisco and, as the great emporium
of trade with the New World, it relied heavily on Morisco labour for
carrying and lading and other essential services. The loss of this labour
force added one more to the many grave problems which were already
beginning to overwhelm Seville, and which would culminate in the 1640s
in the dislocation of Spain's Atlantic trading system.
But in the mood of euphoria created by the expulsion of the Moriscos,
it was easy to discount the unpleasant testimony of facts and figures.
Everything else paled before the one dominant consideration that a long-
standing irritant, and a cause of national shame, had at last been successfully
banished from the Castilian body politic. Beside this notable achievement,
any possible economic consequences seemed of minor importance. After
centuries of struggle, Castile's crusade had at last been completed, and
pure religion established through the length and breadth of Spain.
It was perhaps ironical that the regime which had achieved the long-
desired religious unity of the Peninsula should have shown itself singularly
indifferent to its continuing constitutional and administrative disunity.
'Aragon, Valencia, Catalonia and Navarre devote all their energies to
preserving their many privileges, and are content', reported the Venetian
ambassador. 1 Lerma was quite prepared to gratify their more reasonable
wishes, so long as this would keep them quiet, and his policy towards
them was compounded at once of flattery and neglect. Except for an
extended visit to Lerma's native province of Valencia, Philip Ill's visits
to his other dominions in Spain were fleeting, and brought neither satis-
faction to the majority of their inhabitants nor any real financial relief
to Castile. During the twenty-three years of his reign, he summoned and
attended personally the Cortes of Catalonia once, in 1599, and ob-
tained a subsidy of 1,100,000 ducats in return for large concessions; those
of Valencia once, in 1604, where the subsidy of 400,000 ducats was all
spent in gifts and bribes; and those of Portugal, convened to take the
oath of allegiance to his son, once also, in 1619.
Even if the reign was unusually favourable to the particularism of the
peninsular kingdoms, they showed little gratitude to a regime which paid
them only the most casual attention. Lerma not only failed to further the
unity and co-operation of the different states within the Spanish penin-
sula, but came very close to abdicating all his responsibilities towards
them. Between 1600 and 1615 Catalonia, overrun by bandits, drifted
towards anarchy; but Lerma appeared to be totally unconcerned. 'Here
1
N. Barozzi and G. Berchet, Relazioni degli Stati Europei (Venice, 1856), Series I:
Spagna, Vol. 1, p. 321.
456
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SPANISH PENINSULA I 5 9 8 - 1 6 4 8
it's all a matter of gaming, hunting and comedies, and no one will be
bothered with anything', complained an angry Catalan sent by the city
of Barcelona on an important mission to Madrid. At a time when the
apparatus of government appeared to be constantly growing, govern-
ment itself was ceasing to exist. A passive, negative regime, incapable of
taking decisions, and almost unaware of the decisions to be taken, was
squandering one by one the precious years of respite.
Lerma at last fell from power in October 1618, a victim of the palace
intrigues of his own son, the duque de Uceda. A fitting epitaph on his
government was written anonymously in 1640: 'Although in the reign
of Philip III there was universal peace, and long-established evils should
have been set right, nothing was done either in the Indies or inside Spain,
and the Crown's finances were given no relief. n A heavy responsibility
lies with Lerma himself, the half-willing prisoner of social groups and
forces which he had neither the inclination nor the energy to defy. His
downfall, however, altered little. The change of favourites brought no
change of policy; the son proved no more energetic a minister than the
father. But the crown's finances were in such straits, and the exhaustion of
Castile so patent, that pressure for reform was becoming irresistible. The
Council of Finance, in memorandum after memorandum, insisted on the
necessity of curbing royal expenditure and the liberal distribution of
mercedes. The Council of Castile, in its famous consulta of 1 February
1619, pressed for greater economy and for the lightening of Castile's in-
tolerable burden of taxation. As an analysis of Castile's troubles, the
document added nothing to the reiterated conclusions of the arbitristas,
but it was important as the first attempt by a council to examine as a group
the many fiscal and economic problems which has for so long been ignored.
The introduction of the reforms recommended in this consulta required
more political courage than that possessed by Uceda, but the days of the
new ministry were numbered. Philip III died suddenly on 31 March 1621.
With the new king came new favourites, Don Balthasar de Zuniga and his
nephew, the conde de Olivares. The change of ministers was generally
acclaimed as bringing hope of reform; when the news reached Barcelona
a Catalan lawyer wrote in his private diary that a new dawn had broken.
Philip IV himself, with more intelligence but no more strength of
character than his father, hardly represented a very inspiring herald for a
new dawn, but in the conde de Olivares he had chosen a favourite of a
very different calibre from the favourites of Philip III. Olivares, who be-
came sole privado on the death of Zuniga in 1622 and remained in power
for over twenty years, was, as a man and a minister, the antithesis of
Lerma. He was hard, dynamic, puritanical. As a member of the Anda-
lusian aristocracy he had no need, unlike Lerma, to ingratiate himself
1
16
Suplica de la .. . Ciuclad de Tortosa (Tortosa, 1640), fo. 95.
457
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
MHFDECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
with the great families of Castile. No personal considerations would be
allowed to stand in the way of that restoration of Spain which he con-
sidered himself called upon to accomplish. In his intense nationalism, in
his desire for a thorough reformation, and in his disgust with the old
ministers and their policies, Olivares, who was only thirty-four at the
time of his advent to power, represented the hopes and ideals of the new
generation in Castile. But he also possessed, perhaps in a heightened
degree, the failings of the age; above all, its expectation of the miracle, its
willingness to embark upon great enterprises without first calculating
sufficiently the possibilities of success. One of the Venetian ambassadors
wrote of him: 'He loves novelties, allowing his lively mind to pursue
chimeras, and to hit upon impossible designs as easy of achievement.
For this reason he is desolated by misfortunes; the difficulties proposed
to him at the beginning he brushes aside, and all his resolutions rush him
towards the precipice. n
Formidable problems awaited him. The Council of Finance was con-
stantly submitting the most gloomy reports on the crown's revenues. The
alcabalas and royal rents in Castile were sold or mortgaged to such a
degree that their redemption would cost 350,000 ducats more than their
value; the proceeds of cruzada, excusado and servicios had been assigned
up to 1625 to pay for royal expenditure before 1621; the collection of the
millones was so defective that the bankers could never count on receiving
the sums promised them; and 'the treasure fleets have brought such small
sums in recent years that, unless there is an improvement, they will be of
very little assistance'. The only means of meeting the deficit on the anti-
cipated expenditure of 1621 was to manufacture more vellon coins, and
this was done on as large a scale as the limited quantity of available
copper permitted. 2
The Council of Finance was working on the assumption that Spain
would remain at peace. But in April 1621 the twelve-year truce with the
Dutch was due to expire, and unless it were renewed, the council would
have to find large additional sums of money for the army and the fleet.
The question of whether or not the truce should be prolonged was debated
in both Brussels and Madrid. Although the condition of Flanders and the
state of the crown's finances suggested the desirability of prolongation,
it was finally decided that the war with the Dutch should be resumed. The
exact circumstances in which this decision was taken are not yet known,
but it seems probable that Ziifiiga and Olivares were primarily influenced
by the long chronicle of Dutch overseas successes since 1609. Under
cover of the truce, the Dutch had penetrated into the Spanish and Por-
tuguese preserves of the Indian and Pacific Oceans. This entailed not
1
Barozzi and Berchet, Relazioni..., Vol. 1, p. 650.
This, and the following information on the financial situation in 1621, is from AGS
Hacienda, leg. 573, fos. 11,172 and 303.
2
458
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SPANISH PENINSULA I 5 9 8 - I 6 4 8
only the loss of lucrative trades, but a weakening of the ties of interest
that bound Portugal to the crown of Spain. Philip IV's ministers could
not afford to overlook Portugal's reaction to Spain's failure to protect
its overseas territories; nor could they overlook the heavy expenditure
in recent years on relief expeditions, of which the latest, a costly fleet for
the Philippines, had been totally destroyed by a storm off Cadiz in January
1620. By 1621 there seemed much to be said for attacking the trouble at
its source. A well-organized military and naval campaign against the
United Provinces would keep the Dutch occupied at home, put an end
to their incursions into Spanish and Portuguese waters, destroy their
trade, and perhaps finally bring their fifty-year revolt to an end. 1
While these arguments had much to commend them, they displayed
an optimism about Spain's capacity for war which was not supported by
the available information about Castile's economy and the royal finances.
A return to war meant the recruiting of new armies, for which Castile
would have difficulty in finding the men. It meant also a considerable in-
crease in the size and efficiency of Spain's long-neglected fleet. Certain
ministers had pressed vigorously for this during the reign of Philip III,
in the belief that the preservation of Spain's Empire depended principally
on the strengthening of its naval power. Olivares shared these views, but
at this stage a naval revival was likely to be difficult. As soon as the truce
expired, the Dutch put an embargo on all naval stores for Spain, and
effectively crippled the shipbuilding industry in a country where wood
was scarce and where techniques of naval construction had been allowed
to lag behind those employed in the dockyards of northern Europe.
Above all, a resumption of the war with the Netherlands meant more
money. During the truce, the annual expenditure on the forces stationed
in Flanders had stood at about i-§- million ducats. As soon as war broke
out again in 1621, this figure rose to 3^ million ducats, bringing the total
expenditure for the year to well over 8,000,000. It was asking much of the
Council of Finance to find an annual figure of this order, and it was not
long before Olivares himself came to take a hand in negotiating the
crown's yearly asiento or contract with the Genoese bankers. His bullying
and bludgeoning of the Imbreas, the Spinolas and the Stratas had the
desired results: sooner or later an asiento was agreed. But the price paid
was fantastically high, and it was principally paid by Castile.
The last twenty years of Spain's international power are only under-
standable in terms of this relentless pressure of fiscal necessity, never
abating after the resumption in 1621 of the war with the Dutch. The
twelve years' breathing-space provided by the truce of 1609 was gone,
squandered by a prodigal ministry. When a reforming regime came at
last, it came too late, since reform could be carried out only to the dis-
1
There is a vigorous exposition of some of these points in a paper by Don Carlos
Coloma, printed in Antonio Rodriguez Villa, Ambrosio Splnola (Madrid, 1904), pp. 382-92.
459
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
i6-aDECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
rupting accompaniment of an intolerably expensive war. In this lay the
tragedy of Olivares' government. War, while making long-delayed reforms
indispensable, created conditions which made their fulfilment impossible.
The history of Olivares' government is littered with good intentions frus-
trated by the insatiable demands of war.
Olivares began his ministerial career by attempting to make a clean
break with the past. While Lerma had taken care to ensure his own sur-
vival by investing in a cardinal's hat, his unfortunate creature, Don
Rodrigo Calderon, was sent to the scaffold. A vast investigation was begun
into the personal fortunes of Calderon's colleagues and of all ministers
who had held office since 1603. The list of favours and pensions distri-
buted by the king was mercilessly cut. A special junta was established
for the 'reformation of manners', and in February 1623 the government
issued its famous reforming decrees. 1 They constituted an almost exact
replica of the arbitristas' demands for the axing of the Castilian bureau-
cracy and the curbing of court extravagance. The number of municipal
offices in Castile was to be reduced to one-third; restrictions were imposed
on extravagant clothes and jewellery and, more effectively, the king's
personal example led to the substitution of the austere golilla for the
elaborate ruff; the court was to be cleared of suppliants and suitors, the
nobles were to return to their estates and many grammar schools were
to be closed.
It took little time to discover that sweeping reforms of this nature were
more easily decreed than effected. Not even an assault from within the
citadel could make much headway, against personal interests and against
the established practice of many generations. The imposing super-
structure of court and bureaucracy stood fast while the storm harmlessly
blew itself out. The economy campaign was forgotten in the festivities
celebrating the unexpected visit of the prince of Wales in March 1623;
the order for the reduction of municipal offices was withdrawn in 1626
at the request of a Cortes speaking in the interests of municipal govern-
ments threatened with heavy financial loss.
Only in the sphere of administrative reorganization did Olivares meet
with any real success. In an attempt to rescue government from the cum-
brous machinery of the conciliar system, he came to place more and more
reliance on special or permanent juntas, staffed with his own friends and
relations and a select group of officials in whom he could place his trust.
These were the men of the new regime, men like Jose Gonzalez and
Jeronimo de Villanueva, personally devoted to Olivares and to the realiza-
tion of his ideals. By working through small juntas, some of which he
attended personally, Olivares obtained a much tighter control of the ad-
ministrative machine than would otherwise have been possible. One after
1
A. Gonzdlez Palencia, La Junta de Reformacidn (Valladolid, 1932), Document L X VI.
460
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SPANISH PENINSULA I 5 9 8 - I 6 4 8
another the routine-bound councils saw their powers clipped by the
creation of some new junta: juntas for fleets and garrisons and mines,
for the Military Orders and for the administration of new taxes. Even
the Council of State, the supreme organ of government under Philip III,
lost much of its power to a special Junta de Ejecucion, which was to
become the effective policy-making body in the last years of the Olivares
regime. But government under Olivares was essentially a one-man affair.
The councils and juntas continued to meet and produce their consultas,
but it was Olivares who took the decisions.
Imbued with the ideals of the arbitristas he was particularly concerned
to salvage Castile's economy. He shared their views on the need for pro-
tectionist measures to encourage national development, and he showed
considerable anxiety over the technical backwardness of Spain in such
matters as the construction of canals. He proposed that trading companies
should be established with royal encouragement, and that honours should
be conferred upon merchants to destroy the traditional disrepute in
which trade was held. He devised or approved schemes for the encourage-
ment of foreign settlers, for the establishment of a state bank, and for the
relief of the lesser nobles, whose plight preoccupied him as much as the
plight of their colleagues preoccupied Richelieu in France.
Scarcely one of these plans was realized. An India Company was indeed
founded at Lisbon, but it survived only a short time, and was principally
useful as establishing a mutually advantageous alliance between the
Spanish crown and a number of wealthy Portuguese businessmen. Other-
wise, Olivares' schemes, like those of Richelieu, were shelved or forgotten
as the overwhelming problems of war and finance came to dominate every
aspect of the nation's life. The armies must be paid, new fleets must be
built, and this could only be done if the crown's revenues were substan-
tially increased. But how could they be increased without imposing fresh
burdens on the long-suffering taxpayers of Castile ? It was clear to Olivares,
as it had long been clear to the arbitristas, that the time had come for a
complete reappraisal of Spain's system of taxation.
Since the beginning Philip Ill's reign, when Alamos de Barrientos had
commented on the strange character of an empire in which the principal
kingdom was expected to subsidize the rest, 1 the disparity between the
fiscal contributions of Castile and the other realms and territories had
provoked a series of angry complaints in Castile. At a time when Castile,
with its prostrate economy, was paying over six million ducats a year in
taxes, it was surely reasonable to demand some sacrifice from the king's
other realms. 'The kingdoms of Aragon, Valencia and Catalonia contri-
bute nothing to His Majesty's expenses outside their own territory', com-
plained the president of the Council of Finance in 1618. 'In fact', he
1
See above, p. 442.
461
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
continued, 'money has to be sent from Castile to pay for their garrisons',
and the same was true also of Navarre, Milan, Naples, Sardinia and
Sicily. Admittedly the king had obtained something at the beginning of
his reign from Portugal, through customs dues, freight charges and pepper
imports, but this income had dwindled away, and Castile was now main-
taining the Portuguese fleet and the troops stationed on Portuguese soil.
It was significant that the Council of Finance's urgent requests for
financial assistance from the other kingdoms should have coincided with
a period of intensified Castilian nationalism, which itself was very
probably a natural response to Castile's misfortunes. While the arbitristas
campaigned against the domination of Castile's economy by foreign mer-
chants, certain sections of the Castilian aristocracy showed a renewed
antagonism to the semi-autonomous government of the king's other terri-
tories. In Catalonia, for example, the Castilian duque de Alcala, viceroy
from 1619 to 1622, treated the principality's laws and privileges with a
contempt which convinced the Catalans that the government in Madrid
was conspiring to abolish their contractual form of government. In the
Council of State, the duque del Infantado and Don Pedro de Toledo
commented bitterly on Portugal's exemption from the taxes levied on
Castile, while preparations were made to wrest from the Portuguese their
monopoly of lucrative overseas trades and to restrict the activities of
Portuguese merchants who had infiltrated into Castile's American poss-
essions since the Union of Castile and Portugal in 1580.
It was against this background of xenophobia and of revived Castilian
nationalism that Olivares set himself to solve the problems created by the
fiscal and constitutional peculiarities of the Spanish monarchy. These
problems appeared at their most acute in the question of imperial defence.
It was difficult and costly to defend an empire of widely scattered terri-
tories, and it seemed unreasonable to Olivares and his colleagues that
Castile, in its present state, should be expected to provide both the men
and the money to defend territories which raised not a finger to defend
themselves. The time had come to consider radical changes in the structure
and organization of the Spanish Empire, so that the fiscal burden should
be more evenly distributed and the kingdoms should come to each other's
help in time of need.
The plan devised by Olivares for the future of the Spanish Empire was
presented to the king in the form of a long, secret memorandum written
in 1624. 1 To Olivares, as to other European statesmen of his generation,
unity implied uniformity. All the kingdoms of the Spanish monarchy must
be integrated and reduced to a single legal and administrative unit.
1
Instruccidn que did el Conde Duque a Felipe IV, B(ritish) M(useum) Egerton MS 347,
fos. 249-90. The only complete printed version of this important text is an eighteenth-
century one, wrongly ascribed to Philip IV's tutor, in A. Valladares, Semanario Erudito
(Madrid, 1787-91), Vol. xi, pp. 161-224.
I
462
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SPANISH PENINSULA I 5 9 8 - 1 6 4 8
The most important thing in Your Majesty's Monarchy is for you to become
King of Spain; by this, I mean that your Majesty should not be content with being
King of Portugal, Aragon and Valencia and Count of Barcelona, but should
secretly plan and work to reduce these kingdoms of which Spain is composed to
the style and laws of Castile.
These words in themselves would seem to place Olivares among the ex-
treme Castilian nationalists, but other parts of the text show that he
sympathized with the various territories in many of their grievances and
was anxious to remove them. Since they complained that they never saw
their king, he would in future live in each of his kingdoms in turn. Since
they felt themselves excluded from the benefits of empire, the Castilian
monopoly of offices and honours would be abolished, and imperial posts
be thrown open to all. In future it would be a Spanish, not a Castilian,
Empire: an empire ruled, it is true, by the laws of Castile but an empire in
which posts would be open to everyone, irrespective of nationality. Cus-
toms barriers between the kingdoms would be removed, intermarriage
among their nationals encouraged. The empire of Olivares' dreams was to
be an integrated empire in the fullest sense; a constitutional, economic
and racial whole.
Since the integration of the Spanish Empire by these means could only
be achieved by degrees, Olivares prepared a second, short-term plan,
known as the Union of Arms. 1 The union was to be made by the creation
of a common reserve of 140,000 men, supplied and maintained by all
the states within the Spanish monarchy in fixed proportions:
paid men
Catalonia
Aragon
Valencia
Castile and the Indies
Portugal
Naples
Sicily
Milan
Flanders
Mediterranean and Atlantic Islands
16,000
10,000
6,000
44,000
16,000
16,000
6,000
8,000
12,000
6,000
The king, drawing on this reserve, would send the seventh part of it,
or 20,000 infantry and 4,000 cavalry, to the help of any territory which
was attacked. This, according to Olivares, was 'the sole cure for all the
ills that can arise: namely that, as loyal vassals we all unite . . . ' .
In devising these plans for a closer measure of co-operation between
the realms of the monarchy, Olivares showed himself the first ruler of
Spain to formulate a coherent policy for the empire's future development.
His plans, if successful, might perhaps bring some relief to Castile; but,
whether successful or not, any attempt to put them into practice would
entail great changes in the relationship between the king and his non-
1
The printed version of this plan, as presented to the Cortes of the crown of Aragon,
is in BM Additional MS 13,997, fs. 11-16.
463
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Castilian subjects. Each kingdom of the Peninsula had always maintained
that the king was primarily its king, and only accidentally the ruler of
other territories. Taking shelter behind this fiction, the kingdoms had for
long revolved in orbits of their own, ostentatiously oblivious of the king's
wider obligations. But the fiction was wearing thin. Henceforth every
action taken by Olivares for the relief of Castile would have its reper-
cussions among the other kingdoms, and they in the days to come would
find themselves inexorably drawn into the orbit of Castile.
In November 1625 the English attacked Cadiz. This foolhardy attack
occurred at a convenient moment for Olivares since it provided the requi-
site note of urgency for the launching of his plan for the Union of Arms.
In the opening months of 1626 the king and Olivares laid the plan per-
sonally before the three Cortes of Aragon, Valencia and Catalonia. It was
coldly received. The traditional fears of Castile's intentions had been
aroused during the first years of the new regime, and rumours had for
some time been circulating that Olivares planned to introduce un rey,
una ley, una moneda [one king, one law, one coinage]. Not one of the
three Cortes was willing to raise troops for compulsory service beyond the
provincial frontiers. Each suspected a scheme which demanded large
sacrifices, and the abandonment of cherished privileges, in return for the
most hypothetical advantages. Of what interest was the fate of Flanders
to Catalonia, or that of Milan to Aragon? These arguments reflected that
long-standing isolation of the different kingdoms which had effectively
prevented the growth of any tradition of mutual assistance on which
Olivares could begin to build. The resistance proved too strong to allow
any rapid settlement of the Union of Arms, and Olivares had to content
himself with more conventional forms of help. From Valencia and Aragon
he at least obtained money, if not men: 1,800,000 ducats from the Val-
encian Cortes over a period of fifteen years, and sufficient money from
the Cortes of Aragon to maintain 2,000 men, if possible Aragonese
volunteers, for the same period. The Catalan Cortes, however, were ad-
journed after a series of sharp clashes without having voted either men
or money. Olivares returned to Madrid disappointed, but still confident
of final success.
The setback of 1626 meant that Castile would continue to provide most
of the men and money required for the king's foreign enterprises: for
the wars in Germany, the expeditions to relieve Brazil, and the unfor-
tunate Mantuan War of 1628-31. Castile was ill equipped to meet these
heavy commitments. A series of bad harvests was accompanied by an
exceptionally sharp rise in prices between 1625 and 1627, to which the
government responded in August 1628 by a deflationary decree reducing
the tale of vellon by 50 per cent. During this period of acute monetary
instability, the crown finances underwent another crisis. On this occasion
Olivares secured the help of a group of Portuguese businessmen, whom
464
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SPANISH PENINSULA I 5 9 8 - I 6 4 8
he skilfully played off against the Genoese bankers. On 31 January 1627,
twenty years after its last bankruptcy, the crown was once again able to
repudiate its debts. But the repudiation brought only temporary relief:
the treasure-fleet of 1628 fell into the hands of the Dutch, and the ser-
vicios voted by the Castilian Cortes, although raised in 1626 by two million
ducats a year, were in fact yielding only half a million.
It was essential to find new sources of revenue, and this could only
be done by casting the fiscal net more widely. Since an irremovable social
stigma was attached to direct taxation by the crown, Olivares fell back on
a host of ingenious devices for indirect taxation, which would allow him
to mulct those groups in Castilian society enjoying special fiscal advan-
tages or immunities. In 1631 he introduced a tax known as the media
anata, appropriating to the crown half the first year's income from all
new appointments, and also a tax on salt which provoked a serious
rising in Vizcaya; in 1632 he secured papal consent to a special grant
from the clergy and appropriated a year's income from the wealthy arch-
bishopric of Toledo; in 1635 he confiscated half the yield of sAl j'uros held
by natives, and the entire yield of those belonging to foreigners—a device
imitated in whole or in part almost every year thereafter; in 1637 he im-
posed a profitable tax on the sale of paper, and seized 478,000 ducats in
American silver belonging to private individuals, compensating the un-
fortunate owners with juros; two years later, oblivious to the consequences
for Seville and the American trade, he confiscated a further 1,000,000
ducats in the same manner. All these special fiscal devices were introduced
over and above both the direct taxes voted in increasing quantities by the
Cortes, and the more timeworn methods of raising money, like the sale of
crown rents, titles and offices. But even they did not exhaust the conde
duque's repertoire.He revived the old feudal obligations of the aristocracy,
so that the hidalgos found themselves serving in the army at their own
expense, while the magnates were expected to raise and maintain complete
infantry companies. He endlessly exhorted nobles and ecclesiastics, town
councils and cathedral chapters to offer money either in the form of loans,
or as 'voluntary' gifts or donativos to meet some special emergency. The
collectors would go from door to door demanding contributions not only
from the head of the house but also from his wife, children and servants,
carefully grading the demands according to the estimated wealth of the
victims.
These various fiscal stratagems had social and political consequences
of profound importance for Castile. The rapid growth of indirect forms of
taxation under the government of Olivares blurred the sharp line that
had once divided the pechero—the ordinary taxpayer—from those who
traditionally enjoyed special consideration for reasons of social prestige.
The clergy were now groaning beneath the unprecedented weight of their
taxes. Many hidalgos of moderate means were ruined, while the great
465
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
magnates, although saved from financial disaster by the inalienability of
their estates, were mulcted of enormous sums: by 1640 the crown was
said to have obtained 900,000 ducats from the Duque de Arcos alone.
His ruthless treatment of the great and privileged brought down upon the
head of Olivares the most bitter personal hatred. Bombarded with an
endless succession of demands, the nobles, one by one, retired from
Madrid to their estates, in self-imposed or compulsory exile from a court
dominated by a favourite who treated his equals with arrogance and dis-
missed their protests with contempt.
While the conde duque never allowed himself to be deterred by aristo-
cratic or popular antagonism, he was passionately concerned to alleviate
the sufferings of his beloved Castile. This, he believed, could only be
achieved by pressing on with the Union of Arms. Since Catalonia had
failed to vote a subsidy in the Cortes of 1626 and had indeed voted no
taxes to the crown since the Cortes of 1599, it was singled out for early
attention. The Catalan Cortes were convened again in the spring of 1632.
News had reached Madrid that ships of the treasure-fleet had been lost
in a storm, and the conde duque hoped for a grant of three million ducats
from the Catalans to cover the reported loss. He had chosen an unfortunate
moment. After their experiences in 1626 the Catalans would in any event
have been unwilling to loosen their purse strings, but their reluctance was
increased by recent economic misfortunes. Between 1629 and 1632 corn
prices had reached famine level, the plague raging in the south of France
had penetrated into northern Catalonia, and the principality's Mediter-
ranean trade was at a standstill. Hardly had the Cortes met when a clash
on a question of ceremonial between the city of Barcelona and Philip
IV's brother, the cardenal infante, brought them to a sudden halt. Neither
threats nor blandishments could make Barcelona waive its claims. Once
again, in 1632 as in 1626, the Catalan Cortes had failed to vote money
to their king.
Olivares expressed his anger by resorting to a series of dubious devices
for obtaining money from Barcelona, which only served to deepen the
antipathy between the Catalans and the Castilians, and presaged the fate-
ful events in Catalonia at the end of the decade. From the outbreak of the
war between Spain and France in May 1635, the history of the Spanish
peninsula comes to be dominated by the deteriorating relationship on one
side between Castile and Catalonia, and on the other between Castile and
Portugal. To Madrid, both provinces presented a similar problem. Both,
when viewed from a stricken Castile, had the air of privileged, prosperous
undertaxed lands, far removed from the din and disruption of war.
Neither had offered any material assistance to the crown or Castile at a
time of desperate need. The Portuguese had stood aloof while Castile
prepared the relief expeditions of 1634 and 1635 for the recovery of
Portugal's own possessions in Brazil. The Catalans had failed on two
466
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SPANISH PENINSULA I 5 9 8 - 1 6 4 8
different occasions to vote a service to the king; they neither provided,
nor paid, the troops which defended their own frontiers with France, nor
did they even contribute enough to meet the expenses of a viceregal
government whose annual income was only half that enjoyed by the city
of Barcelona. No Catalan troops fought in the German wars, or could be
used for the invasion of France. In Olivares' words, the Catalans showed
themselves to be 'entirely separate from the rest of the Monarchy, useless
for service, and in a state little befitting the dignity and power of His
Majesty'.
To both the east and the west of the Peninsula, therefore, Olivares
found himself saddled with territories whose reluctance to co-operate in
the task of common defence had disappointed all his hopes of closer union
among the dominions of the king. Yet the Union of Arms had never
seemed more necessary than now. With the coming of war with France,
the anticipated expenditure for 1635 had risen to over 11,000,000 ducats.
Spain was engaged in a battle to the death, for which Castile alone could
never provide sufficient money or men. The resources of both Catalonia
and Portugal must be mobilized.
Any successful exploitation of the wealth of Portugal was likely to re-
quire the preliminary establishment of a more effective administration in
Lisbon. The forms of government introduced by the union of 1580 had
given little satisfaction either to Madrid or to Portugal itself; nor was any
real improvement effected in 1621 when the viceroyalty of Philip Ill's
reign was replaced by an administration of governors. Hoping to end
the constant dissension in Lisbon and to allay Portuguese complaints of
royal neglect, Olivares in December 1634 sent out Princess Margaret of
Savoy to govern Portugal. But since she was accompanied by Castilian
advisers the new government was quick to divide itself into two opposing
camps of Castilians and Portuguese, and proved to be even less satisfactory
than its predecessors.
Princess Margaret had instructions to introduce into Portugal a fixed
annual levy of 500,000 cruzados for the country's defence and the recovery
of its lost possessions. The new taxes imposed for this purpose created
considerable discontent among a populace which had always disliked the
union with Castile. The fact that the money was to be used on a fleet
being equipped for the relief of Brazil did nothing to reconcile people to
payment and in 1637 riots broke out in Evora and other towns. French
hopes that the Evora riots would turn into a general revolution were,
however, to be disappointed. The popular movement, although abetted
by a discontented clergy, had no hope of success without the adherence
of the duke of Braganza and of the aristocracy. Braganza was naturally
cautious, the aristocracy was faction-ridden, and Olivares was able to
bring the disorders to an end by a judicious combination of threats of
armed force and a show of leniency.
467
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
While the Portuguese risings of 1637 alarmed Madrid, they also con-
vinced the conde duque that Portugal must not be left in its present con-
dition, 'so separate and divided from the rest of the Monarchy . . . with
which it refuses to conform'. He therefore summoned to Madrid various
influential Portuguese to discuss questions affecting the government of
Portugal and the recovery of its empire. Almost at once, however, the
Portuguese question was pushed into the background by the still more
urgent problem of Catalonia.
The principality of Catalonia, unlike Portugal, occupied a vital strategic
position in the war against France. It was an essential base for operations
against the French, but in 1636 Olivares had been compelled to abandon
plans for an invasion of France from Catalonia partly because of un-
certainty over how the Catalans would react. He had on occasions con-
templated the use of force against them, only to desist because the time
seemed inopportune and the advantages doubtful. His dilemma was
aggravated by their behaviour in 1637 and 1638. In the first of these years
French troops crossed into northern Catalonia, but the Catalans' con-
tribution to the defence of their own province was belated and ineffective.
In 1638 the French invaded Guipuzcoa, and Catalonia alone among the
Levantine kingdoms of the Peninsula failed to send troops to the aid of
the defending army.
Angered by the recalcitrance of a province which he regarded as the
most prosperous in the peninsula, Olivares determined that the Catalans
should be made to concern themselves 'as up to now they have apparently
not been concerned, with the general affairs of the Monarchy and of
these kingdoms'. By choosing Roussillon as his theatre of operations for
the campaign of 1639 against the French, he hoped to involve Catalonia's
population and financial resources in a war from which the principality
had so far stood aside. During the summer and autumn of 1639 the mini-
sters of the viceregal government in Catalonia, under strong pressure from
Madrid, harried the principality remorselessly for men and provisions to
be sent to the front. When the French finally surrendered the fortress of
Salces in January 1640, Olivares had achieved his object of involving the
Catalans in Spain's wars, but only at the expense of creating in Catalonia
an intense bitterness against his government and against Castile. During
February and March of 1640, when the troops which had been fighting
in Roussillon were billeted in the principality for the winter season, this
bitterness turned to smouldering revolt. In his anxiety to make the most
of the wealth which he attributed to the principality, Olivares insisted on
the maintenance of the troops by the native population. The Catalan
peasantry took its stand on the very specific laws of Catalonia relating to
billeting, and refused to comply with the royal orders. Underpaid and
underfed, the soldiers either ran wild or deserted. One clash between
468
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SPANISH PENINSULA I 5 9 8 - I 6 4 8
soldiers and peasants followed another until, by the late spring of 1640,
all northern Catalonia was in a state of revolt, and the last trained army
of the king in the Spanish peninsula found itself threatened with destruc-
tion at the hands of an irate peasantry.
Olivares almost certainly did not intend, as has sometimes been
alleged, to employ the billeted army to destroy at a blow the laws and
liberties of Catalonia. But he did plan to use this occasion to compel the
Catalans to offer troops for service abroad, and to play a part in the war
commensurate with their presumed resources. These resources were cal-
culated on the assumption that the population of Catalonia was over
1,000,000. It was in fact under 400,000. Nor was Catalonia as prosperous
as a hard-pressed Madrid believed: Catalan trade had suffered severely
from the war with France. It was true that agriculture in parts of Cata-
lonia was flourishing, and the coinage was stable, but this did not make
the principality a source of unbounded wealth. It did, on the other hand,
strengthen the Catalans in their determination to resist exploitation by a
country with an impoverished economy and a notoriously unstable
currency, for the sake of a cause which in no way interested them. If the
Catalans now defied the orders of a viceroy who had become the puppet
of Madrid, it was fundamentally because they had no wish to suffer the
fate of Castile.
It was only towards the end of May 1640, after an armed force of
Catalans had penetrated into Barcelona and released from prison a deputy
arrested on the orders of Madrid, that Olivares awoke to the gravity of
events in Catalonia. Relying largely for Catalan affairs on the advice of
Jeronimo de Villanueva, the protonotario of the crown of Aragon, the
conde duque had pursued towards Catalonia a policy based on the con-
viction that the Catalans had evaded their obligations to their King, and
should be compelled to co-operate with the other kingdoms of the
monarchy. Now that this policy had driven the Catalans not to co-operate
but to rebel, it must hastily be abandoned. A revolution in a region
bordering on France would be highly inconvenient at a time when the
struggle with Richelieu was nearing its climax, and all the available troops
were fully engaged in war with the French. But Olivares' attempts at
conciliation came too late. The rebellion in Catalonia was gathering a
momentum of its own. Under the energetic leadership of Pau Claris,
the Catalan Diputacio 1 had made its first approaches to the French. On 7
June 1640 riots in Barcelona culminated in the murder of the viceroy,
the conde de Santa Coloma. Neither Diputacio, aristocracy nor municipal
authorities were able to restrain the armed gangs which passed from town
to town carrying revolution in their wake. When, in late July, the revolt
reached the indispensable port of Tortosa, Olivares was compelled to
1
The traditional standing commission of six entrusted with the task of seeing that the
ruler's contractual obligations to the principality were observed.
469
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
abandon all hope of conciliation. There was now no alternative to armed
intervention—if ever he could find the troops to intervene. 'And my
heart admits of no consolation that we are entering an action in which,
if our army kills, it kills a vassal of His Majesty, and, if they kill, they kill
a vassal and a soldier.'
By the autumn of 1640, therefore, civil war had come to Spain. Since
Catalonia was deeply divided by social feuds, its revolt might have been
crushed fairly soon, but for the assistance rendered by the French, and
the grossly incompetent leadership of the Castilian invading army. The
troops of the marques de los Velez were defeated outside the walls of
Barcelona in January 1641, and there was no army ready to take their
place, for on 1 December 1640 Portugal also had come out in revolt.
Portugal's motives for revolution were similar to those of Catalonia,
although its immediate grounds for discontent were less. Olivares' atten-
tion had been concentrated on the Catalans during the past two years,
and the Portuguese had suffered none of that daily harrying by royal
ministers which had done so much to aggravate the principality. No
large army had been billeted in Portugal, and no war had been fought
along its frontiers. But the events in Catalonia encouraged the Portuguese
to end a union with Castile which no longer held any attractions, and the
conde duque's plan to use the Portuguese nobility in his war against the
Catalans made it essential to act with speed. When the duke of Braganza
declared himself willing to accept the throne of an independent Portugal
as King John IV, there was no further impediment to a movement which
enjoyed the sympathies of the mass of the Portuguese, and which no
Castilian troops were present to prevent.
The existence of two simultaneous revolts within the Spanish peninsula
meant the end of all Olivares' hopes and ambitions. From the end of 1640
Spain and Spain's international power were visibly crumbling. The
crown's difficulties in obtaining credit were now acute. The Portuguese
Revolution administered one more blow to the confidence and the pros-
pects of the business community of Seville, already faced with the grave
problems of a contracting American trade and subjected to all the vaga-
ries of a short-sighted governmental policy, which interfered arbitrarily
with the flow of commerce and appropriated at will the private capital
of merchants in the name of public necessity. Between 1639 and 1641
Seville's trade was foundering, and the Spanish-American economic
system, which had for so long helped to sustain the wildly extravagant
foreign adventures of the Spanish Habsburgs, was in process of rapid
dissolution. With Seville on the edge of bankruptcy, and the government
driven to new inflationary measures, the years 1641 and 1642 were years
of frantic price rise in Castile, the premium on silver reaching 120 per cent,
until a drastic deflationary scare in September 1642 brought prices
tumbling down.
470
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SPANISH PENINSULA I 5 9 8 - 1 6 4 8
The general discontent with Olivares' government was now no longer
concealed. A plot was discovered in the autumn of 1641 which would have
made the duque de Medina Sidonia king of an independent Andalusia.
Medina Sidonia declared in his confession that the aims of the conspiracy
had included the relief of the country from its burdensome taxes, the
removal of the conde duque from the control of government, and the
restoration of the nobles' Estate in the Cortes of Castile. This was a clear
signal that, after twenty years of sullen acquiescence in the government
of the conde duque, the great aristocrats of Castile and Andalusia were
beginning to stir. The obvious failure of Olivares' policies, and his own
increasing signs of mental instability, gave them their long-awaited oppor-
tunity. Nobles like the conde de Castrillo, one of the few who had dared
to disagree openly with Olivares at the time of his greatness, brought
heavy pressure to bear on the king. Finally, on 17 January 1643, Philip
IV gave Olivares leave to retire to his estates. His fall from power came
only a few months after the death of Richelieu. In Spain, as in France,
an epoch had ended.
Little is known about the government of Spain in the period that
followed the fall of Olivares, but it would appear to have been a time of
aristocratic reaction after the long years of darkness. The control of ad-
ministration passed into the hands of Don Luis de Haro, the conde
duque's nephew, who governed with more circumspection and more
attention to the wishes of the aristocracy than his uncle. The twenty years
nightmare of the Olivares regime was over. The juntas were abolished,
the nobles returned to Madrid. But there was little now that any govern-
ment could do. The loss of Spain's fleet at the Downs in 1639 and the
defeat of the Spanish infantry at Rocroi in 1643 already portended the
collapse of Spain's international power. The army's advance into
Catalonia was slow and expensive; Portugal was consolidating itself
as an independent state, and Spain's Italian possessions were showing
signs of restlessness. In 1647 the harvests in Andalusia, New Castile and
Valencia were among the worst of the century, and famine was followed,
as in 1599, by plague: a devastating epidemic which claimed in 1649 half
the population of Seville. The age was ending, as it had begun, in demo-
graphic disaster.
Without resources, its credit shattered by bankruptcy in 1647, Haro's
government, like that of Lerma forty years before, had no choice but to
seek peace with the Dutch. The Peace of Minister brought it precious
relief. Its foreign commitments further reduced by the civil wars in France,
the regime could now set about recovering something of what Olivares
had lost. It was fortunate in that the Catalans' will and capacity to resist
were being undermined both by the ravages of the plague, and by internal
dissensions and feuds with the French. In October 1652, after a terrible
siege, the city of Barcelona surrendered to the royal army, and the prin-
471
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
cipality returned to allegiance to Philip IV on the understanding that its
laws and liberties were left inviolate.
It was now the turn of Portugal, but this was a different matter. Better
placed by geography than Catalonia, and enjoying both the protection
of England and the wealth of Brazil, Portugal was able to preserve its
new-found independence against the Spanish attack. The war dragged on,
against Portugal as against France; and Castile, as always, bore the brunt
of the burden.
Spain's defeats in the 1640s, following upon the revolutions of Catalonia
and Portugal, and the palace revolt of the aristocracy, marked the end of
an age in which Spain had dominated the affairs of Europe. Olivares'
imperialism had represented a return to the imperialism of Philip II, but
his reserves of money and manpower were less than Philip's, and his task
was proportionately harder. The negligence of Lerma, and Olivares' own
failure to carry out the reform programme of the arbitristas, had con-
demned him to look beyond the frontiers of an exhausted Castile for the
military and financial assistance he required.
In appealing to the other Peninsular kingdoms, however, Olivares had
found himself hopelessly handicapped by the policies of his predecessors.
The reaction of the Catalans and the Portuguese to Olivares' demands
constitutes a striking commentary on the failure of Spain's sixteenth-
century rulers to establish any form of unity among the various kingdoms
of which Spain was composed. Catalonia and Portugal revolted against
the Olivares regime for essentially similar reasons. Neither their historical
traditions nor their economic interests bound them sufficiently close to
Castile to make them willing to associate themselves voluntarily with it
in a common enterprise. The populace and lower clergy of both countries
were instinctively anti-Castilian; their aristocracies saw themselves de-
prived of the opportunity to obtain offices and honours by the permanent
absenteeism of their king; their urban and mercantile classes were in-
creasingly alienated from Castile by the fiscal demands of the conde duque,
who had exacted large gifts and loans from the cities of Barcelona and
Lisbon. Both countries were afraid that alien forms of government would
be imposed upon them, and that they would be sucked into the economic
system of a depressed Castile. This was a profoundly unattractive pros-
pect. Catalonia, barricaded behind a stable currency, was still hypnotized
by the commercial possibilities of a Mediterranean region whose wealth
was slowly ebbing away. Portugal, after the loss of its Far Eastern Empire,
had directed its gaze across the Atlantic to the New World. The vitality of
some of the Portuguese coastal towns in the first half of the seventeenth
century suggested that its hopes were not misplaced, but the gradual ex-
clusion of Portuguese merchants from Castile's American possessions
after 1620 made it clear that the economic advantages to be derived from
a Castilian-Portuguese union were by now exhausted. None of the Por-
472
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE SPANISH PENINSULA I 5 9 8 - 1 6 4 8
tuguese merchant class in 1640, with the exception of a few crown finan-
ciers, had much to gain from a continued association with Castile. The
future lay with Portuguese Brazil, which the king of Spain had shown
himself too weak to defend. Militarily, as well as economically, the union
with Castile had outlasted its value.
Since the unity of Spain had not grown organically, and contained no
form of economic or other attraction for the peripheral kingdoms after
about 1620, Olivares could only hope to impose it by threats and force.
It was too late to convince the Portuguese and Catalans that a close
association of the kingdoms of Spain could bring them any real advan-
tages. In the Union of Arms they could see no more than a plan for
common impoverishment. Rather than submit, they broke away from
allegiance to Philip IV, and Castile discovered that it was no longer
strong enough to force them back into the fold. The disintegration of
Spain therefore followed as the natural consequence of the decline of a
Castile which insisted on retaining and extending its hegemony over the
Iberian Peninsula, while no longer possessing sufficient strength for the
task.
Yet even if Olivares' schemes for a closer union had succeeded, it is
doubtful whether it would have brought the immediate benefits for which
he hoped. In his desperate desire to alleviate the sufferings of Castile,
he had come to exaggerate the economic resources of the other kingdoms,
and the extent to which they might prove of benefit to the crown. But
there was about this an irony in keeping with the history of Castile's
imperial career. In the sixteenth century Castile had relied upon miracu-
lous benefits from the El Dorado of America; in the seventeenth, it came
to expect no less miraculous benefits from the El Dorado of the Spanish
periphery. The failure of one miracle demanded the working of another;
and, as the grounds for hope were less, so the act of faith was greater. A
Lerma had replaced a Philip II, and an Olivares a Lerma, but nothing had
changed. Seventeenth-century Castile remained a 'republic of the be-
witched, living outside the natural order of things', hoping against hope
for the miracle that never occurred. Under the last kings of the House of
Austria it died as it had lived, the victim of its own illusions, a Quixote
to the last.
473
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER
XVI
FRENCH INSTITUTIONS AND SOCIETY
1610-61
the death of Henri IV, his son Louis XIII was not yet nine years
old. Kings of France came of age at thirteen and a day, so a
1 X. regency was necessary. On 15 May 1610 the young king, from his
lit de justice in the Parlement of Paris, appointed his mother, Marie de
Medici, regent, according to his father's wishes. Periods of regency were
always difficult for France and seemed to threaten the kingdom's dissolu-
tion. Jurists, political theorists and members of the government had a
clear concept of the state, 1 not shared by others, least of all by the nobility.
They preferred a simpler concept of greater emotional force, loyalty
between man and man, inherited from the feudal or remoter past. With
the king dead and a child on the throne, it seemed as if every man had
regained complete freedom, as if laws no longer existed, as if social
obligations, society and the state had died with the king. On hearing of
Ravaillac's attack, some nobles took to their fortified chateaux, while
others roamed the countryside in bands, plundering, holding men to
ransom and seizing the money in the royal coffers. The princes and mag-
nates summoned their followers. In town and country tumult and sedition
were rife.
The princes and magnates dreamed of regaining the independence
they had enjoyed under Hugues Capet, both in their own domains and
in the provincial governorships to which they were appointed by the king
(which sometimes became hereditary), and in the apanages granted by
the king to the princes and princesses of the royal blood and to queens-
dowager. Princes and magnates made use of the division of society into
'vertical' groups of men bound by ties of loyalty. These cut across the
other social divisions into orders (clergy, nobility and third estate); into
the corporations (universities, companies of officers, ecclesiastical
corporations and trade gilds); and into provinces, towns and peasant
communities. Each prince and magnate had 'clients', their devoted fol-
lowers, who had 'given' themselves to a lord to serve him, with arms,
counsel, skill or money in all his enterprises—even those against the king
or the state. In return they enjoyed his confidence, his friendship, his
protection (from the law if need be) his help in securing places at court,
commissions in the army, or offices, in making advantageous matches, in
gaining ecclesiastical preferment for younger sons and in every sort of
social advancement. This system was not strictly speaking feudal, for these
1
See above, Chapter in.
474
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRENCH INSTITUTIONS AND SOCIETY l 6 l O - 6 l
henchmen were not usually given fiefs, nor were they bound to their lord by
virtue of holding fiefs. It was based on personal ties reminiscent of com-
mendation. These ties were often strengthened by marriage, for mutual
obligations of service and protection were most important within families,
which resembled clans in their zeal to win social advantages for their
members. Once a member of a family had arrived, he had to bear in mind
his cousins to the nth degree. Marriage to the seventh cousin of a magnate
carried with it loyalty to the lord and assurance of his protection. A noble
sought the hand of a distant relative of Richelieu and was accepted; a
few months later, Richelieu married the girl off to another, but offered the
younger sister to the gentleman, who replied that it was all one to him:
'I am marrying your Eminence'. These devoues came primarily from the
lesser nobility or gentry. But the nobility provided the dominant social
ideals to which the king's legal and financial officers, whether members
of the sovereign courts or lesser officers, merchants and bourgeois rentiers,
municipal oligarchs, all aspired. The gentry in their turn had their own
followers, while gentlemen, officers, merchants, bourgeois were all owners
of land and seigneurial jurisdictions and employed some country dwellers.
They regarded the peasants as their 'men'; thanks to the protection they
gave against the royal tax collectors and soldiers, they were very powerful
in the countryside. In the towns the magistrates and the royal officers
(charged with the regulation of crafts and trades, wages and conditions
of work) had so much prestige that they were often followed by the
shopkeepers and workers. Princes and magnates naturally had even
greater influence. In provinces of which they were governors they appoin-
ted to posts such as governorships of towns or fortresses; in apanages,
they appointed fiscal and judicial officers. Within their governorships,
apanages and domains, the gentry felt themselves to be the magnates'
vassals, the more so as some of their fiefs depended on the magnates'
fiefs. Consequently, when the princes or magnates gave the signal for
revolt, whole provinces rose, and the rebels could count on help from
strongholds, towns and the royal coffers.
Revolts by the aristocrats were well received by the discontented
provincial gentry, who had often been impoverished by the wars of religion.
Their way of life was also ruinous, for to live nobly meant avoiding any
profitable activity and much spending on luxuries, presents, feasts,
marriages, religious benefactions, on service with the army and at court.
Few of the gentry took full advantage of their lands by making the effort
to sell grain, cattle and fleeces, as they were entitled to do without
derogation. Most of the gentry fell into debt and eventually sold their
lands to merchants from the towns, to royal officers, or even to large
farmers. Most small or middling fiefs were in the hands of bourgeois or
peasants and only the larger fiefs remained in noble hands. In much of
the country the feudal system no longer had any meaning and the ser-
475
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
vices attaching to a fief were not performed; in many places such as the
regions south of Paris, around Beauvais or Lyons, the proper recipient
of such services was not even known. The gentry were also discontented at
their exclusion in practice from most offices. They overlooked their general
ignorance, to which there were few exceptions so that their handwriting
was generally childlike and their spelling phonetic. They blamed the sale
of offices and the Paulette or droit annuel, a sort of insurance premium,
which enabled the holder of an office, or his family, to dispose of the
office freely in the event of his sudden death provided the tax had been
paid. As a result many offices remained in the same families and their
rising prices could only be afforded by officers and merchants.
This picture would need modifications for each region. The rural
gentry seem to have been particularly weak in regions where capitalism
and trade were most advanced, such as the Beauvaisis, where the class
would have died out but for the influx into its ranks of officials and
merchants, eager for social advancement. They bought fiefs and were
ennobled by letters patent, or by buying offices of royal secretaries,
or by repute acquired by three or four generations of living nobly. The
nobility survived, but the noble families changed, and the newcomers'
outlook was different. The nobility of the Beauvaisis, ruined by the wars
of religion, then partly renewed by new families, took no part in the
revolts against Richelieu, or in the Fronde.
Elsewhere, for instance in Brittany, Auvergne, Limousin, Quercy and
Perigord, the position of the gentry was relatively better, and ties of man-
orial subjection and feudal homage were stronger. The gentry were more
conscious of their obligations to the great families and of their own
seigneurial authority over their peasants, to whom they often behaved
like tyrants. Almost throughout this period in Auvergne, the marquis de
Canillac, like the king, imposed direct and indirect taxes on the peasants
and abused his judicial authority by imprisoning unfortunate wretches for
trifles, or for no reason, in order to force them to buy their freedom.
The Canillacs even dominated the city of Clermont and reduced the
king's envoys to despair. There were many other nobles who levied un-
lawful taxes, imposed corvees unjustly and misappropriated the church's
tithes.
Royal taxes cut into seigneurial dues when harvests were bad or below
average and led nobles to incite their peasants against royal taxation
and to attack royal agents. The worst and most frequent revolts were in
the provinces where nobles were preponderant.
Fortunately for the king, the gentry did not form organized bodies, or
an estate in practice. In certain provinces, such as Auvergne, a syndic of
the nobility survived, but the king's consent was necessary for any
nomination and its functions must have been only honorific. At the
States General of 1614 and during the Fronde, when delegates of the
476
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRENCH INSTITUTIONS AND SOCIETY l 6 l O - 6 l
nobility met, the gentry's activities only echoed those of the magnates
and princes, lacking any real independence.
The gentry declined, for its military and knightly ideals and its anxiety
not to lose caste excluded its members from capitalist commerce. This
was the life of the ports—Rouen, Nantes, La Rochelle, Bordeaux, Mar-
seilles; of the cities at crossroads—Lyons, Toulouse, Poitiers, Paris; of
towns in the midst of fertile plains with good communications, such as
Amiens, Beauvais, Noyon, Soissons. Their merchants and officers domina-
ted considerable surrounding areas both economically and socially.
Beauvais may be taken as an example. It has received little attention
hitherto, it was not one of the leading industrial or trading towns, so its
example is all the more revealing. 1 There a handful of great merchants
controlled the whole textile industry. They bought wool from the regions
of Noyon, Soissons, Brie, the Beauce, and even from Spain, via Rouen;
flax and linen for bleaching from Mayenne, Laval, and Chateau-Gontier,
and also from Arras, Tournai and Courtrai in the Spanish Netherlands.
They controlled the weaving and processing of textiles in the town and
its region, producing fine woollen cloth, comparable according to
contemporary evidence with that of Florence until the 'open' war with
Spain in 1635, when they turned to hard-wearing serges. They sold
their woollens and linen throughout northern France through Rouen
and Dieppe to Spain and America and in the Spanish Netherlands
before 1635. Thereafter they looked increasingly to Lyons and through
Lyons to the East and the Mediterranean. They felt responsible for the
livelihood of a vast number of people and in fact gave employment to
several thousand persons in Beauvais. These belonged to many categories
including the clothier with several looms and weavers, spinners and
combers, or the man with one loom, as well as mere day labourers. Many
ancillary trades, such as dyers, fullers, shearers, were also employed by
clothiers and others. The only ones who were independent of the big
merchants were a tiny number of merchant drapers [marchands drapiers
drapants] who might have anything from six to twenty looms and all the
other equipment needed for finishing the cloth (except fulling and dyeing).
They sold directly on the markets of Troyes and Paris, without their
goods passing through the hands of the great merchants. Thousands
of peasants on the plateau to the north of Beauvais were dependent on the
town's merchants. Labourers, who accounted for two-thirds of the village
population, wove serge or linen for them in winter. A few owned their
own looms and sold their cloth unfinished, but most were given their
equipment and raw materials by agents of the merchants and worked
for wages, though each might own a cottage and a garden or a field.
Throughout the region, women and girls spun wool for Beauvais, Amiens,
1
See Pierre Goubert, Families marchandes sous I'Ancien Regime: Les Danse et la Motte
de Beauvais (SEVPEN,Paris, i959);andBeauvaisetleJ3eauvaisisdei6oodi73o(Paris, i960).
All
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Paris, Flanders, Holland and England. The agents of the merchants in
the country were often peasants, owning some thirty acres, a couple of
horses and a plough, who often served as carriers for textiles and other
products. The entire plain owed its living to the merchants of Beauvais.
The upper classes were also interested in their activities, for it was from
them that the merchants obtained part of their capital, by loans at a fixed
interest; the Danse and La Motte families illustrate this.
Moreover, even isolated farming regions with which communication
was difficult could be centres of long-distance trade. The parishes of the
Election of Brive only produced a tenth of the grain they needed. They
obtained additional supplies from Quercy, Perigord, Auvergne, and paid
for them with money received from the sale of wines at Limoges and of
cattle at Bordeaux. Almost the whole of France was involved in a trading
economy, and sometimes in commercial capitalism.
Trade might be a family pursuit for two or three generations, but the
position of merchant was not the ultimate ideal of this class. The trader
bought fiefs and manors, his daughters entered convents or made marriages
with officers or minor nobles, his sons might become priests, monks,
canons or officers. Then the head of the family would one day give up
trade, buy an office in a Bailliage or Election and become receiver-general
of the feudal dues of an abbey. The new officer's son would buy an office
conferring nobility, such as that of king's secretary, or councillor of the
Parlement of Paris or Rouen, and he would take a title from one of his
properties. The son of this new noble might enter the army, buy a company
and gain recognition as a true noble. The family would then begin to
ruin itself by living in the way fitted to its station, until it had to sell its
lands and was replaced by another family. Rise, success, decline and fall
covered some five to seven generations in most cases. By 1789 the greater
part of the French nobility consisted of families who had begun to rise
during our period.
A good example of an officer is Toussaint-Foy, an elu, 1 whose fortune
was dispersed after his death, in 1660 and 1661. He left 171,000 livres.
His office accounted for about 6% of this sum—10,000 livres—lands and
seigneuries at farm 55%, and stocks of foodstuffs 9%. He was receiver-
general of the feudal dues of the bishopric-county of Beauvais, of two
abbeys and a priory, and possessed 565 quarters of wheat and 229 casks
of wine, and had rented five houses in Beauvais to store them. Prices
leapt between 1660 and 1662. Wheat, which had cost 27 livres in June
1660, rose to 38 livres in August and to 42 livres in October. Toussaint-
Foy had 1,030 obligations owing him, worth 23,113 livres, mainly from
peasants. 603 were acquired between 1647 and 1653 during the rise in
prices during the Fronde. Thanks to a thousand other obligations he had
1
[The election had a tribunal of some 20 ilus; it judged cases arising from the taille
and other taxes and supervised assessment and collection.]
478
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRENCH INSTITUTIONS AND SOCIETY l 6 l O - 6 l
acquired many mortgaged parcels of land and built up seven domains
from 1646 to 1657.
Not all the officers were men of culture. Many were mere administra-
tors, whose library consisted of a few works of devotion and some law
manuals, but often by the third generation such families produced
humanists, jurists and theologians. George le Boucher, of the Election
of Beauvais, had in his library in 1652: Isocrates, Plato, Plutarch, Cicero,
Livy, Seneca, Gregory of Tours, Robert Etienne, Lorenzo Valla, Calvin,
the Satyre Menippde, Olivier de Serres, Cardin Le Bret, Jansenius, Antoine
Arnauld, 72 folio and 411 quarto volumes and a mass of pamphlets and
tracts.
The example of Toussaint-Foy demonstrates another aspect of the
domination of town over country: the feudal dues and the debts of the
peasants. In years of bad harvest, high prices gave the merchants and
officials who received grain in payment of feudal rents a larger profit
than in good years, whilst the peasants starved. The structure of society
killed some and enriched others. In bad years the small farmer had to
borrow to meet all his expenses—food, seed, taxes and dues, from the
bigger farmer, often the collector of tithes and dues, or from the merchant
or officer who was the local seigneur. The peasant mortgaged his land
and was not able to meet his payments until eventually his creditor sold
the property. To the peasant it seemed a process of spoliation. In 1664-5,
during the special judicial enquiry [Grand Jours] in Auvergne, the local
peasants thought that the royal commissioners were going to return the
lands which they had had to alienate to the seigneurs.
Merchants and officials controlled the municipal institutions, becoming
echevins, consuls and mayors [members of municipal corporations].
In many towns either the king nominated the mayor, or else the royal
officers exercised a close control over the election of the town's magist-
rates and their activities. In Beauvais the royal officials had much less
influence, in spite of the nearness of Paris. The city corporation was
elected by an electoral body on which the lower-class textile workers had
ten votes and the merchants and officers twenty-one. As a result, from
1600 to 1655, 84 echevins out of 116 were merchants and all the mayors
except two. The commune saw to the upkeep of the ramparts, defence,
allocation of taxes, and had some powers of police. 1 The bishop of Beau-
vais, a count and peer of France, possessed the main judicial authority
from which there was the right of appeal to the Parlement of Paris, and
the major powers of police. The royal Bailliage only concerned itself with
royal cases, and the Election only supervised the division of taxes and
fiscal disputes. The local authorities held the workers' lives in their
hands. The bishop's bailli fixed wages at a low level, which fluctuated
1
[Police included many functions wider than the modern meaning, such as regulation
of wages, prices, weights and measures, food supplies and holidays.]
479
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
slightly and dropped in times of crisis, when prices rose. The worker's
life was hard and he was often without bread. At the time of very poor
harvests accompanied by epidemics—the time of 'mortalities'—the work-
ers were the worst hit, especially from 1630 to 1632, from 1648 to 1653,
from 1660 to 1662. In the poorest quarters of Beauvais the expectation of
life was eighteen years. The workers' attitude to the authorities and other
social groups was changeable. In times of increasing prices of food there
were uprisings against employers and magistrates, which were repressed
by the bourgeois militia, of three privileged companies. When the king's
demands on the town, or the duties on cloth became too heavy, bourgeois
and workers were united against them. In many towns traders and
officials incited the workers to revolt and made no attempt to check the
disorders. When threatened by foreign invasion, Beauvais again became
united. The bourgeois armed and drilled the workers, who formed four
companies, commanded by merchant drapers. This happened in 1636,
the year of Corbie, several times during the Fronde, notably against the
princes in 1652 and again in 1657, when there was an incursion by
Spanish cavalry.
In the country 'mortalities' might carry off a third of the population.
Day labourers were the main victims, and with the death of many crafts-
men there were long economic crises. The 'mortalities' of 1630-2, 1648-
53 and 1660-2 had lasting consequences; their effects were cumulative
producing destitution and fear of lack of men and resources. Bands of
vagabonds descended on the towns and there were peasant risings. Such
disturbances were not serious in the Beauvaisis, because both gentry and
nobles remained loyal to the king. Indeed it should be noted that revolts
mainly occurred if the overlords (gentry, officials, merchants) stirred the
peasants up against the various agents of the royal treasury, and a
rebellion often began with the murder of some tax-collector.
The king's government was never confronted with a united opposition,
although seigneurs, nobles, merchants and officers had a common cause
in opposing the king's financial demands which in wartime adversely
affected returns from rents and feudal dues. The king, however, had his
own loyal followers, his divouis and could rely on them. The nobles
despised the bourgeois, who in turn envied them. The officials of the
Bailliages and of the Presidiaux [local royal courts], who were not
nobles, were jealous of the officers of the sovereign courts, especially
those of the Parlements, who were ennobled by their offices; the elus
were hostile to the Tresoriers de France} Peasants and workers were
lacking in class consciousness, towns and provinces were concerned only
with their own privileges. What Frenchmen had in common with each
other, their social ideals and reasons for living, were all embodied in the
1
[The Tresoriers were more recently created offices, forming the bureau des finances
which supervised the elus and other fiscal officers in each generality.]
480
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRENCH INSTITUTIONS AND SOCIETY
l6lO-6l
king. All oppositions wished to return to outmoded political and social
systems, incompatible with the independence and very existence of the
kingdom, and with the fuller development of individual self-expression.
The king and his supporters, by their efforts to build up the state, repre-
sented forces of progress and the future.
Marie de Medici kept the ministers and councils of Henri IV. The main
decisions were taken in a secret council, whose members were Villeroi,
the secretary of state, Jeannin, president of the Paris Parlement and
Sillery, the chancellor of France, but the real government was in the hands
of a court clique; the Jesuit Coton, Henri IV's confessor, Ubaldini the
papal nuncio, Leonora Galigai, lady-in-waiting to the Queen, and her
husband, the Florentine Concini, who was one of those favourites now
more numerous in Europe, because the demands of absolutism were too
heavy for many kings. Henri IV's old companion, Sully, resigned on
26 January 1611.
The queen-regent was a foreigner, the king was a child; the new govern-
ment was content with a policy of peace and alliance with Spain, con-
firmed by the marriage of Louis XIII to the eldest Spanish infanta, Anne
of Austria (Treaty of Fontainebleau, 20 April 1611). In domestic affairs,
Marie de Medici wisely made the magnates lead a life of continual
celebrations at court and showered bounty on them. Even so, they
muttered that the time of kings had passed and that the time of the
princes and magnates had come. Their demands were unceasing and finally
they revolted. In February 1614 the princes, Conde, Mayenne, Nevers,
Bouillon and Longueville, retired to the provinces of which they were
governors, raised armies and forced the summoning of the States General.
The regent took Louis XIII on a tour of the provinces and the sight of the
young king on horseback aroused the enthusiasm of the people. Further,
the king was declared to be of age on 2 October 1614. Loyalty to the
monarchy revived and the elections were unfavourable to the princes'
faction.
The States General met in Paris on 27 October 1614, but were rendered
powerless by their divisions. The majority of the Third Estate consisted
of officers. The nobles demanded the abolition of the Paulette or droit
annuel, whereupon the Third Estate demanded the abolition of pensions.
Harsh words were exchanged. The lieutenant-civil? Henri de Mesmes,
had said that' the three Orders were three brothers, children of a common
mother; France'. At this certain gentlemen asserted 'that they had no
wish for the children of cobblers and shoemakers to call them brothers,
and that there were as many differences between them as between master
and servant'. The Third Estate also quarrelled with the Clergy. They
wished it proclaimed that the king derived his power directly from God
1
[Chief officer of the civil court at the Chatelet, also responsible for police of Paris.]
481
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
and that the pope had no power to depose him; while the Clergy rejected
this. The Government dissolved the States General and the representatives
went home (February-March 1615). They did not meet again until 1789.
However, the government considered it desirable to announce a reduc-
tion in pensions and the abolition of sale of offices. The sovereign courts
were also active; on 28 March 1615 the Parlement of Paris decided to
summon the princes, dukes, peers and great officers of the crown to
consider 'the king's service, the relief of his subjects and the good of his
state'. The Parlement was attempting on its own initiative to revive the
curia regis, or even the assemblies of the Prankish nation, and to intervene
freely in affairs of the state. This would have meant the king's permanent
subordination to two aristocracies, the nobilities of the Sword and Robe,
an aristocratic government, or at least a sort of Sta'ndestaat. 1 But the
king held himself responsible 'to God alone and to his conscience' and
'as the sovereign power of the Prince is a reflection or lustre of the omni-
potence of God, so the power of the officers is a reflection of the absolute
power of the prince'. He commanded Parlement to desist. At the same
time, 13 May 1615, he deferred the abolition of the sale of offices and
allowed officers to retain the Paulette. The sovereign courts calmed down
and began to hunt for a way to save their faces. By a decree of 23 May
1615 the princes were declared guilty of lese-majeste.
The ministers were now old men, 'greybeards'. They made peace at
Loudun (3 May 1616). Conde and his supporters received large sums of
money and Conde became head of the council. He was preparing to assume
power and to change the constitution to his advantage. Concini replaced
the ministers by energetic men devoted to the royal cause, Barbin, the
queen-mother's intendant, being controller of finances; Mangot, the
first president of the Parlement of Provence, chancellor and Richelieu,
bishop of Lucon, secretary of state for foreign affairs (November 1616).
The new ministers threw Conde in the Bastille and three royal armies
marched against the rebellious princes. A council of dispatches was set
up to deal with reports from the provinces, a sort of ministry of the
interior, charged with the restoration of law and order. Many intendants
were sent to the provinces, often with very wide powers, such as judging
cases in place of the usual officers, deciding all administrative matters and
supervising towns and communes. The council alone had authority over
the intendants and when the intendants came into conflict with the Parle-
ments, the council annulled the latter's decrees. Thanks to these com-
missioners, the king was no longer dependent on officers who owned their
posts. Richelieu negotiated with the German Protestants, who were
friendly with the due de Bouillon and prevented the rebels from raising
troops in the empire. He also claimed for Louis XIII the role of arbiter
of Christendom.
1
See above, Chapter m.
482
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRENCH INSTITUTIONS AND SOCIETY l 6 l O - 6 l
This truly monarchical policy was advocated by Concini, but Louis
XIII, kept out of affairs and pushed on one side, hated his mother's
favourite. With his own favourite, Charles d'Albert de Luynes, he decided
to remove him. As the fount of justice, the king could pass sentence of
death independently of the courts; raison d'etat provided further justifi-
cation. Vitry, the captain of the guard, was entrusted with the execution
of the sentence. On 24 April 1617 Concini was shot down at the entrance
to the Louvre. Nobles crowded round Louis XIII, shouting 'Vive le Roi\
Louis XIII recalled the former ministers and Marie de Medici was exiled
to Blois. The removal of Concini saved the princes from complete defeat
and from unconditional surrender.
Louis XIII felt a great affection for Luynes, making him a duke and
peer and entrusting all power to him. But the favourite was undistinguished
and he put the kingdom in jeopardy. To satisfy public opinion and above
all the officers, he summoned a great assembly of notables to reform the
kingdom. In it the officers of the sovereign courts were put on an equal
footing with the nobles and as a result of its proposals, a great edict was
drawn up in 1618. It limited the powers of the council over the sovereign
courts and of the intendants over the provinces, but was never strictly
applied. Luynes enriched his family and friends, and joined forces with
Lesdiguieres, Conde and Guise: as a result, the other great nobles in
1620 seceded to their provincial governorships. Mayenne and d'fipernon
went to Guyenne and Saintonge and Longueville to Normandy where
he made contact with the queen-mother. The government was obliged
to restore the Paulette to the officers (it had been suppressed in 1618) to
regain their support and won an easy victory at Ponts-de-Ce (August
1620). Luynes embarked on a vast Catholic campaign, supported the
Emperor Ferdinand II, helping him to win the battle of the White Hill,
and allowed Spain to occupy the Valtelline, contrary to France's real
interests. He attempted to restore Catholicism in Beam and promulgated
the Union of Beam and Navarre, the former personal possessions of
Henri IV (1620), with the French crown. The Protestants rose; Luynes as
constable besieged Montauban without success and died soon after of
purple fever (1621).
Louis XIII was twenty-one and dreamt of greatness and absolute
power. When he had reduced the Protestant town of Saint-Jean-
d'Angely on 25 June 1621, he had refused to discuss terms with his
rebellious subjects. They had been obliged to beg for mercy, which he
was then pleased to grant; thus adopting a policy usually attributed to
Richelieu. With Luynes out of the way, he began to reform his council
in 1622. Although brave, honourable, scrupulous in his religious duties
and with a highly developed understanding of the state, Louis lacked
political ability. He was not able to restore the foreign situation and left
the initiative with the Habsburgs. In home affairs, he could not overcome
483
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
the Protestant opposition (Peace of Montpellier, 18 October 1622). He
regarded the work of Catholic reform demanded by a large section of
public opinion as inadequate. Under the influence of St Francis de Sales
(Traite de Vamour de Dieu (1616) 'a wave of mysticism swept through
the elite of French Catholicism'. Prayer was the means of reforming the
religious orders. The clergy were often too ignorant and coarse to make
good priests; Bourdoise had formed the Community of Saint Nicholas du
Chardonnet in 1612, while on 11 November 1611 Berulle had founded the
French Oratory which influenced Vincent de Paul. At the same time
libertinism was rife, from 1623-1625 its leading representative being the
poet Theophile de Viau, whose collection of obscene verse, the Parnasse
Satyrique, appeared in 1623. All the young nobles at court followed him.
Mersenne thought that there were 50,000 atheists in Paris. The devout
were alarmed and called for a strong government to repress libertinism
and to give effective support to the 'Catholic Renaissance'.
In turn, Louis XIII tried Conde, the Brularts and La Vieuville as
ministers. All of them failed when faced with the inconsistent policy of
fighting in defence of orthodoxy at home, while attacking the Habsburgs
abroad, who claimed to be the champions of orthodoxy. By now Louis
XIII was reconciled with his mother who had her favourite, Richelieu,
made a cardinal (5 September 1622). Louis was distrustful of him, but the
cardinal suggested, via the queen-mother, prospects of glory and the means
of achieving greatness for the monarchy. On 29 April 1624 he was ad-
mitted to the council and on 13 August, under pressure of public opinion,
Louis made him its head, for the defeat of heresy and the House of Austria.
Louis XIII was a conscientious king who knew his limitations. He chose
Richelieu from among those who alarmed him to be the instrument
for executing his will in return for Louis' unfailing support. The bonds
of fidelity were strengthened by the genuine friendship between these two
men, both Catholics and both soldiers. Richelieu was a man of action:
ambitious, authoritarian, and he gave the hesitant king confidence and
the strength to assert his will. By word of mouth and by a profusion of
notes and memoranda he explained to the king in minute detail carefully
balanced reasons for and against every decision, but it was the king who
finally decided.' These two men devoted themselves entirely to the welfare
of France and sacrificed all to raison d'etat.'
Until 1630 Richelieu was not the absolute master of the council whose
members included Marillac, keeper of the seals (1626), the cardinal de la
Rochefoucauld, the chancellor d'Aligre, and Schomberg. These men
were devoted to the queen-mother, and were more concerned with
internal reforms and the struggle against heresy than with opposition
to the House of Austria. In 1625, therefore, Richelieu put forward far-
reaching plans for reforms, aristocratic in trend: the suppression of the
484
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRENCH INSTITUTIONS AND SOCIETY l 6 l O - 6 l
Paulette and sale of offices and a balance between the three estates in the
king's council (though the higher clergy came mainly from the nobility).
Richelieu wished to return to a less absolute monarchy, to governing
by a great council, with the restoration of the old hierarchies; the magi-
strates ranking below the old nobility were to be secure in power and social
position and so he suppressed many intendants. He attacked the propa-
ganda of heretics and libertines, limited the number of printers, forbade
private persons to have printing presses and allowed printers outside
Paris and Lyons to print nothing but Books of Hours, catechisms, and
doctoral theses (1626).
Seeing the need to check the Habsburgs' progress towards hegemony,
which would have been followed by a renewal of the conflict between the
papacy and the empire, he attacked their lines of communication in the
Valtelline and Genoa and subsidized their Dutch and German enemies.
As he turned against the Catholic powers, the Protestants chose to rebel
at La Rochelle, in the Cevennes and in Upper Languedoc, under the
prince de Soubise and Duke Henri de Rohan. Meanwhile the Catholic
faction, the queen-mother, d'Aligre and Marillac, advised by Father
Berulle, called for peace with the Habsburgs to leave them free to crush
heresy in Europe. The king's brother, Gaston d'Orleans, the Vendomes,
bastards of Henri IV, the comte de Soissons, the due de Longueville and
the duchesse de Chevreuse began to plot against the king and Richelieu,
while the Spaniards, informed by Anne of Austria, lent their support.
Richelieu had to give up his plans against the Habsburgs and come to
terms with the Huguenots (5 February 1626) and the Spaniards (Treaty
of Moncon, May 1626). This showed Richelieu the necessity of sacrificing
everything to secure the king's absolute authority. Louis XIII had one of
the conspirators, the marquis de Chalais, beheaded in August 1626,
banished Madame de Chevreuse and put aside Anne of Austria. The
great nobles were quiescent for a while. The prince de Conde rallied to
Richelieu, who abandoned his plans for the nobility, and made it his main
concern to appease the high robe and the bourgeois officers. He convened
an assembly of notables (1626-7), with a majority of members of the
sovereign courts. They protested at the actions of the intendants and
evocation of cases from the ordinary courts by the royal council; on
these points Richelieu was unhelpful, but he dropped his plans for abolish-
ing the Paulette and sale of offices and for balancing the three orders in
the council. They went home appeased.
The king's council was divided into several sections, in theory it was
one body and its members came mainly from the high robe; the king
governed through men who in the eyes of nobles were mere 'bourgeois'.
In 1630 the last of a series of decrees completed the reorganization of the
council. The king in his Cabinet Council with one or more ministers
decided the most important matters which were approved by the Conseil
485
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
d'en haut, comprising the ministers of state, the first minister, the chan-
cellor or keeper of the seals, the superintendent of finances and the
secretary of state for foreign affairs. This council was mainly concerned
with general policy, but also with anything detrimental to the other
councils or concerning public security. It assumed increasing control of
finance. The ministers were granted a patent, entered in 'possession'
of their 'functions', taking the title of minister after being 'installed'.
There were several clerks under their control—their 'servants'. They now
received a salary and expenses from the king; real ministers were emerging.
The other councils, concerned with administration and not with general
policy, began to form a corps of administrators. The career of Andre
d'Ormesson was typical. After being maitre des requites and therefore rap-
porteur to the council [preparing legal, judicial and other business] he later
received his patent and took the oath in April 1615. Before taking up
his duties, he was intendant in Champagne, and subsequently entered the
Council of State and the Privy Council as quadrimestre serving three
months a year, in 1626. After acting as commissioner to the Estates of
Brittany, he was made semestre (serving six months a year) in January 1633.
He was then promoted and sat on the Council of Finance as well as on the
others. In April 1635 he was granted the patent of Councillor-in-Ordinary.
An effort was made to preserve the council's archives in the Louvre,
but records were badly kept and the ministers and secretaries of state
retained their own papers. Numerous temporary or permanent commis-
sions of councillors prepared the business of the councils. It was from
the councils that the king drew most of his commissioners and intendants.
The king's power depended on ready supplies of bullion. Richelieu
therefore proposed to the enthusiastic notables a mercantilist programme
which he pursued at least until 1630. In March 1626 he assumed the
title of 'Grand Master, Chief and Superintendent General of Commerce
and Navigation'. He wished the French to produce and export as much as
possible and to buy as few foreign manufactures as possible. Duties
were to be removed on imported raw materials and greatly increased on
finished goods imported and raw materials exported. He dreamed of
making France 'the common warehouse of all the trade of the world'
by a Navigation Act and by linking the Saone and the Loire by means of
a canal to avoid the Straits of Gibraltar. He tried to raise trade in the
public esteem. The Ordinance of 1629, drawn up by Marillac, allowed
nobles to engage in maritime trade without derogation, and ennobled
shipowners and merchants of long standing. Richelieu wished to obtain
silk and dyes for the textile industry direct from their countries of origin,
cutting out the Dutch middlemen. From 1626 to 1628 emissaries, among
them des Hayes de Courmenin, bargained with the Barbary pirates, the
Sultan and the Bedouins to reopen the Mediterranean-Euphrates route
to India and Persia and so damage the Anglo-Dutch trade routes by sea.
486
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRENCH INSTITUTIONS AND SOCIETY l 6 l O - 6 l
This failed and he then attempted to open up a route through the Baltic,
the Neva, the Volga, the Caspian and Persia. In 1629 des Hayes de Cour-
menin obtained from Denmark a reduction in tariffs in the Sound and the
czar gave permission to trade at Archangel, Novgorod, Pskov, and
Moscow, with the proviso that the French should obtain Asian produce
through Russian traders. Twenty French vessels reached Russia in 1630
and seventy-two in 1631, then war checked trade.
For Atlantic trade Richelieu would have liked to cut a canal from
Paris to Rouen, making Paris a sea-port. He dreamed of Canada becoming
a 'New France'. He wished to open the Northwest Passage to China
with its silk and spices. He set up trading companies; Morbihan (1626),
Nacelle de Saint-Pierre fleur de Lysee (1627) and New France (1628). But
the war paralysed these attempts.
The royal power was incompatible with the existence of a Protestant
state in France. The Protestants were organized in a way not anticipated
by the Edict of Nantes, with a general assembly, provincial assemblies,
eight military departments, strongholds, a standing army and com-
mander-in-chief. A Protestant and a Catholic state united by the king
implied a political dualism, the kind of federalism which inspired aristo-
cratic movements. The religious party (devots) and its leader Berulle, a
cardinal since 1627, incited Richelieu to attack the leading Protestant
town, La Rochelle, the main port in the kingdom, through which they
could maintain contact with England and Holland. The time was oppor-
tune. The Protestants were growing lukewarm; they were casting doubt on
predestination and free-will. Their religion, from being a life in God was
becoming a mass of rules and regulations. Among the nobles conversions
to Catholicism were numerous. The due de Lesdiguieres turned Catholic
and was made constable and given the Order of the Holy Ghost. The due
de la Treinoille became a Catholic just as the siege of La Rochelle began.
The Protestants held important financial posts at court and many judicial
offices in the south of the kingdom, even whole presidials. They were
attached to their offices, whose value was increased by the Paulette.
They shared the bourgeois mentality of the officers: their legalism, pru-
dence, taste for order, love for hierarchy. In the Protestant towns, officials
and traders held the monopoly of the municipal offices and feared popular
risings. They also feared the dictatorship of the due de Rohan during a
civil war. They desired peace and order.
In 1627 the inhabitants of La Rochelle revolted, instigated by England.
Only a small number of southern Protestants followed them. The duke
of Buckingham landed on the He de Re, but in November Louis XIII and
Richelieu forced the withdrawal of the English and, to stop them relieving
the town by sea, Richelieu built a large mole bristling with cannon.
The English fleet was repulsed on 11 May 1628 and the starving town
surrendered after a heroic resistance: the king entered it on 1 November.
487
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
The war continued in the south, but the English came to terms at
Suze, 24 April 1629. Rohan signed a military alliance with the king
of Spain (3 May) but it was in vain, and the plight of the Protestants
was desperate. The king refused to treat with his subjects, but on 28
June 1629, by the Grace of Alais, the rising was forgiven and the
Edict of Nantes reaffirmed, but the edict alone: all the fortifications of
the rebels were razed, the Protestant organization broken up and the
due de Rohan was obliged to go into exile. The Protestant state ceased
to exist.
Meanwhile the council was endeavouring to introduce reforms. The
Chancellor de Marillac presented a first list in January 1629. These
limited the power of the high robe by the suppression of the sale of offices
in the royal households and in the army, by restricting the power of
remonstrance of the Parlements, which could only delay edicts for two
months and by legalizing the position of the intendants. Richelieu an-
nounced the council's intention not to renew the Paulette, granted for
nine years, when it expired in a year's time. 'The Parlements were en-
raged and the situation of the kingdom became revolutionary'. After
the fall of La Rochelle the king had had to intervene in Italy against the
Habsburgs and taxation had to be increased. From 1626 to 1628 there
was a sharp drop in agricultural prices causing difficulties for farmers.
After 1628 a succession of bad harvests caused grain prices to shoot up
and famine was accompanied by epidemics of 'plague'—the great
'mortality' of 1630-2. There had already been popular disturbances in
1627 and 1628. The royal officers, burdened with forced loans and capital
payments for increased salaries, did nothing or secretly connived at
disturbances. In 1629 and 1630 even the sovereign courts openly rebelled,
broke open the royal coffers, seized their arrears of salaries and incited
the people to plunder the army grain stores or to attack the intendants.
Armed risings by peasants and craftsmen grew in number and serious-
ness. It was impossible to wage war and reform the kingdom simultan-
eously. Richelieu offered the king the 'great choice'. Louis XIII could
follow the religious party (devots), Marillac and the queen-mother, make
peace with Spain, decide to wipe out heresy in his realm, respect the
rightful possessions and liberties of his subjects and try to make his
people happy. Richelieu pointed out that it was not possible to achieve
conversions by force, that the safety of the kingdom and the independence
of the country were the greatest of all goods and that the Habsburg
threat had to be removed before reforms could be considered. The king
followed Richelieu and (21 May 1629) appointed him 'principal Minister
of State'. In April 1630 he took the decisive step by refusing to yield
Pinerolo the gateway to Italy, therefore opting for a long war against
the Habsburgs and giving u p ' all thought of rest, economy and re-ordering
of the domestic affairs of the kingdom'. At first he waged a hidden war
488
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRENCH INSTITUTIONS AND SOCIETY l 6 l O - 6 l
by supporting the enemies of the Habsburgs—the United Provinces and
Gustavus Adolphus—and by attacking lines of communication; then
after the defeat of the Swedes at Nordlingen he embarked on 'open'
war with Spain and the empire.
Marie de Medici was shocked by Richelieu and made several attempts
to secure his dismissal. On 10 November 1630, during a painful scene
between herself, the king and the minister, she thought she had succeeded.
On 11 November the courtiers hastened to her and loaded her with
compliments, but the king assured Richelieu of his trust in him, and
next day the news came that Marillac had been arrested and Richelieu
was all-powerful. After this 'Day of Dupes' Marie was obliged to go into
exile for the last time and Gaston d'Orleans retired to his apanage to
foment rebellion. The king declared his brother's accomplices guilty of
lese-majeste, but the Parlement of Paris refused to register the declaration
and so authorized rebellion. The king banished some officers of the
Parlement and forbade it to meddle in affairs of state, but also abandoned
the ordinance of 1629, restored the Paulette to office-holders and maintained
the sale of offices. The sovereign courts deserted the rebels and registered
the fiscal edicts. Gaston d'Orleans incited Henri de Montmorency,
governor of Languedoc, to revolt: they were defeated at Castelnaudary
(1 September 1632). Henri was beheaded and Gaston fled to Brussels,
married Marguerite of Lorraine, the sister of the duke, an enemy of
France, and was a continual source of difficulties. Attempts were made to
have the marriage annulled but eventually (8 October 1634) Gaston
yielded and returned to France.
Richelieu had had his hands free since 1630. The main task of the reign
was to be the struggle against the Habsburgs. This drove Louis XIII and
Richelieu to dictatorship for war with arbitrary, centralized, egalitarian
government which unintentionally began revolutionary changes. The
solution of two problems guided all the government's actions: those of
finance and of national morale and intelligence with the enemy.
The sovereign courts delayed the ratification of financial measures by
presenting seven or eight remonstrances on fiscal edicts. In order to break
this resistance and to end their refusal to grant essential credits, the king
gave the council power over the courts in his absence. From 1632 the
council had power to annul, on its sole authority, any decree of the courts
conflicting with the public interest or the crown's authority. Moreover,
by an edict of 21 February 1641 the king finally reduced the number of
remonstrances to two before registration in financial matters, while they
could only be made after registration in matters of state. He restricted
the courts to their judicial functions: 'You have been established only to
judge between Master Peter and Master John . . . and if you continue your
ventures, I shall clip your nails so close that you will repent it.'
In the provinces the king was dissatisfied with his financial officers.
17
4^9
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
UHPDECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
He complained that they showed excessive respect for legal forms. The
treasurers of France refused to sanction the levying of taxes when the
edicts had not been verified by the sovereign courts and were able to do
so because they formed companies, empowered to make remonstrances.
Further, these officers, who regarded the offices they owned primarily
as dignities giving them a position in the society of the time, were held to be
negligent and indolent. In 1634 the intendant de Vertamont found some
officers at Bordeaux who could give him no information on the taxable
value of parishes and who had made no changes in the assessments of the
taille for sixty years. It was said that the elus under-assessed taxes on
parishes where their friends, relations or superiors had lands or houses
or farmers, and overburdened the rest. They looked the other way when
the rich and influential taxpayers, the 'cocks of the parish' or nobles'
farmers, were spared and the poorest were crushed. The taxes, being
levied on those unable to pay, could not be collected. The nobles, seig-
neurs and officers took the inhabitants into their strongholds when the
bailiffs arrived, guarding goods, crops and cattle from distraint and driving
off the revenue officials if need be with firearms. Incited by seigneurs and
nobles whole parishes rose. The royal judges made no effort to punish
the guilty, but helped to cover their escape and to conceal them. In order
to increase the income from taxation, to ease the lot of the 'weakest and
most helpless' and prevent revolts, after 1633 the government made
increasing use of commissioners sent to the provinces to assess taxes more
equitably between the parishes and between individual taxpayers.
These tasks were for preference entrusted to maitres de requites and to
intendants of justice, police and finances, who had new financial powers
in addition to their other powers. Their missions were temporary and
local. Whenever necessary the intendants performed the functions of
the treasurers of France, elus or assesseurs-collecteurs [parish assessors
and collectors of taille], while exercising general supervision over all the
officers and the whole population. These missions became increasingly
frequent and finally the decree of 22 August 1642 and the declaration of
16 April 1643 transferred all the duties of the financial officers as well
as those of ordinary jurisdictions in financial matters to the intendants:
they were given wide powers to punish the recalcitrant. The 'companies'
of financial officers remained, but their functions became merely formal
and the intendant was empowered to ignore them in certain circumstances,
so that they lost their power of remonstrance and resistance. They provided
the intendant with a reserve of men from whom he could choose experts
loyal to the king. It was an expedient, but the war made it last and turned
it into an institution. 1
1
See Roland Mousnier, 'Etat et Commissaire. Recherches sur la crtation des intendants
des provinces (1634-48)', Forschungen zu Staat und Verfassiwg, Festgabefiir Fritz Hartung
(Berlin, 1958).
490
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRENCH INSTITUTIONS AND SOCIETY l 6 l O - 6 l
To keep up the morale of the nation, Louis XIII and Richelieu made
extensive use of political surveillance. In addition to the reports sent to
Richelieu, the Chancellor Seguier and the secretaries of state by com-
missioners, intendants, the king's advocates and by secret agents in all the
companies of officers and municipal corporations, Richelieu had had his
spies and emissaries everywhere. Every morning at his lever, the governor
of the Bastille and master of posts, and the lieutenant-criminel [chief
officer of the criminal court] told him of the rumours of Paris and the
behaviour of the prisoners. The intendants were ordered to prepare
cases against enemies of the state. Isaac de Laffemas, the 'Cardinal's
hangman', was notorious for his ability to build a case of lese-majeste
on the slightest evidence and to extract confessions. Judgement was
passed by a commission of the council which often condemned on pre-
sumption of guilt. For the king, the cardinal and the council all agreed
that with conspiracies it was almost impossible to obtain rigorous proof
and that it would be fatal to wait on events. The government made more
use of preventive detention of unlimited duration than of extraordinary
courts. Men were imprisoned by Lettre de cachet alone and the Bastille
was bursting with illustrious prisoners: the comte de Crammaing, the
Marechal Bassompierre and Baradas, who, surprisingly, was one of
Louis XIII's favourites. Louis XIII and Richelieu appreciated that it was
impossible to control the kingdom by force alone and tried various
methods of propaganda to influence public opinion and win its support.
They made use of the press. Pamphleteers such as Fancan, Pelletier,
Ferrier and Sancy defended royal policy, as did the academicians Hay du
Chastelet, Jean Sichon, and Sirmond. After 1631 Theophraste Renaudot
published a weekly, the Gazette, a sort of official journal: Richelieu sent
him news and Louis XIII wrote articles. The Mercure Francois gave the
official history of France and Europe.
Louis XIII and Richelieu were in favour of classical art, with its
aesthetic of unity and hierarchy, as against the baroque, embodying
diversity. Moreover the lead given to the nation by the king and his
minister, the feeling of belonging to a great nation in the process of making
the old humanist dream of Gallic hegemony come true were an inspiration,
and numerous major works of art appeared from 1630 to 1642 (Corneille,
Descartes, Poussin, Philippe de Champaigne, etc.). Richelieu nationalized
a group of men and letters, became its protector, augmented it with
councillors of state and made it into the Academie Francaise, whose task
was to provide him with polemicists and to make the French language
and its literature the first in Europe. The academicians envisaged the time
when the French language, carried forward by French arms, would
become the tongue of the whole civilized world. It was the desire for
glory which led the king and his minister to build the Pavilion de l'Horloge
at the Louvre (Le Mercier), the Sorbonne church (1635-42), the Chateau
491
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
17-3DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
de Rueil, the Chateau de Richelieu and a sort of Versailles, also the work
of Le Mercier, the town of Richelieu. In 1641 the king set up an academy
or royal college there. Richelieu gave it an encyclopaedic syllabus which
anticipated that of the central schools of the revolution.
Richelieu would have liked to control Catholicism. He improved the
recruitment of bishops; as abbot of Cluny (1629), of Citeaux (1637) and
administrator of Chezal-Benoit, he reformed the Benedictine monasteries.
He tried to give effect to the canons of the Council of Trent. Monks were
obliged to recognize their subjection to the diocesan bishop. He would
have liked the pope to make him patriarch of the Gauls, but it was not
to be and the religious movement passed him by almost entirely—the
mystics, the Oratory, St Vincent de Paul, the Company of the Blessed
Sacrament (a secret society set up in 1629) and the foundations by nobles
or high robe of charitable organizations. The whole of this minor 'Renais-
sance' of Catholicism passed him by and indeed the majority of the
religious party (devots) were among his adversaries. Among these were
Caussin, the king's Jesuit confessor, exiled in 1637, the followers of
Berulle and the first Jansenists, including Saint-Cyran, whom he im-
prisoned at Vincennes. After 1635 Saint-Cyran's influence at the mona-
stery of Port Royal grew enormously. From 1637 laymen, the 'mes-
sieurs', began to gather around Port Royal des Champs and Saint-Cyran
was able to form a sort of party from his prison.
Richelieu was not able to prevent numerous revolts. Taxation was too
heavy. He had been obliged to increase the taille from 17,000,000 to
69,000,000 livres, to multiply indirect taxation in order to make the rich
contribute and to burden officers both with creations of offices which
lessened the importance of existing offices and with forced loans never
to be repaid. In 1633 the income from the sale of offices provided 52
per cent of the receipts, but loans also had to be raised from financial
officials, financiers and tax fanners to whom royal demesne and future
tax receipts were pledged. These taxes and the fortunes made by financiers
enabled Richelieu's enemies, aristocrats, officials, devots, to rouse dis-
content by pamphlets, remonstrances and rumours and to stir up revolts
against taxes and the king. In Paris the journeymen of the gilds rose in
1633; at Lyons the populace plundered the customs offices (1633, 1642).
At Rouen the rope-makers and paper-makers attacked the office of the
tax-farmer (1634), the textile workers pillaged the office of the treasurers
of France and stormed the house of Nicholas le Tellier, receiver-general
of the gabelle, in 1639. In the country the 'croquants' (mainly peasants)
rose in Limousin, Poitou, Angoumois, Gascony, Perigord, hacked a tax
collector to pieces and dismembered a surgeon whom they mistook for a
revenue official (1636). The 'Va-nu-pieds' [barefoot ones] rose in Nor-
mandy in areas where the government wished to introduce the gabelle
(1639). The king's armies had to be sent everywhere and there were some
492
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRENCH INSTITUTIONS AND SOCIETY l 6 l O - 6 l
real battles (La Sauvetet d'Eymet, June 1637). The Chancellor Seguier
himself went to Rouen to attend to the execution of the rebels, to suspend
the Parlement and the Cour des Aides [appeal court for fiscal cases]
and to abolish the positions of mayor and echevin, as these officers had
not acted with sufficient severity.
Meanwhile the king's health was deteriorating and he gave Richelieu
more and more freedom of action. The latter surrounded the king with
his own men, Father Joseph, the 'grey Eminence' (d.1638), Superin-
tendent Bullion (d. 1640), the secretaries of state, Claude and Leon
Bouthillier, Seguier and the Neapolitan Jules Mazarin. Richelieu had
formed a retinue of loyal followers who had sworn to be faithful to him
and who received appointments everywhere. The king was alarmed to
see his captains leave him and pass into the cardinal's service. He foresaw
the time when he would not be able to command obedience in his king-
dom except through Richelieu and his men. The cardinal was founding a
dynasty: he made his relations marshals of France, generals of galleys,
governors, dukes and peers. He made one of his nieces duchesse d'Aiguil-
lon: another married the due d'Enghien and became a princess of the
blood. He owned fortresses which he left to his heirs, at Brouage and Le
Havre; he had a company of infantry and another of gentlemen. He took
precedence over princes of the blood and began to behave like a mayor
of the palace of late Merovingian times.
If Cinq-Mars had been content with attempting to have the cardinal
killed, without plotting with the due d'Orleans and the due de Bouillon
and without negotiating with Spain for the support of Spanish troops in
return for restoring French conquests, Louis XIII might not have put
him to death (12 September 1642). Richelieu, worn out, died on 4 Decem-
ber 1642. At the king's death (14 May 1643) he had gained Artois,
Roussillon and Alsace. Spain and the empire had been defeated and
negotiations for peace had begun. The king of France was regarded
as 'one of the greatest monarchs in the world' and he was convinced
that with his minister he had preserved the independence of France,
liberty and the balance of power in Europe.
Louis XIV was four years old, having been born on 5 September 1638.
Louis XIII, suspicious of Anne of Austria, had regulated the regency by a
declaration of 20 April 1643. He was unable to prohibit the queen from
becoming regent, the due d'Orleans lieutenant-general of the kingdom,
and Conde head of the council, but he also appointed four irremovable
councillors, all Richelieu's men: Cardinal Mazarin, as chief minister,
Seguier, the chancellor, Bouthillier, superintendent of finances, and the
latter's son, Chavigny. All decisions required a majority vote. Unfor-
tunately this declaration was unconstitutional. As soon as the king was
dead, his successor assumed the royal powers in full and could not be
493
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
bound by any act of his predecessor. The queen took advantage of this.
On 19 May 1643 Louis XIV held a lit de justice in the Parlement to make
his mother regent with full freedom to constitute the council as she
wished and without being bound by the majority. Anne of Austria kept
her favourite, Cardinal Mazarin, as first minister, but a good many
Frenchmen despised this upstart foreigner. The troubles began again,
as during every royal minority, but were graver than in 1610. After the
'harsh Richelieu' who, in de Retz's words, 'had blasted men rather than
governed them', after the hard and implacable Louis XIII, everyone
relaxed and many thought themselves dispensed from obedience. All the
exiles returned and, led by Mme de Chevreuse, intrigued against Mazarin,
who imprisoned the due de Beaufort in Vincennes and exiled the 'Cabale
des Importants' (September 1643) but agitation continued. The queen
was obliged to provide the magnates with endless festivities and to admit
a large number of nobles to the Council of State so that its efficiency
was impaired. Seguier lamented that 'each day saw a new Councillor of
State . . . it was like the aftermath of a shipwreck, with bits of wreckage
washed up on the shore every day . . . all confusion and disorder'. The
king's minority, disturbances and risings helped to prolong the war
against the emperor until 1648 and against Spain until 1659, while the
war worsened financial difficulties and in turn aggravated domestic
disorders.
After the death of Louis XIII, resistance to taxation increased. Seig-
neurs and nobles were constantly inflaming the peasants against taxes
and gave an example by driving the agents of the tax-farmers from their
lands by force of arms, encouraging their peasants to do the same,
spreading false rumours about the restoration or abolition of taxes and
hiding the rebels, even if guilty of murder, with the support of the bour-
geois magistrates. The intendants' reports to Seguier leave no doubt that
it was not the poorest or most heavily taxed parishes which rebelled,
but those where the gentry stirred up trouble, with a view to increasing
their own rents in money and in kind. Such was the case in Normandy,
Touraine and Limousin—where M. and Mme. de Pompadour excited
the peasants of fifty or sixty parishes belonging to them to uprising—in
Auvergne, Angoumois, Aunis, Saintonge, Poitou and Perigord in
1644. From 1643 to 1644 there were continual peasant risings in the
west, the centre and the south, the northern and eastern limits of the
risings passing through Normandy, Berry, Auvergne and the Dauphine.
The peasants refused to pay their taxes, drove out the tax collectors,
threatened the financial officials, seized several chateaux and threatened
towns, at the instigation of the nobles. 1
The royal officers endeavoured to guarantee the safety of the rebels,
1
See R. Mousnier, 'Recherches sur les soulevements populaires en France avant la
Fronde'.. Revue d'Histoire Moderne et Contemporaine, Vol. v (1958).
494
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRENCH INSTITUTIONS AND SOCIETY l 6 l O - 6 l
intervening against the intendants and hiding the guilty. The Parlement
of Rouen quashed a judgement given by the intendant de la Potherye,
forbade the lieutenants-criminels from acting and made it impossible for
anyone to be arrested (June 1643). The Cour des Aides of Paris on 21
July 1643 verified the royal declaration of 16 April on the financial powers
of the intendants. The court endeavoured to subordinate the intendants
to it by obliging them to submit their commissions for registration and
possible modification. They attempted to assert the principle that the
royal commissioner—an instrument of absolutism—was subordinate
to the ordinary courts, the guardian of the old laws and established
customs. The Cour des Aides amended the declaration so as to maintain
the traditional role of the treasurers of France and the elus and to protect
seigneurs and nobles. 1
The government was obliged to have recourse again and again to the
tax-farmers and financiers [traitants et partisans], who were granted in
return the right to collect the taille, to sell offices, to farm domains and
to levy an incredible number of taxes. The tax-farmers demanded that
the taxes should be assessed promptly and that their agents should be
backed by decrees of the intendants, summary justice and armed force.
The government therefore employed an increasing number of intendants;
thirty or thirty-five performed most of the duties of [the treasurers
of France and elus throughout the country. They used regiments of
cavalry and infantry, passing through or quartered in their districts,
or raised special troops, fusiliers or carabineers, to crush resistance
and raise taxes. They marched in, besieged the rebels, hanged the
most guilty and were accused by their adversaries of 'ruining parishes
and desolating provinces more surely than if they had been enemy
troops'.
The action of the council and the intendants affected the officers so
that their honour and their pockets both suffered; for apart from their
salaries they also received fees or a percentage of receipts, according to
their duties. They also complained about the excessive sums levied on
them and the multiplying of offices. The treasurers of France claimed
that on the death of Henri IV, there were ten of them to each bureau
des finances, while in 1648 the number was twenty-five and the market
price of their offices had fallen by two-thirds. Moreover they had paid
the king over 30 million livres for increased salaries, taxes and dues.
The elus claimed to have disbursed over 200 million livres since 1624,
including 60 millions since 1640 'for confirmations of an imaginary
right or of a fictitious supplement'. Since 1640 the government in des-
peration had cut salaries and dues, first a cut of a quarter's salary for the
elus, whose salaries were whittled down to nothing by 1647, depriving
1
Mousnier, 'Recherches sur la crdation des intendants des provinces', Forschungen zu
Stoat . . .
495
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
them of three-quarters of the dues for which they had paid such vast
sums. The treasurers of France, officers of Bailliages, Sene~chaussees and
Presidiaux were all subjected to the same levies. 1 This had the unexpected
result that posts became increasingly hereditary, fixed within one family.
The officers assessed the value of their posts by reckoning all they had
paid out for increases in salaries and allocations of dues: there were
twenty to fifty in the lifetime of an officer. Their valuation of the offices
became so high that they were impossible to sell, for the market price
was much lower. This was common after 1635 and particularly towards
1648. Families were thus forced to keep offices, which were more in the
nature of a burden and which by preventing any purchases of higher
offices blocked any rise in social status. 2
It is not surprising that the Fronde began in 1648 with a revolt of
public servants. The Parlement was for ever raising and dashing hopes by
its remonstrances. It argued that the war concerned the king alone and
was prolonged only by the will of the government. This was the more
readily believed, since Mazarin had more than once boasted that peace
was in his hands. The Parlement held that the financial deficit was
caused by the speculations of financiers and the extravagance of the
court and asserted that economies would balance the budget. Its opposi-
tion increased in 1648 over the renewal of the authorization to pay the
Paulette, 8 granted for periods of nine years, which had expired on 31
December 1647. The government renewed it on 30 April 1648, but kept
back four years' salaries from the officers. The Parlement was exempt
from this deduction, but it associated itself with the other sovereign
courts. The Decree of Union, 13 May 1648, decided that deputies should
be elected by the four sovereign companies of Paris, to meet in the Chambre
Saint Louis, to discuss the reform of the state. The treasurers of France
and the elus joined the movement, the latter having formed a syndicate
in 1641, while the treasurers had been organized in an association since
1599 for the defence of their professional interests, with two representa-
tives at Paris. After May 1648 most of the bureaux des finances had a
delegate at Paris, where they formed a permanent assembly. On 30 June
the Chambre Saint Louis proposed the recall of the intendants and all
royal commissioners, abolition of the farming of the taille and its re-
duction by a quarter; the restoration of the old financial officers to their
full functions and powers and a ban on the creation of new offices.
New fiscal edicts should be registered by the courts only after free votes
and discussion, while the taxes should be levied by the sovereign courts.
Imprisonment of anyone for more than twenty-four hours, without
1
See F. Mousnier, 'Recherches sur les Syndicats d'officiers pendant la Fronde', XVH'
Sitcle, Nos. 42-3 (1959).
8
P. Goubert, 'Les officiers royaux des Prdsidiaux, Bailliages et Elections', ibid.
3
See above, p. 476.
496
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRENCH INSTITUTIONS AND SOCIETY l 6 l O - 6 l
interrogation and being delivered to his rightful judges was forbidden.
Thus control of administration and political life, the sinews of govern-
ment, would have been transferred to the sovereign courts and in par-
ticular to the Parlement of Paris, which claimed to be the true king's
council, an epitome of the States General, the descendant of Frankish
popular assemblies, the representative of the kingdom.
The example of Paris was followed in the provinces; Parlements,
companies of officers and towns rebelled in many places. In July 1648
the government was forced to give the proposals of the Chambre Saint
Louis legal force by edict. After the victory of Conde at Lens the council
decided on the arrest of the main leader of the Parlement, Broussel. On
26, 27 and 28 August 1648 Paris rose in his support.
The barricades forced the government to release Broussel and to
reaffirm on 22 October 1648 the constitution of the Chambre Saint
Louis. The intendants were only to be kept to supervise army matters
in six frontier provinces: Languedoc, Provence, Lyonnais, Burgundy,
Champagne and Picardy.
The people lit bonfires in many places anticipating a general remission
of taxes. The Treaties of Westphalia passed by unremarked, but the
court summoned Conde and his troops, fled from Paris and civil war
began, called the 'Fronde' after the name of a children's game (5-6
January 1649). Passions were roused against the favourites around the
king who engrossed absolute power, betrayed and sold the people, above
all against Mazarin. Hence demands that the Parlement should appoint
and dismiss the members of the Council of State, which should abide
by majority decisions, and that government by a chief minister and his
clients should cease.
The civil war coincided with a great 'mortality' (1648-53) resulting from
bad harvests and a calamitous rise in the price of grain. The food crisis
was followed in many places by crisis in textile industries whose sales
collapsed. The political disturbances erupted before this crisis. The
continual passage of troops, pillage, arson, taxes and dues levied by rebels
as well as by king's men, all helped to make the economic situation
worse and to increase disorder. In the country men were reduced to eating
earth, husks, rags, even to gnawing their own hands and arms. Unburied
corpses infected the air, the 'plague' ravaged the starving people and
France was depopulated. At Verdun-sur-le-Doubs in Burgundy there
were 86 births and 72 deaths in 1648, but 37 births and 224 deaths in
1652. The economy was in chaos. Twenty to thirty years later, under the
personal government of Louis XIV, there was a decrease in marriages
and births due to the coming of age of the depleted generation of children
bora during the Fronde.
The government could not defeat Paris and the parliamentary Fronde
ended in March 1649 with the Peace of Rueil. The declaration of October
497
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
1648 was confirmed. Then Conde, as a victorious general and a prince of
the blood, demanded honours, offices and money for himself and his men.
He was arrested with the princes de Conti and de Longueville (January
1650), and the princes' Fronde began. Mme de Longueville raised Nor-
mandy and the princesse de Conde Guyenne and Bordeaux. The Span-
iards invaded France and threatened Paris. The princes' supporters
asserted that the fundamental laws of the state prevented the queen-
mother from being made regent and demanded that a council of princes,
great officers of state and members of magnate families, should exercise
power during the king's minority. They accused Mazarin of holding the
king prisoner and of ruling France as a tyrant. Bordeaux however had to
yield in October and the Spaniards were defeated at Rethel, 15 Decem-
ber. In the provinces the government went on employing various com-
missioners, maitres de requites, councillors of state and officers of the
Cour des Aides. In Champagne, in 1650, Pages was simultaneously
intendant of justice, police and finance for the army in Champagne and
maitre des requites on tour, which empowered him to supervise all royal
officers, while as commissioner-general for troops' victualling he had
wide powers in financial matters.
However, Mazarin had been able to arrest the princes by making
promises to the other nobles. When he did not keep his word, all the
magnates united against him and he had to flee (6-7 February 1651).
During that year the intendants disappeared and other commissioners
became less numerous. The nobles demanded the summoning of the
States General and the delegates were elected, but never met. The rebels
again quarrelled among themselves. The Parlement did not want the
States General. Conde broke with the other magnates and had to flee
Paris in September and at the same time the king was declared of age.
Conde formed an alliance with Spain and was declared a rebel and traitor.
The war was carried into his own governorship of Guyenne and the
royal army repulsed the prince.
Mazarin thought it possible to return in December 1651, with an army
recruited in Germany. Many Frenchmen loathed him: carters styled a
vicious horse bougre de Mazarin. The union of malcontents, Gaston
d'Orleans, Conde and the Parlement was revived. What was more, there
were casuists to argue that the prince's revolt was justified by natural
law, for he had taken arms in self-defence and it would be right to sup-
port him. His appeal to Spain was justified, for as he was waging war
he was entitled to exploit the stratagems of war. The Spaniards were not
the real enemies, for it was 'Mazarin's cabal' which prevented peace!
Conde found allies in the Parlement of Bordeaux, the town council and
the democratic faction of the city, 'L'Ormee'. These last wished to come
to terms with the English and the Spaniards. General war broke out anew
in the terrible year 1652. From February to July there were military
498
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRENCH INSTITUTIONS AND SOCIETY l 6 l O - 6 l
operations all round Paris and the monarchy was saved by a handful of
faithful (de"voue~) captains. The royal forces were victorious at Blenau
and Etampes. After the arrival and prudent withdrawal of the due de
Lorraine in June and the battle of the Porte-Saint-Antoine (1 July), the
princes were besieged in Paris. The revolution of 4 July saw the formation
of an insurgent government, with Broussel as head of the municipality of
Paris, Orldans as lieutenant-general of the kingdom and Conde as com-
mander-in-chief of the insurgent armies. During this year the most extreme
political projects for replacing the king and organizing a Standestaat
were produced. 1 The princes proved incompetent and only concerned
with selfish interests. In addition to the divisions within the aristocracy
and the hostility of the Parlement to the States General, there were
struggles between the various officers. The treasurers of France opposed
the elus, the chambers of accounts [chambres des comptes] and the
Corns des Aides. Each company sought to increase its importance at the
expense of its rivals and nothing constructive emerged from rebellion
and opposition, instead the kingdom was disintegrating. In the Sois-
sonnais whole villages put themselves under the protection of nobles
and seigneurs, offering rents or voluntary submission to hematite's in
order to escape the exactions of the troops. Even in areas near Paris,
such as Beauce, the royal courts may have ceased to function. The civil
wars revived features of the ninth and tenth centuries, due to Norman,
Hungarian and Moslem invasions, producing a spread of commendation,
a growth of seigneurial and feudal power built on the ruin of the state.
The members of the council alleged that the treasurers of France and the
elus had made the collection of taxes even more chaotic and that the people
now regretted the intendants. Clearly there was general weariness and in
August 1652 Mazarin went into exile to clear the way for the rebels to
submit; Paris was reconciled with the king. Broussel was obliged to
resign, Paris refused supplies to the troops of Conde and the due de
Lorraine and they decamped on 13 October. The king returned on 21
October to an accompaniment of splendid but expensive celebrations.
In February 1653 Mazarin returned; on 3 August Bordeaux surrendered
and the Fronde was over. The state had been saved, but was still tottering.
The civil war and the economic crisis had plunged the country into
appalling poverty. The Company of the Blessed Sacrament engaged in
the struggle against famine; its most active members were Jansenists
(the due de Liancourt and the magistrate Charles Maignart de Bernieres).
Its best auxiliaries were the Ladies of Charity and Vincent de Paul and
his missionaries, whose travels round the country discovered those in
need of help. The company diminished the hardships, but after 1653
internal disputes between the Jansenists and their enemies made it less
effective.
1
See above, Chapter in, pp. 121-2.
499
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
The peasants and workers were the hardest hit. On the other hand
there were profiteers, among them the great merchants, textile manu-
facturers, who had found a profitable outlet for their goods by supplying
the troops or by finding foreign markets. More fortunate were the land-
owners, merchants or officers, who made loans to peasants in need and
acquired their lands strip by strip in cancellation of their debts. The
period of the Fronde apparently saw a large-scale transfer of land from
peasant to bourgeois hands in many regions. But the biggest profits were
made by tax-farmers and financiers.' The fine air of their town and country
houses, the beauty of their parks, the dignity of their furnishings, the
glitter of their clothes and jewels, all this splendour of gold dazzled and
corrupted the nobility and the magistracy . . . France at this time was
really a plutocracy...' (Lavisse). Their protector and partner was
Fouquet, the surintendant des finances. In the process of financing the
state by endless expedients he inextricably confounded his personal
fortune with his official balances. His house at Saint-Mande was a
source of wonder, while his chateau at Vaux-le-Vicomte, with decora-
tions by Le Notre, Le Brun and Poussin excelled even the Versailles of
Louis XTV as a work of art. His collections, drawn from all over the world,
had an Arabian Nights air. He kept open table, was the patron of writers
such as Corneille, Scarron and La Fontaine and was highly successful
with the ladies. The salons of his wife and his mistress, Mme du Plessis-
Bellieres, were prominent in society. 'He was the Maecenas of France
during the childhood of Augustus.' His motto was Quo non ascendet
and the ceiling of his library was decorated with an eagle with wings
outstretched. As well as surintendant, he was the procureur-ge'ne'ral of the
king to the Parlement and had founded a dynasty and a following among
the nobility and the clergy. In 1658 he bought Belle-Isle-en-Mer which
he converted into a fortress. His friends called him "The Future'. He had
conceived the main parts of Colbert's programme and was preparing
plans for civil war.
The government was slow in regaining its authority. From the end of
1653, the intendants gradually returned to the provinces, but the govern-
ment had to proceed with caution. The instructions for Le Febure, the
councillor of state sent as intendant to Dauphine on 19 November 1654
were typical; the title 'Intendant of Justice, Police and Finances in the
said Province' was crossed out and replaced by the title 'Intendant of
Justice, Police and Finances for the Troops who shall be in the said
Province'. He had also been empowered to make contracts for supplying
the troops and audit their accounts in place of the treasurers of France.
These instructions were also struck out and replaced by authorization to
join in making the contracts and to check the accounts of expenses.
Ordinances reforming the councils and edicts for restoring order among
officers, promulgated in 1655, had to be reissued in 1657, as they had never
500
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008FRENCH INSTITUTIONS AND SOCIETY
l6lO-6l
been put into effect. The Parlements went on fighting the council, issuing
judgements contradicting those of the council, forbidding execution of
its decrees and condemning those who took cases to the Council of
State.
The government had to fight Jansenism, 'warmed-up Calvinism',
whose expansion in France dates from the publication of the Frequente
Communion by Antoine Arnauld, a disciple of Saint-Cyran (1643). On
1 July 1649 Nicholas Cornet, a syndic, asked the faculty of theology at
Paris to condemn five propositions on grace drawn from the Augustinus
of Jansenius. The advice of the pope was sought and he condemned the
propositions in the Bull Cum Occasione (31 May 1653). The Jansenists
admitted that the five propositions were erroneous, but claimed that in
fact they were not in Jansenius and had not been condemned in the
meaning used by him. The pope declared that he had condemned the
five propositions as being in Jansenius and according to his usage
(September 1654). The government ordered that the Brief was to be
executed throughout the kingdom (May 1655). At this, the Jansenists
called upon Pascal with his Lettres Provinciales (23 January 1656 to 24
March 1657), but even so the assembly of the French clergy condemned
the Jansenist heresy (1-2 September 1656). After 1655 the government
closed the petites ecoles of the Jansenists and in September 1660 the
Provinciales were burnt by the public executioner. In February 1661, at
the king's command, the assembly of the clergy drew up a formulary
condemning the five propositions to be signed by all ecclesiastics. The
superiors of Port Royal de Paris and Port Royal des Champs were
obliged to send their novices and postulants away and the 'Messieurs'
scattered.
The king was obliged to fight against heresy by his coronation oath.
Port Royal was a refuge of disillusioned Frondeurs and seemed a centre
of plots. The pessimism of the Jansenists was contrary to the ideal concept
of the Hero, one of the foundations of absolute monarchy. The Company
of the Blessed Sacrament began to be cornered; Anne of Austria had
revealed the secret to Mazarin who was appalled by it. The company
also endangered its position by excess of zeal which went so far as
arbitrary confinement. In 1660 it was denounced in pamphlets. A police
trap failed, but the Parlement forbade all assemblies without the express
permission of the king.
Mazarin had completed the work of Louis XIII and Richelieu. After
the Peace of the Pyrenees (1659), of Copenhagen and Oliva (1660),
Europe was at peace; France was the greatest power and the arbiter of
the European states. Like Richelieu, Mazarin had founded a dynasty
and a clientele. His nieces married the greatest in the land. He was all-
powerful and allowed no one to be seated in his apartments, not even the
chancellor. Louis XIV allowed the old minister to enjoy the fruits of
501
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
office and he was able to leave his vast and ill-gotten fortune to his family,
when he died on 9 March 1661. The Fronde had taught Louis XIV that
Frenchmen wished to see their king governing alone without a first
minister, or favourites, without foreigners, without a cardinal. A few
hours after the death of Mazarin, the president of the assembly of the
clergy asked the king to whom he should refer in future for decisions
on affairs. 'To me, my Lord Archbishop', Louis XIV replied.
502
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER XVII
THE HABSBURG LANDS 1618-57
L T the beginning of the seventeenth century the states of the House of
LX Habsburg stretched from the Vosges to the Carpathians. This vast
1 JL domain lacked organic and political unity. In the west it began with
fiefs scattered through southern Germany and continued eastwards with
a group of compact but distinct principalities from Vorarlberg onwards.
It included a great variety of geographical regions and climates and a
diversity of peoples. Through it ran the Danube, rightly portrayed as the
king of European rivers on Bernini's great fountain in the Piazza Navona
in Rome. It ran through Habsburg territory from the bishopric of Passau
to the Turkish frontier not far below Pressburg. Across it ferries and
bridges linked the southern Alpine region with the Bohemian and Mora-
vian plateaux, but the Danube was not yet the principal artery of a
political complex. The Moldau (Vltava), separated from the Danube
valley by a mountain ridge, flowed north through Bohemia to join the
Elbe at Melnik, Unking the region with the river system of northern
Germany.
These states belonged to one family and had one suzerain, but as a
result of family compacts, as in Styria and the Tyrol, for administrative
convenience as in Alsace, or to avoid the threat of secessions, cadet
branches governed several of these countries. Moreover, the important
kingdom of Hungary, whose lands by tradition and law were indivisible
and inviolable, was split into three regions. In practice, the Habsburgs
ruled over only a narrow strip of Croatia, the plain between the Drava
and the Danube and the mountains of Upper Hungary. Pressburg had
inherited the position of capital from Buda, now in Turkish hands.
Transylvania was an autonomous principality governed by a Hungarian
noble, a vassal of both the emperor and the sultan, but more effectively
subjected to the latter. In thinking of these states in the light of their later
history we might be tempted to see them either as a great central European
power or a chaotic agglomeration. More objectively we can see not only
many features inherited from the Middle Ages, but also much that was
new.
There were profound and important economic changes and religious
upheavals in progress, while the political activity of the princes, by turns
hesitant and resolute, showed a strange amalgam of Roman and Ger-
manic law and Italian statecraft. Medieval traditions survived in each of
these regions, all preserved customs strongly cherished by its inhabitants,
however ignorant in other respects. Longstanding compacts were every-
503
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
where the basis of some form of association between the sovereign
Landesfiirst and the people, or rather those enjoying privileges (privileges
here being a matter of guarantees rather than exemptions), who were
represented by Diets or Estates. Yet there were new developments as a
result of the accidents which had brought each of these territories into the
hands of the Habsburgs.
The dynasty had two guiding ideas, complementary rather than con-
tradictory: their entrenchment in certain regions where the prince's
role as fount of justice won the lasting affection and confidence of the
people and the desire to control these isolated forces for a common end.
Within three generations these ideas created a family tradition. By 1600
traditional institutions peculiar to each region are found by the side of
princely institutions common to the whole, some of which were also com-
mon to the empire.
Surveying their domains from west to east, we come first to their fiefs
and rights in Alsace—at the foot of the Vosges. Across the Rhine, in the
Black Forest, lay Breisgau, and the scattered territories in Wurttemberg;
all forming a single government—VorderOsterreich. This was important
for its strategic position, controlling military and trade routes, and because
it kept many German feudal lords directly under the Habsburgs. Beyond
Lake Constance and Vorarlberg lay the county of Tyrol with the seat of
government of Upper Austria at Innsbruck. Then came the Alpine
duchies of Styria, Carinthia and Carniola, the county of Gorizia and the
margraviate of Istria, which were linked, oddly but advantageously, with
the region, divided to the south by the River Enns, where the last foothills
of the Alps meet the Danubian plain. Here Maximilian had set up the
capital of Lower Austria (Austria above the Enns was distinguished from
Austria below the Enns—modern Upper and Lower Austria, with Linz
and Vienna as capitals—and from Central Austria, consisting of the
Alpine duchies, erected into a principality for the cadet branch of Styria).
In each of these lands power was shared between the estates and
the sovereign. The composition of the Landtag reflected the social order:
the prelates, the nobility of lords and knights, in either one or two curias,
the clergy and the towns. Even the peasant communities sent delegates;
but this representation was based on status rather than on counting heads.
The nobles and the clergy could sit individually, but the towns and mar-
kets of the Tyrol and the districts of Vorarlberg nominated deputies,
bound by strict instructions, and Vienna and eighteen other towns shared
a single vote in the Landtag of Austria below the Enns. During the sessions
the prince or his representative proposed taxes and considered petitions
and grievances, but in each territory the prince also had his own govern-
ment. An officer chosen and appointed by him, the Landeshauptmann or
Landestnarschall, his resident representative, saw to the carrying out of
decrees and supervised general security. This officer had to be of the
504
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE HABSBURG LANDS 1 6 1 8 - 5 7
native-born nobility: a noble born elsewhere, though subject to the same
prince, was ineligible. The supreme judicial authority of the country was
vested in the Landrecht, acting in the name of the prince. This was a court
of appeal for the seigniorial courts, and a court of first instance for the
privileged. The Landrecht sat several times a year, under the Landes-
hauptmann. The revenues of the prince's domain, customs and taxes
granted by the estates, were administered by a supreme chamber where
the prince maintained a legal representative. As a result of this, Ensis-
heim, Innsbruck, Vienna, Linz and Graz gradually assumed the position
of minor administrative capitals. These Austrian lands kept their character
of medieval German principalities, but for a hundred years the prince had
been centralizing the administration, stimulating economic activity, and
establishing and supervising markets, gilds and trade. Prince and subjects
began to develop some common interests transcending purely local ones.
The kingdoms of Bohemia and Hungary were a different world. Their
territories were more extensive and they had historic constitutions,
granted by their former dynasties. Bohemia was the only kingdom within
the empire and its king was the first lay elector. The crown of St Wenceslas
included the kingdom and its associated territories: Eger or Cheb,
Elbogen or Loket, Glatz or Kladsko, the margraviate of Moravia and the
duchies of Silesia and Lusatia, styled 'the kingdom and the incorporated
lands'. In each land power was vested in the king and the estates (lords,
knights and towns) who also took part in choosing the monarch. It was
only with the sanction of the diet of Bohemia that the king exercised his
royal authority, whether he was elected or merely accepted from the
reigning dynasty, and he swore to respect the constitution. The Diet
enjoyed unlimited legislative power, but the king had to execute the laws.
Taxes on noble or peasant property had to be voted by the Diet, but the
king supervised fiefs, controlled coinage, customs, dues from royal cities
and administration of mines and forests and so was able to take the initia-
tive in economic matters. Supreme justice reposed in the king, and judicial
and administrative affairs were often confused, as often happened in
contemporary Europe. Disputes over the prerogatives of king and estates
were frequent. Nevertheless, the great officials of the realm, the burgrave
of Prague, the grand master of the court, the grand marshal, the grand
chamberlain, the justiciar, and the burgrave of Karlov-Tyn, custodian
of the crown and the old charters, all held office for life and were respon-
sible to both the king and the estates, as did the local officials, the circle
captains (a lord and a knight in each circle). Without modifying the con-
stitution and the reservation of office to natives of the realm, the emperor-
kings consolidated their rights and exercised them more effectively,
aiming at good government rather than absolutism, though the one led
to the other. For example, the royal towns which had made an alliance
with the elector of Saxony in 1547 were now under the control of royal
505
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
judges (the captains of the three towns of Prague) 1 and subjected to a
perpetual tax on each barrel of beer. A royal appeal tribunal had been
set up in Prague and it increased the autonomy of the kingdom by
unifying the administration of justice and by banning henceforth appeals
to external jurisdictions even within the empire. General administration
had been reorganized on Austrian models in the chancery of Bohemia, the
president of which, though not the first officer in dignity, became the
most powerful in fact, as both head of the royal service and representative
of the estates; he was chosen by the king from a list of the royal council
(consisting of the great officers and the principal judges). He could claim
to have a hand in all matters requiring the use of the royal seal. A lieute-
nancy council performed the king's functions when he was absent from
the kingdom. The same drive towards centralization and royal control
was found in Moravia and Silesia, but it was carried through more
effectively in the margraviate than in the twenty principalities of Silesia
where the feudal powers still stood firm and influenced the general
Landtag.
The constitution of Hungary, which was not a part of the empire, was
even more strongly particularistic. The Opus Tripartition of Verboczi at the
beginning of the sixteenth century had settled the characteristics of the
constitution. The crown of St Stephen was recognized as the head of a
mystical body of which the estates formed the members. Only the corona-
tion ceremony could give the elected king the authority to rule. An un-
crowned king was no true king. The country was divided into comitatji
and the numerous nobility jealously preserved its privileges and assem-
blies, binding its deputies to the Diet with strict instructions from which
no deviation was allowed. In the seventeenth century this Diet comprised
two chambers or tables. The first, of magnates, sat under the presidency
of the Elector Palatine, the king's representative, himself a sort of
viceroy and delegate of the tables. Its members were the diocesan bishops,
the high dignitaries of the court, the governors of the comitatji and the
members of the upper hereditary nobility. The table of the Estates was
composed of delegates of the comitatji, deputies of the royal towns,
noble members of the royal council, protonotaries, royal judges, and
representatives of various religious corporations. Its president was a
royal judge, the primate.
What merits attention is not so much the constitution as the circum-
stances which made it nearly unworkable. Since the disaster at Mohacs,
disputes over the succession in Hungary and the contested elections
between Ferdinand and Zapolya had favoured the Turkish advance.
Again, Transylvania was ruled by autonomous princes elected from
among the privileged Hungarians of the region by the Diet of Transylvania
1
Prague comprised three administrative divisions: the old town, the new town and the
little quarter on the other side of the river.
506
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE HABSBURG LANDS 1 6 1 8 - 5 7
on which three nations (juridical not ethnic bodies) were represented: the
Nobles or Hungarians, the Siculi and the Saxons. The Hungarian noble
who ruled over Transylvania was a more national figure than the German
sovereign at Vienna, and constituted a permanent threat to the Habsburgs,
who were obliged to respect Hungarian privileges in the part of the king-
dom still in their power, buying support and restraining their use of the
centralized agencies legally under royal control. It is sometimes held to be
a weakness that certain provinces were bestowed, either for life or with
rights of succession to cadet archdukes, but this had always been Habs-
burg practice. It was a convenient means of governing very large domains
and it advanced the interests of the dynasty. The revolts against the
Emperor Rudolf by his brothers and nephews were attributable in the
main to their fear that he would put his own comfort before the defence
of his own and the dynasty's rights, for the prince, though highly intelli-
gent, was neurotic and loathed his royal responsibilities. Close relations
were maintained with the Spanish branch. Family marriages and the
agreements of Graz in 1617 over the succession to a childless Emperor
show a tenacious family solidarity and a desire to keep the imperial crown
in the family.
Thus the king of Bohemia and Hungary was also the Landesfiirst of
many Austrian lands, and was at the same time the Holy Roman Em-
peror, around whom some centralized institutions were beginning to
develop, such as the Hofrat, a council modelled on the Reichshofrat. Its
members were nobles and jurists, all imperial subjects, and its authority
extended over the Austrian lands and the empire, though soon restricted
in practice to cases affecting fiefs and the direct dependants of the empire
—princes and cities. One section, the secret council [Geheime Rat]
became a permanent council of state for general policy. It consisted of
dignitaries, nobles and jurists, chosen for their knowledge of particular
problems, including members of the governments of Bohemia and
Hungary. The imperial chancery was the supreme appeal court and court
of registration; its arch-chancellor was the archbishop of Mainz who
chose his own vice-chancellor, necessarily a jurist. Finally the court
chamber [Hofkammer], consisting of a president, auditors and coun-
cillors, was concerned with the interests of the ruling house throughout its
domains and the empire. It administered those royal revenues, not
dealt with by the regional chambers, and exercised some control over those
chambers; it also controlled the collection of imperial contributions and
extraordinary taxes. This cumbersome administrative machine belonging
to the emperors, not the empire, co-ordinated the work of the regional
governments rather than directed them. It made each country aware that
it was part of a power greater than itself and that the existence of a com-
mon sovereign committed them to common interests and policies. There
was however no real absolutism which would have needed an active
507
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
sovereign and a small but effective bureaucracy. These collegial courts,
often sharing the same councillors who were also frequently dignitaries
and councillors in their own countries, were painfully slow-moving
by nature. They were useful for securing some uniformity of policy and
action within the system, but they could not give any effective unity to the
whole.
Historians have traditionally laid much stress on the different charac-
teristics of the inhabitants of the Habsburg lands, on their diverse racial
origins and on their different languages which accentuated differences.
In the seventeenth century, belonging to the same country and acceptance
of the same laws were much more important than any feeling of racial or
linguistic solidarity. Germans, Slavs or Magyars were much more con-
scious of being Tyroleans, Austrians, Styrians, Bohemians, Moravians or
Hungarians. Recent ethnological research has shown that the various
physical types in central Europe have a long history and that in the seven-
teenth century such racial groups were intermingled. A Czech ethnologist,
Henry Matiegka, has examined numerous seventeenth- and eighteenth
century skeletons from the cemeteries of Prague and the countryside.
Out of 25 skeletons in the Cemetery of St Nicholas, 12 (48%) belonged
to the nordic or subnordic type, which was predominant in northern
Germany in the Middle Ages; 6 (24%) were of the Alpine type most
numerous in central Europe, and 7 (28%) of the Dinaric type which
originated in the Balkan Peninsula. Seventeen skeletons from the Ceme-
tery of St Charles Borromeo showed 5 (29-4%) of nordic type; 5 of Alpine
type and 7 (41 -2%) of Dinaric type. Out of 25 skeletons from the country,
9 (36%) were nordic or subnordic, 11 (44%) were Alpine, and 5 (20%)
Dinaric. Such mixtures within single national or social groups prove that
there is no question here of alleged racial characteristics. Language was a
more important factor than physical characteristics. Men were Czech,
German or Croat, primarily because they spoke those languages. In
Bohemia, knowledge of Czech gave access to a body of literature,
religious, hagiographical and political. Czech and German speakers
were conscious of profound differences between them, which might
lead to choices with far-reaching consequences for an individual's life.
Choice of language might result from specific social activities or might
depend on circumstances. The towns with their numerous traders and
craftsmen of German origin and speech formed centres of germanization
for newcomers from the country, in both Bohemia and Hungary. The
phenomenon was also common in mining regions, where those in charge
of operations were often foreigners. In rural areas the language spoken
by the lord had some influence on the region's linguistic destiny, but some-
times the lord adopted the language of his vassals. On the whole the rural
areas tended to preserve their local idiom, but in the seventeenth century
508
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE HABSBURG LANDS 1 6 1 8 - 5 7
the linguistic map was not firmly fixed, and changes from one group to
another were more common than has subsequently been believed. Above
all, the mental attitudes of the time, with each group protected by its
privileges, did not conceive of linguistic unity as essential for a state, nor
did they conceive of undying racial enmities underlying differences of
language. Hungary gives the most striking example of this variety, with
its Croats, Magyars, highlanders of Upper Hungary, speaking Slovak
dialects related to Czech (literary Czech having been adopted by the upper
classes) and the Transylvanians including German and Magyar elements.
Latin remained the language of government, a common means of expres-
sion, standing above all these linguistic groups.
Economic and social developments and religious differences which cut
across social groups were more important in determining the course of
events than linguistic and national differences. These developments
cannot be fully understood without some reference to population statis-
tics. The inhabitants of the empire numbered some 20,000,000 at the
beginning of the seventeenth century. The notable studies of Otto Placht
on Bohemia give the figure of 4,000,000 for the whole kingdom, a density
of 34-5 per square kilometre, one of the highest in Europe at the time.
The population of Bohemia alone is put at 1,700,000. Thus the kingdom
provided a much larger number of subjects than any other single territory
of the empire. Size of population however was not everything; although
it played a part in the success or failure of a policy, it was of less account to
rule a densely populated kingdom than to exploit its resources effectively,
and effective power depended mainly on the good administration of the
state's resources. Towns were numerous in the Habsburg domains, though
this status was legal rather than economic or demographic in origin. They
included large urban agglomerations which derived their importance
from the strategic and trade routes on which they stood. Such were Linz
and Vienna, possibly the largest city in the empire if the figure of 60,000
inhabitants is accepted. Prague, however, must have had a population of
60,000 or 70,000. None of these figures is as reliable as modern statistics
but they may be taken as very close to reality and allow a reasonable
estimate of the importance of these regions.
From the beginning of the sixteenth century, major changes had been
taking place in organization of production and in working conditions.
The rise in prices, the discoveries and the growth of trade all had reper-
cussions in the Habsburg lands. In the traditional economic pattern the
land of an estate was adequate for the needs of those who worked it,
providing food and clothing and enough cash to pay taxes and buy a few
essentials. For many families this pattern continued, but in addition a
new system of production for sale emerged. This required the creation of
workshops and some concentration of industry and labour. In administra-
tive and trading centres the population grew and new towns sprang up for
509
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
the mining of iron-ore in Styria, and precious metals in Bohemia and
Hungary. Given the competition of American silver, despite the formal
ban on its importation, production could only be undertaken by those
with considerable resources and enterprise. Recently the increased con-
struction of artificial lakes in southern Bohemia, from the early sixteenth
century, by rich landowners to their profit has been studied. There is some
analogy with the effects today of building dams for electric power.
Many of these lakes covered 50,000 square yards, but some, as at Wittin-
gau and Tfeboii, were ten times as large. Noble demesne and peasant
holdings alike were flooded; the peasants seem to have been compensated
with land elsewhere on the estates. The labour for these enterprises was
provided either by the tenants, who were obliged to work for their lord, or
by hired hands. Once the lakes were ready, more employment was pro-
vided. The lakes had to be stocked with spawn, fished and the catch trans-
ported. For this rafts were used, plying up and down the rivers hauling
baskets in which the fish were kept fresh. The markets of Prague, Linz
and Vienna were supplied with carp and pike which competed seriously
with the dried herrings and salted fish from the North Sea. Figures show
that at the end of the century the revenue from fish was three times as
great as the former income from feudal rents and leases in Krumlov,
Rozmberk and Tfebon. The lakes of Bohemia remain a special case. Of
more general interest and importance is the change in agricultural produc-
tion. It was in the interest of the noble proprietor with reasonably exten-
sive lands to revise the conditions of tenure, to increase the area of his
demesne continually by the purchase of peasant lands and to use the
corvde as an essential means for its. exploitation. The old money rent had
been rendered insignificant by devaluation and the rise in prices. The great
estate became more important, on account of its size and economic
viability. The effective exploitation of the great estate, consisting of farms
and share-croppers' holdings, where peasant smallholdings were found
side by side with land directly controlled by the lord, required a large
labour force and vigilant administration. Hence the detailed rules given
to stewards when they took office, telling them how to supervise work in
the fields.
This extension of demesnes occurred in all the Habsburg states, often
by imitation, as when the commission of 1571 which visited the royal
domains borrowed its instructions from a Hungarian administrator.
The group of landowners which profited most from the opportunity to
enlarge their estates was the upper nobility. There was however nothing
to prevent knights from doing the same, for status was not determined
by the extent of possessions, and the king (with agreement from the
estates) was continually promoting men from the lower to the higher rank.
On the other hand, it was hardly possible to reach the upper nobility
without wealth, and that rank was associated with holding important
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE HABSBURG LANDS I 6 1 8 - 5 7
offices which in various ways provided large revenues. Historians, whether
democratic or marxist, know most about great lords and great estates,
because they are better documented. However small estates and the
knightly class survived in the sixteenth century. This class remained the
largest and benefited from rising prices and from increased agricultural
production; as always, some were more fortunate than others. Above all,
it must be emphasized that the old feudal institutions remained.
Recently definitions of feudalism have been much discussed. Some see
it as essentially a question of military obligations, of ties between man and
man, symbolized by the grant of lands and the payment of dues in money
or kind, which lost its meaning with the decline in the value of money
over the years. But feudalism also meant the overlord's right—whether
usurped or not—to administer justice and to police his lands, which im-
plied the levying of tolls on roads and waterways. Moreover, in the case
of lands granted in perpetuity or leased by the lord, contractual obliga-
tions bound the vassals to various duties (hence the corvte) and particularly
forbade them and their descendants to leave the estate. These feudal
rights carried duties with them: the lord had to protect his vassals, by
giving them refuge in time of war, and by the guardianship of widows and
orphans. These features, with local variations, are found throughout
Europe in the seventeenth century. One cause of this is that work on the
land, under prevailing methods of cultivation—which have been modified
and improved over the centuries rather than entirely changed—involves
landholders in patriarchal and family associations, which have not always
disappeared under modern conditions of free individual ownership.
However that may be, the expansion of great estates in central Europe
took place within the framework and traditions of the feudal system.
Some historians seek to reject the term 'feudalism', preferring to use the
term capitalism for this phase; others speak of a 'new feudalism'; but all
are obliged to concede that the extension of great estates took place in the
social framework inherited from feudalism and that this contributed to in-
creasing landowners' privileges and to further restrictions on the indepen-
dence of those working the land.
Henceforth the seigneurial estate was organized as a little state. The
number of administrative officials varied with the importance of the estate.
An officer, styled the administrator or captain, exercised general super-
vision. Under him was the burgrave, later to be charged with economic
administration. One or more secretaries kept the registers of receipts and
expenses. Separate accounts were later kept for each form of production—
lakes, woods, brewing, milling. Around 1600 the Rozmberk estates at
Krumlov were controlled by twelve officers and fourteen secretaries. In
each part of the domain the bailiffs had to keep daily accounts. The im-
pression given is of a little private state, with perhaps several thousand
subjects. Unfortunately, too little is known of the rights reserved at this
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
period by the oflBcers of the realm and of their interventions in seigneurial
lands.
Presumably not all the great estates were well managed. This often
depended on whether the master was present or whether the officials were
competent. The crown lands had the best reputation and they served as a
model for many private estates. The king could dispose of his estates and
of escheated lands and he occasionally gave some to his followers as a
reward. The crown peasants dwelling on these lands became subject to a
new master. Crown peasants were one thing, free peasants another. The
latter were found in many regions, direct dependants of the king as
supreme head of states and not as a landlord. There was a danger of con-
fusing the two classes. Rudolf II wished to bestow a score of them,
holdings and men, on the lord of RoZmberk. The protests of the peasants
and the proofs of their inalienable independence given by charters pro-
duced a decision by the royal judges which reversed the royal act as
illegal: this throws some light on the limits of absolutism in Bohemia at
this time.
The liberty of the peasants, which remained very much alive in some
countries—for example the Tyrol—was increasingly threatened by the
advance of the great estates. Historians disagree as to whether personal
servitude [Leibeigenschaft or £love£enstvi\ existed in Bohemia or whether
the peasants' freedom of movement was restricted merely by a ban on
leaving the estate without written permission. During the seventeenth
century decrees repeatedly asserted the lord's right to demand the return
of peasants who had left the estate, and forbade employers, whether in
towns or on other estates, to hire peasants from other estates freely. It has
not been demonstrated that these measures exclusively reflect the concern
of the great landowners to keep their labour force. The knights as owners
of medium and small estates were equally concerned as they had fewer
workers at their disposal.
The status of the peasants was complex. Some had hereditary holdings
and were said to be established; others, not established, were in the posi-
tion of tenants; all were subject to seigneurial justice and control. In each
class there was a hierarchy based on wealth, ranging from the husband-
man working fifty acres to the smallholders, journeymen, woodcutters and
charcoal-burners. During the slack times of the farming year, many
peasants found work in the towns; in busier times, the great estates hired
harvesters and it became impossible to keep a check on permits to move.
The mobility of the peasants—which some lords found advantageous—
was easier to control where the estates had a large and watchful admini-
stration.
It should not be thought that the country dweller lived only by working
the land; many followed a trade. A survey of the occupations of 234
youths on a great estate in southern Bohemia in 1607 revealed that 98
512
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE HABSBURG LANDS 1 6 1 8 - 5 7
were apprenticed to the trades of baker, carpenter, shoemaker, smith,
draper, painter, dyer, tailor, potter, butcher, furrier, cooper, fuller, mason
and glass painter. In 1612, the parish priest of Jifetin (northern Bohemia)
urged his parishioners to thank God for giving them, if not rich corn-
fields, vineyards, or mines, at least the means of growing flax and weaving
cloth, which attracted many foreigners and enabled every father of a
Christian family, artisan or farmworker, to provide his family with bread.
The lords had won for the towns on their estates the same rights as the
royal cities. They established markets, and won the right to monopolies.
In particular, after 1517, when the privilege of brewing beer, claimed by
the towns as their exclusive right, was extended to the nobles, the land-
owners reserved the right to sell the beer produced in their breweries
throughout their domains in town and country alike. Hence the saying:
'Sheep, beer and fish make the Bohemian nobles rich'. From 1578 to 1615
there was a sharp rise in the price of beer, and a small number of noble
families acquired great economic power. Even so, if there were 340 great
estates in Bohemia held by the king, the clergy and the lords, there were
an equally large number of estates of over 35 households held by members
of the knightly class. This parity of numbers does not necessarily indicate
that power was equally divided, but it might suggest that the progress
of the great estate would cause friction between neighbouring social groups.
As far as the towns are concerned, the royal cities showed a decline in
population and activity, whilst the seigniorial towns advanced, as though
the protection of the economic system of the estate afforded greater
security and advantages, but this advance was not as yet very marked. The
situation of Prague seems unusual. The city was not as busy as Nurem-
berg or Leipzig, lying apart from the main flow of trade and producing
only one major export, felt hats; but it retained its importance because it
was the centre of distribution for the merchandise of the entire kingdom,
and because the presence of the court ensured a market for fine cloth,
jewels, furnishings and good wines. Merchandise flowed through Prague
in transit for Nuremberg: iron from Bohemia and Austria, farm produce and
cattle from Hungary, Poland and Austria, cloth from northern Bohemia.
Its trade figures account for about two-thirds of the country's commerce.
Inevitably Vienna suffered as a result, though that city remained thriving
and populous within its defensive system. Linz was the great international
market in the Habsburg lands, followed by Krems. At the beginning of
the century, the German traders of the empire had lost their predomi-
nance in Prague to the Jews (the richest inhabitant of the city was the
Jew Meyzl, loaded with privileges by Rudolf II) and to Italians such as
the Pestalozzi or Heracles de Novi.
Religious questions exerted a greater influence on opinion than econo-
mic matters and indeed economic conditions were complicated by religion.
The conflict of interests, and the social divisions which led to hostility
513
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
between large and small estates, between lords and peasants, between the
royal cities and the nobility did not coincide with religious divisions; both
Catholics and Protestants were found in every group and even within one
family. The most serious cause of conflict was that in all Habsburg lands
the majority were Protestants, while an active and powerful minority had
returned to the Catholic fold. In Alsace and Lower Austria and the Alpine
duchies, in Bohemia, Moravia and Silesia and Hungary, Protestantism
held its ground in spite of Jesuit campaigns and all attempts to win men
back to Rome. In Hungary, the Estates had obliged King Mathias to
recognize the privileges of the Protestant churches. In Bohemia in 1609
the Diet had obtained in the Letter of Majesty one of the most liberal
charters ever granted to a country of many creeds.
The Bohemian Evangelical Church, professing the Confession of 1609,
had received the widest guarantees for their religion and their church
buildings. Magistrates—the defensores fidei—had been appointed to see
that these guarantees were observed. Lords were forbidden to force their
subjects to change their religion; it might be thought that this measure
would have been advantageous to Catholic peasants of a Protestant lord,
but it was mainly directed against Catholic lords. The Roman Curia had
long been convinced that the Counter-Reformation could only become
effective with the support of the ruling classes of the empire and its
territories. It also seemed essential that the most important posts should be
given to Catholics; if Protestants were to retain or regain key posts, the
reconquest would never be more than superficial. Since Charles V the
Habsburg emperors had been lukewarm or passive in their Catholicism
compared with the militancy of the Spanish branch. The Emperor Mathias
was old, childless and timid, but his cousin Ferdinand was a militant
Catholic whose rule in his duchy of Styria had followed the example of the
Counter-Reformation in Bavaria. 1 In 1617 Ferdinand was recognized as
king of Bohemia, thanks to the Chancellor Lobkowicz, who skilfully
handled the uncommitted members of the Estates.
The Thirty Years War had many longstanding causes and brought into
play all the economic, social and political problems of contemporary
Europe. But its immediate cause was whether Ferdinand could be
successfully barred from securing the full Habsburg inheritance before the
death of Mathias. Even if the Defenestration of Prague was the work of
a small group of plotters or the result of the exuberance of a few hotheads,
the resistance of the Protestants of Bohemia, using the affairs of Grab and
Brunnau as pretexts, can only be explained in terms of the anxiety caused
by the election of Ferdinand. It was not a question of economic interests,
of threats of absolutism, nor even of the ancient laws of the realm. There
was a man to be crushed and the first issue in the struggle was the religion
whose fortunes that man embodied.
1
See Chapter x, p. 290.
514
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE HABSBURG LANDS 1 6 1 8 - 5 7
In the event it was not the imperial crown, but his power in Austria and
Hungary which Ferdinand seemed most likely to lose as a result of the
revolt in Bohemia in the spring of 1618. When Mathias died in 1619,
Ferdinand was refused entry into Bohemia and his election of 1617 was
declared null and void by the Estates. Soon afterwards the Elector Pala-
tine, Frederick V, was elected king of Bohemia in Ferdinand's place.
Meanwhile Ferdinand was elected emperor with the support of the
Palatine ambassadors. 1 By the summer of 1619 the crisis was no longer
confined to Bohemia. The House of Austria still kept the imperial crown,
but the political system which had supported it and had guaranteed its
perpetual succession to the empire was shattered and slipping from its
grasp.
The Estates had everywhere regained the advantage over the king or
Landesfurst, and imposed their ideas of government. In July 1619 a
general Diet of the kingdom of Bohemia inaugurated a confederation of
the various lands under the crown of St Wenceslas. The summoning of
such a Diet was itself a triumph of common interests over local differences.
The Letter of Majesty and the Protestant privileges were re-established
as fundamental laws. The principle of election to the throne was reasserted
unequivocally and the prince's authority was again subjected to the close
supervision of the Estates. Thus, when Frederick V assumed the crown of
Bohemia, he inherited a power far more limited than that enjoyed by his
Habsburg predecessors. The Estates entrusted important duties to the
defensores fidei elected by them. These defensores had the permanent duty
of watching over the maintenance of privileges and the observance of the
laws. They met in council to consider the general situation and to allocate
the funds needed for the common defence. In August 1619 delegates of the
Estates of Upper and Lower Austria sought membership of the con-
federation. The act passed in Austria made no mention of defensores, but
laid down that each of the confederate states could appeal to the others in
case of need. The necessary decisions would then be made collectively.
Every five years, a general congress would meet to consider disputes
between the members, and to complete the charter of confederation by
adding new articles as needed. Early in 1620 the Estates of the kingdom
of Hungary joined the confederation. Further, in Upper Austria, at Linz,
Erasmus von Tschernembl, a Protestant lord who had always favoured an
alliance of the nobles against the sovereign, called in question the rights of
Ferdinand under the pretext that he was not the nearest male relative of
the late Landesfurst. According to laws of inheritance and the constitutional
law of the country, the throne should have passed to the last surviving
brother of the Emperor Mathias, the Archduke Albert, regent of the
Low Countries. The Archduke Albert rejected this solution which was
contrary to the family compacts. Thus the rights of the dynasty were in
1
See Chapter xi, pp. 310-11.
515
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
conflict with those of the old local constitutions. It was all very well for
Ferdinand of Styria to be emperor; most of the states of his House were
slipping from his grasp and he had no alternative but to win them back
by force.
The nobility was everywhere asserting its rights and privileges against
those of the sovereign. The system of 1619 has been variously assessed by
historians. As against the absolutism of the prince, it was based on the
privileges of the Orders. This confederation between neighbouring
countries, approved by the legal representatives of the various political
and privileged orders of the countries, claimed that it defended religious
liberties, and proclaimed this as a general principle (though failing to
apply it when the Jesuits were banished from Bohemia for ever). This
corresponded to a Protestant ideal: to them, subdivision into small units
as in the United Provinces and Switzerland seemed the most suitable form
of government. At that date, certain French Huguenot circles had the idea
of introducing the system into France. Many historians have taken the
view that the regime of 1619 was the most liberal of all and that it even
contained the seeds of republican and democratic liberties; but these
considerations carry less conviction to those modern historians who are
primarily concerned with economic and social problems. In their view,
whether the political system gave power to prince and council or to
magnates and diets, the social order remained the same feudal and
seigneurialone. The question which exercised nineteenth-century historians
—which of the two systems, centralized monarchy or oligarchical con-
federation, was the best ground for the general advance of society and the
emancipation of the population—is thus brushed aside. In both cases
political and social power was in the hands of a privileged landowning
minority.
The election of Frederick V in Bohemia was in the hands of the Diet,
that is to say of the same men who two years earlier had voted for Fer-
dinand. Only those regarded as avowed supporters of Austria were
excluded from the voting, such as the Chancellor Lobkowicz and William
of Slawata, who in any case had both fled to Austria. For a year, the new
king's government worked smoothly and in principle equitably towards
his subjects, whatever their religion. In a letter to Louis XIII Frederick
boasted that the least of his subjects enjoyed freedom of religion and con-
science. Such was the spirit at least of the Letter of Majesty. The people of
Bohemia rallied to the new prince, whatever their creed or nationality. The
Catholics however were naturally suspicious of a Protestant king and
hoped for the return of the House of Austria, while some few Protestants,
among them Zerotin, the Moravian noble and former friend of Henri IV
of France, remained loyal to the Habsburgs. Thus the whole nation
seemed implicated in the revolt and to share the guilt, so that a terrible
punishment could be anticipated.
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE HABSBURG LANDS l6l8~57
The course of the war between Frederick and Ferdinand has been
described elsewhere. 1 It is appropriate to recall here that, in the opinion
of recent historians, the sacrifices which resistance on a national scale
would have necessitated were never accepted in Bohemia, either by the
aristocracy or the commercial middle class of Prague, where the largest
liquid fortunes were to be found, or by the people in town or country.
Peasant revolts, the features of which have not been sufficiently studied,
broke out on many estates. No convincing argument has yet been advanced
to confirm the hypothesis that a lev&e en masse might have been obtained
by social reforms freeing the peasants from their obligations to their lords.
At all events, both the imperial armies and Frederick V's foreign levies
committed such depredations that the people desired only peace. This
disillusionment was reinforced by the inactivity of the European powers.
Bohemia and its allies were left isolated and were defeated at the White
Hill, 8 November 1620. Just as the Defenestration of Prague (23 May
1618) had precipitated the latent crisis in the states of the House of Aus-
tria, the victory of the White Hill—an episode in a religious rather than a
political war—made a revival of the Habsburg fortunes certain and,
though the ultimate result of the struggle remained doubtful, its conduct
was made easier because internal order was restored.
In the evolution of what may be called the Austrian system, the crisis of
1618-20 was of the greatest importance. In political and human terms the
balance of forces was modified for several centuries and there were
important indirect effects on the economic future of the country. Accord-
ing to the notions of the time a king had a right and even a duty to punish
his rebellious subjects. Severe measures could therefore be anticipated.
Ferdinand's attitude, however, alarmed even those who did not blame
him for inflicting punishment. They soon saw that he was looking beyond
domestic politics, and was developing ambitions to dominate all Germany
and to establish a Habsburg preponderance in Europe together with
Spain, now resuming the war in the Netherlands.
Bohemia had hitherto occupied a privileged position in the Austrian
system, as much on account of its intrinsic importance as because of its
status as a kingdom and because the emperors had dwelt in its territories.
Ferdinand favoured Graz as capital and wished to be buried there, but he
could not govern his states from such an out-of-the-way city, and Vienna
assumed the position of capital. Pressburg, the capital of royal Hungary,
was very near Vienna. These cities were more exposed than Prague to
any renewed Turkish offensive. It is true that as the war dragged on
Prague became the focus for the Protestant armies of Germany and
Sweden, from which they attacked the states of the emperor himself, but
this danger did not arise before 1630. Ferdinand felt bitter towards
1
Chapter x i : ' The Thirty Years War.'
517
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Prague as the centre of the revolt, and the dynasty's lasting aversion to
the ancient kingdom influenced its future as much as constitutional
changes. Despite appearances, this aversion hindered the process of
centralization and unification which might have taken place in central
Europe to the advantage of the victorious dynasty.
It was often asserted in the nineteenth century—and still sometimes
today—that the emperor, a German prince, vented his personal hatred on
the Czech people, that he deprived them of all their rights, forbade them
to speak their language, put all the leading nobles to death, despoiled
families of their possessions, converted the people to Catholicism by force
and set up one of the most cruel and tyrannical regimes ever known in
Europe. This account is highly exaggerated and still worse shows a
complete failure to understand what was possible in the seventeenth
century. An example was made of those implicated in the government of
Frederick V. A special commission was set up under the country's new
governor, Charles of Lichtenstein, and twenty-seven men were con-
demned to death: they were executed in Prague Square on 21 June 1621.
They included three members of the lords, Slik, Budovec and Harant;
seven knights, Cernin being one, and seventeen burghers including the
German doctor Jessen, the rector of the university. Such severity was
excessive, but the Czech nobility was hardly destroyed by the loss of ten
of its number. In Moravia, where the government was entrusted to
Cardinal Dietrichstein, there were no executions. Silesia and Lusatia
benefited from an amnesty because of the protection of the elector of
Saxony who could not be treated lightly. On the other hand, in Bohemia
and Moravia, all who had collaborated with the revolutionary govern-
ment of 1618, either by providing subsidies or by petitioning it, were
subjected to various penalties. Their property was confiscated wholly or
partially; but even in the latter case it was sold by the royal chamber
which then repaid the price of the unforfeited remainder. In this form the
operation was absurd, because the punishment affected too many, so that
the process of pacification was delayed, and because the vast amount of
land glutted the market and declined in value. Furthermore, in keeping
with prevailing economic conditions most of the possessions sold were
direct or indirect security for debts which the former owner could no
longer honour and which in principle the chamber agreed to settle. In
consequence there was an upheaval of fortunes throughout the country
and the royal treasury ran into debt. The effective power of the king was
compromised and that of some individuals underwent a sudden and scanda-
lous increase. The main victims were the Protestant knights whose
estates were too small for them to be left with anything in the event of
partial confiscation. The main beneficiaries were the great Catholic
landowners who were able to expand and consolidate their estates by
acquisitions, and officers of the imperial army to whom the sovereign was
5i8
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE HABSBURG LANDS l6l8~57
in debt. Even the richest had to borrow to pay for their acquisitions,
but sums owed by the treasury could be used towards purchases and the
liberality of the sovereign sometimes led to remission of part of the price.
Adam of Valdstejn the grand master of the court paid only 20,000 Rhenish
ducats out of a purchase price of 260,000 ducats for the estate of Houska,
confiscated from the Berka family; the emperor made him a present of the
rest. His nephew, Albert of Valdstejn, who had remained loyal to the
emperor, paid 150,000 ducats for the estate of Friedland in northern
Bohemia, confiscated from the Raedern family, and later consolidated
it by new acquisitions. The wife of the Chancellor Lobkowicz was highly
intelligent and took prompt advantage of opportunities so that she and
her husband became the richest landowners in the country. The Slawata
family remained at Jindrichuv-Hradec, but the emperor gave the nearby
estate of Krumlov, a crown possession, to Eggenberg, an Austrian coun-
cillor. This was an exceptional instance though often cited to show that the
emperor was introducing a foreign nobility into the country. In fact it was
rather the Czech Catholic nobility which profited from the first confisca-
tion. Thirteen years later a second confiscation took place. Wallenstein
had extended the duchy of Friedland to the size of a small state. After his
dismissal and death, his possessions were confiscated and shared out,
though a portion was left to his family. By then the imperial army,
reinforced thanks to his efforts, included many foreign officers to whom
the emperor was in debt. He rewarded them with huge bounties, such as
the gift of the Friedland estates to Gallas. This led to an influx of foreign
landowners into the kingdom; most were given lands in Bohemia, but
many sold their property. A great German family of the empire, the
Schwarzenbergs, received extensive estates in southern Bohemia by in-
heritance, succeeding the Eggenbergs. By 1650 the aristocracy of the
kingdom was certainly very different from what it had been before the
war. The indigenous element was still in the majority, with three-fifths
(60,000) of the 107,000 peasant properties in noble hands, but two-fifths
(44,000) were in the hands of newcomers. These figures do not explain
everything. After so many upheavals attitudes and traditions had changed.
In 1627 Ferdinand by his sole authority altered the constitution of
Bohemia. The throne was made hereditary in the reigning family, even in
the female line. The king, by his coronation oath, undertook not to permit
any alienation of territory and to respect the ancient liberties, but Catholi-
cism was the only permitted religion and the Letter of Majesty was
abolished. 1 A first chamber of prelates was added to the Diet, which
retained the right to vote taxation, and this constituted the main limita-
tion of the king's power. 2 Officials were henceforth nominated by the
1
The original document of the Letter of Majesty was slashed twice with a dagger. It is
preserved in this state in the Czech National Archives at Prague.
> See also Vol. v in this series, p. 476.
519
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
king and bound to him by an oath of personal loyalty. In consequence
they no longer bore the title of officers of the kingdom of Bohemia, but that
of royal officers in the kingdom of Bohemia. The constitution was promul-
gated in German, the prince's language, but there was no legal restriction
on the use of Czech. Linguistic and nationalistic persecutions were not
a feature of seventeenth-century politics; what mattered was to be loyal
to the prince.
It did not seem essential as yet to pursue centralization and create a
single state which would abolish the traditional liberties of each country.
The system set up after 1620 marks a retreat from the attempt to form a
central European confederation stimulated by the revolution. The only
link between the states was the person of the sovereign, and nothing
seemed more likely to inspire and guarantee loyalty than religious unity,
produced by practising membership of the Roman Church. Such a result
could not be achieved easily and in certain lands the measures adopted to
achieve peace prevented its realization. The elector of Saxony had con-
tributed to the imperial victory and to please him, Silesia and Lusatia had
been spared repressive action. In Silesia the Letter of Majesty was con-
firmed, and the province became the centre of refuge for Protestants and
the centre of moral resistance to political actions which elsewhere were
destroying the traditional Evangelical cult.
The prince of Transylvania, Bethlen Gabor, had supported the revolu-
tion, joined the confederation and threatened Vienna. More prompt and
determined assistance on his part might have changed the course of
events. By the Peace of Nikolsburg in 1622, several Slovakian comitatji
had to be ceded to him and Transylvania remained a stronghold for the
Protestant Hungarian nobility. In Turkish Hungary conditions were the
same for Protestants and Catholics.
In Upper Austria, where Maximilian of Bavaria was regent, the Protes-
tants were tenacious. As late as 1626 there was a peasant revolt because
their preachers had been expelled and an attempt made to force them to
pay tithes to the Catholic clergy. They demanded the restoration of their
religion wherever it had been practised forty or fifty years earlier, and also
demanded the right to build new churches and schools. For these purposes
they sought the return to the Protestant Estates of their former revenues
and confiscated properties.
In Bohemia many Catholic lords did not hurry to drive Protestant
officials from their lands, as this would have been against their own
interests. The restoration of Catholicism was far from easy, but it involved
more than tortures, executions and burning Bibles and Protestant books
in Czech, though these are not simply the fantasies of polemicists. The
two most effective instruments of the Counter-Reformation were educa-
tion and preaching. Colleges and universities were reorganized in order to
educate the nobility and to recruit clergy—hence the presence of pupils
520
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE HABSBURG LANDS 1 6 1 8 - 5 7
from the common people. In Prague the university, founded in 1348 by
Charles IV, was amalgamated with the Jesuit Academy under the name of
the Charles Ferdinand University. In Alsace, the University of Molsheim
was in Jesuit hands and the religious orders with the support of the arch-
dukes worked to combat the influence of the Protestant middle-class in
the towns. Colmar returned to the Catholic faith. 1
In western Hungary, where the law of 1608 had maintained Protestant
privileges and forbidden religious orders to hold property, Cardinal
Pazmanny, archbishop of Esztergom, founded a university at Nagy-
Sombath (Tyrnau-Trnava) in 1635 and fostered the establishment of
houses of Jesuits at Pressburg, Odenburg, Raab, Varasdin, Agram,
Trentschin and Neusohl. Minds and hearts were to be won above all by
sermons and the splendour of the ritual. The cardinal, himself an orator
and humanist, preached dazzling and eloquent sermons.
Thus as a result of Ferdinand's victories in Bohemia, rivalry between
Reform and Counter-Reform continued in those Habsburg states which
offered the greatest chances of success to Catholicism. A generation later
an educated and devoted priesthood was to be recruited from the people,
but for the present the religious orders' help was indispensable. In
Prague the Carmelites were given the church built by the German traders
of Mala Strana after the Letter of Majesty. The former Protestant church
was dedicated to Our Lady of Victories and a statue of the Infant Jesus of
Spanish origin was placed there. However, most church building was
undertaken at Vienna: the churches of the Capuchins (1622), of the
Dominicans (1631) and of the Jesuits (1627). The two latter had beautiful
facades, adorned with pilasters and volutes, architectural innovations
based on Roman models. Vienna, in addition to being the seat of the court
and government, was also a Catholic city, a reflection of the sovereign and
his suite, the centre from which the enterprise of reconversion spread
through the various Habsburg states and through the empire itself. By
asking their subjects to identify loyalty to their dynasty with acceptance
of Catholicism, the Habsburgs bound themselves so closely to the church
that any harm suffered by the one seemed to shake the other. This funda-
mental feature of the Austrian system lasted until modern times.
The period from the White Hill to the Diet of Ratisbon (1630), was
remarkably favourable to the emperor, but this good fortune could not
last. Conditions changed after 1630; he was checked by the German
princes, alarmed at his success. Ferdinand made the mistake of giving up
the chief source of his power, Wallenstein's army. As a result his govern-
ment underwent a succession of trials which continued after his death in
1637. This new phase of the war, from 1630 to the Peace of Westphalia
(1648), was one of the most difficult for the House of Austria and ended
1
18
G. Livet, VIntendance d'Alsace sous Louis XIV, p. 25.
521
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
MHFDECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
for ever the prospects promised by the earlier victories. Alsace was vir-
tually lost when, to avoid the horrors of war, the Alsatian towns placed
themselves under the protection first of Sweden and then of France.
Transylvanian Hungary, whose Prince Rakoczi was the ally of Branden-
burg and then of Sweden, renewed the struggle for religious and political
privileges and was a constant threat to the eastern flank of the Austrian
possessions. The inhabitants of royal Hungary were thus in a permanent
state of unrest. Lastly, and more important, Bohemia and Moravia be-
came the invasion route for the northern armies marching on Vienna and
were constantly disturbed by the passage of troops (1631-4, 1639-41,
1645-8). Their exactions were much harsher than in the earlier part of
the war.
The production of the great estates, formed after the revolt, had soon
reached a high level. A completely new side of Wallenstein has been
revealed by recent historiography: in a few years, he had ensured order
and progress in his duchy of Friedland, just as he had tried to stop pillage
in the conquered German lands and to establish reasonable government in
Mecklenburg. After bis defection, the lands which he had so successfully
developed in northern Bohemia appropriately suffered most from invasion
and were soon ruined. The Treaty of Prague (1635) with the imperial
electors raised hopes briefly, but it cost Austria dear. In spite of the royal
oath that Bohemia should lose none of its territory, the elector of Saxony
gained the province of Lusatia where Slav peoples, Swabians, lived sur-
rounded by Germans. Thus the emperor agreed to a reduction in his
power both in his personal states and in the empire and a general peace
seemed imminent. Markets revived, the price of land rose and public
order was nearly re-established when the struggle began again with in-
creased bitterness. Trade was at a standstill in the towns, while the country-
side suffered the vicissitudes of good and bad harvests and the requisitions
of imperial and foreign armies. The fate of the peasants was more inti-
mately bound up with the lord than ever. He alone could wrest a safe con-
duct from the emperor, soften the demands of the invader, or charitably
direct the armies to some neighbouring estate. Sometimes it was no longer
clear who the lord was. The exiles, returning in the wake of the Swedish
armies, declared their intention of resuming control of the estates con-
fiscated by the emperor. Estates such as those of the Slawatas in southern
Bohemia which remained continuously in the same hands were fortunate.
The sovereign no longer exercised his authority. As a result of devalua-
tion, the imperial government in Vienna found itself unable to pay for the
war effort from taxation and ordinary revenues; it had to rely on military
entrepreneurs and mercenaries whose loyalty was dictated by self-interest
as Wallenstein and Bernard of Saxe-Weimar had shown. It was a time of
anarchy and hand-to-mouth existence. The results of these dark years
can only be assessed by considering the results of the war and the way in
522
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE HABSBURG LANDS 1 6 1 8 - 5 7
which the reconstruction of administration and the individual lands was
attempted.
In 1645 the Peace of Linz with Prince Rakoczi suspended hostilities on
the eastern front, but by it the emperor was obliged to grant his adversary
further Hungarian comitatji, and to confirm Protestant privileges in royal
Hungary. Here again his authority was strikingly circumscribed. In 1648
came the Peace of Westphalia, with France, Sweden and their allies.
The news that it had been signed halted Konigsmark's Swedish troops,
who had held Mala Strana for several months, at the bridge into Prague,
but the last foreign detachments did not leave the kingdom until 1650.
The Peace of Westphalia sacrificed Habsburg rights and possessions in
Alsace to France and especially weakened the power of the emperor within
the empire. The possibility of the Habsburgs securing a hold on Germany
and gradually turning the empire into a hereditary kingdom was averted
for ever. German liberties were safeguarded against Habsburg absolu-
tism, whether or not the danger had been as great as the propaganda of
the Habsburgs' enemies had contended. Although Czech exiles (e.g.
Komensky) begged the Swedes not to sign the peace until the internal
affairs of the kingdom had been settled, the Treaties of Westphalia made
no stipulations about the emperor's personal possessions. Consequently
Ferdinand Ill's power extended over a vast area from the Rhine to the
Carpathians, and from the Oder Valley to the Adriatic, one of the largest
geographical units in Europe, the potential basis of a large modern state.
It was not yet possible to impose a common policy on these neighbouring
countries, to co-ordinate their economies or their attitudes, or to subject
them to the will of the prince. The first task was to rebuild the ruins: not
only abandoned houses, smoke-blackened castles, or thriving little cities
turned into dead towns; the population was also in ruins. The figures are
still subject to revision and dispute, but the overall results are reasonably
accurate. On the eve of the war Bohemia had been the most populous
of the Habsburg states: in 1648 it was the most ravaged. A census of
taxable properties in 1654 revealed that out of 155,000 households
known before the war, only 123,000 remained. Statisticians have recently
analysed these summary conclusions, including the inhabitants and
properties outside the census, assessing the numbers of a household in the
country and evaluating the fiscal unit in the towns. The masterly studies of
Otto Placht show that between 1615 and 1650 the population of Bohemia
fell from 1,700,000 to 930,000, a drop of nearly 50%, while the population
of Moravia had fallen by a third (30%). The population of Prague num-
bered some 40,000 and the other royal cities some 65,000. This decline of
the ancient cities was a striking feature of the new state of affairs. Prague
was passing through a period of decline and stagnation; the religious
authorities requested the civil government to close the markets, as
Protestant traders from Germany might spread propaganda for their
523
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
I8- SDECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
religion. The majority of the population lived in the provinces: 145,000
in the seigneurial towns and 580,000 in the country. 1 Families were
smaller than before the war, averaging about 3 6 instead of 6 in the towns
and 4 instead of 9 in the country. Military operations were not directly
responsible for this decline, but they led to widespread famine to which the
weaker—the old, expectant mothers, children under fifteen, the newly
born—fell an easy prey. The birth-rate declined, especially among the
poorer peasants, and the proportion of people aged over fifty dropped.
At the end of the war, the population of Bohemia consisted in the main of
country dwellers (among whom may be numbered the inhabitants
of some of the royal and seigneurial towns) born and brought up during
the war and with no recollection of a free and happy land. Indeed few if
any could remember such a time: they naturally loathed war, having
experienced only its horrors, but the war constantly returned, brought by
foreigners, while the emperor seemed to represent the old order and the
promise of peace. The Bohemian students of the Charles Ferdinand
University defended the Charles Bridge against the Swedes in 1648,
fighting for something their grandfathers had tried to destroy. It is not
possible to estimate the proportion of Germans and Czechs, or of Catho-
lics and Protestants in the country. The Protestant element had certainly
not disappeared, for in spite of imperial proscriptions, Protestant admini-
strators continued to be found on the estates. In addition there were still
too few Catholic clergy to accomplish the tasks of conversion, education
and parochial duties for which they were needed. However, the leading
figures of the Czech Counter-Reformation were coming to maturity. The
Jesuits Bridel and Bohuslav Balbin, the first a preacher and professor, the
second a historian and philologist renowned for his defence of the Czech
language, were born in 1619 and 1621 respectively.
The ravages of war had not affected the whole country, but in the
regions which had suffered, reconstruction of farming and agriculture
was especially difficult for landowners unless they were very wealthy.
Both the old families of the knightly order and the foreign families who
had received small properties from the emperor (such as the Tyrolean
family of Spaur at Houska, north Bohemia) were unable to support them-
selves and were obliged to sell their lands at unfavourable prices, while
large estates, whatever their origin, were in an advantageous position.
They already predominated in the southern regions by-passed by the war,
with the vast possessions of the Eggenbergs (5,400 households), the
Slawatas (3,569) and the Bucquoys (3,100). After the war this became the
pattern for the country's economy. The estates, usually well run, were
expanded, sometimes field by field, by purchasing lands which poor
1
These figures are given by Otto Placht, p. 116, Lidnatost a Spoleienska Skladba Ceskiho
Stdtu v. 16-18 stoleti (Prague, 1957). The precise figures are: Prague, over 40,000; royal
cities, 64,814; seigniorial towns, 145,560; rural population, 581,050.
524
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE HABSBURG LANDS 1 6 1 8 - 5 7
peasants or impoverished nobles were obliged to sell and which were
farmed directly by the lord's agents. The state revenue suffered, for noble
lands exempt from taxation (dominical) were confused with servile
lands (rustical) which should have been taxed. On these farms and on the
lord's demesne the peasants' corxie provided labour. The various grades of
tenants were all obliged to provide equipment or time and labour for so
many days a week, husbandmen, smallholders, journeymen and tenants
alike, and the corvee became the chief economic feature of this system.
However, the lords did not derive their main income from agriculture;
administration of justice, taxes on sales and legacies and above all the
monopolies of beer, wool, meat and skins sold to the inhabitants of the
seigneurial towns often brought in as much as, or more than the income
from the land. Apart from the corvee the main feature of the regime was
the paternal authority of the lord on his estates. The inhabitants, including
even prosperous townspeople—brewers, dyers, clothiers—could neither
marry, nor inherit, nor sell their property, nor apprentice their children
without the permission of the lord or his officers. They were not allowed
to move or to leave the estate: if they attempted to do so they could be
sent back. The lord was legal guardian of orphans: he administered their
property and required work from them in return; this was later extended
to all young vassals, who were obliged to serve the orphan years. This
revival of feudalism was not confined to Bohemia, but was also found in
Hungary, where the minor nobility preserved their privileges alongside the
upper nobility, and also to a lesser extent in Innerosterreich.
This system maintained the wealth and influence of a minority of a few
hundred families from which a small number of magnates emerged: the
families of Lobkowicz, Slawata (succeeded by Cernin); Eggenberg (suc-
ceeded by Schwarzenberg), Gallas and Colloredo; Dietrichstein, Lichten-
stein and Kaunitz in Moravia. Many were anxious to run their estates
well and, as far as the law allowed, to behave justly and humanely towards
the inhabitants. 'An estate where justice is observed and respected',
William of Slawata told his son in 1634, 'is by its essence in a better condi-
tion than the others; more men and more profit can be expected from it.'
Of course such generous and wise rule primarily benefited the lord, but
the connection between his wealth and the material and moral well-being
of his subjects was the heart of the system and was its justification. Today
land is held in so little esteem that it is not easy to understand this desire of
families to run their estates well. They were proud if the estate was en-
larged, if its production increased, if religious foundations were set up
and if it was embellished by chapels and castles; they wished to hand it on
to the following generation in better condition. The paterna monita of the
prince of Schwarzenberg, at the beginning of the eighteenth century bear
witness to this. The character of the lord and even more that of his steward
were of vital concern to subjects and vassals, peasants and townsmen
525
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
alike. The administrators of the estates who rose from the people were all
the more pitiless to the peasants. The closed character of the estate made
marriages between near neighbours or relations inevitable, and peasant
dynasties established themselves more tenaciously than the noble families
themselves. In the years immediately following the Thirty Years War, the
basis was laid of a way of life which lasted, though not without accidents,
disturbances and abuses, until the crisis of 1848 in the Austrian lands.
Many features survived after this date in Austria-Hungary and even in its
successor states. The war had strengthened and accentuated a develop-
ment first heralded in the sixteenth century and which might have been
expected to disappear during the crisis. It may be asked whether a system
which gave such power to the aristocracy favoured the authority of the
sovereign. He remained the supreme judge to whom vassals could appeal
against the exactions of their overlord. He also controlled general policy,
in peace or war, for which he asked the Diets to vote taxes, the officers of
state were nominated by him and bound to him by oath. In practice
however it appears that seigneurial authority was a barrier between
sovereign and people. The great lords of Bohemia, Austria and royal
Hungary were the sovereign's direct dependants. They served him, as
members of his councils, of the chanceries of his various states and as
diplomatic representatives. They were eager to receive feudal honours
from him (the imperial titles of duke, count and baron, unknown in the
ancient customs of the kingdoms) and the Order of the Golden Fleece,
which enjoyed the greatest prestige of all. Nevertheless their personal
loyalty, regarded as an adequate safeguard, and their authority over their
vassals combined to check the sovereign from any process of unification
comparable to that undertaken by the kings of France at this time through
their bourgeois officials. The Habsburg sovereign, circumscribed by his
hieratic prestige and by his attendant magnates, could not exercise the
absolute authority which he was recognized as possessing in principle.
Short of a new revolution, such as that unsuccessfully attempted by
Joseph II, he was unable to break down the profusion of feudal sub-
divisions or to unite disparate human groups into one nation. Even so,
Vienna and the court formed a centre to which the aristocracies of the
various states were drawn and where they made matrimonial alliances.
They developed into a single group united by their common interests and
ready to adopt German, the language of the Habsburgs, as their common
tongue. Thus the aristocracy gave up its regional characteristics and
became Austrian. The change was neither rapid nor complete and this
slow development is explained by the conditions of landownership. The
nature of the lord's local authority, the time he spent on his lands, or
both, so as to make use of the dues paid in kind and to live more cheaply
than at Vienna, and from inclination to enjoy the comforts of his resi-
dences and the pleasures of the chase, both maintained or revived regional
526
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE HABSBURG LANDS 1 6 1 8 - 5 7
characteristics which he would have lost at court. The Czech language kept
its hold. In 1634 William of Slawata expressed his regret that it was
losing its purity and becoming full of germanisms. His son Adam estab-
lished a foundation at the Church of the Assumption at Jindfichuv-
Hradec (Neuhaus) in 1652 for the preaching of sermons in Czech because
the inhabitants were traditionally attached to that language. The high
proportion of foreigners settled in Bohemia in the middle of the century
(in the upper nobility there were 58 Bohemian families, including about
30 at least recently promoted from the order of knights, as against 95
of foreign origin) and the decline of the lesser nobility, the knights—still
vigorous in Hungary—accounts for the spread of German as the
current language. Foreigners of Italian or Belgian origin (Piccolomini,
Bucquoy) adopted German more readily than Czech which was regarded
as difficult, strange and archaic. Sometimes the nobility expressed
Bohemian sentiments in German; in 1679 Humprecht Cernin advised his
son travelling abroad to remember to communicate on the Feast of St
Wenceslas, so as to honour the protector of the kingdom, as a good
Bohemian. An Austrian system was emerging, for the hereditary king of
Bohemia now lived in Vienna, to which the chancery had been moved, and
the feudal regime was consolidated to the advantage of the German-
speaking Austrian or foreign aristocracy (still enjoying the Incolate).
Everywhere national traditions survived and preserved regional aware-
ness. Even the Catholic faith, though maintained to some extent by force
as well as by persuasion in the old Hussite lands, helped to foster this
regional—almost separatist—spirit. An imperial decree ordered the
restoration of calvaries and statues damaged during the wars. The lord
attended to this on his estate. The statues of St Wenceslas, St Ludmilla and
St Guy reappeared, reviving the attachment of medieval Bohemia to the
protectors of the race. Devotion to the Virgin was the principal mark of
loyalty to the Roman Church favoured by the men of the Counter-
Reformation, but the restoration of the shrines of the Virgin and the
traditional places of pilgrimage revived the veneration of the traditional
Czech Madonnas: the Virgin of Svata Hora, of Stara Boleslav, of Zlata
Koruna, of Haindorf. A new bond was formed between the land of
Bohemia with its forests, lakes and hills and the half-forgotten and
disputed religion which was rediscovering its holy places; it expressed
itself in charming works of baroque art. This was not against the general
policy of the House of Austria, nor was it likely to disrupt the feudal
system or the corvee. But among the masses spiritual and moral values
were preserved and fostered, which later events brought to fruition; they
were the main cause of what has been inaccurately termed the 'reawaken-
ing' of a nation which had never fallen asleep. In the mid-seventeenth
century only the seeds were there, but they must be recognized, if subse-
quent events are to be understood. This patriarchal peasant system may
527
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
have unintentionally maintained national individuality better than a
centralized system, with a more advanced and industrialized economy, in
which the unity of the Austrian peoples would have been rapidly achieved
by the mixing of regional groups.
The return of peace made possible the building or rebuilding of
churches and of country and town houses for the nobility. Gradually the
increasing numbers and prosperity of the population led to an increasing
taste for building—particularly ornate building—in the Austrian lands.
At the beginning of the century, Italian influences were already making
themselves felt in Vienna and Prague, replacing the influence of the
German Renaissance. In 1611 the Emperor Mathias commissioned a new
portico for the entrance to Hradcany from the workshops of Scamozzi.
Architects came mainly from north Italy—Milan and Venice—or at least
adopted the style of that region. Some years later the religious orders
began to model their churches on the Roman Counter-Reformation style:
facades of two storeys (Dominicans of Vienna), or three (University of
Vienna, Discalced Carmelites of Leopoldstadt) divided by mouldings of
pilasters, with volutes linking each storey, the whole topped by a triangular
pediment. The walls were decorated with niches and statues and the cen-
tral portico would be crowned by a niche or decorated with pyramids
(Our Lady of Victories, Prague). The towers of the old Gothic churches
were not abandoned. They reappeared, short and squat on the Schotten-
kirche in Vienna (1652). As for the interior, the sanctuary was skilfully
modernized with a new reredos and with plaster medallions or figures.
There was still not enough money, nor were there enough craftsmen to
permit many such renovations. Until the middle of the century, the sove-
reigns themselves lived in gloomy medieval dwellings—both the Hradcany
at Prague, where in spite of some work over successive generations the
old castle remained in use; and the Hofburg at Vienna, of which only one
wing had been rebuilt at the end of the sixteenth century (Amalienburg).
Similarly the nobles were still content with their old fortresses—Krumlov,
Rozmberk, Friedland, Kost—though some of the richest had improved them
by the addition of galleries on inner courtyards in the Florentine manner.
Wallenstein was the first to embark on a course of magnificence. He
bought a whole quarter of Mala Strana to build a palace which still
presented a stern front to the street, but with a loggia on the garden side,
the Sala Terrena, recalling the Lanzi of Florence and the Te palace at
Mantua, with its three arches supported by pairs of Doric columns: while
inside, a delicate profusion of plasterwork over vault and walls, framed
paintings. In all the apartments, the hall and the chapel, there were works
of art—German and Italian Renaissance paintings, tapestries, plate. In
the gardens the walls were masked by false grottoes, the aviary was full
of exotic birds, the avenues were flanked by the bronzes of the Flemish
528
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE HABSBURG LANDS 1 6 1 8 - 5 7
sculptor Adrian de Vries. This was still an isolated example, despoiled of
some of its treasures by the marauding armies, when peace returned, but a
tradition had been established. The idea spread that each estate should
have a palatial residence and that the glory of a noble family was con-
firmed by the beauty of its houses. Throughout the Austrian lands from
1680 to 1740 a whole artistic ethos, an independent form of the baroque,
can be observed in the splendour of the church ritual and of sacred and
secular music, in the luxury of the noble houses, in the feasts and banquets
of the hunt, in the eagerness to own fine horses reared and selected in the
studs of Bohemia and Hungary. These Slav, German and Hungarian
lands fell under the influence of Italy. Latin thought and taste refined
sensibilities and led to an enduring preference for form and grace rather
than ideas and action. At the same time the high proportion of peasants
in the society and the life of the great estates preserved some patriarchal
features which tempered social distinctions and awakened in some aspira-
tions for douceur de vivre after half a century of suffering and horrors.
Hereditary transmission of the crown was further confirmed by the
custom of crowning the princes destined to succeed to the kingdom
of Bohemia or Hungary in their father's lifetime. Ferdinand II
took this course with his son Ferdinand III, who bore the title of king of
Hungary when he precipitated the fall of Wallenstein and took his place
as commander of the armies. Ferdinand III, austere and religious like
his father, was the victor of Nordlingen and the most mih'tary-minded
emperor of the seventeenth century. By his first marriage with his cousin
Maria-Anna, daughter of the king of Spain, and sister of Anne of Austria,
queen of France, he had two sons. The elder, Ferdinand IV, was brought
up to rule and elected king of the Romans, while the second, Leopold,
less robust and devoted to music, seemed destined for the church.
Ferdinand IV, however, died prematurely in 1654 aged 21, and the
imperial succession had not been settled when the emperor himself died in
1657, aged barely 50. In 1650, bereaved of his second wife, his cousin
Maria Leopoldina of Tyrol, he had married the daughter of the duke of
Mantua, the Princess Eleonora who came from a court and city celebrated
for their artistic traditions. She further extended Italian influence in
Vienna. Neither Ferdinand II nor Ferdinand III was a nonentity; both
had high conceptions of their responsibilities, but they were not states-
men. Constantly struggling against external difficulties, they were never in
a position to study the problems of their own states or to prepare major
reforms. Their frontiers were never entirely free from danger. In 1656,
the renewal of the northern war between Brandenburg, Sweden and
Poland against which George Rakoczi launched an offensive, threatened
a general conflagration.
In such circumstances they were resigned to an outmoded and ponder-
529
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
ous system. The imperial agencies were confused with and juxtaposed to
those of the government of their own states and those peculiar to each
state. Everything depended in the last analysis on personal loyalty to the
emperor. Absolute legal masters in some countries (though not by any
means in Hungary) and thought to be capable of becoming absolute
overlords in the empire, they enjoyed in fact the trappings rather than the
realities of power. A military victory had re-established their authority in
1620, another had confirmed it in 1634 and it had survived later changes
in fortune. In 1648 they had yet preserved the potentiality of becoming a
great power. They relied on a spiritual force—religion—but more effec-
tively on the clergy of their states; a vigorous and disciplined society of
bishops and secular and regular priests. They had made a tacit pact with
another society, the aristocracy, relying on them to govern and control
the people. Thus two forces, the church and the nobility, which were to be
conspicuous in modern Austria, were already vital in the middle of the
seventeenth century, but the army and the bureaucracy were still absent.
The emperors had soldiers at their disposal, but in accordance with the
traditional system of recruitment they still lacked an effective standing
army, which began to develop after 1680. Meanwhile the Turkish threat
was still at the gates of Pressburg and Vienna, the route to the east was
blocked and the monarchy could not properly be called Danubian.
Nevertheless the term Austrian can reasonably be applied to this block
of states. The dynasty was only important in international affairs because
of power derived from the demographic and economic resources of these
territories. The former legal power of the Estates was, at least in Bohemia
and Austria, curtailed. But force of arms, outside help and empiricism,
rather than any coherent political theory, had led to this result. Every-
thing was bent towards obedience, but the sovereign did not exercise the
plenitude of his powers over his peoples, either in person or through his
agents. Amid the details and complexities of the administrative system
he was not in direct control, nor could he direct the forces which would
develop with the return of peace. Feudalism survived everywhere, taking
on a new life within a commercial and capitalist economy.
At a time when absolutism was becoming effective in other European
countries, secondary powers which had been subdued elsewhere con-
tinued to dominate the social system in Austria. If they repressed the spirit
of revolt they also curbed, to their own advantage, the spirit of enterprise
and limited the prince's authority. Austria was a system possessing
elements of power and greatness, but it was far from being a modern state.
It remained an association of peoples without the means to form a united
nation.
530
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER XVIII
THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
T
HE development of political life and government in England since
1300 had been considerably affected by foreign war and to a lesser
extent by domestic conflicts. English kings had been both attackers
and defenders, defending their French inheritance and their northern
border, asserting claims over Wales, Ireland, Scotland and France. From
Edward I's conquest of Wales to Henry V's of France, attack and con-
quest had predominated. These claims were never clearly renounced
by any of the Tudors and were asserted at enormous cost by Henry VIII.
Part of that cost was the strength of movements of protest and rebellion
1525-54 which were broader in geographical and social characteristics
than the disorders before Henry VII. The cost of trying to match effective-
ly the scale of continental warfare in Charles V's time had profoundly
affected English governments by 1559. Thereafter they were more than
ever limited to a basically defensive policy, however much their subjects
hankered after memories of past glories. From 1570 to 1639 England
had its longest period of domestic peace since 1066 and, unlike the nearly
comparable period 1330-80, was only engaged in foreign wars for just
over a third of the time. One of the most important symptoms of political
crisis under the Stuarts was their inability to pursue an effective foreign
policy. This impotence saved England from direct participation in the
Thirty Years War and at the same time helped to produce the Civil
War.
Nevertheless the scale of the Elizabethan war effort had important
consequences. The debts Elizabeth left were comparatively small, because
she had kept to the tradition set by Henry VIII of selling crown land
rather than meeting the full cost of war by taxation. The more serious
effects were on government and governed. War was accompanied by
profiteering and corruption, which was scarcely novel, though it has been
argued that corruption and self-seeking in high places grew greater.
This could have been a result of the crown's steadily decreasing direct
resources for rewarding its servants, one symptom of which was the in-
creasing number of grants of patents of monopoly as rewards leading
to violent attacks on them in the Commons in 1601. More serious long-
term symptoms were the steady decline in the yield of the lay subsidy
(from £137,000 in 1559 to £71,000 in 1603) during a period of inflation
and the acknowledged fact that it fell increasingly heavily on the poorer
and spared the wealthier landowners. But the decline was also partly due
to the fact that a large part of the costs of war was met by local levies.
531
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
From 1588 to 1599 thousands of men in the trained bands were being
drilled six or more times a year. The rates levied to pay for arms, training
and maintenance in crisis years for a town or county might be four times
the yield of a subsidy. Both local elites and the government exploited the
situation. The well-to-do increasingly evaded their obligations in personal
service and cash, though greater landowners often did provide onerous
voluntary services. The government increasingly commandeered arms,
paid for by local rates, to equip troops sent overseas. Opportunities for
favours and outright corruption were increasingly exploited. A con-
temporary wrote:
[When] the payment of subsidies, the service of musters and other common charges
of this our time were not usual, the harm of retainments was not then so thoroughly
seen . . . as now it is. There is nothing more usual than to retain the wealthiest
yeomanry and others by forbearing them wholly, or charging them lightly to make
recompense of their service, by robbing of the king's coffers or defrauding him and
the realm of that help which they might bring, if they were equally burdened as
their neighbours.
At the same time there was a general tendency for places of power and
profit to be concentrated in fewer hands. The militia was administered
after the 1580s by much smaller groups, whether commissioners or deputy
lieutenants, than earlier. The numbers of commissioners for the subsidies
fell, special commissioners for recusancy offences, or other business,
were chosen from the J.P.s. The membership of all these usually came
from one small group of notables. The crown had long accepted or fost-
ered the growth of oligarchy in municipal government, but the importance
of favour in county government was greater than ever. Both at the centre
and locally the groups enjoying prestige and profit seemed to be growing
smaller, while the numbers excluded grew larger.
Thus the war gave increased opportunities for patronage, faction and
corruption in the country as well as at court. Although organization for
war certainly increased the central supervision of local affairs in the
short run, it did not provide new or permanent means of increasing
the government's power, as had happened in Castile and was to happen in
France. Much of the war effort depended directly on local resources,
or in the naval war on private ones which the government employed, but
could not fully control. Once peace came the militia organization became
eventually a focus for local discontents and grievances against central
authority, a testimony to its weakness rather than to its strength. Once
visible threats of invasion and of domestic emergencies had gone, there
was increased questioning of the scope and basis of the crown's emergency
powers.
By 1603 desire for peace was general and strong. James was doubly
welcomed as a bringer of peace, since many had feared a disputed
succession. His own preconceptions were flatteringly confirmed, for he
532
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
genuinely saw himself as an international peacemaker, while his succes-
sion defied Henry VIII's statutorily conferred power to determine the
succession by his will and vindicated the most practical claims of in-
defeasible divine hereditary right. He also came as the expected bringer
of 'a better time' to English puritans, whose advent was the 'day which
the Lord hath made'.
James was the experienced ruler of a country where to survive and exer-
cise some authority were major achievements of kingcraft. Physically
timorous and unprepossessing, he had shown determination and ability
to choose effective ministers. His own high opinion of his intellectual
abilities was not entirely unjustified. But time would show that in his new
kingdom he lacked not perception but persistence and application. His
growing habits of self-flattery and self-indulgence mattered less in his
intellectual pursuits, where he chose competent collaborators to do the
donkey work in his later years. 1 But he failed to apply the same solution
effectively to the problems of English government. There he could appre-
ciate good advice, but seldom accepted the postponement of immediate
satisfactions, whether in verbal victories, bestowing favours, or hours
spent hunting, for the sake of future strength. Increasingly the captive of
his homosexual tastes, he finally sacrificed his own preferences to those of
Buckingham. He was in a sense corrupted by the magnificence and
ceremonious ostentation of the court which was one of the Tudors'
major achievements and which so impressed foreign observers. In miti-
gation it should be said that kings were not generally expected to show
the obsessive dedication to paperwork of a Philip II and that James
suffered from a painful and disabling disease (possibly porphyria) whose
attacks became increasingly frequent and severe after 1610. 2
These infirmities were not apparent in 1603. The welcoming crowds
looked for bounty and a new dispensation. Such hopes always marked
the beginning of a new reign, but they were stronger and more urgent now.
James was ready to see himself as the uniter of crowns and creeds,
bringing judgements of Solomon to cure his subjects' conflicts. After the
poverty of Scotland, means for bounty seemed limitless and he never
digested Elizabeth's saying 'no prince's revenues be so great that they
are able to satisfy the insatiable cupidity of men'.
The desire to end the war was undoubtedly strong, but this could not
solve the crown's financial problems and would increase its political ones,
as vested interests in the war had grown up. Apart from contractors
supplying the forces, there was heavy investment in privateering. Although
this gave opportunities to West Country captains, the largest ships and
profits belonged to great London merchants like Bayning. The war
probably increased their domination of the country's trade still further
1
See above, Chapter in, pp. 105-8 for his European reputation as a controversialist.
• I. Macalpine and others, Porphyria—A Royal Malady (1968), pp. 26-33.
533
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
and certainly increased their ability to gain privileges and favours from
a harassed government. Both were bitterly resented by the outports who
wished to ensure that these gains were not perpetuated in any peace.
In peacetime general prosperity depended upon industry and trade to a
greater extent than in any country outside the Netherlands. Overseas
trade was dominated by woollen textiles (some three-quarters of the total
value of exports). Although the home market for cloth may have been bigger
and agriculture was the basic sector of the economy, a serious slump in
cloth exports produced unemployment, credit difficulties, falling rents
and widespread discontent. Landowners in the Commons recognized
an interdependence between industry, overseas trade and rents of land.
The main export was of unfinished cloth to the Netherlands and was the
monopoly of the Merchant Adventurers, a regulated company dominated
by great London merchants, who thus seemed to control the fortune of
much of the country. The importance and narrowness of the Merchant
Adventurers' market was a limiting factor in English foreign policy and
a longstanding ambition had been to diversify the markets for cloth.
Peace might provide opportunities for this, while the outports rallied
behind the slogan of free trade in the hope of reducing London's domina-
tion through privileged companies.
Some merchants might want freer overseas trade, without attacking
economic regulation in general. The crown had always in theory possessed
wide powers of regulation, generally thought necessary to preserve order.
Thus it controlled middlemen, forbade forestalling and regrating, tried
to regulate prices in times of scarcity and found itself responsible for
regulations concerning wages, apprenticeship, the poor, standards of
cloth production, encouraging fishing by fast days, or discouraging im-
ports of luxuries by sumptuary laws. Much regulation was based on
statutes, but some was based on grants by the crown to companies or
individuals ostensibly to encourage or reform branches of trade, or
particular industries. Such grants were often monopolies with powers of
search or inspection, or they might be licences or dispensations from
statutes, such as those prohibiting the export of unfinished cloth. Thus
statutory and prerogative power were mingled, complementing and
contradicting each other, not so much for the profit of the crown, or at
the behest of its policies, but rather for those of pressure groups and their
intermediaries at court. In emergencies, such as bad harvests, the privy
council might be active, trying to ensure that local authorities controlled
grain supplies, regulated prices, or relieved the poor, but enforcement
of most economic regulation was left to interested parties or common
informers, who claimed the penalties provided in statutes. Professional
informers (often the agents of Londoners) could live by forcing offenders
to compound by threats of prosecution or by starting prosecutions.
Sometimes the crown granted individuals power to dispense from penal-
534
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
ties in statutes. Thus informing on penal statutes was a major grievance,
even to those who wanted effective enforcement of economic regulation.
If the emergency powers of the crown to preserve order were wide and
ill-defined, a number of tacit conventions had grown up which restricted
its freedom in fiscal policy. Since the mid-sixteenth century debasement
had never been used as a fiscal device; though considered a couple of
times before 1640, it was felt to be politically impossible. Since Henry
VII's time offices had been sold, but the profits almost always went to
other office-holders, not to the crown. Both the Commons and crown
before 1642 accepted the view that to reform the system of direct taxation
by introducing excises was also politically impossible. Thus the only
revenue which could be readily increased was that from customs. Apart
from the constitutional issues as to whether this could be done by
prerogative power, there was the fiscal limitation that duties had to be
kept low to avoid smuggling and discontent. To pursue effective pro-
tectionist policies by abolishing export duties and imposing high import
duties on manufactures would have involved sacrificing certainty in yield
which the crown could not afford.
War and the queen's old age had not caused the postponement of all
efforts at reform. Attempts to improve the educational standards of the
clergy, procedures in Chancery, Star Chamber and other courts and put
statutory limitations on informers made some progress. Even these
modest efforts offended some vested interests, but many men wanted much
greater and often contradictory changes, any of which would upset even
more interests.
This was especially true of the church, where the wealth, status and
education of most of the rural parochial clergy had probably risen during
Elizabeth's reign. As the country parson was usually an active farmer,
this may have enhanced him in the eyes of some of his neighbours, or
encouraged the jealousies of others. The improvement in education
necessary for' a godly preaching ministry', like other long-sought improve-
ments, seemed to make some problems worse. The more graduates, the
more of the poorer livings they held; the output of clergy from the univer-
sities doubled or perhaps tripled between 1560 and 1600 and continued
to rise. Some graduates might have to be content to be curates, others
held pluralities. After 1600 the number of pluralities increased in some
dioceses. Another response was the endowing of lectureships (for weekly
or more frequent sermons) by laymen and towns. Their increasing num-
bers after 1600 threatened the traditional order and authorities of the
church, while providing Puritan corporations and patrons with oppor-
tunities for propagating their views, which were the greater since lectureships
were often relatively well paid. Thus, as in other cases, an improvement
which everyone desired in principle, in practice seemed to call either for
more sweeping changes, or repressive measures to preserve the old order.
535
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Abuses attacked in the Reformation Parliament still seemed as vexa-
tious as ever. Bishops now defended pluralism as a practical means of
ensuring an adequate living for educated men. The promised reform of
canon law and the church courts had never taken place. Their procedures
remained dilatory and ineffective, their officials often corrupt; when high
commission provided more effective sanctions its legality might be
challenged. Complaints came both from those who wanted an effective
godly discipline and those who resented clerical pretensions and power.
These latter can be seen as the heirs of medieval anti-clericalism, or as
pioneers of modern secularism, or more immediately as the defenders
of their own selfish interests; over 40 per cent of rectories were improp-
riated to laymen. Such sentiments also helped the Commons to pass
bills on four occasions between 1604 and 1629 making clergy with cure
of souls ineligible for commissions of the peace. Constructive reformers
including both the subscribers to the Millenary Petition at James' accession
and their opponents such as Bancroft, Robert Cecil or Thomas Egerton
agreed on the desirability of taxing impropriate tithes in lay hands; the
Commons of the 1604 Parliament rejected such proposals.
If the greatest and most immediate expectations of reform were in the
church, James again could not hope to satisfy all expectations, which
were equally high among both Puritans and Catholics. Between 1580 and
1604 the number of families of Catholic gentry in Yorkshire had risen by
60 per cent to include nearly a third of all gentry families. This trend fed
Catholic expectations and confirmed the Puritans' view of the Elizabe-
than church's failure to evangelize 'the dark corners of the land'. The
Puritans seemed to have real grounds for hope and were encouraged
by James' chaplain. Their movement was not exclusively clerical, nor were
their lay supporters confined to prosperous landowners and townsmen.
Many ministers claimed that they omitted to wear surplices, or perform
prescribed ceremonies, especially the use of the cross in baptism, not
because they held them to be against the law of God, but because their
congregations, or most of them, would leave. Almost everyone agreed in
abhorring separation from a national church, few regarded episcopal
government as unscriptural, just as very few bishops recognized non-
episcopal ordination and church government as ungodly. As yet few
acknowledged deep doctrinal differences, however much they disputed
about ceremonies, discipline and the priorities demanded by preaching
and evangelism.
Whitgift, the archbishop of Canterbury, and Bancroft who succeeded
him in 1604, were against any conference with the Puritans whom, like
Elizabeth, they regarded as presbyterian conspirators against church and
state. But at least four bishops favoured accommodation with the
moderate Puritans, as Grindal had done. Whitgift was overruled by James,
who nominated Puritan spokesmen for the Hampton Court Conference
536
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
(January 1604). They were moderates, but received instructions from a
conclave of delegates; this represented many areas and did include some
believers in divinely ordained presbyterianism. The instructions were
conspicuously moderate, except for claiming the surplice and ring in
marriage were unlawful. They concentrated on asking for union of small
parishes, redemption of impropriate tithe to ensure a preaching ministry,
revision of the Prayer Book and the Thirty-nine Articles and some partici-
pation by the lower clergy in ordination and discipline, while acknow-
ledging episcopal authority. Some minor concessions were agreed of
which some found their way into the Canons of 1604 and the Prayer Book,
but most were ignored by the bishops and forgotten by James, despite
his instructions for their execution. These included abolishing the power
of chancellors and other lay officials to excommunicate, and means to
plant preachers in Ireland, Wales and the North. The moderation of the
Puritan spokesmen may have made James feel they could be ignored.
Bancroft was left free to pursue his campaign for complete conformity
which resulted in the deprivation of some ninety clergy and strong
efforts to defend them in the Commons. But this triumph was somewhat
illusory, many of the deprived finding their way back into livings or
lectureships. Anglicanism continued to accommodate many clergy who
used only part of the ceremonies, prayer book, or vestments and still
hoped for reform in the spirit of Grindal. The conference's failure perhaps
had more serious effects on the Puritan movement, since it was never again
to unite effectively behind a moderate programme. Hampton Court
was the real birthplace of Independency. 1 However this may be, it certainly
ensured that crown, Parliament and common lawyers became involved
in quarrels over the nature of the royal supremacy and ecclesiastical
jurisdiction as a result of the Canons of 1604. The practical objectives of
reform which many of the clergy and laity accepted were effectively
obstructed.
If there was much dislike of clerical pretensions to wealth, power and
precedence over the laity, going back to before the Reformation, there
was also another longstanding tradition of resentment at the pretensions
and profits of the lawyers. This expressed itself in demands for control
of fees in legal proceedings and of the number of attorneys, for simpli-
fication or codification of the law and in general for cheap and speedy
justice. Not all lawyers were hostile to reforms but those which profes-
sionals attempted (such as Egerton's in Chancery) often seemed to pro-
duce fresh grievances. The fact that England never received Roman law
and the procedural changes this entailed meant the survival of lay judges
(especially the J.P.s) and juries of trial and presentment. On the continent
professional jurists were usually judges in local courts, whether royal,
seigneurial, or public. The lack of concepts such as the French crown's
1
P. Collinson, The Elizabethan Puritan Movement (1967), pp. 464-7.
537
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
justice retenue and powers of evocation restricted the crown's ability to
interfere formally with procedures of courts and to create new jurisdic-
tions. The crown could and did influence judges by dismissing them, but
the revival of the House of Lords in the 1620s as the supreme court of com-
mon law was a denial of the crown's judicial supremacy.
Nevertheless the common law courts at Westminster began to exercise
greater powers of supervision by the late sixteenth century. They did this
mainly by the process of defining the privileges of their own and other
courts. In asserting a supremacy over other courts, the selfish interests of
common lawyers and judges in maintaining the business and fees of their
courts were certainly important. This involved them in attacks on the
courts of Admiralty and High Commission which did use civil and canon
law, but it is a mistake to think of the common law in conflict with or
threatened by other systems of law. Chancery, Star Chamber, the Councils
of the Marches and the North used procedures derived from the common
law, their pleaders and many of their judges were common lawyers,
though all had some reliance on lay opinion. Disputes between common law
judges and Chancery did occur, but their usual relationship was co-
operative, especially in asserting the subordination of the provincial
courts and of Admiralty and Requests. The Star Chamber largely exem-
plified co-operation between chancellor and judges and was not seriously
challenged, even by Coke. However, this process of definition did lead
to conflict over the privy council's functions and the king's personal
judicial powers.
From the point of view of litigants the results of these efforts are more
obscure. In tightening their procedural rules, Chancery and other courts
tried to prevent vexatious litigants pursuing vendettas simultaneously in
several courts. But increasing formality of process in Chancery, or Star
Chamber, also gave opportunites for delay. Down to the 1570s many
cases (perhaps most) were sent to local commissioners for arbitration
or settlement by Star Chamber, Chancery, Requests and the privy
council. While Chancery still did this on a large scale in the 1590s, Star
Chamber had ceased to do so and the activity of Requests and the privy
council declined after 1599. It is likely, but not certain, that as process in
Chancery grew more formal fewer cases went to commissioners. It is
certain that in most manorial courts civil litigation shrank steadily after
1600, and their discretion was checked by the frequent settlement of
manorial customs by Chancery. Custom ceased to be flexible and changing
as it had been in the thirteenth century; immemorial binding custom was
a discovery of the sixteenth century. Fuller reporting of cases, stricter
interpretation of statutes increased the courts' tendency to bind themselves
by precedents. By 1600 the justices of assizes monopolized criminal justice
to a greater extent than ever before. Local gentry no longer delivered
gaols and quarter sessions had been ordered not to try serious crimes,
538
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
while the assize judges were expected to exercise close supervision over
local administration.
The privy council not only directed local administration, but tried to
supervise administration of justice. It reinforced execution of process,
ordered juries to be changed and courts to speed judgement. This often
involved prohibitions from other courts against cases in Requests and
Admiralty. Although it refused to hear cases begun in other courts, it
explicitly asserted its right to hear cases not so begun, and hear complaints
about courts. After protests by the judges more cases were dismissed to
the common law courts from 1589. Apart from appointing arbitrators,
or commissioners, to end cases, much of the council's legal activity was
concerned with debtors and creditors. Commissioners for poor debtors
were appointed, creditors were forced to accept compositions and pre-
vented from pursuing the full rigour of process at common law. The
sanctions were imprisonment of creditors by order of commissions or
privy councillors. This led to release of prisoners by writs of habeas
corpus and a protest by all the judges in 1591. Later commissions had no
power to arrest and general commissions ceased after 1603. Nevertheless
similar means to relieve individual debtors were used by the council,
on the king's personal authority and by bills of conformity in Chancery
which were stopped after attacks in Parliament in 1621.
The harshness of the law to poor debtors was a constant theme of law
reformers throughout the seventeenth century. Yet attempts to relieve
them raised important questions about the crown's power to interfere
with proceedings and judgements of the courts and to imprison men
without showing causes recognized by the common law. The king's
personal responsibility for administering justice revived rather than
diminished after 1603. Down to at least 1616 hundreds of cases came be-
fore the king by petition and show 'constant... intervention . . . in all
kinds of private litigation with summary action under the king's personal
authority on a very large number of personal cases appropriate for
ordinary trial'. 1 Abuses by influence and favouritism were possible and
even likely. But this was also a last stronghold of the traditional basis of
much English justice, enforceable arbitration, and the king was still a
source of arbitration for the poor as well as the powerful. As oligarchy
grew stronger in local government and factions more entrenched there
and at court, such a system was likely to produce more dissatisfaction
than ever. It was also endangered by the central courts' growth in power
and formalism. Men of all ranks feared that a system of technicalities,
exploited by professional lawyers and fee-hungry officials, was obliterating
any hope that justice could be cheap, speedy and based on generally
accepted notions of equity. Coke's common law which is 'perfect reason
1
J. P. Dawson, 'The Privy Council and Private Law in the Tudor and Stuart Periods',
Michigan Law Review, Vol. XLVIII (1950), pp. 393-428, 627-55.
5930
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
which commands those things proper and necessary and which prohibits
contrary things' might seem sympathetic to such aspirations. But Coke's
reason is artificial: 'gotten by long study... and not of every man's
natural reason...', so that the common law refined by generations of
learned lawyers is 'grown to such a perfection for the government of this
realm' that it is superior to the private reason of individuals, whether
kings or subjects. In the long run the crown was blamed for failing to
control the system, though its ability to do so was often weakened by
professional lawyers in Parliament and elsewhere seeking to define its
prerogatives. The supreme expression of this was Coke's view, developed
in the 1620s, that Parliament was the summit of the common law, though
its voice was to be that of professional lawyers, bound by precedents of
artificial reason, interpreting Magna Carta, to control both crown and
Parliament.
Now it is true that the political nation spoke the same language of
politics, based on common assumptions about the ancient constitution.
Conflicts in Parliament about the crown's religious, fiscal and foreign
policies occurred throughout Elizabeth's reign, not only in its last years.
Recently these facts have been taken to show that such conflicts toppled
the Stuarts because of their incompetence and extravagance and that
there were no deeper problems with which Elizabeth and her councillors
could not have coped. Obviously there is some truth in this, but this
common language expressed agreement over vague and ambiguous
generalities, such as the complementary character of prerogative and
parliamentary privilege and subjects' rights, or the existence of funda-
mental laws. Everyone agreed the crown had emergency powers, the
difficulty was in agreeing on their scope and the occasions on which they
could properly be used. Most immediate precedents, if not always much
immediate political wisdom, were on the side of the crown. Agreement
often proved to be about inessentials, on many actual issues new demands
and unwillingness to compromise were characteristic of the Commons'
leaders.
The rickety theoretical foundations of this agreement are illustrated by
the problem of conquest. As the ancient constitution was agreed to be
immemorial, the Norman conquest had to be treated as a non-event;
any suggestion that parliamentary institutions, privileges, or laws had
specific origins in the will of later kings seemed to threaten the whole
constitutional position of parliament. James himself disliked claims based
on conquest, as diplomatically he wanted to recognize the United Provin-
ces as a legitimate state and to resist any Spanish claims arising from
attempts to conquer them or England. It needed civil war, before the
myth of the ancient constitution inherited from the Saxons could be sub-
jected temporarily to rational criticism. Any conflict was dangerous, not
only because of the presumption that harmony was the pre-ordained out-
540
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
come of the constitution, but because arguments were based on searches
for precedents which might further undermine the whole precarious
structure of agreement on fundamentals. James' hostility to the Society of
Antiquaries was on the mistaken grounds that their researches could only
produce precedents against his prerogative, but critical historical re-
searches, such as Spelman's, might subvert the whole accepted order of
things. Men were inured to sudden death and uncontrollable extremes of
pain in ways beyond our imagining. They saw society as subject to various
divine plans, not as the result of evolutionary process. Social and political
changes might be the product of human sin, some had millennial ex-
pectations of destruction and transformation, but the idea of conflict
as part of a continuing process of relatively peaceful and ultimately fruit-
ful change was absent: toleration might be expedient; very few accepted
it as an essential basis for society. The observation that everyone (except
a few high-flying clergy) used the same political language applies to the
polemicists of the first Civil War. This might persuade us that the Civil
War was consciously fought about narrow issues as a result of mis-
understanding, but not that this vocabulary demonstrates the lack of
conflicts serious enough for shedding blood.
In parliamentary politics behaviour and conflicts can be classified in
terms of court and country, terms in use by the 1620s. But it is misleading
to envisage two monolithic blocks, however much the convenience of
static analysis in terms of office-holding and connections may encourage
this. In fact there were always factions at court and conflicts within the
privy council, liable to seek allies in the Commons to discredit and attack
their rivals. Thus a spokesman who attacked the policy of a dominant
minister or group endorsed by the crown was not necessarily cutting
himself off from connections with the court or hopes of office. This
was clearly so in 1610, 1614, 1624 and even 1626. The effective political
nation was small in numbers, so that its leaders were personally known
to each other and at least formally to the king. For many who were not
courtiers or officials came occasionally to court. M.P.s did see themselves
as representatives who had to explain themselves and their doings to
quarter sessions, municipal corporations and especially to meetings
to assess subsidies. This public opinion was that of small groups, of
those with weight in local affairs, themselves divided by rivalries and
factions.
The claim that the constitution rightly understood must produce
harmony, though clearly untrue historically, exacerbated political feeling;
when disharmony and deadlock manifestly prevailed, scapegoats had to
be found. Conflicts under Elizabeth were frequently denied by the Com-
mons' leaders, while defenders of the status quo could deny the need for
reforms. While it is doubtful whether the Commons contained conscious
seekers of revolutionary changes, from James I onwards there were men
541
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
such as Ellesmere, who feared such changes would happen, or Bacon who
thought wholesale legal and intellectual reform and reconstruction were
needed. Even the leader of the pro-Spanish Howard faction, Henry earl
of Northampton, had his programme of reforms for stabilizing society.
He wanted the revocation of all grants of arms since 1568, their restriction
to gentlemen of blood or merit, and strong measures to suppress duelling.
Whether or not they were practicable, useful, or desirable, the Millenary
Petition, the unenacted bills passed by the Commons of 1604, James'
Union with Scotland, the Great Contract, Bancroft's further programme
of reforms, or Sir Henry Neville's legislative programme of 1614, would
have produced substantial changes in both the constitution and social
relationships, if any of them had been accomplished. The failure of the
Stuart monarchy is partly the history of its failure to accomplish any
reforms, even where there was substantial agreement that something
needed doing. Elizabeth had always been hostile to ecclesiastical reforms,
including those of her own bishops. The view that there were no really
new problems, other than those created by Stuart incompetence, no
consciousness of need for reform for any other reason, does not seem to
be demonstrated by the first ten years of James' reign. There was perhaps
more general desire for change and reform among the political nation
then and less fear of chaos and disorder resulting than in 1640. Because
men spoke the same political language and believed in a basically un-
changing constitution, it does not follow that they did not desire reforms
which would in fact have involved political and social changes.
It has also been argued that profound social and economic changes
made political conflicts inevitably sharper and finally broke the monarchy.
The monarchy and the existing order stood for regulation and exploita-
tion of economically progressive elements; businesslike landowners,
industrialists, merchants, or the middling sort, wishing to maximize
profits, were hindered by tillage laws, monopolies, chartered companies,
regulation of prices, or attempts to set the poor on work. These proper-
tied groups eventually found economic freedom in the Interregnum and
had contributed most to the Commons' opposition before 1642. These
economic and social freedoms largely survived the political and religious
restoration of 1660 and were finally secured in 1688. Another more
social interpretation asserts that a decisive part was played by a
crisis in the affairs of the peerage. 'For a time this group lost its hold
upon the nation and thus allowed political and social initiative to fall into
the hands of the squirearchy.' 1 By 1603 the peerage had lost a great part
of the lands it had owned in 1558, had ceased to constitute a majority of
the greater landowners and was losing its political and military power and
prestige. Although it was very successful after 1603 in increasing its in-
come from land and other sources, this further weakened its prestige and
1
L. Stone, The Crisis of the Aristocracy (Oxford, 1965), p. 13.
542
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
power with other groups and identified it more completely with court
corruption. It traded 'respect and loyalty for cash' which was spent 'on
pleasure rather than power,' 1 making possible a naked struggle for power,
although most of the peers supported the king in 1642.
While no one would deny that economic and social changes occurred,
it is not clear that they were qualitatively so decisive as either of these
explanations require. The first view exaggerates the amount of economic
and social laissez-faire achieved by 1660, while what was achieved was
more the result of accident than of conscious design. As to the' crisis of the
aristocracy', even if Professor Stone has correctly diagnosed the peers'
economic position in 1603, his assumptions seem to exaggerate the extent
and character of their political power and social prestige in 1558. It is
unlikely that they were then' a reasonable majority grouping of the greater
landowners'; if they were not in 1603, this does not imply a radical change
in the social landscape, so that a whole generation lacked familiar land-
marks. There is evidence that peers' incomes in aggregate rose faster than
prices down to 1641, but that this was at the expense of their political
power and social prestige is highly disputable.
Thus the ending of the war and the coming of a new king heightened
demand for solutions to old problems and created new ones. These
certainly reflected changing conditions, but it is not clear that structural
economic and social changes were inaugurating a new era. Doubtless it is
a distortion to see the Commons as inexorably, if unconsciously, pursuing
their privileges along a road which inevitably led to a total usurpation of
sovereignty. But if there was no struggle for sovereignty in 1604, it does
not follow that a patient and co-operative country was goaded to intran-
sigence by a corrupt and feckless court. The Commons' attitude to the
crown's discretionary powers is illustrated by two uncontroversial
minor measures in the first session of James' first parliament.
An act regulating the tanning and leather trades included an ingenious
proviso that any grant dispensing with any provision of the act would
automatically repeal that provision (1 James I c.22, cl.51). This was
presumably inspired by memories of Dyer's patent for dispensing offences
under the 1563 act now repealed. On the second day of business and the
first on which bills were considered, a bill repealing all previous statutes
of apparel was rejected by 125 votes to 75 at its first reading when debate
or division was 'not usually admitted without some extraordinary
Conceit of Mischief...'. The mischief was the power given the king to
regulate apparel by proclamation, though Elizabeth had in effect revised
the old statutes by proclamation. The Commons then produced a bill
restricting the use of cloth of gold or silver to the royal family, which the
Lords rejected. A third bill, which allowed their use by peers, misliked
by the Commons, passed because it repealed the earlier acts. James
1
Ibid. p. 164.
543
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
vetoed it, but allowed the repeal of the acts: yet a bill of apparel passed
the Commons in 1621, others were read in 1626 and 1628. There was
general agreement that such regulations were necessary, yet disagreements
about how to revise them effectively left no regulations at all. In thei62os
an agreed measure was probably still possible, but wider conflicts left no
time for its enactment.
On the matter of wider theoretical import, the Commons of this first
parliament undoubtedly challenged the way Elizabeth had interpreted
and exercised her powers. The most serious challenge was to her concept
of the royal supremacy in religion. The Commons denied that king and
clergy alone could legislate in ecclesiastical affairs and held the Canons
of 1604 ' . . . in prejudice and impeachment... of the lawes, statutes and
free customs of the r e a l m . . . ' . In 1606 a bill invalidating canons and
church ordinances made during the last ten years, or in future, without
parliamentary consent passed the Commons and was read twice in the
Lords. Another bill to limit the crown's power to dispense from penal
statutes reached the same stage.
Lord Chancellor Ellesmere, reviewing this first parliament after its
dissolution in 1610, found that while the power of king and Lords had
declined, that of the Commons 'hath grown big and audacious . . . it will
not cease (if it be not stayed in time) until it break out into democracy'.
He pointed to their unprecedented and successful claims of privilege
in deciding disputed elections and returns of members and interfering
with process of the courts. Despite not being a court of record, they had
attempted to review judgements and to examine Sir Stephen Proctor
for misdemeanours in his office as collector of fines on penal statutes.
They attacked prerogative and equity courts and High Commission,
as well as denying the king's right to impose customs duties without
parliamentary consent. 1
Ellesmere was right that the demands of the Commons had grown, but
he omits to mention the unprecedented financial demands and difficulties
of the crown. James had inherited debts and war expenses, as well as
ministers, notably Robert Cecil (secretary and master of the wards,
later earl of Salisbury) and Thomas Sackville, earl of Dorset Qord trea-
surer), who knew how to profit from office. Dorset told Parliament in
1606 James' ordinary expenses were £80,000 a year greater than Eliza-
beth's, owing to his wife and family. His detailed account of royal ex-
penses, putting the debt at £735,000, aided by a reminder that the charges
of the militia had ceased and by the reaction to the Gunpowder Plot,
produced a grant of £453,000 to be paid over four years. Salisbury
succeeded Dorset in 1608 and sold crown land (ironically much of it
impropriate tithe) for some £411,000, but as ordinary expenditure con-
tinued to grow, there was a debt of £280,000 in 1610. Salisbury wished
1
Proceedings in Parliament 1610, ed. E. R. Foster (1966), Vol. 1, pp. 276-83.
544
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
to increase ordinary revenue and limit the king's bounty. Unfortunately,
like his predecessors and successors, he never believed that such limita-
tions should apply to his own profits and this always provided scope for
rival factions to attack both inside and outside the court. All ministers had
to treat royal favourites and their exploitation of the king circumspectly.
In 1609 most of the crown lands were entailed so that they could not be
granted without consent of a number of privy councillors and James
undertook not to grant pensions or favours at the expense of revenue.
Meanwhile Salisbury had imposed new customs duties and was improving
the yield of crown lands. In 1610 he staked everything on the Great
Contract. In return for abolishing the court of wards and purveyance,
for regulating fees, codifying penal statutes and preventing abuses by
informers, the Commons were to grant £200,000 a year revenue and a
supply of £600,000 to pay off debt, strengthen the navy and provide a
reserve. After much bargaining during which James agreed to remove
some of the new impositions and that in future they could only be imposed
with parliamentary consent, the Commons promised £200,000 a year
and a grant of £100,000. During recess the Commons consulted their
counties and James heeded the warning of Salisbury's enemies about the
loss of patronage involved; both raised their terms; attacks were re-
newed more violently on impositions, the clergy and the Scots, and en-
sured the dissolution of the first parliament. The contract ruined Salisbury's
influence with James and ensured the triumph of his enemies even before
he died in 1612.
Whether it would ever have really solved the financial problem—
already in 1607 Hoskyns had claimed 'whatsoever wee give, wee can-
not give that (which) may suffice'—it could certainly have altered the
constitution. Already members were calling for the summoning of Parlia-
ment at regular intervals, and there would have been a permanent direct
tax for the first time which the crown would have been tempted to increase
in emergencies. Both Dorset and Salisbury taught the Commons the
strength of their position by giving details of the crown's financial weak-
ness, without offering a constructive legislative programme. James' own
cherished plan for union had been rejected. The contract's failure also
meant failure to tackle the longstanding problems about fees, informers
and penal statutes and to settle the question of impositions. James had
also contemplated far-reaching law reforms, codification and proceedings
in English. The attempt to provide a constructive programme in 1614
failed, thanks to James' vacillations, and the question of impositions.
Another dissolution was partly engineered by the Howard faction at
court. Their supremacy meant years of increasing corruption. Attempts
at parliamentary solutions had failed and left a legacy of increasing debt,
worsening credit and scepticism about royal promises of economy and the
motives of ministers which further impaired prospects of agreement.
545
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Yet if James had died in 1614, despite further sales of crown land and
debts of £600,000, his reign might have seemed one of real achievements.
He had made peace with Spain and seemed established as Europe's
mediator. His mediation had secured the Truce of 1609 in the Nether-
lands and the settlement of the Cleves-Julich dispute in 1612. He had
married his daughter to the Elector Palatine, the leader of militant
Calvinism, and hoped to marry his son to a daughter of Philip III, the
leader of militant Catholicism. Yet in reality these successes had depended
on the hostility between France and Spain and their consequent need to
court England. The assassination of Henri IV prevented a war over
Jiilich-Cleves, in which James had been willing to assist and which
would have made understanding with Parliament essential. It also
ensured France's drift into passive or co-operative policies towards
Spain, when James' financial weakness made it less possible for him to
pursue an independent policy effectively. Nevertheless he was the first
king to rule effectively throughout Ireland, which remained a serious
burden on government finance, though there was at last some prospect
this would cease. Irish society was being transformed after the wholesale
destruction by war and famine by the imposition of English law, in-
stitutions and settlement. His authority over the Scots nobles and church
was greater than ever before. He could claim to have strengthened the
church of England by protecting the bishops from their critics and their
lands from the lay exploitation they had suffered under Elizabeth, while
reaffirming the authority of Convocation and High Commission. Minor
compromises and reforms had been made; Abbot, Bancroft's successor,
was a moderate. Once the crisis about subscription was over, moderate
Puritans and some of the more extreme ones found ways of accommo-
dating themselves within the church.
James could also claim to have maintained order among the courts,
he had effectively protected the church courts and Chancery from the
prohibitions of the common law courts. He had restored the authority
of the Council of the Marches after limiting it in 1606. In these cases he
had listened to lengthy arguments from both sides. The judges and the
Commons had refused to accept the High Commission's powers to im-
prison and use ex officio procedures, though the commission's validity
had been recognized by the judges in 1591. James did not accept all the
bishop's demands and promised reforms; the judges were forced to accept
new letters patent in 1611. These restricted and defined the arbitrary
powers of the commission to imprison and fine, limited its discretion and
allowed appeals. As after Hampton Court, not all the reforms promised
were implemented. Yet wordy and pedagogic as James was, he was
accessible to the Commons of his first parliament. He was at pains to deny
explicitly any claim to legislate, or levy direct taxes, without parlia-
mentary consent, just as he had been willing to renounce his power to
546
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
levy impositions. To some extent the outports had won concessions to
their fears of domination by London. The general free trade bill of 1604
had failed, but trade to France and Spain had been declared free by
Parliament; although a French company was later chartered, the privy
Council consistently consulted the outports about its scope. Some obsolete
statutes had been repealed and an act attempting to restrict the number
of attorneys was passed.
Bacon complained that Salisbury had taught the Commons to haggle
with the king and to take the initiative in legislative reform. After
failing to regain this initiative in 1614, James was constrained to a
period of expedients, which exhausted his credit and increasingly
restricted his freedom of action, both at home and abroad. Some ex-
pedients were futile but relatively harmless, such as the attempt to
raise a benevolence. Others had more serious consequences, such as
sales of honours, grants of monopolies and Cockayne's project. James
had dubbed nearly 1,000 knights in his first year and thereafter sale of
knighthoods was a regular means of rewarding courtiers. In 1611 the order
of baronets was created,their sale brought £101,000 to the exchequer down
to 1619. From 1615 peerages were sold, down to 1628 some 30 English
and 40 Irish and Scots ones for perhaps £350,000. The crown may have
got £150,000, but most went to courtiers, especially to George Villiers, the
new favourite from 1616, later created duke of Buckingham. 1 Sale of
offices, such as the mastership of the wards, became more blatant, though
again most of the profits went to the favourite and his clients. The court
seemed more than ever a synonym for corruption. The sale of honours
increased tensions and divisions in a society which was ideally conceived
as a stable hierarchy, and where living individuals were jealous of rights to
precedence. Sale of office and of honours came to be grouped together
with older grievances about excessive fees. On fees a commission in 1611
and another in 1623, following more intensive parliamentary agitation,
achieved nothing.
In 1604 the government had not accepted the case against the Mer-
chant Adventurers, when their enemies had a majority in the Commons,
yet in 1614 Alderman Cockayne got their privileges abolished by promis-
ing to procure the finishing of white cloth in England and additional
revenue of £47,000. As the most important part of the cloth exports was
unfinished, this would vitally affect the country's prosperity. Cockayne's
real objective seems to have been to share the export of undressed cloth
between his associates and the old adventurers rather than seriously to
create a cloth-finishing industry. The old adventurers refused to recognize
the new company's privileges; the consequent lack of capital and dis-
organization of exports helped the growth of foreign industries. The
1
Some money which did go to the crown did not go through the exchequer and so
cannot be traced.
547
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
export of old draperies had reached a peak in 1614, and never achieved
this level again. This was not due solely to the project, but to drastic
debasements in Germany and Poland from 1616 which tended to price
English cloth out of these markets, followed by a depression in inter-
national trade after 1620. In 1617 the old adventurers bought back their
privileges for some £80,000 which was recovered by imposts (imprest
money) on cloth exported which was also burdened by the crown with
new praetermitted customs. It was easy and not totally unreasonable to
blame the depression of the cloth industry and its repercussions throughout
the economy on the crown's disastrous policies, though Cockayne's
project had been blessed by Coke himself. The situation was the more
humiliating because English trade and shipping had lagged so far behind
the Dutch in the years of truce, except perhaps in the Mediterranean.
Dutch ships were capturing carrying trade from English ports. From 1610
onwards there were demands for navigation acts and a whole literature
of warning and imitation about the Dutch. From being clients the Dutch
had become all too successful rivals.
By 1618 the royal debt was £900,000. In 1617 the crown's credit was so
bad it could only borrow by forcing London to guarantee the loan;
as the crown defaulted on both interest and repayment, James' credit
there was exhausted for the rest of his reign. The Howard faction's supre-
macy completed the ruin of the royal finances, and had added the moral
corruption of the Essex divorce and the Overbury murder to the venality
of court life. The new favourite George Villiers, eventually created duke of
Buckingham, was wooed by those with programmes of reform and self-
advancement—notably Coke, Bacon and Cranfield. Even the hoped-for
dowry from the Spanish match could not have met the debts, still less
stopped the deficit, so Buckingham came to power as the patron of
reformers. Reform was the weapon which would destroy the Howards.
Buckingham's most important hatchet man was Lionel Cranfield, who
had the qualifications needed to carry out plans for retrenchment. The
first was that of the sub-committee of the privy council investigating the
household. By 1620 substantial economies and improvements were
achieved there, in the navy, the ordnance and the wardrobe. Cranfield,
their chief executant, had combined a profit of £7,000 a year for himself
and a saving of £22,000 for the king as master of the wardrobe. These
efforts saved some £87,000 a year and increased revenues (mainly from
customs) by £37,000. But the debt and royal credit were unchanged
and nothing had been done to cut pensions; grants of monopolies and
favours to Buckingham and his relatives had increased, as had the
expenses of foreign policy thanks to the Elector Palatine's involvement in
Bohemia.
As lord admiral, Buckingham did repair the decay achieved by the
Howards and built up the navy. The decisive work was done by com-
548
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
missioners down to 1623, but Buckingham concerned himself effectively
with naval administration. From 1618 the crown made as many pater-
nalistic efforts as after 1629. It tried to deal with the adverse balance of
trade by enforcing prohibitions on the export of bullion and the statutes
of employment. It tried to deal with abundant harvests by encouraging
export of grain and the setting up of county magazines and with bad
harvests by regulating prices and markets. Much was vitiated by con-
siderations of fiscal or personal gain, most obviously in the granting of
monopolies, or the commissions to pardon conversion of arable or
dispense with apprenticeship. After 1620, unlike the 1630s, real efforts
were made to consult opinion and some workable compromise did seem to
be emerging. This was first undermined by war and the resulting fiscal
and political crises, and was finally undone in the years of personal rule.
It can be argued that only determined retrenchment could ever improve
the crown's position enough for it to meet Parliament with any confidence.
Clearly this would exclude Buckingham and his clients and an expensive
foreign policy, but, even without them, increases in ordinary revenue were
needed to maintain credit, a strong navy and reasonable diplomatic
activity. The only substantial increases possible were in customs' revenue,
whose legality continued to be challenged. Even without the crisis in
foreign policy some new modus would have had to be worked out with
Parliament.
As Spain was invading the Lower Palatinate and Bavaria the Upper,
Parliament was called to finance the demands of foreign policy. When it
met in January 1621 Frederick had been driven out of Bohemia. James
could point to considerable achievements in administrative reform
and Bacon was ready with a programme of legal reforms. Unfortunately
serious tactical mistakes had already been made. Bacon had wished to
anticipate complaints by withdrawing patents of monopoly, especially
vexatious ones belonging to Villiers' connections, but he was overruled
by the privy council, including Coke. Coke had hoped for the treasurer-
ship and was passed over in favour of Montagu (later earl of Manchester)
who had previously supplanted him as chief justice. Grievances were pres-
sed as soon as the Commons met, but they granted £160,000 quickly on
promises of co-operation in reforms of the law, informers and trade
grievances. The crown needed £500,000 for the Palatinate, but the grant
was freely given with an implication that more would be forthcoming.
The Commons turned to monopolies, especially those involving Bucking-
ham's relatives. They wished to punish monopolists themselves, but were
persuaded by precedents to have Mompesson and Michell judged and
condemned by the Lords. Steered by Coke and Cranfield into enquiring
who had approved the grants as referees, the Commons accused Lord
Chancellor Bacon, refused to leave his judgement to James, so that he was
condemned and made incapable of holding office by the Lords. This
549
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
revival of impeachment was perhaps the most important constitutional
development of the reign, while more immediately the enthusiastic pre-
paring of accusations against officials of ecclesiastical courts hastened the
prorogation. Sir Thomas Wentworth denied to his fellow Yorkshiremen
meeting to assess the subsidy ' that we have given away your money and
made no laws', promised the king would give 'free and speedy passage
for whatever we might require of reformation. . . ' especially against
common informers,'... your traffic with foreign parts (shall) flourish
with increase'.
Dissension among the councillors had destroyed Bacon and drove Coke
further into opposition when Cranfield became lord treasurer. Bucking-
ham hesitated between co-operating with the Commons and seeking a
dissolution, becoming more hostile as the enquiries pressed nearer to him
and his brother. But not only vacillation at court hindered legislation;
in May the Commons were invited to pass twelve bills, including ones
about informers, export of wool and Sabbath observance, but preferred
to debate the depression and outports' grievances. Cranfield promised
action; after the adjournment proclamations withdrew many of the
patents attacked, allowed free internal trade in wool and Welsh cloth and
the outports freedom to export new draperies. Another had abolished
bills of conformity without creditors' consent, until Parliament took
further action.
Unfortunately these concessions coincided with the arrest and question-
ing of members for their conduct in Parliament. This and Bavaria's con-
quest of the Upper Palatinate ensured the thwarting of reforming bills
when Parliament resumed in November. The Commons now wanted to
pass bills, including one against monopolies, but would not give priority
to supply as they wished to ensure another meeting in February. The
king did not wish them to debate foreign policy or the Spanish match.
In so far as there was some hope Spain might force the emperor to restore
Frederick to the Palatinate, James was not wholly unreasonable. Eliza-
beth had denied her parliaments' right to discuss foreign policy unin-
vited. But in asserting his prerogative James tactlessly denied that Parlia-
ment's privileges were 'your ancient and undoubted birthright and
inheritance', but 'derived from the grace and permission of our ancestors
and us'. Even members like Wentworth with no great interest in foreign
policy were roused and the Commons excitedly passed a Protestation,
asserting their privilege of free speech was unrestricted and all their
privileges were 'the birthright and inheritance of the subjects of England'.
This ensured prorogation without supply or legislation, followed by
dissolution.
As lord treasurer, Cranfield, now earl of Middlesex, had no immediate
solution for the financial problem, except the old one of the Spanish
marriage. Given the Commons' demands for full enforcement of the
550
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
recusancy laws, this was incompatible with parliamentary supply. The
dowry would pay off debts, restore credit and end the need for extra-
ordinary expenses by restoring Frederick. The big economies by admini-
strative reform had been achieved by 1621, though Cranfield applied
himself to supervising reform of Irish government. Customs yields could
not be increased appreciably during a depression. Cranfield refused to sell
crown lands. They were so encumbered with long leases their yield could
not be increased (it actually fell 1619-24), so his wisdom is questionable.
This left attempts to curb James' extravagance and Buckingham's
perquisites, politically the rasher, since Cranfield's profits from office had
grown from £4,100 p.a. in 1618 to £20,000 in 1624, while his income from
rents had grown from £1,500 in 1614, when he ceased to be a merchant,
to £7, ioo. 1 Buckingham grew more hostile and he and Charles were taking
decisions instead of James. Their journey to Madrid to pursue the Spanish
match was against James' wishes, as was their decision after their return
to attack Spain and to summon Parliament.
While James was being dragged into ruinous foreign policies and Cran-
field was adding to his enemies by his share in dissolving the Virginia
Company, more constructive efforts were going on. In 1621 a committee
of trade was appointed and in 1622 another to investigate the decay of the
cloth trade, followed by a standing commission on trade, under Man-
chester. This commission had a wide membership; it carefully considered
the views of many interests, problems referred to it by the privy council
and most important of all recommendations of the Commons' committee
of trade in 1624. The result was a number of informed and acceptable
compromises on economic policy.
This is only one aspect of the co-operation achieved with Parliament in
1624, though the least ephemeral one. Buckingham persuaded James to
accept an immediate vote of £300,000 and to wait till a later session for
further supply. The bills considered in 1621 were now enacted, including
those limiting common informers, monopolies, prescriptive title to land
by the crown, reforming legal procedures and repealing many obsolete
statutes. It was the first body of legislation since 1610. Despite James,
Buckingham and the Commons co-operated to impeach and condemn
Middlesex. They proved little in the way of bribery, his real offence was
the enmity of Buckingham and the Southampton-Sandys faction in the
Virginia Company. His fall demonstrated how powerful impeachment
was, provided Lords and Commons were in agreement. Once again the
positive and negative powers of the Commons had been enhanced by
court factions.
The Commons acted in ways that pointed towards either considerable
changes or serious conflicts, as their procedures against patents of mono-
1
M. Prestwich, Cranfield, Politics and Profits under the Early Stuarts (1966), pp. 123,
131, 253-4, 419-20.
551
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
poly show. Their committees summoned patentees and their servants,
examined them and other witnesses, called in patents and condemned
them as illegal in content or execution, or as inconvenient. Although
their examinations were not on oath, they were exercising functions,
hitherto belonging to the privy council, the law officers and the courts.
As the Lords refused to condemn existing grants in the statute of monopo-
lies, the Commons presented them to the king as illegal. 1 James objected
to their condemnations and seizures of letters patent, ' For the Lawfull-
ness of Pattents I must relye upon my lerned Counsell and my Judges,
but if there falle out any Inconvenience in the Exeqution you may com-
plaine... but I am the Judge', but a final answer was deferred till the
next session. The Commons still held impositions illegal, though this was
most strongly pressed by members hostile to war, like Wentworth. They
again turned to religion and prepared to impeach the bishop of Norwich
for suppressing preaching. James was correct in seeing all these as in-
novations encroaching the prerogative, just as the monopolies act was
the first statutory limitation of it. Yet there were new potentialities for
co-operation as well as conflict 1620-5. The commissions and special
committees, first adumbrated by Bacon for law reform, proved their
worth on economic matters. Even the treasurers appointed by the Com-
mons to receive the 1624 subsidies and the Council of War, had they
been encouraged to report to Parliament, might have built up confidence.
Contrary to a commonly held view co-operation proved easier in
economic than in other policies. The Commons in 1621 and 1624 heard
new demands for a free trade bill; their committee of trade examined the
Merchant Adventurers' charter and evidence from them and others. It
was resolved that the adventurers' monopoly should apply only to white
cloth with free trade in coloured and mingled cloths and kerseys in
addition to new draperies. They also demanded abolition of the advent-
urers' imprest dues and unrestricted entry to the company. The com-
mission of trade accepted these recommendations—except that imprest
was reduced by a third and confined to white cloth—and others for
the prohibition of foreign tobacco imports and continued prohibition of
export of wool. Demands for the total abolition of imprest and the
praetermitted customs continued in the next two parliaments, but the
worst grievances of the outports were met. The commission also concer-
ned itself with regulating the cloth industry including the new draperies;
charters for thirty-two county corporations including J.P.s and with
powers to raise stocks were prepared in 1625. Their issue was inter-
rupted by James' death which also ended the commission, and they
were finally abandoned on account of the war.
1
E. R. Foster, 'The Procedure of the House of Commons against Patents and Mono-
polies 1621-4', in Conflict in Stuart England, ed. W. A. Aikin and B. D. Henning (i960),
PP- 59-85.
552
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
Buckingham's foreign policy made continued co-operation with the
Commons impossible; over-ruling James he accepted toleration of
Catholics as a condition for a French alliance and marriage. As even
those who had doubts about the war had supported enforcement of the
recusancy laws, this made the promised meeting of Parliament impossible.
Prorogations continued until James' death dissolved it. Thus reply to
grievances, further supply and legislation had to wait thirteen months
till a new parliament met in June 1625, after waiting in plague-stricken
London for a month.
The death of James worsened political tempers. Although over-ruled
on major matters and wary of concessions to Parliament in 1624, James
was widely believed to be preparing to check Buckingham's domination.
This was perhaps wishful thinking, but it underlines the new reign's
reversal of the normal expectations of new alignments in making Buck-
ingham's power even greater. Experienced magnates and courtiers like
the earls of Arundel and Pembroke found this intolerable. Even among
his clients Lord Keeper Williams, Sir John Eliot, Sir Nathaniel Rich and
William Coryton began to doubt his leadership. Many like Abbot or
Cranfield remembered his ingratitude, others like the Howards and
Mansell had been disgraced by him. Even those who wanted war with
Spain resented the increased efficiency in controlling privateering and in
collecting the lord admiral's and the crown's dues from prizes. 1 Bucking-
ham never achieved any military, diplomatic or naval successes which
might have provided some popularity.
If those who attacked him contributed something to his failures,
Buckingham's foreign and parliamentary policies were equally irres-
ponsible. When the Commons at last met they received no specific
demand for supply or explanation of policy and had to wait a fortnight for
an answer for their petition of grievances of 1624. In the absence of any
official request, they hastily voted £140,000 at Sir Robert Phelips' sug-
gestion. As the answer to the 1624 petition was unsatisfactory about
praetermitted customs and impositions, tonnage and poundage (the basic
customs duties) were only voted for one year instead of for Charles' life,
as had been customary since 1485. Buckingham ignored Williams' and
Eliot's advice to proceed cautiously, offer concessions and leave supply
till a winter session. Parliament was adjourned for three weeks to Oxford.
There Buckingham took full responsibility for the fleet which was pre-
paring and for the continental alliances whose extent and some of whose
cost was at last revealed. The Commons' leaders demanded enforcement of
the recusancy laws, settling of impositions, enquiry into sale of honours and
offices, into fees and royal revenues. The general implication was of some
new deal which would reduce Buckingham's monopoly and exploitation of
power, though he was not directly attacked until the last few days.
1
19
See above, Chapter vn, p. 234.
553
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
M
«FDECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Some like Wentworth did not want war, but to ' . . . carry some good
bills down with us to his people'. Others wanted war with Spain, but no
continental entanglements. Most resented threats of adjournment. Some,
particularly Sir Robert Mansell, whose spectacular corruption as treasurer
of the navy had led to his dismissal by Buckingham, had selfish motives.
The opposition showed no understanding of the need to sustain the
government's credit by firm promises of future supply. The only conces-
sion was a promise to enforce the recusancy laws, thus breaking the
treaty with France. Buckingham dissolved Parliament for attacking him
and refusing supply; he had offended his most important ally, yet by
hiring ships to her which were used against La Rochelle gave another
weapon to his enemies.
To make up for the lack of preparation for their first parliament,
Charles and Buckingham excluded from their second, summoned for
February 1626, Phelips, Wentworth, Coke and three other leaders by
making them sheriffs. Meanwhile Mansfield and the Cadiz expedition
had failed and the French alliance was foundering. Disasters like this
made attempts to silence critics of the war futile, but no attempt was
made to conciliate magnates like Pembroke with followers in both
Houses. In religion, apart from enforcing the recusancy laws, the Com-
mons were allowed to pursue their attack on Montague's Arminian
writings in a way not countenanced in 1625. The Commons complained of
increase of papists, ill guarding of the seas, plurality of offices in one
man's hand, sale of honours and judicial offices, impositions, use of
English ships against La Rochelle and the misuse of the 1624 subsidies
for projects not intended by Parliament. They promised to vote three
subsidies when their grievances were redressed. Direct personal attack
on Buckingham was evaded, but Charles' reply was to demand an im-
mediate and larger supply on pain of dissolution. Through Buckingham
he then retracted and offered to appoint a committee of both Houses
to 'take the view of his estate'. This might have won co-operation in
1625, but now, urged on by Buckingham's former client Sir John Eliot, the
Commons impeached the duke. The charges included the hastening of
James' death and must have mortally offended Charles. He dissolved
Parliament rather than receive a remonstrance demanding Buckingham's
dismissal, but was not deterred from declaring war on France.
A constitutional deadlock had resulted from the Commons' pressing
their newly won right to question and accuse the king's servants against
one whom the king was determined to defend. The new importance of
the old maxim that kings cannot command unlawful things and Pym's
appeal to fundamental law raised problems which could disrupt the
traditional constitution, but the political crisis which produced them was
not necessarily insoluble. With a little more luck at Re and more con-
cessions to men like Pembroke and Warwick, or to men like Digges,
554
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
Wentworth, or Phelips with whom the court was still in communication,
a political settlement might be found. Buckingham, unlike Charles, did
eventually show some capacity for political self-preservation.
But immediately the crisis did lead to invocation of the crown's
emergency powers which to many seemed to endanger the traditional
frame of government. The levying of the forced loan was a real cause for
alarm. It was a loan only in name and was in fact a demand for five
subsidies without parliamentary consent to be collected in the unprece-
dentedly short time of three months. The judges refused to endorse its
legality and Lord Chief Justice Crew was dismissed. Abbot was suspended
for refusing to license a sermon by Sibthorpe defending the loan. Though
there was opposition, most of the £300,000 was collected, though more
slowly than planned. The minority like Wentworth who refused and were
imprisoned raised important issues of consent and individual rights
leading from the Five Knights Case to the Petition of Right and the
Habeas Corpus Amendment Act. Most acquiesced, comforting them-
selves with Charles' promise it would not be used as a precedent. But the
immediate question was whether a new system of prerogative expedients
might not appear.
In the event neither side was prepared for a confrontation outside the
traditional concepts. The crown considered in detail debasing the coinage,
levying ship money on inland counties, hiring foreign mercenaries and
raising an excise only to abandon each of them. The final decision was for
conciliation and a new parliament. The resisters to«the loan were released,
though even in confinement some like Wentworth had been in touch with
the court.
Some of the most difficult and longstanding problems arose from the
militia and raising troops for foreign service. The Elizabethan militia
had depended on assessments of the act of 1558, revised by prerogative.
The act was repealed in 1604 so that when training was revived in 1612
the assessments rested solely on the prerogative. To the long-resented
rates for paying the muster masters were added ones for re-equipment with
modern weapons. From 1618 the privy council was concerned to punish
the recalcitrant, demand uniformity of equipment and provide new
training orders. But the really vigorous attempt to reform the militia
began immediately after Charles' accession, including efforts to strengthen
the horse, provided by the gentry and freeholders, culminating in a scheme
for regional musters in 1628, reluctantly abandoned after Parliament
met. These growing burdens may have fallen more heavily on the gentry
than the Elizabethan ones.
But the greatest grievances arose from pressing, billeting and disciplin-
ing troops for foreign service, whose immediate burdens fell heaviest
on the poor. Billeting was potentially the most dangerous, since it might
be used to overawe districts and in practice the long delays in payment
555
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
19-3DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
made it a form of local indirect taxation. Commissions of martial law
to prevent desertions and plundering were regarded as an invasion of
common law rights. Yet martial law had been used against civilian rioters
in late Elizabethan times, and power to use it at discretion against riots
and unlawful assemblies was regularly included in the commissions
of lieutenancy, while some grants of commissions of martial law had
been at the request of local authorities under Charles. The commissions
were often joined with ones of oyer and terminer: in Hampshire, the only
place where their proceedings have been studied, there were no summary
executions. Soldiers were imprisoned, then tried at assizes, quarter
sessions, or commissions of oyer and terminer. The commissioners of
martial law also administered billeting which led to some confusion of
jurisdictions, with civilians being summoned as witnesses or given
orders. Martial law was a grievance, because it emphasized the vagueness
of the crown's emergency powers and was another means of attacking
the already unpopular powers of lieutenancy, 1 but it was not used as it
was in Ireland. In 1627 it was less of a real menace than the threats to
impress humble refusers of the loan or to send gentry to serve with
embassies at their own expense.
When Parliament met in March 1628, most of the Commons' leaders
had just been released from confinement after refusing the loan. They
seemed very aware that the future nature of government was at stake,
and probably agreed to redress grievances before seeking for their
authors. Charles in his opening speech offered no concessions, only
demands for supply, if these failed there were other means 'which God
hath put into my hands'. Later a programme for a mainly naval war
from the Baltic to Spain and for building twenty warships a year was
presented, but aroused little response. Conciliation came from Bucking-
ham; he had been given a mediatory role unsuccessfully before, but in
1628 he showed more patience and tactical skill in the Lords, though the
report of his desire for more frequent parliaments was ill received by the
Commons. There Wentworth was the leading figure in the first weeks;
they agreed to vote five subsidies, but that the grant should go hand in
hand with remedying their grievances about the forced loan, billeting,
martial law, imprisonment without cause shown. Their aim was a bill
of rights declaring all these illegal and providing penalties for any future
transgressors.
Charles refused to accept any new law and the Lords wanted a compro-
mise. When Sir Dudley Digges suggested a Petition of Right to declare the
law, a conception already found in the 1624 petition of grievances, he
got no support; but eventually it seemed preferable to a bare confirmation
of Magna Carta and other statutes which was all Charles offered. The
1
L. Boynton, 'Martial Law and the Petition of Right', E.H.R. Vol.79 (1964), pp.
255-84-
556
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
Lords after hesitating accepted the Commons' text without substantial
change, but Charles refused to record his formal assent. This produced an
attack by Eliot on Buckingham, and at the insistence of both houses
Charles gave his assent to make the petition a matter of record. The
Commons passed the subsidy bill and produced a remonstrance attacking
Buckingham and naming Neile and Laud as promoters of innovation in
religion. This was rejected and they turned to tonnage and poundage.
They apparently intended a detailed revision of duties which would still
give Charles the equivalent of his present revenue including impositions.
This required more time than Charles would give, as he feared pursuit
of the remonstrance. The Commons wanted an adjournment during which
Digges and Rich proposed commissioners including members should
sit to produce a detailed customs bill to be enacted in October. 1 Charles
insisted on prorogation and the Commons claimed that the levying of
tonnage and poundage and impositions was' a Breach of the Fundamental
Liberties of this Kingdom' and contrary to the Petition of Right. Charles
plausibly answered that the petition was not intended to trench on his
prerogative and its interpretation belonged to the judges, but less reason-
ably claimed tonnage and poundage by prerogative right.
Though the issues raised by the petition had long-term constitutional
significance, despite its lack of any immediate effect, the inquisitorial
activities of the Commons were perhaps more immediately important.
They continued to condemn patents, ordered that Hull should be free to
fish off Greenland, despite the Muscovy Company's charter, they col-
lected figures about shipping losses and investigated abuses in the stan-
naries. Manwaring was impeached, and disabled from holding any office
by the Lords for his sermons asserting the king's power to levy taxes in
1627. Perhaps as remarkable was the case of Mr Burgess of Witney;
examined by the committee of religion for scandalous preaching and
catechizing on the testimony of his parishioners, and a motion prepared
that he should make public recantation and submit to the House. 2 The
Commons' tendency to supplement or encroach on the crown's executive
and judicial functions and its supremacy in religion were not just theoreti-
cal pretensions.
Charles' unwillingness to make concessions might still really seem
proof of the influence of evil counsellors to Eliot, but the fiction was
wearing out. In fact Buckingham was the more pliant. From late May his
tactics were more conciliatory; he was reconciled with Bishop Williams,
Arundel and Abbot; he met complaints of his pluralism by giving up the
wardenship of the Cinque Ports. Weston was made lord treasurer and
under his patronage Wentworth was reconciled to the court, made a baron
and promised the presidency of the Council of the North. Buckingham
1
s
Warwickshire County Record Office, Newdegate Diary, 24 June.
B. M. Stowe MS 366, fos. 137V, 193.
557
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
also hoped to limit his commitments by making peace with France,
but he was determined first to relieve La Rochelle and get terms for the
Huguenots. His assassination by Felton, an officer disappointed by
lack of promotion and arrears of pay, leaves the question of what he
might have done. His desire to redeem his reputation in war would
presumably have made him readier with concessions to Parliament in
return for supply than Charles was after the failure to relieve La Rochelle.
Unquestionably his death meant a change in Charles' conduct of affairs.
But the immediate and bitterest facts were Felton's assertion that he was
inspired by the Commons' remonstrance and the acclamation that he
and his act enjoyed.
Meanwhile many merchants refused to pay tonnage and poundage
and their goods were seized. Parliament was prorogued from October to
January, but Weston tried conciliation. The exchequer refused to judge
the king's right to tonnage and poundage, referring it to Parliament, but
equally refused to release the merchants' goods. A declaration forbidding
disputation about interpretation of the Thirty-nine Articles was issued
and Abbot was readmitted to the privy council. Against this Charles made
Montague a bishop, though withdrawing his book Apello Caesarem,
but he over-rode Parliament's sentence by pardoning Manwaring and
giving him a rich living, adding pardons to Montague and Sibthorpe.
Charles' efforts at religious peace may have been sincere, but were un-
perceptive.
His declaration by invoking Convocation and High Commission as
the only authorities for settling religious questions raised the question of
Parliament's relationship to the royal supremacy which had been rela-
tively dormant since 1610. As the new session opened without a royal
speech, the Commons were freer to devote themselves to religion and the
seizures of the merchants' goods, especially Rolle's, which were held to
be a breach of privilege since he was an M.P. Charles belatedly urged
them to grant tonnage and poundage, denying he had claimed it by
prerogative, but the House was deep in questions concerning Rolle's
privilege, the pardons to Manwaring and the rest and the spread of
Arminianism. The resolutions of Pym's sub-committee on religion show
determination to censure Arminianism, defend Calvinist orthodoxy and
uproot the favourers of innovations, though they also urge Parliament
to consider means for maintaining a godly minister in every parish. The
deadlock on tonnage and poundage caused an adjournment for a week
of private negotiations with the Commons' leaders. All we know for
certain is that they failed. 1 On 2 March the House met again and refused
1
The Venetian ambassador believed this was because Charles refused their demand to
condemn and punish the customers as they 'had acted by his special command' and he
would not 'establish a precedent by virtue of which none would obey him again', Col.
State Papers Venetian, 1628-9, PP- 579-80.
558
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
to accept the Speaker's order from the king to adjourn. They passed reso-
lutions condemning payment of tonnage and poundage without Parlia-
ment's consent, innovation in religion and countenancing of popery. Eliot
and eight others were arrested and after some debate in the council
Parliament was dissolved.
The Venetian ambassador thought Charles well pleased at this, but
not all his councillors were. Moreover the Commons debate of 2 March
shows that some who supported the resolutions disapproved of Eliot's
tactics. He denounced Weston as another Buckingham and the author
of evil counsel and present grievances. But Digges, Littleton and Clement
Coke demanded proof before naming councillors, Phelips thought
Weston would clear himself; Clarendon later blamed Weston for urging
dissolution to save himself, when he could have triumphed over an
impeachment. Several leading figures of the Commons, Digges, Littleton,
Noy, Phelips, were reconciled with the court after the dissolution. Sir
Simonds D'Ewes, a strong Puritan and defender of parliamentary
privilege, blamed the dissolution on 'fiery spirits' in the Commons who
'were very faulty and cannot be excused'. Yet by 1638 D'Ewes was
seriously considering emigrating to New England, while thousands
had actually done so.
Yet Charles enjoyed more positive support in 1629 than 1626, if only
because he was making peace. His direction of government has not had
enough detailed study for precise judgements of his responsibility, but
he never gave his undivided confidence to any servant after Buckingham.
Chronically unsure of himself, he was obstinate in his ultimate intentions,
yet a canvasser of contradictory tactical advice without discriminating
among its authors so that h e ' often changed his own opinion for a worse'
(Clarendon) and 'they who at night have pulled off his doublet...
divested him of the resolution of the preceding day'. He had a genius
for making concessions too late, and behaved in the long run as though
the purity of his private devotions absolved him from public honesty.
If on the scaffold 'he nothing common did or mean', on his throne he
too often acted differently, showing a petty vindictiveness towards those
in his power which pursued Eliot beyond his grave. Tender-hearted about
executing criminals, he was not a man of blood, save in his steady ex-
pectation that men should be willing to die for the justice of his causes.
His attitude to Parliament differed from his father's. Eliot at first
found the briefness of his speeches a refreshing change. This was probably
dictated by an impediment in speaking, but Charles often took little pains
to explain himself by the mouths of others. His tone was peremptory.
James too had threatened adjournments and dissolutions, but he was
often willing to confer and explain. Charles more often simply demanded
that they trust his word. In 1628 the Commons were perturbed by the
belief that Charles thought the forced loan had been paid willingly.
559
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Certainly he seemed deliberately to choose to do things by prerogative,
especially in Scotland, when James, while fond of the theory, might be more
politic in the act. If James might have made a better professor than a king,
Charles might have made a better connoisseur and patron of painting
and architecture, an unscandalous and uxorious Beckford. Capable of
choosing loyal gentlemen of the bedchamber, he was less capable of
discrimination about the loyalty and honesty of his councillors.
Along with debts Charles inherited lost opportunities from his father,
one of the most serious being the failure to settle impositions. This might
still have been done in 1625 or even 1628, if Charles had allowed time to
work out a bargain or compromise. Instead of trying to review the
customs duties in the interests of trade, both sides became entangled in
legal technicalities over tonnage and poundage and argued extreme
cases. A settlement of impositions might only have led to embroilment
over the royal supremacy. Certainly the Commons' range of enquiry and
determination to question all royal servants grew. When Pym in 1626
said 'we sitt heere as law makers as councillors and as judges' this is how
Commons' committees wished to act. But in religion moderates could
also find common ground in promoting preaching, repressing Catholics,
or in the bill of 1628 allowing liberty to hear sermons in other parishes.
The antiquarianism of the Commons' leaders search for dubious pre-
cedents is tedious, unhistorical and often perverse, but in one respect
it was realistic. The fourteenth century's frequency rather than Tudor
infrequency of parliaments was more appropriate, if Parliament was to
survive.
The breach of 1629 meant that all customs revenues now rested on the
prerogative and the merchants' attempts to resist soon ceased. But the
failure to put militia assessments and powers of lieutenancy on a statutory
basis had more damaging consequences. It hindered reform of the militia,
fed local disputes and in a crisis made deputy lieutenants reluctant to act.
Court and country may have become more polarized in the absence of a
forum where factions and individuals could interact. Such contacts did
not cease but they were more confined to individuals acting in a local
context. The process of consultation was more random and was only
institutionalized at assizes. There were plenty of occasions for local
opinion and factions to form, but fewer opportunities for reaching the
central government, a greater sense of being governed. Presumably
because of the war little constructive work had been done since 1624.
Moderates in 1629 did not see that a period of personal rule had begun,
but the acceptability of prerogative government would depend on its
ability to provide at least some of the reforms which parliamentary
stalemates had seemingly prevented.
Charles' Parliaments had frequently urged general consideration of the
royal finances. The return of peace made this possible, and some histor-
560
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
ians have claimed that relative solvency was achieved. War and diplo-
macy had cost over £2 million, lands and woods were sold for £651,000.
Crown lands were conveyed to the corporation of London in settlement
of £350,000, nearly half of which was capital and interest of the loan
of 1617. This was repaid last and was still not fully paid in 1642, so the
credit of crown and corporation remained poor. From 1630 fines on those
who were not knighted of £40 a year or more from land—a right not used
since the mid-sixteenth century—raised £174,500. Thus debt was reduced
to £1,164,000 in 1635, but the old problems of increasing ordinary revenue
and decreasing expenditure remained.
Ordinary revenue averaged £618,000 p.a. 1631-5 and showed little in-
crease, but the average 1636-41 was £899,000. The main increase was
from customs, yielding about £500,000 in 1640 against £300,000 in 1635.
This was achieved by increasing official valuations of goods and by new
impositions, helped by a greater volume of trade. Most of the other
increases came from the wards, the soap monopoly and the mint. But 60%
of the ordinary revenue was anticipated in 1635 and the proportion re-
mained high so that the crown had little cash available and became more
dependent than ever on advances provided by the customs' farmers.
A principal reason for this was the failure of attempts to reform the
spending departments, especially the royal households, whose expendi-
ture continued to rise, diet alone cost £107,000 in 1640 (the king's cost
60% more than in 1617).
This epitomizes the best of the personal rule, good intentions and poor
results; the worst was that no policy was persisted in except in hope of
fiscal gain, while fiscal expedients and personal interests of courtiers
reduced the execution of policy to incoherence. Despite increasing
revenue, lack of cash and credit and rising expenditure provided constant
pressure to seek new projects. Despite later parliamentary assertions,
every expedient was arguably legal, however much the intention of the
law was defied. Thus the proviso in the statute of monopolies for the
privileges of corporations was used to grant monopolies to companies
instead of individuals. As before profits went mostly to the projectors,
only the soap monopoly after years of campaigning by Laud yielded an
appreciable revenue to the crown (£33,000). Charles, like other con-
temporary rulers, constantly appealed to emergency powers and neces-
sities of state, but unlike them pursued an entirely pacific foreign policy.
Some efforts were made to deal with public grievances. Parliament
repeatedly complained about sale of honours and these ceased after
Buckingham's death. A new commission of fees was appointed in 1627,
it laboured long and repetitiously till 1640, investigating multitudes of
offices and fees. Its achievements were that the crown profited by selling
officers pardons for their irregularities and asserted its right to sell some
offices, formerly sold by other officers. The crown gained some £35,000,
561
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
offended many officers and disappointed its subjects. An apparently
ineffective effort to limit the number of attorneys and solicitors was made
by the privy council and judges. The commission for poor debtors of
1630 had much weaker powers than its Elizabethan predecessors, but it
was more discreet in that it tried to ensure co-operation with the common
law courts. Indeed action with the approval of the judges was character-
istic of the personal rule and necessarily limited its attempts at legal
reforms. While the Council of the North under Wentworth was given
power to check prohibitions by common law courts, the Council of the
Marches found its jurisdiction over fornication, which provided an essen-
tial part of its revenue, undermined by Laud.
Monopolies were not the only instance of earlier agreements being
undone. In 1634 the free trade in cloths other than white cloths agreed
in 1624 1 ended with the restoration of the Merchant Adventurers'
monopoly of exporting cloth to the Netherlands and Germany. The
adventurers were being pressed to pay heavier dues to the duchess of
Richmond for her licence to export white cloths and the 1634 proclama-
tion may have been their price. In 1640 the then licensee, the Duke of
Richmond and Lennox, unable to get his terms, seized the adventurers'
cloth shipments with the crown's help. Attempts by Wither, a failed
adventurer, under a royal commission inspired by the adventurers to
enforce regulation of cloth and put down market spinners in Wiltshire
and neighbouring counties produced successful resistance from J.P.s,
who were willing to enforce inspection themselves, but not to suppress
yarn dealers. Yet in 1640 a royal commission on the cloth industry, with
Wither among its members, proposed suppression of market spinners
and regulation of the cloth industry by companies which, unlike those of
the 1625 scheme, excluded J.P.s. If the adventurers' monopoly was
restored, that of the East India Company was broken by the Courteen
Association, whose sleeping partner and contact man was Endymion
Porter, gentleman of the bedchamber, despite Charles' promises to the
company 'as a Christian king' that no damage was intended to it.
The notion that whatever vexes men of property must favour the poor
and social justice appeals to sentimental authoritarians of right and left.
Certainly Charles vexed landowners with commissions of depopulation,
revival of the Forest Laws and the higher prices and harsher terms for
selling wardships after 1634. 2 But the commissions of depopulation for
all their professions of preventing such enclosures became a means to
sell licences to confirm them. Charles ignored his own precepts when he
disafforested lands and sold them, disregarding common rights enjoyed
by customary tenants and others. James was less hypocritical when in
1
See above, p. 552.
Sales of Wards in Somerset, ed. M. J. Hawkins, Somerset Record Soc, Vol. 67 (1965),
pp. xxi-xxiii.
2
562
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
1618 he set up a commission to sell pardons for enclosure; at least one
of those who bought a pardon was still fined by Charles I's commissioners.
Similarly the earl of Salisbury had to compound for disafforesting lands
for which his father had already been pardoned. The revival of the
Forest Laws extended forest bounds beyond those settled under Edward I
in order to force landowners to compound for disafforestation. This
produced some £39,000* and annoyed scores of gentry and peers.
The best claims for the government's paternalism rest on the policies
and results for poor relief of the Book of Orders of 1630. The book was
immediately a response to the dearth of 1630-1, as the machinery of the
Elizabethan Poor Laws was normally used for such emergencies rather
than to provide permanent parochial relief. In ordinary times the main
provision for the poor came from private charity, from individuals and
from endowments, such as almshouses. The book probably owed most to
Manchester, little to Wentworth or Laud, and was partly based on his
brother's experience as a Northamptonshire J.P. Professor Jordan
concludes from a regional survey of surviving parochial accounts that the
council's 'efforts were without any substantial consequence at all' and
that the 1,200 returns it obtained from J.P.s were largely worthless. 2
Against this, Professor Barnes claims that in Somerset 'throughout the
1630's the content of the Book was effectively translated into reality', 3
though his evidence is the records of the J.P.s. rather than the parishes.
Certainly the lord keeper's charge in 1638 complained of general neglect
of the book, but it seems likely that there was increased activity in re-
pressing vagabonds, dealing with alehouses and apprenticing pauper
children. The book may also have stimulated the effective organization
of petty sessions.
If there was reinvigoration of local administration in the early 1630s,
it soon produced its own undoing. For the extension of Ship Money to
the inland counties in 1635 and its establishment as a regular tax put
the burdens on the sheriffs, J.P.s and constables. In Somerset what proved
fatal was not appeals to fundamental law and precedent, but interminable
disputes about rating, fed by local jealousies, which swamped the J.P.s
sessions. If Somerset is representative, local administration was becoming
as hopelessly overburdened as the king's finances. In 1637 some eighty
J.P.s were removed from the commissions of twenty-one counties, pre-
sumably because they were unwilling to serve. 'Had not war put a virtual
end to county government, it is possible the dwindling number of magi-
strates would have crippled it. ' 4
Serious resistance to Ship Money only developed in 1640 after its
1
P. A. J. Pettit, 'Charles I and the Forest Laws in Northamptonshire', Northampton-
shire Past and Present, Vol. m (1961), pp. 54-62.
2
W. K. Jordan, Philanthropy in England 1480-1660 (1959), pp. 128-42.
8
T. G. Barnes, Somerset 1625-1640 (1961), chapter v n and p. 196.
4
Ibid. pp. 301-6.
563
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
denunciation in Parliament. The charges for the militia had long been
debated and met increasing opposition earlier. As the rates varied between
different areas they seemed inequitable, quite apart from the question
of authority for raising them. Some counties now pressed men for the
trained bands, raising further legal problems. The main challenge to
the deputy lieutenants was refusal to pay assessment, especially for the
muster masters. The council failed to deal effectively with refusers, 'have
gone with so tender a foot in those Businesses of Lieutenancy that it hath
almost lost that Power to the Crown' (Wentworth). As a final touch of
farce the lieutenancy was harassed by Laudian injunctions which treated
the traditional mustering in churchyards as sacrilege.
This is a trivial but public illustration of why many without being
fervent Puritans found Laud an innovator. Already in 1626 new instruc-
tions for High Commission undid most of the restrictions of 1611,
restored its unlimited visitatorial powers and complete discretion in using
ex officio procedures. It is true that James had issued instructions for
silencing controversies, controlling lecturers and more rigorous censor-
ship, but Charles and Laud tried to achieve a much greater degree of
uniformity in both England and Scotland.
The English church exemplified the balances and tensions of political
life. In so far as it was comprehensive, this was not the result of pursuit
of an ideal via media. Lay patronage, the privileges of nobles and cor-
porations sheltered Puritan clergy. Successive archbishops of York had
relied on Puritan preachers' zeal against papists, encouraged the West
Riding Exercises, many of whose preachers had no cure of souls, and
turned a blind eye towards tendencies towards Congregationalism in some
of the chapelries. Enthusiasts and selfseekers might join to promote a
godly discipline which would increase lay participation or might despoil
the church. Royal and episcopal authority held such forces in check,
along with radicals who denied the lawfulness of tithes. But if grateful
or sycophantic clergy, like Manwaring, cried up royal authority too far,
or if others yearning for a more independent authority cried up episco-
pacy by divine right, they raised fears of clerical domination. As the church
became less comprehensive under Charles it seemed to be overthrowing
established traditions and vested interests. The moving of communion
tables, placing them permanently altarwise at the east ends of chancels
behind rails where communicants received the elements, instead of
kneeling round three sides of the table, was a breach of established
tradition. No theology, or even literacy, was needed for anyone finding
his parish church refurnished according to Laud's injunctions to detect
innovation. The tearing down of wrongly placed pews, the deploring of
the spoliation of the church, securing of increased tithe rates in London,
attempts to obtain augmentations from impropriators, the silencing of
lecturers for not wearing surplices, or not reading the full liturgy, were all
564
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
to promote decency and order. To the owners of pews and tithes, to those
who contributed to lecturers' stipends or levies for refurnishing churches,
who preferred sermons to services, it all seemed a counter-reformation
against which interest and conscience were powerfully united.
Not all the bishops and fewer of the clergy were enthusiastic Laudians,
many churches remained unchanged, but there is evidence of greater
strictness in several dioceses after Laud's metropolitical visitation (begun
1634). Silencing of lecturers and afternoon sermons and sanctions against
those going to churches outside their parish increased. The translation
of Neile to York in 1632 had striking results. He was vigorous in en-
forcing refurnishing of churches; the exercises ceased. At his first visi-
tation forty-six ministers were presented for Puritan offences, the previous
maximum had been six. Perhaps the muddled comprehension of Abbot
was doomed and the Commons' attacks on Harsnet, Neile and Laud
forced them to rely on Charles' supremacy. If so, it was impolitic to
insist on uniformity in non-essentials, to use the Book of Sports (enjoining
lawful games on Sundays) as a shibboleth for detecting moderates in
postures of disobedience. Abbot had persuaded James not to insist on its
public reading. While it is true that strict Sabbatarianism was a recent
development, the book conflicted with traditions exemplified in the
Homilies. Still more unwise was the use of Star Chamber against the
bishops' critics and the martyrizing of Leighton, Prynne, Bastwick, Bur-
ton and Lilburne. Charles fed fears of popery by refusing Laud's request
to suppress Catholic proselytizing at Henrietta Maria's court. His pre-
dilection for bishops as councillors was resented even by courtiers, par-
ticularly his making Juxon of London the first episcopal treasurer since
1470.
In Ireland, where the church was crippled by encroachments and faced
a Catholic hierarchy effectively reorganized in the 1620's and growing
Presbyterianism among the Ulster Scots, the need for reform was more
urgent. Wentworth went there as lord deputy in 1633. He set himself to
recover the church's endowments which had been especially exploited by
the Protestant 'New English' who dominated Irish administration, and to
assert ancient crown titles to huge areas owned by the Catholic 'Old
English' (traditionally supporters of the crown) as well as by the 'mere
Irish'. This was to be the prelude to large-scale plantations, especially
in Connaught, to secure permanent royal revenues and a firm basis for
Protestant rule. Although Wentworth used traditional means of intimi-
dation of Irish governments, he used them against 'New English' mag-
nates and officials and 'Old English', not exclusively against the mere
Irish. He was also unusually successful in exploiting the Irish Parliament,
playing off Protestants against Catholics to get an unprecedentedly large
subsidy, extend the scope of the court of wards and leave the crown
free to pursue its claims to land. Wentworth was so confident of his
565
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
management that he intended to keep Parliament on session longer, but
Charles insisted on a dissolution. Although Wentworth's own religion
had been mildly Puritan, Laud became his principal ally at court and his
ecclesiastical instrument in Ireland was the Laudian Bramhall, not the
more Calvinistic primate, Usher.
Wentworth's rule in Ireland seemed the only example of vigorous
sustained and effective action in the 1630s. He doubled Irish revenues,
bringing them to £80,000 a year, and made considerable profits for him-
self. For the first time the Irish government was financially self-support-
ing and the prospects of its contributing to English resources seemed
good. Wentworth's will-power and self-confidence made him a gambler
who, unlike Charles' other servants, was prepared to risk his own profits,
fortune and eventually his life in service of the crown and his own am-
bition. In Ireland he had offended so many interests and individuals
that peace was essential for his policies to succeed, just as it was for the
rickety finances and contradictory expedients of the English government.
The death blow came from Scotland.
If James' legacy in England was one of lack of credit and confidence,
in Scotland it was of relatively effective government. Royal justice was
comparatively ineffectual in Scotland, thanks to the crown's poverty and
the power of the nobility through heritable jurisdictions and their fol-
lowers. Attempts ta introduce justices of the peace in 1609 and 1634 were
ineffective; probably the kirk sessions were an enduring force in local
government. 1 Their superintendence by bishops, High Commission and
privy council was the surest basis of James' authority. The procedure
adopted in 1621 gave the bishops a decisive part in securing royal domina-
tion of the committee of the articles which controlled Parliament. Charles
soon called all in question by theoretical claims and impolitic actions.
Absence of the court from Scotland tended to produce resentments like
those of the nobilities of the other Iberian kingdoms against Castile.
Charles was as much personally concerned with governing Scotland as
his father, and after Buckingham's death the Scots Hamilton and Lennox
were treated as intimates, but they were near-aliens to the resident
nobility, some of whom spent longer in France than England.
Charles' revocation of 1625 rescinded grants of crown property since
1540 and all dispositions of ecclesiastical property. James had erected
twenty-one abbeys into hereditary temporal lordships, as the complement
to restoring the estate of bishops. Church lands were later confirmed
to their grantees, but the crown kept the right to redeem their feudal
superiorities, though as yet it could not afford to do this to any appreci-
able extent. Machinery for the valuation and commutation of tithes,
provision of minimum stipends and an annuity to the crown was a genuine
reform which lasted. But the revocation alarmed all holders of church
1
G. Donaldson, Scotland James V to James Vll (1965), pp. 224-6.
566
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
property, the more so as Charles also revoked some hereditary sheriff-
ships and other noble offices, had regular annual direct taxes granted for
the first time, and put increased burdens on Edinburgh. The bishops'
attendance and importance in the privy council grew considerably after
1630. The parliament of 1633 showed unprecedentedly strong opposition,
but the crown's control was unbroken and it confirmed an act of 1609
empowering the king to prescribe apparel. Charles proceeded to break
with tradition by prescribing the wearing of surplices by ministers.
Attempts at protest outside Parliament by supplication led to Lord
Balmerino's condemnation for treason.
Charles seemed more determined to rely on his prerogative in Scotland
than in England. In promulgating canons in 1636 and commanding the
use of the new Prayer Book in 1637, he defied the general view that
changes in the church must be ratified by a general assembly. The Prayer
Book was largely the work of less moderate Scottish bishops, but Charles
was responsible for retaining numerous saints' days in the calendar,
chapters from the Apocrypha and a rubric providing for communion at a
table set altarwise. Spalding believed that the riots which greeted the
book's inauguration in Edinburgh were the result of a conspiracy by
the nobility against the bishops. Organized petitions denounced the book
and the bishops as councillors. Delegates of the petitioners formed ' the
Tables' and forced the bishops to withdraw from the council. In February
1638 the National Covenant was drawn up, denouncing popery, the
canons, the Prayer Book; appealing to statutes and the coronation oath,
it pledged its signatories to disregard recent changes until allowed in free
assemblies and parliaments.
The covenant can be interpreted as constitutional and conservative,
seeking a return to a moderate episcopalian regime, and some signed in
that sense. But the importance of the bishops in government meant that
their exclusion involved radical constitutional changes (the notion of
free parliaments was new) which could be secured by abolishing episco-
pacy. As a covenant it appealed to conceptions of federal theology, 1
to pre-reformation traditions of the Scots as a chosen race and to the
idea of God's covenant with the nation preached by Presbyterian dis-
senters under James. Many now saw the covenant as a divine commission
to complete the reformation in Scotland and England, save continental
Protestantism and destroy Rome so that, as Johnston of Wariston said
later, 'Until King Jesus be set down on his throne with his scepter in his
hand, I do not expect God's peace . . .'. a
Throughout Charles helped on the work by his constancy in giving
'nothing in time'. As the leaders armed and the council had lost control,
1
See Chapter v, p. 193.
S. A. Burrell, 'The Apocalyptic Vision of the Early Covenanters', Scottish Hist.
Review, Vol.43 (1964). PP-1-24, 20-1; I. B. Cowan, 'The Covenanters', ibid. Vol.47
(1968), pp. 35-42.
2
567
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Charles suspended the canons and Prayer Book and summoned an assem-
bly to Glasgow. The covenanters packed the assembly by excluding
ministers and by the unprecedented inclusion of lay elders, while Charles
told his commissioner, Hamilton, 'to flatter them with what hopes you
please so you engage me not against my grounds . . . until I be ready to
suppress them'. Ignoring Hamiltons' dissolution, the assembly deposed
the bishops and annulled the canons. A majority of the nobility and gentry
had taken over the church in defiance of the king and many clergy; next,
with the help of the towns, they organized an army to defend themselves.
Charles tried to attack and demonstrated his deluded ignorance of his
situation in both Scotland and England. All the local dissensions,
grievances and legal doubts about the militia ensured its ineffectiveness.
The navy was helpless without bases in Scotland. What forces he had
could not be kept in being for lack of money, appeals for a loan from
London and for voluntary contributions failed, despite the revocation
of a large number of monopolies. Hamilton urged compromise and
Charles reluctantly made peace (June 1639). He agreed that church and
state should be settled by assembly and Parliament summoned for
August. Neither side kept faith; the Covenanters did not effectively
disarm, Charles confirmed the abolition of episcopacy, believing that the
bishops' absence would invalidate the proceedings of both assembly and
Parliament. He had decided to try conquest again, while the assembly
declared episcopacy contrary to the law of God and Parliament des-
troyed the crown's control of the committee of articles. Scotland had
embarked on constitutional and religious revolution, but conservative
doubts were gathering strength.
Charles now made Wentworth one of his inner ring of councillors.
They discussed extraordinary ways of raising money, but Hamilton,
Wentworth and Laud demanded a parliament. Charles seems to have
regarded this a means to strengthen an ultimate appeal to his emergency
powers, for he insisted on a pledge from the privy council that 'if the
Parliament should prove . . . untoward . . . ' they would assist him in
extraordinary ways. A loan of £300,000 was raised immediately from
councillors and officials. Wentworth (now created earl of Strafford)
crossed to Ireland, obtained a vote of four subsidies from the Irish
Parliament and arranged to raise a new army of 8,000 foot before re-
turning to England. The English Parliament met (13 April) and the lord
keeper demanded immediate supply without offering any concessions,
except to acknowledge the need for a parliamentary grant of tonnage and
poundage. As Convocation's commission included power to make
canons, the whole question of Parliament's relationship to the royal
supremacy was again revived.
The Short Parliament's failure now seems inevitable and was probably
expected by Charles. It is not clear that Strafford or even the Commons
568
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
saw this. Pym in a two-hour speech rehearsed the grievances of 1629
adding under propriety of goods, ship money, monopolies, military
charges, denounced the responsibility of the judges and the bishops'
claims that their authority was iure divino, and demanded annual parlia-
ments. The Commons were determined to pursue their grievances, but
the Lords voted that supply be given priority by 52 to 25 and rejected
the Commons' subsequent protest by 60 to 25. This might be seen as a
court manoeuvre to provoke a breach between the Houses and justify a
dissolution. But at Strafford's insistence Charles agreed to concede the
illegality of Ship Money, but rejected his advice to trust the Commons'
affections for supply; he agreed instead to ask for eight subsidies instead
of the twelve proposed by Secretary Vane, then apparently changed his
mind. Vane asked for twelve subsidies and refused any compromise; even
so one observer thought they might have been voted, until some mem-
bers demanded the inclusion of military charges with Ship Money. 1
Charles was determined to dissolve, on Vane's assurance that no supply
was possible. Strafford agreed and the privy council voted the dissolution
with only two dissentients (5 May).
If supply had been voted, full investigation of grievances had been
promised in a later session, so that at best Charles would have con-
quered Scotland, while awaiting an investigation of his rule by the Com-
mons. The moment Charles had anticipated had come, perhaps he
imagined he could repeat the forced loan of 1626, but the privy council's
promises of full support proved of little worth. Charles overruled Laud
and insisted that Convocation should continue to sit in order to vote
supply and canons embodying Laud's innovations, thus ensuring a united
attack by any future parliament. Only Strafford and to some extent Cot-
tington were prepared to invoke the full emergency powers of the crown.
Even so threats failed to raise any appreciable amount of money, nego-
tiations to obtain troops and money from Spain were fruitless. When the
Irish Parliament met again in June the Old and New English allied to
attack Stafford's policies and reduce the subsidies. In England men
pressed for service rioted, destroyed enclosures and altar rails, on their
way to the north, where the army's commanders had already despaired.
When the Scots invaded, they took Newcastle and Durham easily and,
though the Yorkshire trained bands rallied to Charles, he still lacked
money to continue the war. A great council of peers was summoned
to York, but was only willing to guarantee a cessation with the Scots and a
loan from London on condition of calling Parliament. The Scots referred
themselves for a final peace to this Parliament and until then their pre-
sence costing £850 a day guaranteed its continuation.
Factions at court became more deadly, looking for ways to conciliate
parliament by sacrificing their rivals. Holland, Vane and Cottington all
1
B. M. MS Harley 4931, fo. 48.
569
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
patronized by the queen saved themselves, as did Hamilton, thanks to the
Scots. All were hostile in varying degrees to Strafford, who had not meant
to attend Parliament. After it met Charles summoned him, promising to
protect him. On Stratford's arrival, his enemies at court warned the
Commons' leaders that he intended to accuse members of both Houses
of treason with the Scots. Laud thought there was such a plan and the
warning made Pym procure an immediate vote for Stafford's impeach-
ment for treason. The Lords accepted this, although the Commons had
not had time to prepare full charges, and Strafford was arrested. His
fate became the main political issue for the next six months.
By December Laud, Lord Keeper Finch and six judges had been
impeached, charges against two bishops were preparing. Finch and
Secretary Windebank had fled abroad. Many grievances were being
considered, but the most important piece of legislation was the Triennial
Act (February 1641) inspired by that of the Scots Parliament of June
1640, which provided machinery for the summoning of Parliament every
three years, irrespective of the king's will. The only impeachment actively
pursued was Strafford's and the attempt to prove constructive treason
and alteration of government failed, partly because the evidence from
Ireland was unsatisfactory and because the evidence of advising Charles
to levy war on his subjects was not only dubious, but involved the king's
personal responsibility. If making a division between king and people
was treason, what of the twelve peers who had denounced Charles' rule
in August 1640? The political reasons for Strafford's execution were that
he had invoked the crown's full emergency powers in 1640 and was an
object of army plots in 1641; the reason of state of Essex's 'Stone dead
hath no fellow' was forced on Charles by riots which threatened Charles'
courtiers and queen. But the Lords in passing the Bill of Attainder and
ignoring Charles' pleas were guided by the judges' view that alteration
of government was treason, not that Strafford had constructively com-
passed the king's death. 1 This helped to reconcile law and political reality,
but the fact remained that Charles had been coerced. Strafford offered him-
self to the scaffold as a sacrifice to that unity which was the foundation
of all order, yet his presence there exposed the fiction. Everyone agreed
that without this unity there would be chaos, which duly came. Was this
because Charles' critics were determined to subvert government's funda-
mental laws, or because Charles was, or because a mixed constitution
was self-destructive in trying sacrilegiously to share out sovereign power,
or because a new distribution of property made it unworkable ?
All these explanations were offered by contemporaries. Clearly by
September 1641, the monarchy which James inherited had been drastically
changed and we must lastly, generally and even more selectively consider
1
C. Russell, 'Theory of Treason in the Trial of Stafford', E.H.R. Vol. 80 (1965), pp.
30-50.
570
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
why these changes led to civil war and the effects it had and failed to
have on English society and government. First the Long Parliament's
achievements had been based on agreement between the Houses, so that
by September Ship Money, High Commission, Star Chamber, the
Council of the North, the king's discretion in summoning parliament,
his right to impositions and to dissolve the Long Parliament without its
own consent had been abolished, peace had been made with the Scots
and the army disbanded.
Like the Covenanters, some leaders of the Parliament had millennial
aspirations. They saw themselves called not only to punish evils, but to
complete a final reformation in church and state. Pym and others had
long patronized Hartlib and hoped to invite Comenius to England to
promote Protestant unity and educational reforms. An invitation was
sent in the name of Parliament and finally in September Comenius arrived.
His plans for a complete system of education on Baconian lines and for
the conversion of the Jews as a prelude to the imminent last age of en-
lightenment were frustrated by the renewed political crisis. 1
At a more mundane level attempts to enable king and Parliament to
work together so that further encroachment on the executive would be
unnecessary failed. The chief instrument was to have been Bedford
who was to have become lord treasurer, accompanied into office by his
followers including Pym. These hopes were wrecked by Bedford's failure
to persuade Pym to spare Stafford's life, and by Bedford's sudden death.
Although Bedford, Essex and others were made privy councillors, or
given office, this made things worse, as Charles continued to take so much
of his advice from outside his council. Hence the demand of both houses
that Charles should remove from him all councillors who had divided
him from his people and appoint ones in whom they could confide.
The differences between the Houses were strongest in church government.
Everyone had been united in denouncing innovations and clerical pre-
tensions; differences arose as to the reforms needed. The Lords would
exclude the clergy from all secular offices, but not from their House, as
the Commons wished. The Commons then turned to a bill to abolish
the office of bishop, voted that episcopal lands, except for impropriations,
should go to the crown, that dean and chapter lands should go to
promote education and augment poor livings, and that ecclesiastical
jurisdiction should be exercised by lay commissioners. There was a strong
movement for abolishing episcopacy in London and some support in the
Commons, but many who voted for these resolutions wanted a primitive
episcopacy. The Lords guided by Bishop Williams produced a bill to
moderate episcopacy by joining twelve clerical assistants in ordination
and jurisdiction and providing a fund from the revenues of bishops,
1
H. R. Trevor-Roper, 'Three Foreigners: The Philosophers of the Puritan Revolution',
in Religion, the Reformation and Social Change (1967), pp. 237-93.
571
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
chapters and colleges to buy in impropriations. Both Williams and Pym
were patrons of Comenius, but it is not entirely clear that his cloudy
plans could have reconciled these contradictions. Charles might have
stomached Williams' plan, but not the Commons.
Moreover, outside Parliament it was not only Londoners but some
of the clergy who had a covenanting exaltation. Many of the sermons to
Parliament showed a willingness to see Parliament as an instrument for
speedy reformation, but rejected the Erastianism of moderate Anglicans.
Surprisingly Prynne, who had been a martyr for moderate episcopacy,
rejecting episcopacy by divine right as destructive of the constitution, in
1641 was converted by his zeal for moral reformation to presbyterianism
by divine right, rejecting Williams. 1 Others, perhaps a majority, viewed these
questions very much in a social and political context. Thus Sir Thomas
Aston argued that Presbyterianism might be suitable for Scotland
where 'the Nobility and Gentry having absolute power over their
tenants, shall ever bear sway in the Church', but as this is not so in
England the commoners in electing elders would 'exclude both Nobility
and G e n t r y . . . our Communalty depend upon Lawes, not Lords.' But
Nathaniel Fiennes objected to episcopacy as incompatible with English
forms of government which are 'aristocraticall and placed in many and
not in one', as in parliament, assizes and commissions of peace, such
interests should not be excluded from church government. But increasing
numbers also believed that there was a scriptural model of church
government which properly presented would command acceptance.
Hence the summoning of an assembly of divines was both a way of
postponing clashes between different aims inside and outside Parliament,
while sustaining faith that unity and reformation were attainable. The
plan for the assembly was included in the Grand Remonstrance and
nominations began in February 1642.
Meanwhile Charles' insistence on visiting Scotland alarmed Parliament,
which rightly suspected him of seeking allies against them. He found none
and had to allow Parliament there to nominate officers of state. But he
was beginning to see allies in England. Petitions were being organized to
support episcopacy and the Prayer Book in a number of counties; the
lord mayor and aldermen of London, alarmed for their oligarchic com-
mercial and municipal interests by the leadership of the city's Puritan
M.P.s and ministers over the populace, were rallying to him. But earlier
intrigues in Ireland now came home to roost with the Irish rebellion
which was to precipitate the civil war. The Irish claimed to have Charles
I's commission to fight for his just prerogative and were joined by the
'Old English', traditionally loyal to the crown, who denounced the
English Parliament's claims and policies towards Ireland.
Although Charles had not issued the commission, he had started, but
1
W. M. Lamont, Marginal Prynne (1963), pp. 77-84.
572
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
not pursued, negotiations to use the Irish and 'Old English' which
influenced the rebels' timing and tactics. 1 Their professions and the
earlier English army plots made it impossible for Pym to trust Charles
with an army against the Irish. Pym attempted to rally opinion by the
Grand Remonstrance, most of which recited the grievances before 1640
on which everyone agreed, ending with demands for counsellors in whom
Parliament could confide, dismissable at Parliament's discretion, as a
condition of aid to Ireland, and exclusion of bishops from the Lords;
but it was only carried by 159 to 148 (20 November). Hyde opposed it
because of its violent language, mistrust of Charles and failure to seek
support from the Lords. The breach with the Lords was emphasized by
preventing the bishop's attendance by riots whose instigators also
defeated leading members of London's common council at the December
elections. Having acquired moderate supporters, Charles followed
extreme counsels. First he reunited Lords and Commons by demanding
registration of a protest by the bishops that proceedings were invalid
without them. Next his attempt to impeach and arrest Pym and four
other members ensured their uniting with the new forces in London.
Charles' appeal to the common council to deliver them was as vain as
his appeal to the speaker. A committee of safety, appointed by the
common council, took over control of the city and its militia from the
royalist mayor and moderate aldermen whose resistance produced the
impeachment of the mayor and recorder. Having ensured the impotence
of his moderate supporters, Charles took refuge in the country and
conceded the bishops' exclusion from Parliament. He refused to give up
control of the militia and the war began on this issue.
Cromwell's view that religion was not at first the thing contended for
is often applauded as though it were a profound analysis. It is true,
partly because Charles in both Scotland and England was readier to
make tactical concessions about religion than about his prerogative,
but ultimately he believed his supremacy and his prerogative were
indissoluble. In 1646 he wrote ' . . . if the pulpits teach not obedience
(which will never be if Presbyterian government be absolutely established)
the king will have but small comfort of the militia . . . ' . Moderates made
a party for Charles, partly because they wanted moderate church
reforms, necessity made him heed them and allow them to write his
manifestoes. Pym rightly doubted the permanence of his conversion.
Sir Edward Walker, Hobbes and Newcastle believed moderates on both
sides agreed in fearing Charles' use of a complete victory. While his
followers fought for what Parliament had enacted with his constrained
consent and Charles may have died for it, what he fought for was shrouded,
by his evasions, his past actions and his multiplicity of counsels.
1
R. Dunlop,'The Forged Commission of 1641', E.H.R. Vol. 2 (1887), pp. 527-33. A.
Clarke, The Old English in Ireland 1625-42 (1966), pp. 220-34.
573
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Not all moderates, however attached to the ancient constitution, saw
Parliament's claims as usurpations. Some like D'Ewes gave the establish-
ment of religion 'in power and puritie among us . . . that all might know
their duty to God and the K i n g . . . ' priority. Most Royalists execrated
' lordly prelacy' and many wanted reformation, but the primitive' modera-
ted' episcopacy of Dering and Du Moulin was not acceptable to Royalists
like Sir Thomas Aston and many clergy whom Dering complained 'had
rather the Kingdom should be blown up than . . . the King . . . forbear
to hear the blowing of Organs'. The Royalists defended a balanced
constitution and most of the Prayer Book and deprecated further con-
stitutional change. Most Parliamentarians claimed to be defending the
constitution against change, but even the most moderate favoured some
change in religion, though represented as a return to primitive truths.
If no one defended the personal rule, the great majority of the proper-
tied wished to stay out of the war. London may be an exception, but even
here a count of wealth rather than heads might have shown a majority of
neutrals. It has been argued that the drive to fight for Parliament came
from below, but even in London it was organized by men of wealth and
standing, though mainly outside the dominant oligarchy of great mer-
chants, customs farmers and aldermen who ruled before December 1641.
Elsewhere there were popular movements; in some towns, such as South
Molton, the townspeople prevented local gentry from proclaiming the
king's commission of array; in Staffordshire the Moorlanders rose for
Parliament with little help from the gentry, but were unable to achieve
anything without them. At all levels the determination of comparatively
few was needed to start the war and decisive leadership came mainly from
the landowners. Clarendon considered 'it had been utterly impossible'
for Parliament 'to have raised an army then if the earl of Essex had not
consented to be general...'. The earl of Warwick was responsible for
bringing over the navy to Parliament. Thus if only some thirty-odd peers
stayed with Parliament while some forty joined the king by August 1642,
about half the peers of 1640 eventually actively supported the king and a
quarter Parliament; in 1642 many were passive.
Generally speaking in most areas a passive or neutralist majority was
forced to choose sides. Thus the strength of neutralism and royalism is
hard to gauge in London, which was under Parliament's control from the
start. Kent does not fit the often asserted claim that the economically
advanced south and east were parliamentary; it was controlled by London;
but most of the established gentry were moderate Royalists, though few
were active. In Cornwall which became a Royalist stronghold initially
'the prime of those persons that were most conversant in the government
by commission of the peace' were Parliamentarians. The exceptions are
Suffolk where the leading families were solidly Parliamentary and Wales
where the gentry was solidly Royalist, while both lacked declared neut-
574
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
ralists. Sometimes families took opposite sides as they had been rivals for
generations, as Greys and Hastings had been in Leicestershire. Some,
choosing on principle or under pressure, brought with them individual
jealousies which disrupted their own sides. Even the recusants, though a
majority supported Charles, included an appreciable number who were
passive and tried to avoid committing themselves to him.
Control of the seas meant that Parliament held nearly all the port
towns. But the ruling groups of some towns wished to avoid involvement
as much as possible, as at Bristol and Newcastle, while at King's Lynn
most of them supported a Royalist rising. Parliament got considerable
popular support in the textile areas of Lancashire and the West Riding,
though in Manchester and Leeds the leading men held back; local
conditions did not favour such caution in the East Anglian areas. The
clothiers of Wiltshire were predominantly neutralist; though their
Somerset neighbour, the wealthy John Ash, was an active Parliamentarian,
he asked for the earls of Bedford and Pembroke to bring aid 'for though
the Countrie people be stout and resolved, yet we are not able to main-
tain the cause . . . without expert men that can lead and advise us'.
Clarendon believed that not only most of the nobility but most of the
gentry, especially those of wealth and standing, were Royalist. This last
was true of the second Civil War, but for the first it seems more compar-
able to the claims of Parliamentary propaganda that Royalist nobles
'gather unto them the decayed gentry of several countrys w h o . . . con-
ceive civil war to be the best way suddenly to raise their fortunes equall
to their descents . . . ' . So far studies of M.P.s and county divisions have
not shown that either side had a monopoly of rising or declining gentry,
or even of capitalists. The Royalist M.P.s median age was eleven years
younger than the Parliamentarians which may suggest that those with
most experience of Charles and politics trusted him least. Some believe
that the gentry rallied to the king because of fear of social disorders.
Admittedly since 1640 there were probably more riots against enclosures,
more resentment about tithes and there were frequent riots in London.
Each side accused the other of promoting popular anarchy and then
provided grounds for this by ordering tenants to refuse rents to landlords
who recognized their opponents. In the summer of 1643 fears of popular
disorders were invoked by Pym and by the parliamentary peace party as a
reason both for sacrifices to win the war and for making peace. Clearly
this consideration might move men in quite different directions.
The situation was revolutionary in 1642 because men failed to find
ways to avoid settling their disputes by force. The longer the war continued
the more often negotiations failed, the more the moderates on both sides
were blamed, the more complete victory seemed the only solution. The
tactics of middle of the road leadership, pursued by Pym and St John
since 1641, of postponing any clear commitments on forms of church
575
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
government meant that victory was sought for quite contradictory
reasons. The middle group needed victory because it did not trust Charles,
it did not trust the peace party to make a satisfactory peace, or the radi-
cals to keep enough support to win the war. As Charles never really
recognized defeat, it was impossible for moderate terms to be won
without destroying the constitution.
But it is also worth considering how each side chose to see themselves
and their opponents in general. Lord Robartes at Essex's installation
declared ' . . . the liberty of the subject . . . ought to be maintained that
we may not be converted into a Country of Peasants and slaves as France
is, where the K i n g . . . d o t h . . . squeeze his subjects like so many oranges
. . . who would not adventure life f o r . . . the Protestant Religion which
is in danger now to be changed into Popery . . . ' . If Parliamentarians saw
Royalists promoting popery and wooden shoes under a king, bewitched
by evil councillors, Royalists saw them as Anabaptists, sectaries, icono-
clasts, dedicated to destroying social and religious order. This propaganda
seemed verified by the many papists fighting for Charles and by the be-
haviour of some Parliamentarians. Essex's troops in Worcester Cathedral
'eased themselves in the Font and upon the Communion Table, calling
to them that chearfully looked on to name the child and sign it with the
sign of the Cross'. 1 These doubtless were 'the ruder sort of soldiers'
whose society the pious Londoner Nehemiah Wharton avoided and who
deprived him of his pillage. For Wharton the march from London was a
providential succession of torn surplices and service books, sustained by
venison cooked with fuel from altar rails, and Worcester (still an impor-
tant cloth town)' so vile and the country so base papisticall and atheisticall
and abominable, that it resembles Sodom and is the very emblem of
Gomorrah . . . '. 2
Both sides conducted the war by methods which most of them had
previously denounced. They used martial law against civilians and sol-
diers; they used free quarter and pressed men to fight. They raised forced
loans, military contributions and excises and confiscated and pillaged
their opponents' property.
The reasons for Parliament's victory seem overwhelming in retrospect.
Control of the sea and London's wealth and credit were the basis for a
relatively effective system of administration, in which county committees
and sub-committees, responsible to committees of Parliament, or appoin-
ted by Parliament, organized local resources, but also were accountable
to a remarkable though imperfect extent for the moneys raised and spent. 3
These resources were eventually concentrated behind an effective striking
1
T. Carte, A Collection of Original Letters, Vol. I (1739), p. 15.
Archaeologia (1853), PP- 3H-34-
3
D. H. Pennington, 'The Accounts of the Kingdom 1642-9', Essays in the Economic
and Social History of Tudor and Stuart England, ed. F. J. Fisher (1961).
8
576
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
force, which acted independently of regional and local concerns, the New
Model Army. While the fervour of many of its officers and troopers is
undoubted, its foot consisted mainly of pressed men, another tribute to
effective local administration. Against this, Charles had few ports—
Newcastle, Chester, Bristol, those of Cornwall and South Wales; the
textile areas under his control still depended on London's trade and
credit. His forces and administration were fragmented and further
weakened by local and personal rivalries. Central administrative and
strategic control diminished and with it the ability to maintain an effective
field army. But these contrasts only became true in the long run.
For at least the first year of the war, the king was comparatively well
supplied. His forces were first raised mainly by voluntary contributions
of men and money and then sustained by contributions from occupied
counties (fifteen counties were supposed to raise £540,000 a year). The
Council of War supplied some general direction and organization. But
from 1644 its effectiveness and authority declined; as always Charles was
unwilling to delegate his authority or to abide by the council's decisions,
when sought. Royalist commissions acted much more independently in
their localities and there is little sign of any effective accountability to
Oxford, except for the counties adjacent to Oxford. The Royalist excise
only seems to have worked at all in some towns such as Bristol and
Chester. The strategic direction of the war became more incoherent as a
result of rivalries centring on Rupert and Digby. By January 1645 the
contribution system had broken down even in Oxfordshire, while the
setting up of a council for the prince of Wales in the west further frag-
mented the Royalist war effort. 1
Parliament's success after 1643 in enforcing collection of excises and
assessments over wider areas through its committees and the king's
decreasing ability to control the exactions of local commanders produced
a resurgence of local efforts to protect themselves from both sides. The
Clubmen's movement has been too little studied to be fully understood, 2
their strength was in the country people. In the winter of 1644-5 move-
ments against the Royalists in Worcestershire, Shropshire and Hereford-
shire were put down. The movement in Wiltshire and Dorset was strongly
organized; one Dorset petition asked for a return to religion of the purest
times under Elizabeth and James with no consciences to be troubled by
indifferent ceremonies. Here and in Sussex they demanded a return to
traditional county government through quarter sessions. The Sussex
petition also attacks the county committee's arbitrary actions and un-
1
I. Roy, 'The Royalist Council of War 1642-6', Bull. Inst. Hist. Res. Vol. 35 (1962),
pp. 150-68; J. Engberg, 'Royalist finances during the Civil War', Scandinavian Ec. Hist.
Rev. Vol. 14 (1966), pp. 73-96.
1
The only, but excellent, general survey is in B. S. Manning's unpublished Oxford
D.Phil, thesis, 'Neutrals and Neutralism in the English Civil War 1642-6' (1957),
pp. 405-65-
577
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
audited accounts. Such petitions were doubtless written by gentry and
clergy, but there was widespread support from Somerset to Sussex.
Fairfax made some concessions in July in Dorset, before breaking them
in August 1645. Resistance to their exactions helped to defeat the Royalists
in the west.
The Clubmen not only demonstrated the power of the New Model
Army, but the extent to which Parliament was out of touch with local
feelings. Parliament's own county committees held that the New Model
abrogated 'the ends and purposes' of their Eastern Association and
ignored the needs and burdens of the counties, complaining that coat
and conduct money was not paid out of the monthly assessments. 1 County
committees dominated by a militant local leader, such as Sir William
Brereton in Staffordshire or Sir Anthony Weldon in Kent, meant the
eclipse of many established families and opportunities for new men by
1645, or earlier. This trend culminated in the exclusion of the ruling
families of 1640 in Kent and Wales after 1648, though in Wales the old
families began to emerge again under the Protectorate. The same emer-
gence took place in Northamptonshire, Wiltshire and Norfolk, though
the original ruling families had never been so totally excluded. These last
counties may be typical, where Suffolk whose ruling groups were little
disturbed throughout is almost certainly not.
This alienation between the local communities and the managers of the
Parliamentary war effort was well under way before the war ended and
was part of the process whereby the moderates on both sides became
helpless. In Parliament the middle party, led first by Pym and then St
John, had bought Scots' intervention without committing themselves to
more than abolishing episcopacy, instead of winning the war that inter-
vention destroyed the Covenanters' unity and faith in their destiny, and
undermined the middle party. Most of these continued to support Essex
as commander rather than Waller, the war party's hero. The establish-
ment of the Committee of Both Kingdoms was not a complete defeat for
Essex and a victory for the war party, but a compromise with the middle
group. A decisive shift came in late 1644 when Essex joined the peace
party and the Scots. This led St John to support the formation of the
New Model. 2 An essential part of Pym's strength had come from London,
but in the long run the New Model drastically reduced the direct military
power of London's rulers, while its religious aims were irreconcilable
with theirs. Immediately the New Model's victories united Commons and
city behind the Propositions of Newcastle, but eventually the middle
party had to choose between their old allies in London and the army;
St John and many others chose the army.
1
Suffolk and the Great Rebellion, ed. A. Everitt, Suffolk Record Soc., Vol. 3 (i960),
pp. 85-6.
2
V. Pearl, 'Oliver St John and the "middle group" in the Long Parliament', E.H.R.
Vol. 81 (1966), pp. 490-519.
578
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
One of the Newcastle Propositions was the confirmation of Parlia-
ment's religious settlement. Despite the protests of the assembly of divines
this was a 'lame Erastian Presbytery' with appeals from the censures of
the presbyteries to a Parliamentary committee, though this was a con-
siderable concession from the Commons' original desire to have eccle-
siastical jurisdiction exercised by lay commissions. In fact the reluctance
of the divines and the Commons' delays produced the settlement too
late. The Independent (congregationalist) ministers had originally been
willing to accept accommodation within a national Presbyterian system,
but in 1644 this was thwarted by the Scots. When it was offered them in
1645, the Independents demanded toleration 'for every way not scanda-
lous'. Although they believed Congregationalism was divinely ordained,
they now allied themselves with the sects which were strong in the New
Model. The Baptists have been claimed as believing in toleration on
broader grounds than self-preservation, but neither their writings then,
nor the intolerance of Baptist officers and ministers in power in Ireland
under Fleetwood confirm this. The Independents wanted a national
church and publicly maintained ministry and power for the magistrate
to suppress some beliefs, such as popery, unitarianism or familism.
There were many arguments against toleration, all stressed its incom-
patibility with a national church and demanded control of mechanic
preachers. Many of the examples of excess were taken from the army's
lay preachers.
If the demand for toleration was a matter of tactics for most Inde-
pendents and sectaries, its radical social implications may be unfamiliar.
Many sectaries and some independents objected to paying tithes for a
variety of reasons. Given the amount of lay impropriation this seemed
to attack property rights. But more serious was the threat of toleration
to the basis of society, the family (taken to include servants and some-
times non-resident adult sons). Here paternal authority was supposed to
be supreme, but it would be destroyed if servants, sons, daughters, even
wives claimed liberty to worship differently. Disruption of domestic
piety would be the greater, since some sects discouraged their members
from intercourse with non-members. Neither Parliament nor assembly
had ever intended to allow the freedom of printing or speaking which had
occurred since 1642 especially in religion. Conversion and the freedom of
the spirit did in fact divide many families more bitterly than the war
itself. That war had been fought to defeat the ungodly and blasphemers,
how could they be kept in order except by the discipline of a national
church which was also the only means of evangelizing the dark corners
of the land?
Apart from Roger Williams' demand for complete separation of church
and state, the only demands for full toleration had been those which gave
priority to civil peace. These included pamphlets by Walwyn, Overton and
579
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Lilburne. By 1646 John Lilburne had challenged both Lords and Commons,
claiming to criticize members in seeking redress of his personal grievances
and in virtue of fundamental rights which the power and privileges of
Parliament could not override. He denied that the Lords had any juris-
diction over commoners and was imprisoned as a result. From the Tower
he continued his publications, becoming the most well-known leader of
those their enemies called Levellers. 1
Lilburne became more prominent when the Commons' majority lost
control of the army in 1647. It had ignored the religious interests of many
soldiers by being prepared to impose Presbyterian uniformity; it tried to
disband the New Model without settling its arrears of pay or guaranteeing
indemnity, hoping to get most of its men to re-enlist to conquer Ireland.
Like Charles, the Commons were blinded to the realities of power by
their own legal theories. The army's petitions of protest were rejected,
as so many others had been, but the army mutinied and drove out the
officers who accepted Parliament's demands. The privates elected
agitators who were in touch with Lilburne and other Levellers. There
were three successive bad harvests after 1646 along with depression in
overseas trade so that distress and discontent were widespread, feeding
the Leveller movement in London.
The officers' programme, the Heads of the Proposals, included re-
distribution of parliamentary seats, reform of the law and tithes, abolition
of coercive ecclesiastical jurisdiction and penalties for not attending
church, removal of the excise from necessities and its eventual abolition.
Neither Parliament, the Levellers, nor Charles, found this acceptable.
The army leaders took custody of Charles, broke the power of the
agitators, defeated the old alliance between the Commons' majority and
the city, only to find a second civil war. Charles, confident that his
enemies' divisions would ensure his triumph, preferred to ally himself
with a faction in Scotland and the Commons' majority; the royalists
found themselves fighting to establish Presbyterianism for three years.
Despite wider support than ever before, including most of the navy,
Charles' supporters were defeated piecemeal.
Some of the army leaders were determined to try Charles, some wished
to dissolve Parliament, as did Lilburne who had supported the army
during the war. The Army Council under Ireton's guidance accepted
the principle of an Agreement of the People and a wide franchise but,
powerfully supported by the Independent clergy, they refused full tolera-
tion, including papists and episcopalians, and kept some authority for
the state in religion. Because of this and because the agreement was to be
submitted to Parliament, now purged by Pride, Lilburne denounced it,
but not all his associates inside and outside the army agreed. Lilburne is
often criticized for lacking political realism, or more fashionably for
1
See above, Chapter m, p. 128 for a brief account of their programme.
580
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
accepting property rights; he was prepared to compromise on tithe and
the franchise, but not on toleration, or on trusting any group or assembly
with unlimited power. In fact by giving priority to trying Charles the
army found themselves prisoners of the Rump's leadership. After Charles'
execution they were fully occupied in defeating Lilburne's attempts to
influence the army and then in conquering Ireland and Scotland. The
Commonwealth's sea-power built up for defensive reasons involved them
in war with the Dutch. 1 But the officers did not forget their declarations.
By 1648 the dominant figure among them was Cromwell, of whom
many interpretations are possible and none is definitive. A plausible one
is that he acted without any consistency, moved by the spirit and by
circumstances; sympathizing with millennial aspirations in 1653, con-
servative defender of the traditional constitution in 1658. But it is arguable
that some of his aims were constant. He wanted a national church, a
publicly maintained ministry and a minimum of confessional definition.
Tithe must be kept until another form of maintenance was found. Gen-
uinely tolerant, he did not believe there was only one divine model of
worship and discipline; prelatists and papists had tacit freedom to worship
privately. He wanted to reform the law and bring it nearer to scripture.
Unlike some Puritans he did not wish to reimpose the Mosaic code,
although he invoked it when he attacked the use of capital punishment
for theft. One of his chief grievances against the Rump and probably
against the Nominated Parliament was their failure to enact the bills
prepared by Hales' committee. These included simplifying conveyancing,
county registries for transactions concerning land, regulations of lawyers'
and official fees and of admission and conduct of attorneys, decentrali-
zation of much civil litigation to county courts under a judge from
Westminster and five nominees of the J.P.s, and provision for speedy
hearing of appeals. As Protector, Cromwell reformed Chancery on the
committee's lines and under his patronage William Shepherd prepared
schemes to codify the law, merge equity and common law and supervise
judges by assessors. The church was to be comprehensive and not coercive
and the state was to regulate litigation and lawyers according to the
county communities' notions of justice.
Cromwell was less concerned about means, seemingly little involved
in his son-in-law Ireton's paper constitutions. Ready to purge the Long
Parliament before Pride did, he lost patience with the Rump later than
most of the officers. In 1657 he saw himself with some exaggeration as the
officers' 'drudge upon all occasions', dissolving the Rump and pursuing
expedients from the Nominated Parliament to the major-generals,
without satisfying themselves or the country. In 1658 he dissolved the
second Protectorate Parliament, purged the army and could have taken
the crown, had he lived longer, though his intentions are not known. The
1
See above, Chapter vn, pp. 235-6.
581
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
kingship party's Humble Petition and Advice ended with a promise to
join in reforming the law, but Whitelocke and other lawyers of that party
had wrecked the attempt to reform Chancery. Perhaps if Cromwell could
have regained the trust of the gentry he could have defeated the lawyers.
His church settlement did work, though Owen and other Independent
clergy attacked it after allying with the Republicans in 1657. Baxter's
Association movement was successful in getting agreement on ordaining
ministers, but it also raised the question of ministers' authority to exclude
men from the sacraments. In the event Cromwell's death destroyed any
hope of settlement without restoring Charles II, the most unexpected
result of which was the restoration of the Anglican structure of
1641.
Although Parliamentary Presbyterianism was never implemented, the
Assembly's Prayer Book was generally used by Independents and by that
majority (perhaps 70%) of beneficed Anglicans who had accepted the
new dispensation. Serious efforts were made to augment livings; tithe
reserved from the sales of bishops and capitular lands and some £11,300
from Royalist compositions provided a fund of perhaps £80,000-
90,000 a year. By 1655 338 augmentations had been made; the Restora-
tion ended the most serious effort to provide an adequately paid parochial
clergy before the nineteenth century. What survived was a de facto
Parliamentary supremacy, founded not on reforming the church, but on
ending comprehension.
If law reform ceased, it has been claimed that the old tradition of
economic regulation and social paternalism ended and the Common-
wealth saw the beginning of industrial laissez-faire. But the standing com-
mittee for advancing and regulating trade echoed the 1620s that more
regulation through corporations was necessary; in 1656 the great Somerset
clothier Ash agreed 'our manufactures are lost and snatched away into
Holland for want of regulation'. In 1650 the Norwich weavers were
incorporated by Parliament with powers over all Norfolk. Leeds failed
to get a similar corporation for the West Riding, because of local jeal-
ousies as it had failed with the crown before 1640, when the privy council
were trying to encourage regulation in Norwich. The character and machin-
ery of poor relief was not transformed. In the counties studied by Profes-
sor Jordan the amount raised increased in the 1640s and 1650s. In
Warwickshire the JPs dealt with an average of thirty-seven poor relief
cases a year in the 1650s against fourteen in the 1630s and increased the
rates of dole. The Commonwealth and still more the Protectorate
favoured industrial regulation, like earlier regimes they were distracted
from doing as much about it as expert opinion demanded. The Naviga-
tion Act of 1651 reflected new power and self-confidence; earlier proposals
had not been pursued for fear of Dutch reprisals. Regulation of overseas
trade was more than ever Parliament's concern, a complement to the
582
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE FALL OF THE STUART MONARCHY
struggle for complete control of the customs. An improved Navigation
Act was passed at the Restoration and the book of rates was included in
the Act granting the customs.
Some have held that there were significant permanent transfers of land
due to sales by Royalists to pay the compounding fines imposed by
Parliament and to the confiscation and sale of other Royalists' estates
after 1648; these and the sales of church and crown lands created new
landowning families, many of whom survived 1660. Sales of church and
crown property may have brought some windfall profits, but the lands
were let on comparatively long leases and were not open to much im-
mediate exploitation, though tenants often bought their holdings to safe-
guard their future. Other purchasers paid more cash in order to get some
return on earlier loans now heavily discounted by the government's bad
credit. Most Royalists recovered their confiscated estates. Compounding
fines realized £1.3 million, but 'at least half of this—and probably a great
deal more—was raised by borrowing'. The fines caused landowners who
were already heavily in debt in 1642 to sell land, even then sales were
often delayed until after 1660. Impoverishment and heavy taxation
caused lasting bitterness and some attempts to exploit estates more
effectively. Lawyers obligingly developed forms of strict settlement
and mortgage, enabling landowners to create unbreakable entails and
borrow more easily, 1 and ended the uncertainty about the validity and
effects of earlier settlements, when law reformers inclined to encourage
partible inheritance.
Although Parliament was singularly unsuccessful in managing its
debts, it did reshape taxation effectively. The excise became a permanent
tax mainly on beer and spirits, though the general excises on the Dutch
model were too unpopular to continue. The assessment was meant to fall
on landowners' incomes and was the model for the later land tax. Its
apparent permanence inspired the Humble Petition and Advice's demand
that no part of the ordinary revenue should be raised by a land tax.
A tragic and lasting legacy was the settlement of Ireland. Catholics in
1641 held about three-fifths of the land and in 1665 about one-fifth,
having lost their political influence in towns and their control of trade.
A contingent of new planters, including many Cromwellian soldiers, had
been added to the 'New English'; any hope of converting the Irish had
gone, but their hope of overthrowing the settlement continued. Crom-
well's policies in Scotland of abolishing heritable jurisdictions and feudal
tenures, reforming law and local government and attempting greater
toleration, were more novel and radical than his Irish ones. In 1661 all
legislation since 1633 was repealed and of the Covenanters' achieve-
1
H. J. Habakkuk, 'Public Finance and Sale of Confiscated Property during the Inter-
regnum', Ec. Hiit. Rev. Vol. 15 (1962-3), pp. 70-88; 'Landowners and the Civil War',
ibid. Vol. 18 (1965), pp. 130-51.
583
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
ments virtually only the excise and the land tax remained, whereas in
England most of the legislation before 1642 survived.
There the lasting negative legacies were fear of government through
a standing army and of the exercise of executive power by Parliament
or its committees. More immediately the considerable number of men
from outside and beneath the established ruling groups in counties and
many towns who had reached positions of power meant that the disposses-
sed and slighted were determined to seek revenge and to re-establish
the old local order more firmly. Successful attempts at structural reforms
of law, church and most aspects of government seemed to be frustrated
by the complexities of English society and politics. The things which
conservative or radical gentry reformers, or those of the middling sort
wanted, seemed only to be attainable across the Atlantic: Erastian paro-
chial Anglicanism with the Prayer Book but without the real presence
of bishops in Virginia; codification of the law and laws agreeable to the
word of God along with the rule of the godly in Massachusetts; the pre-
valence and recognition of partible inheritance there and in Plymouth and
Connecticut; the setting up of popular government and toleration by
agreement in Rhode Island.
584
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER XIX
THE ENDING OF POLISH EXPANSION AND
THE SURVIVAL OF RUSSIA
I. POLAND-LITHUANIA 1609-48
N the first half of the seventeenth century the kingdom of Poland-
Lithuania was still the most important Power in the Slav world. With
an area of over 375,000 square miles (in 1618) and a population of some
8 to 9,000,000, it was smaller than Muscovite Russia, but compensated
for this inferiority by its greater political and military strength. From the
standpoint of its national composition, Poland was not homogeneous.
The Poles themselves, the largest group, comprised less than half the
total population. After them came eastern Slavs (White Russians,
Ukrainians), followed at a considerable distance by non-Slavic nationali-
ties, amongst whom the most important groups were the Lithuanians,
Germans and Jews.
Formally at least, the constitutional structure of the Polish state re-
mained by and large unchanged during this period. As in the sixteenth
century, political power lay with the king and the Diet [Sejrri], which
consisted of two houses, the Senate and the Chamber of Deputies [izba
poselska]. The Diet, as is well known, was a parliament of nobles. The
Senate was composed exclusively of high-ranking ecclesiastical and lay
dignitaries, that is 'magnates', or members of the upper aristocracy;
whilst in the Chamber of Deputies there sat, apart from some deputies
of the urban population, few representatives of the lesser nobles, the
szlachta or gentry, who constituted about one-tenth of the population.
The peasants, who comprised the overwhelming bulk of the population,
exercised no political influence whatsoever. Already in the sixteenth
century they had to a large extent forfeited their legal rights and had
become entirely dependent upon landed proprietors from the nobility.
The Diet's most important function was to share in the work of legisla-
tion, but its powers of control over the administration were also of con-
siderable significance. Its strength lay in the fact that no taxes or dues
could be levied without its consent. The balance of power between king
and Diet had tilted appreciably in the latter's favour during the course of
the sixteenth century, particularly after the extinction of the Jagellon
dynasty in 1572. At the beginning of the sixteenth century the king had
still possessed great legislative, executive and judicial authority; but one
hundred years later his powers in all these spheres had been substantially
curtailed. Originally, for instance, he could summon the Diet at his own
I
20
5"5
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
MHFDECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
discretion; but from the 1570s onwards he was obliged, by the Articuli
Heinriciani, to convoke it for a regular session once every two years.
These articles also prevented him from deciding questions of war or
peace, or summoning a general levy of gentry, without the consent of the
Sejm. As the influence of the Diet grew, so did that of the chief dignitaries
(e.g. the hetmans and the grand chancellor) in the field of foreign policy.
The scope of the sovereign's jurisdiction was severely limited by the estab-
lishment of the Crown Tribunal for the Kingdom of Poland (1578) and of a
similar institution for Lithuania three years later. These tribunals, com-
posed of members elected by the nobility at the local diets [sejmiki], acted
as the highest judicial instance in all cases concerning those belonging
to the noble class. The limitations imposed upon the royal power were
emphasized by the recognition, in the Articuli Heinriciani, of the nobles'
right in certain circumstances to offer opposition to the king. By the end
of the sixteenth century there was no doubt that the Diet was in a stronger
position than the sovereign. This development was closely connected with
the transition from hereditary to free elective monarchy after the extinc-
tion of the Jagellons; for the nobility felt it necessary to exercise stricter
control over a king who had been elected and was of foreign origin.
The dynastic policy pursued by the first two kings of Poland from the
house of Vasa (Sigismund III, 1587-1632; Wladyslaw IV, 1632-48)
served to encourage the ambitions of the szlachta and the tension between
them and the crown. The few resolutions concerning the constitution
passed by the Diet during the first half of the seventeenth century led to
further limitations upon the royal power, and in part also to an extension
of the Diet's sphere of competence. A resolution of 1607 established in
practice the standing senatorial commission [senatorowie rezydenci],
foreshadowed in the Articuli Heinriciani, to exercise control over the king;
since the commission's decisions were subject to approval by the Sejm,
the latter also secured for itself a share in this supervisory function. The
king had to submit to restrictions even in his private affairs. In 1631
members of the ruling dynasty were forbidden to acquire hereditary
estates; ten years later the reigning monarch was forbidden to travel
abroad without the Diet's consent. The king's authority suffered further
encroachment from the hetmans, who played an increasingly important
part in affairs of state. From the end of the sixteenth century onwards the
grand hetman of Poland [hetman wielki koronny], who had command of
the army in the king's absence, was appointed for life, and thus won for
himself a position of independence vis-a-vis the monarch. He soon began
to wield considerable influence upon the conduct of foreign policy; it was
he who largely controlled diplomatic relations with Turkey, the Crimean
Tartars, Moldavia, Wallachia and Transylvania. The extent to which the
grand hetman could interfere in matters of foreign policy can be gauged
from the actions of Stanislaw 2olkiewski, who when still only 'field
586
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008POLISH EXPANSION ENDS: RUSSIAN SURVIVAL
hetman' (a subordinate of the grand hetman) attempted to pursue an
independent policy towards Moscow. The grand hetman was un-
doubtedly the most powerful secular dignitary in Poland, and was even
spoken of as a 'rival' of the king.
Whilst the monarchy continued to decline, the Diet succeeded to some
degree in extending its powers. It obtained the right to confer noble rank
and indigenous status. At the same time the local assemblies [sejmiki] of
nobles in the palatinates [wojewodztwa], and in part those in the districts
and the territories [ziemie], also grew in importance. This tendency toward
decentralization of power was particularly marked in the field of taxation.
From 1613 onwards the Diet generally only fixed the quota which each
palatinate had to provide, leaving it to the local assembly to make the actual
assessments. In the 1640s the Diet even empowered local assemblies to vote
taxes quite independently, thereby enabling the palatinates to build up their
own treasuries [skarby wojewodzkie], and to become financially autono-
mous. This in turn enabled them to recruit their own armed forces, the
so-called 'district troops', or zolnierz powiatowy. These innovations
brought about not only a diminution of royal power, but a weakening of
the central government as such.
Less obvious, since they were not expressed in legislative form, but of
greater importance for the constitutional development of Poland-
Lithuania, were the social changes taking place within the politically
dominant noble class. During the seventeenth century the lesser nobility
became largely dependent upon the magnates, members of the great
families who owned vast estates and filled the highest offices in the state.
This enabled the magnates to obtain sufficient support at meetings of the
local assemblies, and at the Diet itself, to exert a decisive influence upon
their proceedings. After the collapse of Zebrzydowski's revolt (1606-7), a
rising of the szlachta directed against Sigismund III, the magnates
acquired a position of hegemony over the entire nobility. Basing their
power upon their landed properties and their private armies, they often
indulged in high-handed intervention in political matters, and even in
foreign relations, as will be discussed shortly. This accession of political
strength to the magnates undoubtedly did more to weaken the Polish
state than the decentralization of the financial system. This was most
clearly shown by the great part which the magnates played in the increas-
ingly frequent 'confederations', leagues formed by nobles, generally for
the purpose of promoting sectional interests.
During these years the monarchy made only half-hearted attempts to
counterbalance the ambitions of the nobility by strengthening the
authority of the crown. After Zebrzydowski's revolt Sigismund III
refrained for a long time from any efforts at all in this direction. It was
only in the last years of his reign (1630-2) that he endeavoured, without
success, to win the support of the Diet and the local assemblies for a
587
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
ao-aDECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
reform of the procedure adopted to elect a new sovereign, in the hope of
assuming the succession of one of his own sons. Wladyslaw IV toyed
throughout his reign with the idea of consolidating his position vis-a-vis
the nobility. The best known of his schemes is his establishment of an
order of chivalry on the Spanish model, the ' Order of the Immaculate
Conception of the Virgin Mary', which he hoped would constitute a
dependable bulwark for the monarchy within the noble class. But the
nobles reacted coolly to the idea, and all Wladyslaw's plans collapsed.
For the same reasons the military reform which he introduced achieved
only limited success. The general levy of gentry was already beginning to
lose its former importance, and was only rarely summoned. In the last
decades of the sixteenth century mercenary troops had been formed on
the western model, but they proved inadequate and soon fell into decay.
Wladyslaw IV now sought to emulate the example of other European
rulers by forming a powerful army of mercenaries dependent entirely
upon the sovereign. But the realization of this plan was frustrated by the
nobility, and except in time of war Wladyslaw had to be content with the
few thousand hired soldiers that had been available to his predecessors.
Thus the political order that was now developing in Poland-Lithuania
was the reverse of that now generally coming into being in the rest of
Europe. Whereas in most European states the absolutist regime, or at
least the central government, consolidated its position more firmly, in
Poland-Lithuania the monarchy was still further weakened, and even the
efficacy of the other central institutions undermined. One result of Poland's
deviation from the general European pattern was that now, in contrast
to the sixteenth century, she frequently met with criticism in the West.
The Polish economy still remained predominantly agricultural. The
most significant development in this field was the great expansion of
grain production (chiefly rye, whilst wheat, barley and oats were much
less important), which had begun in the previous century. This was made
possible by an extension of the sown area, which took place mainly in the
area of the Ukraine, since in the central districts of the country all
suitable land had long since been brought under cultivation. The growth
of grain production was accompanied by a decline in livestock-breeding,
especially marked in central and western Poland. Both these develop-
ments were connected with the transition by the larger proprietors from
tenant-farming to the practice of farming their estates on their own
account, mainly with serf labour. The landowners concentrated upon
growing grain, whilst the peasants devoted themselves mainly to livestock-
breeding. The more the peasants were obliged to perform compulsory
labour-services on the farms, the less they were able to tend their cattle. The
widespread use of serf labour on the landowners' estates was only feasible
because the peasants had now lost all legal rights vis-a-vis their masters.
In handicrafts, unlike agriculture, there were no notable developments;
588
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008POLISH EXPANSION ENDS: RUSSIAN SURVIVAL
and this applied also to such modest industries as Poland possessed at
this time. The most important enterprises were in Little Poland, and were
concerned with the mining of salt, lead and iron and the working of
metal. There were as yet no independent industrialists, and the whole
system of industrial production was closely bound up with large-scale
landowning. Until the middle of the century output was on the increase,
but it went almost exclusively to satisfy the domestic market.
Poland's exports consisted primarily of agricultural produce, with
grain, for obvious reasons, taking pride of place. It was now that this
trade, carried on mainly through Danzig with England and the Nether-
lands, reached its climax. Other important exports were cattle and hides,
despatched by overland routes to Germany and neighbouring countries.
Next to agricultural produce in importance came the wealth derived from
Poland's rich forests, such as timber, tar and potash; these, like grain,
were mainly exported to England and the Netherlands via the Baltic ports.
The total value of Polish exports far exceeded that of imports, which
comprised chiefly such commodities as textiles, metals and metal goods,
and fish. By and large Poland's economic development during this period
was not unfavourable. This was particularly true in the commercial field,
but from this progress the Polish middle class derived little advantage—
largely because the state continued to pursue a commercial and tariff
policy which served the interests of the nobility alone.
In ecclesiastical affairs two developments were of decisive importance:
the triumph of the Counter-Reformation at the turn of the century, and
the Union of Brest in 1596.
The first of these developments found clearest expression in the
renunciation of Protestantism by the Polish and Lithuanian nobles, which
had begun in the 1560s and reached its climax at the turn of the century.
This movement received a strong impetus after the failure of Zebrzydow-
ski's revolt, in which the rebels endorsed some of the demands put for-
ward by the non-Catholic 'dissidents'. Of the influential aristocratic
families only a few, such as the Leszczyriskis in Greater Poland and a
branch of the Radziwills in Lithuania, remained loyal—for a time—to
the cause of the Reformation. This sealed the fate of Protestantism
amongst those who were dependent upon the nobility. The peasants had
in any case generally shown little enthusiasm for the new creed. In the
towns the Protestant ranks thinned under renewed Catholic pressure. In
the 1610s and 1620s there took place in such towns as Cracow, Vilno,
Poznan and Lublin major disturbances directed against Protestant ele-
ments, in the course of which their churches and prayer-houses were
destroyed. Cracow no longer had a Protestant church at all after 1593.
Another measure employed was to deprive the dissidents of the right to
hold municipal office. It was only amongst the Germans of western
Poland, especially in the towns of Danzig, Torun (Thorn) and Elbl^g
589
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
(Elbing), that the Protestants preserved their strength. Their position
improved under Wladyslaw IV, who was less concerned to advance the
cause of the Counter-Reformation than to moderate the bitterness of the
conflict between the rival creeds. He ensured that those who participated
in religious strife were severely punished. In 1645, with the aim of calming
the passions that had been aroused, he sponsored the inter-denomina-
tional debate {colloquium charitativum) of Torun (Thorn), in which
Catholic and Protestant spokesmen took part; it did not, however,
achieve any concrete results. At the same time measures continued to be
taken against the Socinians and other radical groups. The more moderate
treatment of the dissidents in Poland after the death of Sigismund III
did not lead to a revival of Protestantism: its power had already been
broken by the triumphant Counter-Reformation. The outcome of the
religious struggle in Poland was that the overwhelming majority of Poles
recognized the authority of Rome.
The success which the Catholic church attained in Poland-Lithuania
would doubtless have been impossible had it not been reinvigorated from
within. The main role in this reinvigoration was played by the Jesuits,
who now experienced their 'golden age'. The leadership of the church
passed into the hands of militant elements. Since the Jesuits obtained
almost complete control over education, they were able to extend their
influence far beyond the immediate ecclesiastical sphere, and to inspire
wide sections of the population with the spirit of the Counter-Reforma-
tion. The favour and protection afforded to the Catholic church by the
state, especially under Sigismund III, known as 'the Polish Philip II',
gave it a position of supremacy vis-a-vis the other confessions which
it was to maintain undiminished so long as Poland continued to exist as
an independent state. Poland became the champion of Catholicism in
eastern Europe, although the struggle was fought more energetically by
Sigismund III than by his successor. The more tolerant attitude which
Wladyslaw displayed towards the dissidents led to coolness between
Poland and the Vatican, and even to a temporary breach of diplomatic
relations. Later Polish rulers returned to the policy of energetic promotion
of the Catholic cause.
Much the most important religious problem, and one which had impor-
tant consequences upon both the internal evolution and the foreign policy
of the Polish-Lithuanian state, was that of relations with the Orthodox
church, which had a strong following amongst the White Russian and
Ukrainian minorities in the eastern part of the country. The decision of
the Synod of Brest (1596) to unite the Orthodox and Roman Catholic
chutches in Poland-Lithuania was not acceptable to the whole Orthodox,
community, and a split ensued. A struggle developed between supporters
and opponents of the union, in which neither group won a decisive victory.
The opponents of the union found themselves in dire straits since all
590
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008POLISH EXPANSION ENDS: RUSSIAN SURVIVAL
Orthodox bishops except one, the bishop of Lwow, joined it; but on the
other hand the number of 'Uniates' (as adherents of the union were
called) rose only very slowly, at least until the 1620s. In White Russia the
situation changed after the murder in 1623 by ecclesiastical opponents of
Archbishop Josephat of Polock (Polotsk), an energetic champion of the
union—an act of violence which swung opinion in favour of the Uniates.
Eventually their supporters obtained a majority amongst the White
Russians, but the Orthodox church continued to command a considerable
following, especially in the Ukrainian areas of the Polish-Lithuanian
kingdom. It found its most active adherents among the gentry and lower
clergy of the south-eastern districts (Galicia, Volhynia, Kiev), the towns-
people of Kiev and, from the early 1620s onwards, the Dnieper Cossacks.
An important part in defending the Orthodox tradition was played by the
numerous 'brotherhoods' [bratstva], which sprang up in the Ukraine and
White Russia during the latter half of the sixteenth century. The members
of these societies considered it one of their most important tasks to raise
the moral and intellectual level of the Orthodox clergy. The Orthodox
also had their allies: in the Diet, for example, they and the Protestants
made common cause. In general the Orthodox church was in such a
strong position that its right to exist had to be acknowledged even by such
a zealous advocate of Catholicism as Sigismund III. In 1609 the Sejm
prescribed that Orthodox clergy should not be deprived of their offices or
livings on any pretext, and that disputes between Uniates and Orthodox
should be settled by a joint tribunal. A Diet resolution of 1618 assured the
Orthodox the right to hold religious services. But Sigismund III stub-
bornly refused to concede their main demand, to be allowed to re-establish
their own episcopal hierarchy.
It was in these circumstances that the Orthodox took the step of re-
establishing their hierarchy illegally, with the aid of the patriarchs of
Constantinople and Moscow (and probably also the Russian tsar), as
well as the Dnieper Cossacks, who were in close contact with the Ortho-
dox clergy of Kiev. In 1618 Patriarch Theophanes of Jerusalem, with the
sanction of the patriarch of Constantinople, made his way to Muscovite
Russia, where he remained until early in 1620. At the same time a Cossack
mission arrived in Moscow, and it was probably during their visit that the
crucial negotiations were held on this question. In 1620, after the Poles had
been defeated by the Turks at Tujora (September), Theophanes conse-
crated one metropolitan bishop and one archbishop, without the know-
ledge of the king or the Polish authorities; the consecration of four more
bishops followed early in 1621. This move was made in the confidence
that it would have the support of the brotherhoods and the monks, and a
certain amount of military protection from the Cossacks. Although King
Sigismund III refused to legalize the new hierarchy, he was in no position
to annul the action that had been taken.
591
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
The ecclesiastical situation that now developed in the eastern territories
was not regarded as durable either by the Uniates or by the government.
Several attempts were therefore made during the 1620s to effect a recon-
ciliation between the Uniates and the Orthodox, and to reunite them
within the framework of a single church. Plans in this spirit were dis-
cussed from 1623 onwards, largely on the initiative of the Uniates. But
these endeavours also had the backing of the king and the senators, who
feared that the religious conflict in south-eastern Poland, coupled with the
Cossack question, might well lead to serious political consequences.
Although the higher Orthodox clergy were ready to enter into negotiations,
the idea of a new union met with opposition on the part of the Cossacks—
as well as the papal Curia. The difficulties that accumulated were so great
that the joint synod of Uniates and Orthodox, called by Sigismund III for
October 1629 in Lwow, did not come about at all. Under Cossack pres-
sure the Orthodox bishops were obliged to refrain from sending any
official representatives to the meeting. So long as Sigismund III was on
the throne, the problem of the relations between the Orthodox church and
the state thus remained unsettled.
Under his successor the situation was rapidly normalized. In 1633 Petr
Mogila, who had been appointed metropolitan of Kiev the previous year,
was confirmed in his office by Wladyslaw IV. At about the same time the
king also recognized the Orthodox bishops of Mogilev-Mstislavl' and
-fcuck (Lutsk), and in 1635 the bishop of Przemysl. In addition to these
Orthodox bishoprics there existed one other, at Lwow, which had never
been in Uniate hands. The Orthodox church in Poland-Lithuania now
disposed of one metropolitanate and four bishoprics, and acquired a
recognized legal status alongside the Uniate church. Under these circum-
stances it was almost a foregone conclusion that the king should go on
to grant the non-Uniates religious liberty, which he did at his Coronation
Diet.
During the reign of Wladyslaw IV the position of the Orthodox thus
noticeably improved. There was now undoubtedly greater tranquillity
in the eastern districts of the country. In the first decades of the century
the antagonism between Uniates and Orthodox had not been entirely
free from violence (the first instance of this being the attack upon the
Uniate metropolitan Potej in 1609). This, together with the resistance
offered by Sigismund III and the secular authorities to the restoration of
the Orthodox bishoprics, had led to the Orthodox minority establishing
contact with Moscow, thereby giving the religious tension a pronounced
political flavour. But the legalization of the hierarchy now strengthened
the hand of those elements in the Orthodox community who sought to
remain loyal to the Polish state. The Orthodox educational system now
began to show itself receptive to Polish cultural influence, although there
were still continual disputes between Orthodox and Uniates over posses-
592
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008POLISH EXPANSION ENDS: RUSSIAN SURVIVAL
sion of land, church buildings and schools. Their most important griev-
ance was that they did not enjoy genuine equality of rights with the
Catholics and Uniates. The Orthodox church therefore still constituted
an element of uncertainty, especially in south-eastern Poland, as was to
become evident in 1648, when Khmelnitsky's rising broke out.
On the whole the internal situation in Poland during these years was
more favourable than in many other countries of Europe. Though there
was tension between the crown and the nobility, there was no civil war;
nor was there a prolonged war of religion, but only a number of isolated
violent incidents between the adherents of rival faiths. The country's
economy was making progress. But the peacefulness of the domestic scene
between 1609 and 1648 ought not to obscure the fact that it was precisely
at this time that Poland began to lag behind the rest of Europe.
This is clearly shown by developments in the cultural field. Whereas in
the sixteenth century religious and intellectual movements in other Euro-
pean countries had had a strong appeal for members of the upper classes
in Poland and Lithuania, they now evoked only a feeble response. This
change was due, at least in part, to the control exercised at this time by the
Jesuits over the Polish educational system. The ties with the rest of Europe
weakened. Young men now travelled abroad less frequently, and in Poland
itself foreign books became a rarity. In many spheres of intellectual
and cultural life there was stagnation. Cracow University, for example,
turned away from humanism and prescribed a narrow scholasticism.
But in some fields, such as poetry or historiography, this was still
the end of a 'golden age'. With his Chronica gestorum in Europa singu-
larium Bishop Piasecki (d. 1649) continued the tradition of the great
fifteenth-century Polish chroniclers, and brought it to a worthy climax.
As Poland's ties with the West weakened, so her attention came to be
focused more than ever upon the east. This was particularly true of the
gentry, who during the seventeenth century did much to colonize the
south-eastern districts, and thus also to extend the influence of Polish
culture beyond the borders of what was ethnically Polish territory. In the
Ukraine this was manifested most impressively in the work of the Kiev
Academy, founded by Petr Mogila in 1631. These achievements in the
east must be taken into account when assessing Polish cultural develop-
ment during this period.
In foreign policy, too, this increased concern with eastern problems
was clearly evident. The troubles which broke out in Muscovite Russia
after the extinction of the old dynasty in 1598 attracted the attention of
the Polish nobility and of the king. At first individual magnates inter-
vened on their own initiative, but later King Sigismund III also decided
to join in the struggle for power in the tsardom of Moscow.
Sigismund's objective was to win the Russian throne for himself. Polish
rule in Moscow would facilitate the newly-launched Polish drive for
593
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
expansion to the east. But at the same time he sought to extend Polish
territory at Russia's expense: Moscow was to be forced to return the
districts of Smolensk and Chernigov, ceded to her by the Jagellons in
the early sixteenth century, which were once again to be incorporated into
the Polish-Lithuanian state. Sigismund's expansionist ambitions were not
merely political and military: as a stout upholder of the Counter-Reforma-
tion, he nurtured the hope of opening up Moscow to Catholic influence.
Finally, he was motivated by purely personal and dynastic considerations:
Moscow could serve as a base for an offensive against Sweden, whereby
he might win back the throne of his ancestors. Characteristically, Sigis-
mund decided to intervene in Russia at the moment when Charles IX, his
rival on the Swedish throne, had entered into an alliance with Tsar
Vasily Shuisky.
It was inevitable that, on religious grounds alone, Sigismund's plans
should meet with strong opposition amongst the fervently Orthodox
population of Moscow. For this reason the commander of the Polish
forces in Russia, field hetman Stanistaw Ziolkiewski, sought to pursue a
more subtle policy which took account of the political and religious out-
look of the Russian upper class. He advocated that Sigismund's son
Wladyslaw, rather than the king himself, should be put forward as a
candidate for the tsardom, and that the rights of the Orthodox church
should not be infringed. Presented in this form, the idea of a union
between Poland-Lithuania and Moscow found considerable support
amongst the Russian boyars. In August 1610, when Zolkiewski appeared
with his army before the gates of Moscow, they accordingly concluded
with him an agreement for the election of Wladyslaw as tsar. This agree-
ment incorporated the assurances desired by the boyars regarding the
inviolability of the Orthodox church, and the Muscovite political and
social order in general. The pact seemed likely to succeed, for, prompted
by the boyars, a section of the Russian population swore an oath of
allegiance to Wladyslaw, and militarily the Poles were now in a strong
position in the country. In July 1610 Zolkiewski had won a resounding
victory over a Muscovite army, reinforced by Swedish troops, at Klushino
(about 120 miles north-east of Smolensk) which freed the way to Moscow;
and early in October the boyars allowed the capital, including the Krem-
lin, to be occupied by Polish forces.
It is a debatable question whether Poland, for all these military and
political successes, would have been able to carry through the plan of
union with Moscow in the face of Swedish opposition as well as the
resistance offered by those sections of the Russian population which
contested the policy of the boyars. Before this problem demanded atten-
tion, the policy of union was wrecked by the actions of Sigismund III.
With the support of a group of senators, he insisted that he himself, and
not Wtadyslaw, should accede to the Russian throne, although he had
594
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008POLISH EXPANSION ENDS: RUSSIAN SURVIVAL
already given his consent to his son's accession—apparently not in
earnest—in an undertaking given to a group of boyars in February 1610.
In view of the king's attitude, the agreement between Zolkiewski and the
Moscow boyars lapsed, and a breach inevitably ensued. The capture of
Smolensk (June 1611) revealed clearly the Poles' annexationist designs;
and this, together with the harsh repressive measures employed by the
Polish troops occupying Moscow, generated amongst the Russian popula-
tion a religious and national movement, directed primarily against the
Poles. A popular levy was formed which marched on Moscow, and in the
autumn of 1612 forced the Polish garrison in the city to capitulate. The
election of Michael Romanov as tsar early in 1613 finally destroyed the
chances of a Polish succession in Moscow.
This was an accomplished fact, which could not be altered by King
Sigismund's belated readiness, in the years that followed, to give up his
claim to the Russian throne in favour of his son. In 1617-18 Wladyslaw
undertook another campaign in the hope of bringing Moscow under
Polish rule, but the attempt failed. Moscow had now regained a measure
of internal stability, and a continuation of hostilities promised little hope
of success; furthermore, in south-eastern Poland there was trouble with
the Turks and Tartars. The campaign was therefore abandoned, and an
armistice concluded at Deulino (December 1618). This brought Poland-
Lithuania an appreciable accession of territory, for Moscow was obliged
to cede the districts of Smolensk, Starodub, Novgorod-Seversk and Cher-
nigov. This represented a considerable success for Poland, which now
had more territory than at any time since the dawn of the modern era, but
this gain was vitiated by the acute antagonism between Poland and Russia
that resulted from Sigismund's policy. Henceforward a vehemently anti-
Polish feeling was prevalent in all sections of Russian society.
When Sigismund III died (23 April 1632), Moscow took advantage of
the interregnum to try to undo the settlement of 1618, which had still
left intact Wladyslaw's claim to the Russian tsardom. In the autumn of
1632 Russian troops crossed the border and occupied several districts, but
failed to take their main objective, the city of Smolensk. Peace was con-
cluded on the River Polyanovka, near Vyaz'ma, in June 1634. The terri-
torial terms restored the status quo (except for the district of Serpeysk,
which was returned to Moscow); Wtadyslaw gave up his pretensions to
the Russian throne. On the whole, Poland-Lithuania had undoubtedly
succeeded in maintaining her position vis-a-vis Moscow; nevertheless the
balance of power was now unmistakably beginning to tilt to the advan-
tage of Russia. This development did not pose a threat until the middle
of the century: in the years immediately following, indeed, there was even
a certain rapprochement between Poland and Russian in the face of the
common danger from the Turks and Tartars. It was only after Poland
had been enfeebled by the Cossack rising of 1648 that Moscow had the
595
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
opportunity to displace her from her position of supremacy in eastern
Europe.
This shows the significance of the developments in south-eastern Poland
for her foreign policy. Poland's position along the lower Dnieper and
Dniester was governed by several factors: by her relations with Turkey,
by the attitude of the sultan's vassals, the Crimean Tartars, and in parti-
cular by the attitude of the Dnieper Cossacks, who lived in this area.
Since the sixteenth century it had been one of the cardinal principles of
Polish foreign policy to avoid a military conflict with the Porte. It was
only in Moldavia that Turkish and Polish interests clashed directly.
Poland had old claims to sovereignty over this area, which she generally
refrained from pressing, although the Polish magnates resident in the
south-eastern districts would often intervene in Moldavian affairs on their
own initiative. A more important cause of tension in Polish-Turkish
relations were the attacks made on Polish territory by the Tartars, and
the unauthorized raids undertaken against the Turks by the Cossacks,
which became more and more frequent from the latter half of the sixteenth
century onwards.
The Cossack system that existed in the south-east of the Polish-Lithu-
anian kingdom came into being during the sixteenth century as a means of
defence against the Tartar hordes; it was, indeed, as Macurek has shown,
a by-product of their proximity. Most of the Cossacks were Ukrainians,
although until the turn of the century there was also a considerable
number of Polish szlachta amongst them. The disappearance of the latter
element from the Cossack bands resulted from the fact that the Polish
gentry formed the spearhead of the advancing wave of Polish colonization
in the south-eastern palatinates. By the early seventeenth century an
acute antagonism was developing between the Cossacks on one hand
and, on the other, the Polish or Polonized gentry of these territories, and
thus also the Polish state. The state exercised control over only a small
section of the Cossacks, the so-called 'registered' Cossacks. The remain-
der retired to the lower Dnieper, and came to be known, from the location
of their fortified strongpoint below the Dnieper rapids (porogy), as Zaporog
Cossacks. Here they successfully asserted their independence against the
Polish authorities. Between 1613 and 1620, in their 'heroic age', they took
particularly vigorous action against the Tartars and Turks, even crossing
the Black Sea to carry out daring raids upon the Turkish towns on the
northern coast of Anatolia.
Since these attacks were made from territory which was at least
nominally Polish, they led to considerable tension between that country
and the Porte, and in 1617 almost to war. Actual hostilities were delayed
until the Deulino armistice freed Poland from her preoccupations in
Russia, and the Turks had concluded peace with Persia. The clash that
took place in 1620 was the first direct encounter between Poland and Tur-
596
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008POLISH EXPANSION ENDS: RUSSIAN SURVIVAL
key since the battle of Varna in 1444. One of the factors that brought the
conflict about was King Sigismund's policy in the opening phase of the
Thirty Years War: he allowed the Habsburgs to recruit in Poland bands
of irregulars, the so-called Lisowczycy, who late in 1619 helped to parry
the attack upon Upper Hungary by the sultan's vassal, Prince Bethlen
Gabor of Transylvania. But the principal cause of the war was not Sigis-
mund's cautious support for the emperor, but the continuing militancy
of the Cossacks. The Polish commander, Grand Hetman Zolkiewski,
attempted to forestall the anticipated Turkish attack by advancing into
Moldavia, but in September and October 1620 suffered catastrophic
defeats at Tujora on the Pruth and Mogilev on the Dniester. In the follow-
ing year a Polish army, aided by Cossack elements, succeeded in halting
the Turkish advance near Khotin (Chocim). It was there, in October
1621, that the war was terminated on the basis of a return to the status quo.
To have beaten off an attack by the strongest European military power of
the day was undoubtedly a notable achievement. For more than a decade
the internal struggles at the Porte and the resumption of the war between
Turkey and Persia safeguarded Poland from another Ottoman attack.
It was not until the early 1630s, when she was again involved in a struggle
with Moscow, that the Turks made another attempt upon the south-
eastern borderlands (1633). It was successfully repulsed, and peace was
restored in the following year.
But although Poland could defend this area against the Turks, she was
unable to control it effectively or establish ordered conditions. It was still
exposed to Tartar attack, and the Cossack question remained unsolved.
The continual Tartar raids upon the south-eastern palatinates could be
eliminated only by subjugating the Crimean Tartars and the other Tartar
hordes that roamed the western shore of the Black Sea. But Poland was no
more able to undertake such action than Muscovite Russia. In 1628-9 the
Dnieper Cossacks intervened in the Tartars' internal feuds and in this
way attempted to bring the Crimea under their influence, but without
success. Conquest of the Tartars would have been feasible only in the
event of a decisive Polish victory over the suzerain Power, the Ottoman
Empire. Towards the end of his life Wladyslaw IV did contemplate a
major attack upon the Turks, but the other Powers whose support he had
hoped to obtain held back, and so did the Sejm. Thus for various reasons
the Tartars were not confronted with effective counter-measures, and
throughout the first half of the seventeenth century south-eastern Poland
was still exposed to their raids. Some contemporary observers considered
that the extent of this evil could have been diminished if the szlachta of the
south-eastern districts had constituted a more efficient military force.
The second problem was still more important. The Cossack com-
munity had become more powerful than was compatible with the interests
of the Polish state. In 1625 and 1630 they revolted, and severe measures of
597
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
repression were taken against them. But these did not suffice to make the
Zaporog Cossacks bow to the authority of the state. On the contrary,
it was now that the antagonism between the Cossacks and the central
government was becoming intensified by the religious issue. From the
1620s onwards the Cossacks came to regard themselves as defenders of
the Orthodox faith against the attempts of Polish Catholics to promote
ecclesiastical union. After the Cossack insurrection of 1637-8 the Polish
state summoned up the determination to take energetic action against
both the Zaporog and the registered Cossacks, which brought a decade
of relative calm. In this era of'golden peace' Polish colonists, led by a few
magnate families, and in particular the Wisnowieckis, rapidly extended
their authority in the lands beyond the Dnieper. But some of the Zaporog
Cossacks remained beyond the government's reach, and even the measures
of 1638-9 (which included, for example, the rebuilding of the strong fort
of Kodak on the Dnieper) did not serve to subdue the Cossacks com-
pletely. Being mainly of peasant origin, the Cossacks came to develop a
burning hatred for the gentry and magnates whom they identified with
Polish rule. Early in 1648, led by Bohdan Khmernitsky, the Cossacks
rose in a great revolt. This insurrection revealed the true character of the
situation in the south-eastern districts: in part of this area Polish rule was
so precarious that it collapsed, never to be restored.
These wellnigh incessant conflicts with the Tartars and Cossacks were
a great drain on the resources of the Polish state. Indeed, the situation in
the south-eastern territories was to have fateful consequences for Poland.
In the 1650s the struggle against the Cossacks triggered off a succession of
prolonged and burdensome wars which did much to bring about Poland's
decline as a European Power.
Poland's preoccupations with eastern problems during the first two
decades of the seventeenth century meant that she had in general to con-
fine herself to defensive action in the north, where she faced the Swedish
drive for control of the Baltic. During the previous period there had
developed a certain rivalry between the two countries over Livonia, which
formed part of the wider breach between Catholic and Protestant Europe.
But the tension only became dangerously acute as a result of the conflict
within the Vasa dynasty, which from 1587 onwards ruled in Poland as
well as Sweden. Sigismund III (1587-1632), the first Vasa to occupy the
Polish throne, was recognized as king of Sweden in 1592 on the death of
his father, John III, but seven years later was deposed by the Swedish Diet
on the grounds that he resided permanently in Poland, and in 1604 his
uncle, Charles of Sodermanland, acceded to the Swedish throne as
Charles IX. Sigismund, however, refused to reconcile himself to the loss
of his hereditary rights. The dynastic struggle which thus developed was
to weigh heavily upon relations between the two countries until the peace
of Oliva in 1660. In the early years of the century it gave rise to fighting
598
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008POLISH EXPANSION ENDS: RUSSIAN SURVIVAL
in Livonia. Under Charles IX's successor, his son Gustavus Adolphus,
the war received a new impetus, and came to be waged on a far more
extensive scale than hitherto. Sweden had now become a formidable
military power, and her new king set himself far-reaching political
objectives: control of the whole southern coast of the Baltic, from Ingria
to northern Germany. However, the Polish nobility continued to regard
the conflict between the two sovereigns as an essentially dynastic matter,
and it was not until Livonia had been lost that they gave more resolute
support to Sigismund in his struggle against Sweden. At this time it was
not in the interests of the dominant class in Polish society to engage in a
struggle for the Baltic; instead the nobles, as we have seen, had their eyes
fixed upon the east.
As soon as the Peace of Stolbovo in February 1617 put an end to the
hostilities between Sweden and Moscow, Gustavus Adolphus launched
his attack upon Sigismund. In the summer of that year his troops marched
into Livonia. Poland still had her hands tied by Wladyslaw's campaign
in Russia, and was alarmed at the threat of an attack by the Turks and
Tartars. In 1618, faced with this trying military and diplomatic situation,
Sigismund thought it wiser to agree to an armistice, even at the price of
ceding some territory in Livonia. Three years later the Swedish king
resumed his Livonian offensive. Once again Poland was preoccupied
elsewhere, for the war with Turkey was still in progress. In September
1621 Riga fell, and in 1625 the Swedes occupied the rest of Livonia.
During the intervening years the Poles had had a favourable opportunity
to counter-attack; but the Diet had refused the necessary funds, and the
chance had been missed.
In 1626, as a result of this success, Gustavus Adolphus could proceed
with an attack upon Royal Prussia (West Prussia). Now even the central
districts of Poland were exposed to the threat of Swedish attack. This
dangerous turn of events impelled the Diet to grant the sum required to
augment the size of the Polish army. But although this time Poland was
not hampered by campaigns against other external enemies, Sigismund
failed to repel the Swedish attack. In July Gustavus Adolphus landed
at Pillau and from there penetrated into the northern part of
Warmia (Ermland) and the Vistula-Nogat delta. Except for Danzig, the
whole coastline was under his control. Nor could the Polish armies
prevent the Swedes from registering further successes. In 1628 they threa-
tened Grudzi^dz (Graudenz) and Toruri (Thorn); by the early months of
1629, after the Polish defeat of Gorzno, a Swedish drive into central
Poland had come within the bounds of possibility. The threat was averted
only by the arrival of a relief corps despatched by Wallenstein.
Neither of the belligerent Powers, however, was able to score a decisive
victory. The Poles only accepted aid from the emperor with some hesita-
tion, since they feared possible imperial claims to west Prussia, and the
599
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
gentry, who looked askance at Sigismund's policy, were pressing for
negotiations with the Swedes. Gustavus Adolphus, for his part, was
anxious to shift his attention as soon as possible to the German theatre of
hostilities. Both France and England were deeply interested in obtaining
effective Swedish intervention in Germany, and it was through their
mediation that the six-year armistice of Altmark (near Malborg [Marien-
burg]) came about in September 1629. This agreement gave the Swedes
all Livonia except a few districts in the south-east; in Royal Prussia
they won possession of all the ports apart from Danzig and Puck (Putzig),
and in the dukedom of Prussia (East Prussia) almost the entire coastline
except for Koenigsberg. The treaty was a severe blow to Poland; yet the
Diet ratified it without turning a hair.
The difficulties in which the Swedes found themselves in Germany
after the death of Gustavus Adolphus afforded Poland a chance to effect
a revision of the settlement of 1629. Negotiations held during 1635 led
to the Treaty of Stuhmsdorf, which provided for a twenty-six year armis-
tice. Poland regained what she had lost in Prussia, but in Livonia had to
sanction a continuation of the territorial status quo. Nothing was said in
the terms of this agreement about the dynastic conflict, and Wladyslaw
maintained his claim to the Swedish crown. The Polish nobles, however,
had little or no sympathy with his ambitions, and refused to contemplate
a war with Sweden for the reconquest of Livonia. Consequently no further
developments took place in Polish-Swedish relations during the remaining
phases of the Thirty Years War.
The struggle with Sweden, which with a few intermissions had lasted
throughout the first three decades of the century, weakened Poland's
position both directly, through the loss of Livonia, and indirectly, by
consolidating the rule of the Brandenburg Hohenzollerns in the dukedom
of Prussia. Already in 1611 the elector of Brandenburg, John Sigismund,
had secured from the Polish king and Diet recognition of his claim to
inherit the fief of Prussia. This ensured that Prussia should pass to the
Brandenburg branch of the Hohenzollern dynasty, and in 1618, on the
death of the weak-minded Albert Frederick, the last duke of the Prussian
line, he was succeeded by John Sigismund. When he died the following
year the fief passed, in conformity with a previous agreement, to the
new elector of Brandenburg, George William—although only after some
delay, for it was not until September 1621 that he was granted title to his
fief. It was impossible for Poland to prevent his succession, even if she
had wanted to do so, since she was preoccupied with the Swedes in Livonia,
and the new elector had gained the support of the Prussian Estates. When
George William died in 1640, Poland offered no opposition to the succes-
sion of the great elector, who secured his fief in October 1641. By and
large the relations between Poland and the dukedom of Prussia show that
in Poland the ruling class had no lasting interest in the struggle for Baltic
600
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008POLISH EXPANSION ENDS: RUSSIAN SURVIVAL
supremacy. In the 1640s Poland even disbanded the small navy which
she had begun to build during the two preceding decades, and both the
harbours that had been constructed for it, Kazimierzowo and Wlady-
slawowo, were allowed to fall into decay.
Poland's attitude towards the course of events in central and western
Europe was largely determined by the alliance between the Polish Vasas
and the Habsburgs. This carried on a tradition dating back to the days of
the Jagellons, for since the early sixteenth century Poland had maintained
peaceful relations with Austria, thus ensuring tranquillity along her
western border. The alliance of 1613 came about naturally, as a result of
the common opposition of both signatories to Sweden and the Ottoman
Empire. Although it contained no explicit military obligations, it sufficed
to keep Poland well disposed towards the Habsburg camp throughout the
Thirty Years War. During the early phases of this struggle the pro-
Austrian policy pursued by the Polish king was not devoid of military
significance. As already mentioned, the Lisowczycy recruited in Poland
by the Habsburgs rendered useful service against Prince Bethlen Gabor
of Transylvania. Subsequently these irregular troops were employed by
the emperor in Bohemia and in other theatres of war. But towards the
end of the 1620s the Poles themselves were so hard pressed by Gustavus
Adolphus that they had to request the emperor for military support.
Sigismund's successor continued the policy of the Austrian alliance.
The treaty of 1613 was renewed in 1633, and in March 1637 relations
with the Habsburgs were further strengthened by the conclusion of a
purely dynastic compact, sealed by Wiadyslaw's marriage to the Arch-
duchess Cecilie Renate, a daughter of Ferdinand II. But despite the
Austrian alliance Poland did not take an active part in the Thirty Years
War. Wladyslaw sought to mediate between the belligerents, but his
efforts were totally unsuccessful, for Poland had ceased to be a significant
factor in the struggle for power in central Europe. This remained the case
even after Wladyslaw's rapprochement with France, which found expres-
sion in the king's marriage in 1645 to a French princess, Louise Marie of
Gonzaga-Nevers. (His first wife, Cecilie Renate, had died the previous
year.)
Taken as a whole, during the first half of the seventeenth century
Poland's international position deteriorated significantly, despite the
successes achieved in the struggle against Moscow and the repulse of the
Turks. Not only the dangerous situation in the south-east, but also the
growth of Swedish power, presented major threats to Poland's existence.
It was Sweden which, with France, emerged as the victor in the Thirty
Years War; and the outcome of this struggle, though strictly speaking
not an actual defeat for Poland, did represent a weakening of her position.
The international developments of these years paved the way for Poland's
decline, which set in after the middle of the seventeenth century.
601
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
2. RUSSIA
1613-45
During the reign of Michael Feodorovich (1613-45), first tsar of the
Romanov dynasty, Russia made a slow and painful recovery from the
devastation wrought by the 'Time of Troubles'. The peasants and Cos-
sacks who had risen in revolt against the encroachment of serfdom
lacked the ability to construct a new social order. After years of anarchy
and civil war the country was exhausted; political passions were subsiding,
and there was a general desire for a return to normality and order. Foreign
intervention had stimulated national sentiment, expressed most forcibly
in the successes of the popular levy [opolcheniye], which in the course of
1612 split the rebel Cossack forces, regained possession of the capital, and
established a shadowy authority over most of the country. But the prob-
lems it faced were formidable in the extreme: Moscow lay in ruins;
Novgorod and the north-west were occupied by the Swedes, and along the
western border Polish armies were active; bands of fugitive peasants,
Cossacks and Tartars freely roamed the countryside, burning and
pillaging; over wide areas trade was at a standstill, and villages lay
desolate and empty, silent witnesses to the cataclysmic violence of the
storm that had swept over Russia. The Troubles had cost some two and
a half million lives.
In January 1613 a national assembly [Zemsky Sobor] met to elect a new
tsar. Apart from the peasantry, all social groups were represented. As was
to be expected, the gathering was dominated by those elements most
prominent in the opolcheniye: provincial serving men, townspeople and
Cossacks. But considerable influence was also exerted surreptitiously by
the clergy and such of the aristocratic boyars whose political reputation
permitted them to be present. The debates were prolonged and acri-
monious. A decision had first to be taken with regard to the Polish and
Swedish candidates. Wiadyslaw's belated expedition to Moscow (October
1612) had finally destroyed any chance he still possessed of acceding to
the throne of the tsars by popular consent. Prince Charles Philip of Sweden
was less unpopular, but the Swedish court delayed his departure for
Russia, and this proved fatal to his cause. The new tsar had thus to be a
born Russian. But there was no obviously suitable candidate among the
senior boyar families, many of which were compromised by their collab-
oration with the Poles. Attention gradually focused upon the sixteen-
year-old Michael Romanov. The role played by his father in the Troubles 1
1
Michael's father, Feodor Nikitich Romanov, was a nephew by marriage of Ivan
Grozny. Under Boris Godunov the family had been persecuted, and Feodor Romanov
forced to take vows as a monk (Filaret). During Shuisky's reign he had accepted service
with the second pretender as his patriarch. After participating in the events leading to
Shuisky's overthrow (1610), he had headed the Russian delegation sent to Smolensk to
negotiate the accession of Wladyslaw. Here his stubborn refusal to accept Polish terms had
led to his imprisonment, which was destined to last until 1619.
602
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008POLISH EXPANSION ENDS: RUSSIAN SURVIVAL
made the family popular with Cossacks as well as with serving men, and
the genealogical connection with the old dynasty was close enough to
satisfy legitimist sentiment. Michael's youth and inexperience told
rather in his favour: personally uncommitted to any faction, he could
serve as a symbol of reconciliation and national unity. On 21 February
(O.S.) he was proclaimed tsar.
Michael showed an understandable reluctance to assume the burdens of
office. The idea of an elected ruler accorded ill with Muscovite traditions,
and it seemed uncertain whether his subjects, whose intellectual horizons
had been broadened by recent events, would willingly submit to his
authority, and pay him the almost religious veneration granted to heredi-
tary sovereigns. His first actions revealed an acute anxiety to strengthen
his authority vis-a-vis the provisional government and the Sobor. But
fortunately for the new dynasty these apprehensions proved exaggerated.
The clergy assiduously spread the view that the tsar owed his crown to
divine intervention, and was responsible to God alone. The upsurge of
popular initiative expressed in the opolcheniye was not sustained; tradition
reasserted itself, and Russian society relapsed into its old passivity. The
national unity briefly achieved at the Sobor vanished almost immediately,
and the various social groups abandoned themselves to the pursuit of
their respective sectional interests. The men who suddenly found them-
selves thrust to the forefront of Russian political life did not attempt to
consolidate their new position in constitutional form, 1 but hastened
to divest themselves of their responsibilities.
The Sobor remained in existence during the early years of the reign,
but it was apparently less representative, and certainly less authoritative,
than it was in 1613. It collaborated with the government in issuing some
(but not all) decrees, appeals and exhortations, but exercised no indepen-
dent initiative. In effect it served as camouflage: the government exploited
its moral authority to render more palatable unpopular decisions taken
elsewhere. Power in these years lay with a clique of boyars, most of whom
were related to the new dynasty, assisted by powerful officials—'ignorant
youths' and 'ravenous wolves', as they were termed by a contemporary
Dutch observer, 'all of whom without distinction rob and ruin the
people'. Patriots who had served in the opolcheniye were ousted in favour
of men with dubious records. Michael himself, a colourless personality,
exercised no authority, and the new regime acquired an unenviable
reputation for corruption and maladministration. It was incapable of
dealing effectively with the many urgent questions with which it was
confronted.
1
The once prevalent view that Michael's powers were limited on his accession by agree-
ment with the boyars is not supported by the available evidence. It may be considered a
rationalization of popular discontent at governmental practices during the early years of
the reign. The most that can be said is that the tsar may have given some informal promise
not to abuse his power by engaging in personal feuds.
603
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Of these the most pressing was the need for revenue. The treasury was
empty, but the claims upon its resources limitless. The cadastral survey,
the basis of taxation in normal times, had been rendered totally un-
realistic by devastation and depopulation. It was nevertheless pressed
into service, with the result that those communities which still had a
minimum of resources were reduced to the general level of misery.
Petitions for reassessment poured in, but the government shrank from a
fundamental reform, and resorted instead to such desperate expedients as
forced loans and 'fifth moneys' (levied arbitrarily upon capital as well as
income), the burden of which fell chiefly upon the hard-pressed towns-
people. The landowners, on the other hand, often succeeded in evading
their fiscal obligations by securing favourable reassessments, bribing the
local surveyors to grant them exemption and to confirm their rights to
land they had illegally appropriated. There now occurred a general
scramble for property, in which the wealthiest elements—siVnye lyudi
(literally, 'strong men'), as they came to be called—were naturally the
most successful. The area under private landownership greatly increased,
especially in the centre and south, and a great many estates changed
hands. The government was in no position to control this process, and in
fact assisted it by making lavish grants to the gentry of crown estates, and
more particularly of 'black' (i.e. peasant) 1 land. Never was the loyalty of
the serving men more essential than now, when Russia's national integrity
was at stake.
Early in 1614 Moscow regained control of the lower Volga from the
rebel Cossack leader Zarutsky, who had retired with his small force to
Astrakhan. The last embers of the Time of Troubles were now extin-
guished, although some years elapsed before the government could finally
suppress the ubiquitous bandit gangs, often several thousand strong, that
terrorized much of the country. Even the far north was not spared. In the
vast forests concealment was no problem, and the troops sent in pursuit
were cumbersome in manoeuvre and unreliable. Sometimes bandits dis-
posed of foreign bases and support: in 1615-16 the Polish guerrilla chief
Lisowski entered Russian territory, swept around Moscow, leaving a trail
of destruction behind him, and returned almost unscathed to Polish soil.
Fortunately for Russia, her two western adversaries were themselves at
loggerheads, and could be engaged singly. The rejection of Charles Philip's
candidature left the small Swedish occupation force in Novgorod in an
exposed position. The local population harboured autonomist sym-
pathies, but were not separatist. Refusing Gustavus Adolphus' demand
that they should swear allegiance to him, they secretly established contact
with Moscow; reprisals by the occupying authorities stimulated the spirit
of resistance. In 1615 the Swedish king landed in Russia and laid siege to
Pskov, but the inhabitants of the ancient city offered a stout defence.
1
See below, pp. 607, 617.
604
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008POLISH EXPANSION ENDS: RUSSIAN SURVIVAL
England, keenly conscious of her commercial interests in Russia, res-
ponded to Tsar Michael's plea for aid by despatching Sir John Merrick
to facilitate a mediated settlement. Negotiations, punctuated by inter-
mittent warfare, dragged on throughout 1616, until in February of the
following year peace was signed at Stolbovo, a village near Lake Ladoga.
Sweden, recognizing the inevitable, surrendered her claim to the Russian
crown and (in return for an indemnity) to Novgorod, but retained the
Ingrian fortresses, thus cutting Russia off from direct access to the Baltic.
Henceforward, until the days of Peter the Great, Archangel was Russia's
only port. Stolbovo was a bitter pill, but in her present state of exhaustion
Russia could not hope for better terms, and she desperately needed peace
to face a new threat of invasion by her principal enemy, Poland.
Wladyslaw refused to admit that the situation in Russia had changed
with Michael's accession, and believed that a show of strength would
suffice to win the throne for himself. However, the Diet would not sanction
a bold stroke on his part whilst Poland was preoccupied with more
dangerous neighbours, Turkey and Sweden. The emperor, too, urged
peace with Russia, and sent a representative to mediate in the talks held
on the border in 1615. The conference broke down largely because both
Russia and Poland, for reasons of strategy and prestige, insisted on
possession of the key city of Smolensk, which a Russian army had just
tried in vain to recapture. Inconclusive frontier skirmishing followed until,
in the autumn of 1617, Wladyslaw succeeded in mounting a rather half-
hearted invasion of Russia. Though he had only limited forces at his
command, his appearance seemed to hypnotize Moscow into immobility.
The government feared that active defensive measures, necessitating fur-
ther sacrifices from the exhausted population, would stimulate opposition.
Vyaz'ma surrendered without resistance, and Wladyslaw, after wintering
in Russia, was allowed to continue his languid advance eastwards. Whilst
he invested Mozhaisk, 20,000 Dnieper Cossacks swept up to his assistance,
and in the last days of September he appeared before the gates of Moscow.
An attempt to take the city by surprise failed. Despite the weakness of
Russian resistance, it was plain that the country had no desire for Polish
rule. The approach of winter and mutinous outbreaks on both sides
induced the two combatants to terminate a campaign from which neither
derived glory or advantage.
In December 1618 an armistice was signed at Deulino, north-west of
Moscow, to last fourteen years. Russia ceded Smolensk and a broad belt
of territory along her western border. Unlike Stolbovo, Deulino did not
lead to an enduring settlement. Wladyslaw's refusal to surrender his
claim to the throne made a resumption of hostilities inevitable. But for the
present, at least, a valuable breathing-space had been gained. Moreover,
the Poles had lost their greatest opportunity: never again would their
armies penetrate into the heart of Russia.
605
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
The exchange of prisoners agreed upon at Deulino enabled Filaret to
return to Moscow (June 1619). Almost immediately he was installed as
patriarch. The head of the Russian church traditionally enjoyed con-
siderable authority in secular matters; as father of the tsar, Filaret's
position was naturally one of exceptional power. In theory, Russia now
became a dyarchy, with Michael and his father as joint and equal sove-
reigns. In practice Filaret, whose strong personality completely eclipsed
that of his weak-willed son, was now the absolute master of Russia, and his
authority remained supreme and unchallenged until his death in 1633.
His position somewhat resembled that of Richelieu; but he differed from
his great contemporary in the source of his ideas. Filaret had no sym-
pathy with the Latin or semi-secularized culture of the West, but looked
for inspiration to the Byzantine traditions of the Russian past. Upbringing
and temperament had not endowed him with breadth of vision. His aim
was to restore rather than to reform: to patch up the shattered framework
of Russian society and, by steering an impartial course between com-
peting pressures, to establish the autocracy upon a new pinnacle of emi-
nence. Under his firm hand government policy, whilst it did not change
direction, acquired a new consistency and sense of purpose.
The implementation of Filaret's programme necessitated the centraliza-
tion and systematization of the administrative apparatus. The court
reverted to the elaborate semi-religious ceremonial of former times, with
hundreds of nobles waiting upon the tsar. Filaret's own court, which
rivalled that of the tsar in Oriental splendour, was also a centre of political
life. Informal gatherings held here, attended by favoured members of all
the articulate classes, served to keep the ruling group in touch with the
popular mood. The Zemsky Sobor thus became superfluous. The Council
[Duma] of Boyars likewise wielded little power. Filaret ruled through the
bureaucracy: the most important offices [prikazy] were headed by his
intimate associates, including even the so-called 'investigating' [sysknye]
offices which, to assuage popular discontent, were established expressly
to check abuses by the 'strong men'. The arbitrariness of the Muscovite
administration was legendary. The work of government was largely
carried on in response to petitions; in taking decisions, the authorities
paid more heed to the wealth and influence of the supplicant than to the
merits of his plea or to abstract principles of justice. Officials were
ignorant of the laws, which were chaotic and contradictory. Filaret
ordered each prikaz to maintain a register of legislation relevant to its
field of competence, but did not attempt to codify the law—let alone to
separate judicial from administrative procedure. At the provincial level,
each district [uyezd] was now normally governed by a 'commander'
[voyevoda] with full military and civil power. He received no salary, but
was expected to maintain himself by 'gifts' from the local population.
This allowed the voyevody ample scope for every conceivable abuse,
606
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008POLISH EXPANSION ENDS: RUSSIAN SURVIVAL
particularly in the remoter areas. In 1627, in an effort to control them, the
government decreed the general introduction of elected gubnye starosty; 1
but in practice these popular representatives degenerated into submissive
agents of the 'commanders'. The elected authorities of the peasant com-
munities also declined in importance, particularly on private estates,
where the landowner wielded absolute power. Elsewhere, they served as
convenient instruments for raising taxes: if a community defaulted, the
elder and his electors were held responsible, and were mercilessly beaten
by government agents until they paid.
Fiscal matters were still the main preoccupation of this powerful
bureaucratic instrument. Within a few days of Filaret's return a nation-
wide survey was ordered of land and other sources of wealth, with the
aim of reconstructing the cadastre, stopping tax evasion, and making
possible an equitable redistribution of fiscal burdens. But the survey did
not embrace monasteries and other holders of charters of privileges,
whose ancient rights were now confirmed (although in most cases on a
less generous scale). Moreover, the surveyors were not properly guided or
controlled, and were generally unfit to perform their complex and
delicate task. The few who conscientiously attempted to obey their
instructions, and to describe matters as they found them truthfully and
fearlessly, found their efforts frustrated by the absence of uniform criteria
of assessment: thus, for example, towns at an approximately equivalent
standard of prosperity might be taxed at grossly different rates. In the
face of obstruction by landowners, who refused to allow surveyors to
check the veracity of their declarations, the government made an impor-
tant concession: in areas where private landowning was general, surveyors
were told not to attempt an assessment of actual resources, but to con-
tent themselves with the purely mechanical task of registering the number
of peasant households; a group of households of specified size was
henceforward to constitute a taxable unit. The landowners subsequently
(1631-2) pressed for a reduction in the norms fixed; and since this was a
moment of national emergency, the government again gave way.
There now emerged a clear distinction between, on the one hand, the
townspeople and 'black' peasants, subject to heavy direct taxation and,
on the other hand, the privately owned peasants, who generally paid
less tax, but rendered dues to their landowners. This differentiation
(which was geographical as well as social) had the effect of making the
survey virtually useless for revenue-raising purposes. The results of this
vast operation failed to justify the efforts expended, and the government
again had to rely mainly upon sources of income other than direct taxa-
tion, which were necessarily less predictable and less equitable. Of these
1
Authorities with jurisdiction over criminal matters (especially banditry), chosen by the
entire population of the uyezd from amongst the local gentry. They had existed in some
areas since the days of Ivan Grozny.
607
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
the most important (apart from the ruinous 'fifths', again levied twice
during the war years 1632-4) were internal customs duties and the spirits
monopoly. The state taverns, often farmed out annually to concessionaires
who undertook to provide a fixed sum in advance, proved highly profit-
able to the treasury, but most injurious to popular well-being, and were
largely to blame for the extensive drunkenness that was one of the con-
spicuous features of the Muscovite social scene. The state also inter-
mittently monopolized trade in certain commodities, much to the detri-
ment of private commerce.
The cadastral survey had military as well as fiscal aims: to bring
order into the chaos that reigned in the ownership of landed property—
for the heart of the Russian army was still the primitive cavalry force
mobilized by the gentry, who in return for compulsory service were
granted estates on conditional tenure [pomestyct]. The government sought
to ensure that all landowners were registered for service, and that holdings
corresponded as closely as possible to official entitlements. Where
necessary, excess land was confiscated and re-allocated, and landless
gentry allotted new estates. But in the central districts the reserves of
'black' land were now virtually exhausted, and in 1627 grants of court
land were suspended, ostensibly for the same reason; the extensive
possessions of the church enjoyed the powerful protection of Patriarch
Filaret. The only alternative was to encourage the gentry to make better
use of their existing land or to extend the area of cultivation. Tentative
steps were taken in this direction, but with disappointing results. The
pomestye system itself hindered the gentry from acquiring a more rational
economic outlook: engaged in service for long periods, they regarded
their estates less as homes than as means of rapid enrichment. The govern-
ment, therefore, whilst maintaining strictly the principle of obligatory
service, allowed pomestye-holders to strengthen their property rights. In
certain circumstances pomestya could be occupied by the widows or
children of deceased or incapacitated serving men, and could be exchanged
or given as dowries—though not, of course, bought or sold. This was
possible only in the case of estates in full ownership [votchiny]. But many
pomestye-holders succeeded in obtaining such land, by purchase or even
by direct government grant.
These measures helped to improve the social status of the gentry, but
their soldierly qualities remained alarmingly low. They received virtually
no training, and the same was true of the infantry [streVtsy], who between
campaigns eked out a modest living as traders and artisans. Yet the need
for efficient and properly equipped troops was obvious. In 1630 the govern-
ment began to form regiments on the western model, recruited locally
but officered by mercenaries engaged in the Protestant countries of
northern Europe; by 1632 such units comprised one-third of Russia's
military effectives. A still more radical, and unjustifiably extravagant,
608
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008POLISH EXPANSION ENDS: RUSSIAN SURVIVAL
innovation was the hiring of a 5,ooo-strong contingent of foreign infantry-
men (1631). Orders were placed in England and elsewhere for equipment
and munitions; in Moscow itself cannon were cast, and at Tula A.
Vinnius, a Dutchman, founded an arms works, the first tender shoot of
Russian industry.
The object of this military consolidation was a war with Poland, the
prospect of which dominated Moscow's foreign policy during Filaret's
supremacy. Across the border the Russian-speaking Orthodox population
seethed with discontent, and the Dnieper Cossacks in particular were
developing a strong religious and national consciousness. But Filaret was
cautious about utilizing this potentially most effective weapon, and
received coolly the idea, mooted by emissaries from Kiev, that the
Ukraine (as it was later known) might accept the tsar's protection.
Moscow hesitated to provoke her powerful neighbour by intervening in
her internal affairs, though she welcomed an opportunity of exploiting her
external difficulties. In 1621, when Poland, reeling after her defeat at
Tujora, was under simultaneous attack from north and south, Filaret
expressed interest in a Turkish plan for concerted operations, and called a
Zemsky Sobor, which obediently endorsed the idea of war. However,
the Poles' resounding victory at Khotin, and the subsequent cessation of
hostilities against both Turkey and Sweden, transformed the inter-
national situation and compelled Russia to renounce her plans.
Fortunately for her this rashness went unpunished. Filaret now moved
more circumspectly, endeavouring to strengthen links with other non-
Catholic Powers. Merrick's diplomacy had increased Russia's regard for
England, and the idea of an alliance, which dated back to the days of
Ivan Grozny, was raised by successive envoys to London. In 1623
James I unexpectedly signed the draft of a treaty, but to Moscow's
chagrin it never came into force. The interests of the two countries were
too far apart: whilst Russia sought political support, England was mainly
concerned to maintain her extensive commercial privileges. Moscow's
initiatives met with much the same response in the Netherlands, which
had now displaced England in the White Sea trade.
Of all the northern countries Sweden, as Russia's nearest Protestant
neighbour and the enemy of Poland, was best placed to be her ally. But
memories of the intervention were still fresh, and although Gustavus
Adolphus, who recognized the advantages of Russian support in realizing
his designs, twice proposed the conclusion of a defensive alliance, the
offers were rejected. Nevertheless, relations remained close, and in 1631
Sweden became the first country to establish permanent diplomatic
representation in Moscow. In return for supplies of grain and saltpetre,
Gustavus Adolphus facilitated the recruitment of mercenaries for service
in Russia. Filaret even agreed to a somewhat unrealistic scheme whereby
Russia was to finance an attack on Poland from the west by an interna-
609
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
tional contingent under Swedish command, to synchronize with the
Russian attack from the east. Had the plan taken effect, it would have
involved Russia in the general European conflagration, from which dis-
tance and religious differences had hitherto kept her aloof. But Lutzen
intervened, and Swedish-Russian amity lapsed.
Filaret had even less success in gaining the co-operation of Poland's
other constant enemy, Turkey. In 1627 the Turkish envoy gave a verbal
promise of military assistance, but this was not considered binding at the
Porte. For most Ottoman functionaries the war in Asia had priority over
the conflict with Poland. Turkey could only welcome a Russo-Polish
conflict, which would weaken both combatants, and had no reason to
lighten Moscow's task. Moreover, both the warring European camps,
for opposite reasons, wished to prevent a Turkish attack on Poland, and
brought their influence to bear in Constantinople.
Russia was thus diplomatically ill prepared for the conflict upon which
she now embarked. The prospect of an interregnum upon the death of
Sigismund III (April 1632) encouraged her to attack before the Deulino
armistice expired. An army of 32,000 men was assembled and placed
under the command of M. B. Shein. Its advance was delayed until the
autumn by a Crimean Tartar raid, but by the end of the year the principal
towns ceded in 1618 had fallen into Russian hands—except Smolensk, to
which Shein laid siege. Having held the city against the Poles twenty-one
years before, he had an exaggerated respect for its defences, and acted in
desultory fashion. The guerrilla movement which sprang up locally
showed more spirit, but the conservative-minded military command,
fearing a resurgence of social conflict, treated its leaders as dangerous
rebels. The Russian invasion served to consolidate Polish opinion behind
the new king, Wladyslaw IV, who marched to the relief of beleaguered
Smolensk, and in October 1633 even succeeded in encircling Shein's vastly
superior forces. By timely concessions Wladystaw had ensured the
support of the Dnieper Cossacks, who had been disillusioned by Moscow's
failure to come to their aid during their recent revolt and tactless en-
croachments into their territory by the invading armies. The morale of the
Russian troops, already low, deteriorated further when the Crimean
Tartars, encouraged by the Poles, launched a major attack upon the
undefended southern borderlands. The gentry deserted en masse for their
estates, and the reinforcements which Shein had been promised had to be
diverted. Disease was rife amongst his men, and his foreign officers,
aggrieved by their hardships and the military reverses, showed signs of
disloyalty. Ceding to their pressure, Shein accepted an armistice (February
1634) whereby his remaining 8,000 men were permitted to retire, after
laying down their arms and standards at Wladyslaw's feet.
Discontent was widespread at the conduct and outcome of the war and
the added burdens it had imposed. Filaret had died (October 1633), and
610
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008POLISH EXPANSION ENDS: RUSSIAN SURVIVAL
the ruling group of boyars, amongst whom the war had never been
popular, sought a scapegoat. Shein had aroused their jealousy by his
overbearing manner, and as the only member of Filaret's circle of inti-
mates not related to the dynasty, his position was particularly exposed.
Accused of treason, he was tried in secret and executed. But responsibility
for the debacle lay rather with the government, for having blundered so
recklessly into war. In central Europe there was now a lull in the fighting,
and in the Balkans the anticipated major Turkish offensive failed to
materialize. The Smolensk war proved that Moscow was not yet strong
enough to prevail over Poland in isolation, and without support from
internal dissident elements.
But though the war had been lost, the ensuing peace, signed on the
River Polyanovka in May 1634, brought Russia significant gains. The
territorial status quo was restored, but was rendered palatable by the
acquisition (against financial compensation) of the district of Serpeysk.
More important, Wladyslaw finally surrendered his claim to the throne,
thus making it possible to normalize Russo-Polish relations. Although
Moscow refused to contemplate a fundamental re-orientation of policy,
remaining unmoved by Polish suggestions of a constitutional union, she
now permitted local collaboration against marauding Tartars. Prejudice
died hard, but it was becoming increasingly clear that hostility towards
Poland undermined Russia's security in the south, and it was to this
quarter that her rulers now belatedly turned their attention.
Russia was still very inadequately protected against the age-old menace
of Tartar attack. 1 The main bulk of her army was normally concentrated
immediately south of Moscow for the defence of the capital, whilst the
scattered Russian settlements further south were guarded by a thin
network of military outposts. During the first twenty years of Michael's
reign the border defences were neglected, partly from lack of means, and
partly because Moscow assiduously cultivated the friendship of the
Crimean khan, Djanibek, by making humiliating annual payments of
tribute (euphemistically termed 'gifts'). Until the early 1630s a tolerable
peace prevailed, chiefly because the Tartars were preoccupied with raids
00 Poland and factional struggles. The situation then changed, as a
result of several factors: the inability of the ageing Djanibek to restrain
his followers, a succession of droughts, the conclusion of peace between
Turkey and Poland, and tension with Moscow over Cossack raids and
the amount of tribute; finally, the further thinning of the border garrisons
in connection with the Smolensk war presented the Tartars with a
1
During the first half of the seventeenth century Moscow lost an estimated total of
200,000 men, women and children as a result of Tartar raids. The Tartars of the Crimea,
nomadic cattle-raisers, supplemented their meagre income by raiding neighbouring states
for captives and selling them on the slave-markets of the Orient. Though formally a vassal
of the sultan, the Crimean khan in fact pursued a largely independent policy; so also did
the individual clan chieftains, since the authority of the khan was seldom absolute.
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
tempting target. The raids of 1632-4, which materially affected the
outcome of the war, were followed by others, mainly by Nogai Tartars. 1
This serious threat made it imperative to strengthen the defences. No
change, however, was made in basic strategy: the army command
remained excessively centralized and unenterprising in battle, whilst the
gentry cavalry were no match for the highly mobile invaders. But the
trickle of colonists southwards perceptibly thickened, and many new
garrison towns sprang up, particularly in the upper reaches of the Don and
its tributaries. An important role was also assigned to the Cossacks
settled along the lower Don. These free military communities, composed
mainly of fugitives from Muscovite oppression, enjoyed in effect autono-
mous status. In return for a promise to serve as directed, they received an
annual grant of money and supplies. They had demonstrated their power
in the Troubles, and the government had no desire to antagonize them.
Its attitude was one of cold calculation: whilst exploiting their strategic
potentialities to the utmost, it took no risks on their behalf, especially
where Turkey was concerned. When the Turks protested at the frequent
Cossack raids, Moscow denied all responsibility, sent the Cossacks sharp
reprimands, and even took measures of reprisal. The Cossacks, for their
part, considered themselves true patriots, but had no illusions about the
self-interest which animated official policy. They were quick to resent any
sign of Russo-Turkish rapprochement, which threatened to extinguish their
precarious liberties. The fact that envoys between the two countries
passed through their territory gave them a lever with which to exert
pressure upon Moscow.
In 1637 the Cossacks, on their own initiative, seized the formidable
Turkish fortress of Azov and executed the Turkish envoy to Moscow,
whom they had detained. This threatened to provoke the war which
Russia had consistently striven to avert. Hurriedly despatching an envoy
to placate the Turks, Russia prepared for the inevitable retaliatory Tartar
raids. But to her good fortune both Turks and Tartars were involved
elsewhere, and the Cossacks were given time to consolidate their victory.
Not until 1641 could Sultan Ibrahim launch the long-expected major
offensive. The Cossacks, though outnumbered fifteen to one, resisted
with legendary bravery, and eventually forced the Turkish armies to
retire. Aware that their heavy losses made it impossible for them to repeat
this spectacular success, the Cossacks then offered their prize to the tsar.
This unparalleled opportunity confronted Moscow with a painful
dilemma: acquisition of Azov would radically transform Russia's inter-
national position, but would involve her in a dangerous war, without
1
The Great Nogai horde, which normally roamed the steppes east of the Volga, had
reverted to Muscovite sovereignty in 1616. But in 1634, pressed by the Kalmyks further
east and the Don Cossacks, they moved westwards, linking up territorially with the Crimeans
and the autonomous Lesser Nogais in the Azov area in a formidable concentration of
power. In 1639 the status quo was restored.
612
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008POLISH EXPANSION ENDS: RUSSIAN SURVIVAL
allies, against the whole might of the Ottoman Empire. At a Zemsky
Sobor, called to discuss the question, the spokesmen of most groups,
whilst dutifully promising the tsar their support, called loudly for the
relief of their manifold grievances. A major war, it seemed, might well
result in a new Time of Troubles. A Turkish envoy warned sharply of the
risks involved; commissioners sent to Azov reported that the fortifications
were in ruins. Reluctantly, Moscow ordered the Cossacks to withdraw
(April 1642).
Peace had thus been preserved—but at a price. The Cossacks were
subjected to reprisals, in which Moscow meekly concurred, by the
reinforced Turkish garrison in Azov. The Tartars interpreted the evacua-
tion as a sign of weakness, and resumed their attacks on a heavier scale;
in 1643 and 1644 their raids were prompted directly by Turkey, concerned
at evidence of a Russo-Polish rapprochement. The long columns of cap-
tives wending their way across the steppe into slavery were the most elo-
quent testimony to Russia's continued inability, despite thirty years of
slow recovery, to safeguard her essential security.
A similar weakness, and apparent unwillingness to face up to her
national and international responsibilities, characterized Russia's rela-
tions with other European Powers during Michael's last years. Moscow
seemed to lapse deliberately into a self-sufficient isolation; the atmosphere
was one of inertia and stagnation. The closer relations with Protestant
countries encouraged under Filaret were now discountenanced: embassies
arrived infrequently, and were despatched still more rarely; attempts were
made to expel the Swedish resident. Russia's misgivings at the growth of
Swedish power caused her to look somewhat more benignly upon
Denmark. Prince Valdemar was selected as a fitting consort for the tsar's
daughter, Irina. Induced, much against his will, to come to Moscow on the
express promise that his Protestant faith would be respected, Valdemar
was soon bidden to accept conversion to Orthodoxy. Unmoved by threats
or entreaties, he refused, and was kept confined under guard. Diplomatic
intervention had no effect, and it was only after Michael's death (June
1645) that he was released. The reasons for this curious affair, and for
Moscow's generally reserved attitude towards the West, must be sought
in the religious and cultural crisis in which the country was now deeply
embroiled.
The Time of Troubles had profound psychological repercussions upon
the Russian people. On the one hand, revulsion against anarchy and
foreign domination strengthened the spirit, characteristic of Muscovite
Russia, of stubborn adherence to national and ecclesiastical tradition; on
the other hand, the sudden sweeping away of familiar landmarks under-
mined the proud belief that 'Holy Russia', as the only land in which true
Orthodox piety survived, enjoyed special divine favour and protection.
Men who sought to explain the problems raised by the great convulsion
613
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
began to break free from the intellectual shackles imposed by obscurant-
ism and bigotry, and to make use of their powers of reason and imagina-
tion. The spirit of free enquiry was stimulated by increased contact with
foreigners. By the end of Michael's reign Moscow had a vigorous com-
munity, over one thousand strong, of western (mainly Protestant) mer-
chants, artisans and soldiers. In court circles in particular there were a
number of Russians who, though otherwise outwardly conformist,
readily adopted western fashions in dress and manners—and thus,
inescapably, also in ideas. Under the influence of Socinian teachings a
prominant nobleman, I. A. Khvorostinin, questioned theological dog-
mas, spoke of the tsar as a despot, and complained of the intellectual
barrenness of Muscovy in contrast to the West. He planned to flee
abroad, but was betrayed, characteristically enough, by his unenlightened
serfs—although, as he claimed, he had treated them with consideration.
Khvorostinin died before finding a new creed to replace the one he had
forsaken; in his egoism, superficial dandyism, and over-eager acceptance
of everything foreign, he anticipated a cultural type familiar to eighteenth-
century Russia.
Such developments naturally alarmed the influential but chauvinistic
church hierarchy, which urged the government to restrict opportunities
for Russians to mix with 'accursed foreign heretics'. An edict of 1643
ordered some of the Protestant churches in Moscow to be demolished.
Such half-measures were clearly inadequate; but the government, appre-
ciating that raison d'etat necessitated acquisition of western techniques,
had no desire to seal off the country hermetically from the outside world.
The more intelligent churchmen realized that heresy could only be
countered effectively by the spread of knowledge: but for this task the
Russian church was singularly ill equipped. Learning was traditionally
regarded with disfavour, as tainted with the sin of rationalism: true
knowledge was acquired by faith, and in particular by strict observance of
ancient rituals, sanctified by centuries of usage. Furthermore, it could
no longer be concealed that the liturgical books abounded in errors, so
that the rites of the Russian church no longer corresponded to those
followed elsewhere in the Orthodox world. But even the slightest attempt
to amend them raised the gravest issues. Owing to the exaggerated signifi-
cance attached to ritual, correction implied an assumption that the
Russian church, instead of being a model of purity, had fallen into heresy,
and should seek guidance from the scholars of Kiev 1 or Constantinople,
who had long been suspected of having succumbed to Latin influences.
Modest efforts at liturgical reform, initiated in 1616 by Dionysius, the
1
Kiev was now the centre of a religious renaissance amongst the Orthodox population
of Poland-Lithuania, who from 1620 had an episcopate of their own, subordinate to Con-
stantinople. With its theological college at Kiev (reformed by Petr Mohila in 1631 as an
Academy) and a rudimentary school system, western Russia was culturally far advanced
by comparison with Moscow, where there were no regular schools at all.
614
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008POLISH EXPANSION ENDS: RUSSIAN SURVIVAL
saintly abbot of the Trinity Monastery, were frustrated by the traditional-
ists. Dionysius was accused of heresy and imprisoned, but was liberated
by Filaret on his accession as patriarch. Filaret's chief preoccupation was
to tighten church discipline and impose strict conformity in matters of
doctrine by excluding foreign influences. Emigre Orthodox clergy from
western Russia who settled in Moscow had to undergo re-baptism, and
their lives were closely supervised. Books by western Russian churchmen
were carefully examined for any sign of heresy, and some were publicly
burnt—although, since insufficient locally printed works were available,
they nevertheless circulated in manuscript form. During Filaret's patriar-
chate the work of correction proceeded at snail's pace, but after his death
western Russian influences increased, and a number of works were
published which often contained innovations in ritual.
Thus the seeds were being sown of the great Schism [Raskol] that was
to split the Russian church, and Russian society, a few years after
Michael's death. Nationalistic resentment against foreign influences and
sentimental adherence to traditional ritual practices were two charac-
teristic features of the outlook of the raskoVniki, although their dissent
was in fact more profound. The 'zealots' [revniteli], as the leaders of the
future raskol were known at this stage, sought to bring about a wholesale
regeneration of the religious and moral life of the country. The proverbial
piety of the Orthodox Muscovite was in truth a shallow formality.
Scarcely anywhere else in Europe was there such widespread brutality and
cruelty, such coarseness in manners and moral laxity. The priests set a
poor example, and enjoyed little respect: too ignorant to preach, they
performed the prescribed ritual as if by rote. In the churches the atmo-
sphere was irreverent in the extreme. Against all these abuses the con-
science-stricken 'zealots', led by a vocal parish priest, I. Neronov,
campaigned with a spiritual fervour little to the taste of ecclesiastical
officialdom. The hierarchy had become increasingly bureaucratized. The
great prelates lived in a world of pomp and luxury, intent on maintaining
the extensive privileges accorded them by the state. With few exceptions
they were incapable of satisfying the aspirations of ordinary believers, for
whom the 'zealots' naturally held a strong attraction.
As in the West, religious dissent was to a large degree a means of
expressing popular discontent at oppressive social and economic condi-
tions. In Russia the masses lived for the most part in abject poverty, and
the Troubles had shown that the prevailing attitude of fatalistic resigna-
tion was compatible with violent explosive outbursts. Development
of productive resources and accumulation of wealth were hindered by
unfavourable natural conditions, and more especially by the inexhaustible
demands of the state. The government narrow-mindedly concerned itself
only with satisfying immediate fiscal and military requirements, regard-
less of the economic consequences. Such economic progress as was
615
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
registered during Michael's reign occurred largely in spite of (or, at least,
as an incidental by-product of) the actions of authority. The establish-
ment of the Tula arms works was characteristic in this respect. Modest
attempts to manufacture products (glass, paper, etc.) for the domestic
market met with little success. Russia's vast mineral riches remained
virtually untouched.
Trade could not develop on an extensive scale so long as each village
or estate tended to constitute an almost self-contained unit. The towns,
with their bazaar-type markets, bore an Oriental aspect: except for Mos-
cow, which could boast a population of 200,000, they were small, and
closely connected to the countryside. They enjoyed no special rights or
privileges. The commercial classes were numerically weak and their
social status low. The wealthiest elements were siphoned off as state
employees; the remainder laboured under the burden of heavy taxation
and service obligations. Credit was difficult to obtain; interest rates were
extremely high, and debts were exacted with the cudgel and the knout.
Merchants were tempting prey for rapacious local officials, who could,
for example, arbitrarily seize their property with little fear of legal conse-
quences. Moreover, they suffered from the effects of competition from the
state, with its various commercial privileges and monopolies, from the
streVtsy and other serving men, and from the inhabitants of tax-exempt
settlements [slobody] established by powerful landowners. And finally,
they faced competition from the more enterprising and experienced
western merchants who had acquired almost complete control of foreign
trade, the most lucrative branch of Russian commerce.
In Russia's exports furs and other forest products occupied a pre-
dominant place. The fabulous natural wealth of Siberia led to a develop-
ment of considerable political, as well as economic, significance: Russian
acquisition of enormous territories in northern Asia. This was largely
a spontaneous process. Lured by the prospect of easy profit, trappers,
traders, Cossacks and serving men penetrated swiftly eastwards, over-
whelming the almost defenceless natives and establishing Russian rule
by means of strategically located forts and blockhouses. The founding of
Krasnoyarsk (1628) completed the subjugation of the Yenisey region;
during the 1630s the Lena river-system was brought under control, and
in 1639 a small detachment reached the shores of the Pacific near Okhotsk.
Four years later an expedition explored Trans-Baikalia, sailing down the
River Amur to its mouth. Intermittent contact was established with
China. Russian colonial policy was in practice characterized by a singular
ruthlessness. Furs, levied as tribute (yasak] upon the natives, often at
extortionate rates, or as tithes upon Russian traders, flowed back to
Moscow in a swelling stream, forming a sizeable element in state revenue
and the basis of many private fortunes.
But the overwhelming majority of Russia's inhabitants derived their
616
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008POLISH EXPANSION ENDS: RUSSIAN SURVIVAL
livelihood from agriculture. As the population began to recover after the
holocaust of the Troubles, so the area under cultivation expanded. Sur-
veys of certain estates in the Moscow region in the 1620s and 1640s
showed a doubling or trebling of the number of peasant households. The
fertile black earth of the northern steppe was slowly being brought under
the plough. But agricultural techniques remained as primitive as ever,
and there was little if any increase in productivity. The well-being of a
peasant community depended not only on natural economic factors but
also on its juridical status. Most peasants now lived on estates belonging to
the court, the church, or to private landowners. The chief exception were
the 'black' peasants 1 of the northern forests who, despite higher taxa-
tion, were better off than most other categories.
The court peasants and those of some large landowners, ecclesiastical
and lay, also enjoyed certain material advantages over peasants belonging
to provincial gentry. But by and large the economic position and juridical
status of all dependent peasants now deteriorated markedly. The devasta-
tion caused by the Troubles intensified their need for loans (in money,
seed, stock or implements), which only the landowners could supply. In
return for such loans (and often, indeed, even without them) peasants
would contract to pay dues [obrok] in money or produce, or to perform
labour-service [barshchina] in the landlords' fields. Generally no time-
limit was specified, and peasants undertook that neither they nor then-
descendants would leave the estate, thus becoming serfs [krepostnye],
bound in perpetuity to the owner of the land they worked. Juridically and
economically inferior to the serfs were those peasants known as bobyli, 2
who were exempted from tax on account of their poverty, and household
servants, etc., who were usually not peasants but slaves [kholopy]. Full
slavery was now fairly rare, but debt-slavery [kabaVnoye kholopstvo]
was widespread. Here again the debts were often fictitious: hunger drove
men of all classes to sacrifice their liberty in order to survive.
The state did not normally intervene in relations between master and
serf. The landowner was free to demand such dues as he thought fit,
although the scale of these impositions obviously affected the peasants'
capacity to pay tax. Instead, the state merely held the landowner respon-
sible for the prompt collection of revenue. This greatly enhanced his
powers over his peasants. In judicial matters, too, his authority was
almost absolute: only the most serious crimes (treason, murder, banditry)
1
'Black' [chernososhnye] peasants paid tax directly to state agencies, not through a
landowner. These were now the sole survivors of the era when most of the land had been
in peasant tenure. They paid rent [obrok] to the state, which in theory owned their land,
although it did not normally attempt to regulate the peasants' economic activities. But
they were liable to be compulsorily transferred to other areas, and it was in this way that there
grew up another category of 'black' peasants, the 'free ploughmen' [volnye khlebopashtsy]
in Siberia where, however, agriculture was not extensively practised.
* Bobyli generally had no land of their own; but many other categories of dependants,
not all impoverished, became classified as bobyli, so that the term lacks precision.
21
6l7
MHF
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
were dealt with by the tsar's officials. Indicative of the spirit of Muscovite
legislation is an order of 1628 that provincial gentry unable to pay their
debts might send their serfs to Moscow to be cudgelled in their stead. In the
eyes of the law, the serf was no longer a human being, but a mere chattel.
Though they had no legal means of redress, the peasants still had one
effective weapon: they could exploit the prevailing acute shortage of
labour by fleeing, either to other landowners, or to the freer atmosphere
of the southern border. Geography facilitated this passive, but traditional,
means of resisting oppression. The main theme in Russian social history
during this period is the fierce and unedifying struggle by certain interested
groups to close this loophole, and so make bondage comprehensive and
absolute.
Since exploitation was most intense on smaller and poorer estates, it
was the provincial gentry who suffered most from these flights. The great
boyars and monasteries, on the other hand, were able to attract fugitives
by offering larger loans and better conditions. Generally peasants
changed masters on their own initiative, but some of the more enter-
prising and ruthless landowners resorted to fraud and violence. On many
large estates enjoying fiscal privileges there sprang up the slobody already
mentioned: centres of handicrafts and trade, inhabited by fugitives,
especially artisans from the towns, the so-called zakladchiki. 1 These
men, though personally dependent upon their creditors, were 'white', i.e.
not liable to tax, and could thus compete favourably with members of the
'black' communities from which they had fled; some of them actually
continued to live in the towns, but paid no tax. The zakladchiki aroused
intense resentment amongst the townspeople, who had to pay tax on
behalf of these privileged competitors so long as they were still officially
registered as members of the community. The interests of the provincial
gentry and townspeople thus coincided: both had grievances against the
wealthier landowners, and welcomed the idea that fugitives should be
forcibly returned to their original place of residence.
The state had a certain natural sympathy with their viewpoint, in so far
as flights undermined the strength of the taxpayers and serving men. But
the church and boyars exerted considerable influence, particularly under
Filaret, whose policy of manoeuvring between competing pressures in
effect worked to their advantage. Some boyars had over 3,000 peasant
households, and many monasteries even more. The Trinity Monastery
retained all its ancient privileges, and as a special concession was granted
a nine-year limit for the return of fugitives, whereas for all other land-
owners the limit was fixed at five years from the date of flight. Great land-
owners were sometimes afforded official assistance in locating runaways,
whilst others, who had to rely upon their own efforts, had little hope of
enforcing a fugitive's return.
1
Literally, 'pledged persons' (zaklad = pledge).
6l8
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008POLISH EXPANSION ENDS'. RUSSIAN SURVIVAL
After Filaret's death the state lost its self-assurance and was more
responsive to extraneous pressure. The gentry had now improved their
economic position and were readier than they had been twenty years earlier
to further their social aims by political action on a national scale. An
opportunity for organization was presented by the annual mobilizations
for border defence: 20,000 armed men constituted a force which even the
most autocratic regime could not afford to ignore. In 1637, in response to
their pressure, the time-limit on the return of fugitives was raised from
five years to nine, better provision made for hearing lawsuits against
powerful proprietors, and high-ranking nobles prohibited from acquiring
land in the southern border region. The townspeople also won conces-
sions: whereas efforts to return zakladchiki had previously petered out in
bureaucratic delay and intrigue, now large numbers of them were re-
integrated into their former communities. In 1641 the provincial gentry
demonstrated noisily in support of their demands, which included the
total abolition of restrictions upon the return of fugitives. This tension
formed the background to their unco-operative attitude over the question
of Azov. The government, whilst not conceding their demands in full,
extended the time-limit from nine years to ten (fifteen for peasants
seized by force), and took various other steps, such as annulling slavery
contracts concluded by serving men. The way was prepared for the
events of 1648-9, when serious riots, in which gentry and townspeople
participated, led to the significant social gains enshrined in the Code
[Ulozheniye] of Tsar Alexis: liquidation of the slobody, control of eccle-
siastical landowning, ascription of peasants to their present owners and,
finally, abolition of limitations on the return of fugitives.
Flight was still a practicable possibility—but henceforward the over-
whelming majority of Russians had to endure the heavy yoke of serfdom.
Society was now moulded in the form it was to retain for the next two
centuries. All classes had their specific obligations to the omnipotent
absolutist-bureaucratic state. This system was to be perfected and moder-
nized by Alexis, Peter and Catherine the Great. But much of the ground-
work was laid in the reign of the unassuming Michael Feodorovich. It
was the heavy price which the Russian people paid for recovery from
collapse and slow progress towards the position of a Great Power.
619
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER XX
THE OTTOMAN EMPIRE 1617-48
N the death of Sultan Ahmed I in 1617 the problem of the succes-
sion to the throne assumed a particular importance. The Otto-
man custom had been that the sons of a reigning sultan should
be sent out, while still young, to rule over provinces in Asia Minor. A
prince thus sent out with the rank of sanjaq begi, that is, governor of a
sanjaq or province, would now receive, under the guidance of the dig-
nitaries composing his household and of the officials controlling the
local administration, a long and elaborate education in the 'adet-i i oth-
maniyye—the mores and the culture distinctive of the Ottomans. It was an
education which embraced language and literature, physical training
and the practice of arms and which inculcated, moreover, a close and
practical knowledge of how the empire was run—in short, an education
designed to fit a prince for the responsibilities of rule, if ever he should
come to the throne.
At the same time it had been the custom of the Ottomans that a new
sultan should order forthwith the execution of all his brothers and their
male children. The pressures imposed on princes of the blood through
the operation of this 'law of fratricide' were acute. Aware that to win the
throne or to die was the ultimate choice offered to them, the princes
strove with all the means at their command to strengthen their resources
in expectation of the evil hour which would mark the death of their
father. Each of them sought to create in his particular province a nucleus
of armed force and, in addition, to establish at the Porte, amongst the
high dignitaries and the troops of the imperial household, 1 a faction
committed to his cause.
To the influence of these factors must be ascribed in no small degree
the sustained excellence of the Ottoman sultans before and including
Suleyman the Magnificent. The experience acquired in the government of
a province was invaluable as a preparation for the throne. The 'law of
fratricide'—whatever judgement be made of it on moral grounds—had
at least one beneficial effect: it exerted a psychological pressure which
tended to drive the princes towards the development of all their personal
capacities in the face of the mortal threat hanging over them.
The accidents of birth and death within the imperial house brought
about now a less favourable situation. Of the male children of Selim II
(1566-74) one alone, the future Murad III, and of Murad III (1574-95)
again one son only, the future Mehemmed III, attained an age suitable
O
1
Cf. Vol. in in this series, pp. 347-8.
620
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE OTTOMAN EMPIRE 1 6 1 7 - 4 8
for their assignment to a province in Asia Minor. Mehemmed III (1595-
1603) was destined indeed to be the last prince sent out to act as a sanjaq
begi.
The 'law of fratricide' was also to fall into desuetude. It had served to
limit the dangers of dynastic conflict and of political fragmentation at a
time when, in the fourteenth and fifteenth centuries, the Ottoman state,
then rising* 1 towards greatness, was beset with numerous difficulties.
These dangers receded, however, into remoteness after the long con-
solidation carried out during the reign of Mehemmed II (1451-81).
Henceforward the 'law of fratricide' acted more to the detriment than to
the benefit of the Ottoman state, as the violent rivalries over the succes-
sion to the throne made clear in 1481-2,1511—13 and above all in 1553-61.
A western source of this time declares that in 1574 Murad III, on ascend-
ing the throne, enforced the 'law' against the wishes of the mufti, who
stressed the fact that of the brothers of Murad none was old enough to be
a danger to the empire. This account reflects perhaps uncertainties
present in official circles at Istanbul over the wisdom of continuing a
usage which, it could be argued, had outlived its original purpose and
value.
The year 1595 witnessed the most dire example of fratricide in the
annals of the imperial house. Mehemmed III, on his accession to the
throne, ordered the execution of his brothers, nineteen of them in all.
This grim event, however, was to be the last enforcement of the old 'law
of fratricide'. The death of Mehemmed III in 1603 confronted the great
dignitaries at the Porte with a situation unparalleled heretofore. The
dead sultan left two sons—Ahmed, then almost fourteen years of age,
and Mustafa, about two years younger than Ahmed. As the elder of the
princes Ahmed now came to the throne, but there was no order for the
execution of Mustafa. Ahmed, as yet, was childless. If Mustafa were
done to death and if Ahmed should die before he had a son, the House
of 'Osman would be extinct. Mustafa, therefore, was allowed to live.
He was confined in the imperial palace and did not go out to govern a
province in Asia Minor. The birth, in 1604, of 'Osman, the eldest son
of Ahmed I, brought no change in the situation. Sultan Ahmed was still
a mere youth and the death rate amongst infants was high. To execute
Mustafa was not in fact feasible, unless and until there existed an heir
to the throne who had survived through the years of childhood.
The death of Ahmed I in 1617 made Mustafa the eldest prince of the
imperial line—the only prince of adult years—and as such he was raised
to the throne. Mustafa I, however, was a man of feeble intellect. His
brief reign of about three months (1617-18) revealed his unfitness to
rule. He was now removed in favour of 'Osman, the eldest son of Ahmed I.
On the deposition of 'Osman II in 1622 Mustafa became sultan once
more, reigning for some fifteen months (1622-23), until his incompetence
621
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
brought about his deposition for the second time. Thereafter, of the re-
maining sons of Ahmed I, Murad IV (1623-40), who left no male heir,
and Ibrahim (1640-8), held the throne in succession.
The particular sequence of birth and death within the imperial house
had created a new situation. The sending out of princes to appointments
as sanjaq begi in Asia Minor was now at an end. The 'law of fratricide',
too, ceased to be operative. Henceforward the princes would spend their
lives in the seclusion of the palace, until and if the course of events should
call them to be sultan. In fact, a new principle had come to govern the
succession to the throne—the throne passed now, in descending order of
age, from one prince to another within a given generation, until that
generation was exhausted, and then fell to the eldest surviving prince
of the next generation. Brother followed brother on the throne—and
not the son in succession to the father. On the death of Sultan Ibrahim
the throne went to his sons in the order of their age—to Mehemmed IV
(1648-87), to Siileyman II (1687-91) and to Ahmed II (1691-5). Only on
the 'death, of Ahmed II did it go to a son of Mehemmed IV, to Mustafa II
(1695-1703).
These changes worked to the disadvantage of the Ottoman state. The
system prevailing before the reign of Ahmed I had done much to ensure
that a series of able sultans should stand at the head of affairs. No such
favourable judgement can be made for the new mode of procedure,
which condemned the princes, in general, to long years of idle and
enervating confinement within the palace walls—to a life, in short, which
failed to prepare them for the responsibilities of power and, indeed,
tended to undermine the capacities innate in them. It was still possible
that a prince who came young to the throne might develop into a capable
sultan. The House of 'Osman could even now produce a vigorous and
ruthless monarch like Murad IV—but Sultan Murad was to be henceforth
the exception rather than the rule.
On a government highly centralized the accession to the throne of
sultans incompetent to rule well had perforce a most adverse effect. The
sultan was the source of power within the state, his will set the machine
of government in motion. If he did not define and direct the exercise of
power, there were others—the great dignitaries of the central regime—
who would do it for him, seeking at the same time to manipulate him to
their own advantage.
The period here under review can be described, not unjustly, as one of
rule by courtiers and officials—a period of intrigue, of shifting alliances
and of spasmodic violence at the centre of affairs. Of great importance
were the women of the harem, and in particular the Walide Sultan
(the mother of the prince on the throne) and the Khasseki Sultans (the
consorts who had borne the sultan a child). Often their influence was
wielded through the Kizlar Aghasi, the chief of the black eunuchs, who
622
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE OTTOMAN EMPIRE 1 6 1 7 - 4 8
controlled the administration of the harem. Their rivalries on behalf of
their children, their private and personal access to the sultan, their forging
of bonds between themselves and the high officials of the government—
all these factors had a marked effect on the conduct of state affairs. A
notable example can be found in the years 1617-23, which saw three
Walide Sultans involved in the conflict around the throne: the mothers
of Mustafa I, of 'Osman II and of Murad IV.
There was faction and intrigue, too, amongst the officials of the central
regime, especially amongst the viziers, the number of whom was to rise
as high as nine. These dignitaries, striving to attain the highest office in
the empire, the grand vizierate, often aligned themselves with other
elements engaged in the quest for power. Some of them had received in
marriage princesses of the imperial house. These exalted ladies, endowed
as of right with access to the intimate circle around the sultan, often
counted for much in the advancement of their husbands.
To the factors mentioned thus far must be added here the 'ulema, the
men learned in the SharVa, the Sacred Law of Islam. The 'ulema, as the
guardians of the Sacred Law, enjoyed great influence and prestige. Now,
in these years of confusion, that influence was sometimes used to legitimize
the course of events or to further the interest of a given cause—as, for
example, in 1648, when the mufti issued z.fetwa or legal pronouncement
approving the execution of Sultan Ibrahim.
A further element in the complex picture is to be found in the troops
of the central government—above all, the janissaries and also the sipahis
of the Porte, the mounted regiments of the imperial household. 1 These
forces, swollen in numbers and far less disciplined now than of old, rose
in revolt from time to time, either of their own volition in quest of
increased remuneration, donatives and other privileges or as a result of
instigation emanating from one or other of the rival factions amongst
the high dignitaries.
The intrigues and feuds surrounding the throne were especially virulent
and bitter in the years following the death of Ahmed I in 1617. Mustafa,
the brother of Ahmed, as the eldest of the Ottoman princes, now became
sultan. His unfitness to rule soon led, however, to his deposition in 1618,
a number of the great officials—amongst them the Kizlar Aghast, the
chief of the black eunuchs, and the mufti, Es'ad Efendi—reaching an
agreement with Mah-Firuze, the mother of 'Osman, to bring her son to
the throne. The new sultan ,'Osman II, then about fourteen years of age,
was too young and inexperienced to dominate the situation before him.
He failed, moreover, to retain favour with the troops of the central
regime—a disadvantage arising in no small degree from the ill-success of
the campaign that he conducted against Poland in 1621. 2
The position of the sultan became precarious indeed when it was
1
Cf. Vol. in in this series, pp. 347-8.
* See below, p. 636.
623
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
known that he intended to make a pilgrimage to Mecca. Suspicion grew
amongst the janissaries and the sipahis of the Porte that the pilgrimage
was a stratagem concealing designs hostile to themselves—that 'Osman II,
escaping from Istanbul to the provinces, meant to use the armed strength
available there as an instrument to curb their own pre-eminence and
indiscipline. On 18 May 1622 the troops rose in revolt, demanding the
lives of the dignitaries held to be most influential with the sultan, amongst
them the grand vizier, Dilawar Pasha. Members of the 'ulema submitted
these demands to 'Osman II, but the sultan was loath to yield and hesitated
too long before sending Dilawar Pasha to his death. The rebels, mean-
while, broke into the imperial palace and, freeing Mustafa, the brother
of Ahmed I, from his confinement, acclaimed him as their master. Some
of the janissaries consulted with the mother of Mustafa about the appoint-
ments to be made and it was in fact her son-in-law, the Bosnian Da'ud
Pasha, who now became grand vizier. The faction committed to the cause
of Mustafa and of his mother, the Walide Sultan, could not feel secure
while 'Osman II was still alive. Their uneasiness was well grounded,
since some of the rebels wished to spare 'Osman, hoping no doubt to
make use of him for their own ends at some future date. Da'ud Pasha
had recourse, therefore, to the last extreme measure—on 20 May 1622
'Osman II was strangled in the prison of Yedi Kule at Istanbul.
The second reign of Sultan Mustafa was a time of confusion, during
which the troops of the imperial household dominated the course of
events. Da'ud Pasha, in 1623, lost his life in the fluctuation of intrigue and
violence around the throne. The unbridled conduct of the troops—with
the janissaries and the sipahis of the Porte often at odds amongst
themselves—was at its worst in 1623 during the grand vizierate of Mere
Huseyn. It was now becoming difficult to achieve even the indispensable
minimum of government. A 'revolt' of the 'ulema led, however, to the
fall of Mere Huseyn and also to the deposition, for the second time,
of Sultan Mustafa—an event which was the essential prerequisite of a
return to some degree of order.
The new sultan, Murad IV, was a son of Ahmed I. His accession to the
throne did not mean that the rule of courtiers and officials was at an end.
Murad, when he became sultan, had not yet completed his twelfth year.
He was to remain for some time yet little more than a tool in the hands
of his mother, Kosem, and of the dignitaries aligned with or against her
according to the circumstances of the moment. Moreover, from time to
time, indiscipline amongst the janissaries and the sipahis of the Porte still
flared out into open violence. The intrigues of Rejeb Pasha in 1626
constituted, it would seem, one of the factors responsible for a new
turmoil which, despite all that Sultan Murad and the Walide Sultan
could do, brought death to a loyal and trusted vizier—the eunuch Gurji
Mehemmed Pasha, who was ninety-six years old, had served under
624
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE OTTOMAN EMPIRE 1 6 1 7 - 4 8
Sultan Suleyman and now, in the judgement of the English ambassador
at Istanbul, Sir Thomas Roe, was still 'the most able and only wise man
in this state'. 1
More violent still was the spasm of revolt which occurred in 1631-2.
The animosities dividing some of the most prominent amongst the great
dignitaries—Khusrew Pasha and Rejeb Pasha as against Hafiz Ahmed
Pasha and Mustafa Pasha—awoke once more the fires of revolt. Murad
IV, with his own life in danger, had to sacrifice Hafiz Ahmed to the
anger of the soldiers. His reaction to this moment of humiliation
was prompt and vigorous. Convinced that Khusrew Pasha was responsible
in no small measure for the renewal of violence, he gave orders for his
execution. A further paroxysm of revolt ensued, in the course of which
the sultan suffered a second humiliation, even more intimate and personal,
in the death of his friend Musa. For some two months the janissaries
and the sipahis of the Porte gave free rein to their licence and indiscipline
at Istanbul. Murad IV waited until the time was opportune and then
struck hard, removing from the scene Rejeb Pasha, whom he considered
to be one of the most active personalities behind the recent troubles.
The execution of Rejeb Pasha was carried out on 18 May 1632—a date
which saw the sultan liberated once and for all from the tutelage of the
great officials and which marked the real beginning of his reign. He had
grown to manhood in a world of danger and duress. His character was
tempered to the hardness of steel in the harsh and bitter experiences of
his youth. A ferocious and inexorable resolve to be the master in his
own house would henceforth dominate his actions. It is not surprising
that in the eight years of life remaining to him he was to become perhaps
the most feared and terrible of all the Ottoman sultans.
The long turbulence which followed the death of Ahmed I was not due
to the spirit of intrigue and faction alone. One factor contributing to-
wards the murder of 'Osman II was, as noted earlier, the belief current
among the janissaries and the sipahis of the Porte, that under the guise of
a pilgrimage to Mecca, he meant to set in motion a scheme contrived for
their ultimate ruin. The main proponent of this scheme, according to the
correspondence of Sir Thomas Roe, was Dilawar Pasha, raised to the
grand vizierate at the time of the Polish campaign in 1621 and destined
to lose his life in the revolt of 1622—a resolute man, who won over 'Os-
man II, in the words of Sir Thomas, to 'a brave and well-grounded
designe and of great consequence for the renewing of this decayed
empire' 2 —a project for raising in the provinces of Asia Minor and Syria
forces powerful enough to give the sultan control over the troops of the
central regime. A scheme so daring reflected, in the mere fact of its formu-
1
Cf. J. W. Zinkeisen, Geschichte des osmanischen Reiches, Vol. IV (Gotha, 1856), p. 48,
note 2.
8
Cf. Zinkeisen, Geschichte des osmanischen Reiches, Vol. m (Gotha, 1855), p.745, note 1.
625
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
lation, the existence of a particular and grave situation confronting the
Ottomans.
The wars against Persia (1578-90) and against Austria (1593-1606)
imposed on the Ottomans the need to increase greatly their regiments of
infantry equipped with firearms and their technical services (e.g. armourers,
artillerists, engineers, etc.)—to increase in fact the paid troops of the
imperial household. The forces of the central regime, amongst them the
janissaries and the sipahis of the Porte, had been recruited thus far from
Christian captives of war and from the child tribute levied on the Christian
subjects of the sultan—from human material non-Muslim and non-
Turkish in origin. These sources of recruitment did not suffice to meet the
new circumstances of war. The Ottomans had, therefore, to incorporate
in the regiments of the household—or at least to assimilate in status to
those troops—recruits drawn from the Muslim-born population of the
empire. One consequence of this radical change was a decline in the
discipline of the janissaries and the sipahis of the Porte. 1
This change came, moreover, at a time when the Ottoman government
was faced with serious financial difficulties. The tide of conquest was far
less rapid and the campaigns much less lucrative than before. Warfare
in the Caucasus area and on the middle Danube had become inordinately
expensive. Now, with the paid troops of the central regime vastly swollen
in number, the strain on the revenues of the state was still more insistent
and severe. To find the enormous sums required of it the government
had recourse to expedients like the manipulation of the coinage or the
reservation to itself of lands belonging to the fief system in the provinces,
these lands being then transformed into tax farms [muqata'a] and leased
out to tax contractors [multezini]. It also raised additional revenues known
as l awarid-i diwaniyye [levies of the Diwan or Council of State]—taxes
imposed formerly to meet exceptional needs, usually of a military
character, but now exacted as a regular contribution, and at a rate which
increased steadily throughout these years. These factors—allied to other
causes, amongst them the pressure of a rising population on resources—
combined to bring about a marked inflation unfavourable to all classes
enjoying a fixed income and, in particular, to the paid soldiers of the
sultan. Inflation was indeed a powerful force driving them to indiscipline
and to a reiterated demand for new emoluments and donatives—a demand
which had behind it the ultimate sanction of revolt. So frequent and
excessive did their claims become that Sir Thomas Roe felt justified in
writing that 'the Turkish emperor is now but the Janizaries treasurer' 2
Of the personnel—officials and soldiers—belonging to the imperial
household no small proportion had come to be located in Asia Minor.
The process began on a considerable scale as a response to the dangerous
1
a
Cf. Vol. in in this series, pp. 352, 356-7, 360-1, 365-6.
Cf. Zinkeisen, Geschichte..., Vol. m, p. 745, note 1.
626
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE OTTOMAN EMPIRE
1617-48
tensions visible there during the conflict over the succession to the throne
between Selim and Bayezid, the sons of Sultan Siileyman, in the years
1559-61. It was intensified thereafter when the paid forces of the central
regime grew more numerous as a result of the great wars against Persia
and Austria. The government at Istanbul, finding it difficult to meet the
new and burdensome demands on its revenue, assigned to the janissaries
and to the sipahis of the Porte offices and emoluments in the administra-
tion of the provinces. These troops, in the course of time, bade fair to
dominate the provincial scene and to divert a large measure of its local
resources to their own advantage. Their penetration into the world of
the provinces was to call forth, however, a long and violent reaction.
The sultan had at his command a numerous and influential class of
'feudal' horsemen, known in general as sipahis and established in most,
though not in all the regions of the empire. The sipahi held a fief of small
[timar] or of large [zi'amet] yield per annum. No title to the land itself
was vested in him—he received no more than the usufruct of the land
constituting his fief, that is, the right to take from the population living
on it certain dues in cash and in kind. Good service would raise him from
a fief of lower to one of higher yield. Out of the revenues thus granted
to him the sipahi maintained himself as an efficient soldier. He came to
war, moreover, with a retinue which increased in size with the importance
of his fief—and this retinue he had to furnish in arms and equipment
from the resources made available to him. 1
To the 'feudal' horsemen—above all in Asia Minor, where the number
of small fiefs was large—the changing circumstances of warfare had been
unwelcome. The profit to be won in war against Persia and Austria was
diminishing, the risk of serious loss much heightened for the individual
sipahi in respect of supplies, arms and beasts of burden, so arduous were
the long campaigns. To make good the loss was now, in view of the
current inflation, more difficult and expensive than before. Warfare, in
short, beyond Lake Van or on the middle Danube had become an un-
rewarding business for the sipahis endowed with a small fief. At the
same time the retention in government hands or the lease as muqata'a
of lands hitherto included in the fief system led to confusion, to a lessened
prospect of advancement and to disaffection amongst the 'feudal'
horsemen.
A further cause of unrest in Asia Minor was the growth of the popu-
lation—a growth more rapid than the bringing of new land into culti-
vation. This imbalance and the resultant pressure on the means of
subsistence led to the rise of a surplus element, largely of peasant origin,
landless and unemployed. Their number was swollen with the accession
of men whom various factors had driven from the soil, for example,
the effect of inflation, the fiscal demands of a government straitened in its
1
Cf. Vol. in in this series, pp. 348-50.
627
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
resources, the exploitation of the tax-farmers and also the exactions of
sipahis reduced to narrow circumstances.
Of this unattached and vagrant class—known as levendat—a large
proportion became soldiers in the service of the state. The central regime,
under the altered conditions of warfare, was obliged to expand its armed
forces, hitherto, in general, of non-Muslim and non-Turkish provenance.
Now it had to allow recruitment from amongst the Muslim-born subjects
of the sultan. It was the human material of the levendat which made this
expansion possible. Soldiers drawn from this source fought on the
frontier as volunteers [gdniillii], acted as fortress guards [mustahfiz] or
served as troops bearing the designation of sarija or sekban—troops
sometimes assimilated in status to the regiments of the imperial house-
hold or else hired as mercenaries for one or more campaigns.
The levendat also found employment in the provinces of the empire.
With the fief system falling into disorder under the harsh stresses of a
warfare expensive to sustain, ill-suited to the capacities of horsemen and
demanding above all the use of firearms, the authorities at Istanbul
countenanced yet another departure from the old modes of action. The
provincial governors began to recruit large retinues, infantry as well as
cavalry, composed of sarija and sekban levies from the levendat of Asia
Minor. To maintain these troops the pashas raised in the towns and
villages a tax called the sekban aqcesi. This recruitment was to be carried
so far that the sarija and the sekban became the most numerous element
in the armed strength of the provinces and, indeed, a main element also
in the imperial armies assembled for the great campaigns.
The use of the levendat as soldiers was of grave consequence for Asia
Minor. Warfare, whether in Armenia and Adharbayjan or on the Danube
and the Tisza, was laborious and hard. At times, regiments of the sarija
and the sekban might abandon a campaign rather than endure the
severities of war. There were intervals also when some of the levendat
soldiers would be out of service. The end of hostilities in 1590 against
Persia and in 1606 against Austria saw a reflux, to Asia Minor, of sarija
and sekban troops bereft of employment. Of serious effect, too, was the
fact that Ottoman control over the lands won from the shah in 1578-90
collapsed before the Persian counter-offensive of 1603-7. This collapse
meant the return westward of thousands of levendat now without an
assured occupation.
Of this numerous soldatesca no small proportion took to brigandage
and revolt as a means of livelihood, acting at times in co-operation with
discontented members of the sipahi class and with nomads of Turkish
and Kurdish descent. These rebel elements, known in their new guise as
jelali, exacted from the villages and towns a contribution called qurban
aq$esi, [i.e. protection tax]. The jelalis plundered much of Asia Minor
between 1596 and 1610. It was in fact a time of hydra-headed rebellion,
628
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE OTTOMAN EMPIRE 1 6 1 7 - 4 8
and of a kind unusually dangerous, the jelali bands consisting, for the
most part, of sarija and sekban trained in the great wars, expert in the
use of firearms and strengthened with a measure of assistance from
another class adept in the arts of war—the ' feudal' sipahis.
The Grand Vizier Kuyuju Murad Pasha crushed this wave of revolt
in Asia Minor during the years 1607-10, but armed repression was no
more than a brief palliative and the basic causes of the unrest continued
to operate as before. The government at Istanbul sought to overcome
the internal difficulties confronting it. Under Ahmed I (1603-17) a new
qanun-name or code of regulations was issued, together with several
edicts relating to specific matters of reform. The main objectives in view
were to reduce in number the troops and officials belonging to the imperial
household, to end the intervention of the janissaries and the sipahis of the
Porte in the conduct of affairs and to protect the provinces from the ills
afflicting them in recent years.
To the advocates of reform some prospect of amelioration seemed to
lie in the divergence of interest visible between the personnel of the central
regime and the forces gathered around the provincial governors. The
'men of the Sultan' demanded for themselves assignments of revenue and
offices of profit and privilege in the local administrations. This develop-
ment was inimical to the aims of the sarija and sekban levies enrolled in
the service of the pashas—levies which saw in the resources of the pro-
vincial world the means to their own well-being and advantage. It is
against a perspective of this order that the death of 'Osman II should be
set. The more responsible dignitaries at Istanbul, aware of the need to
restore efficient rule, proposed that the sultan should move to the pro-
vinces and create there, out of the sarija and the sekban experienced in
war, a powerful counterpoise to the janissaries and the sipahis of the
Porte. This scheme, in 1622, brought death to the Grand Vizier Dilawar
Pasha and to 'Osman II himself. 1 It also brought to the fore the anta-
gonism separating the levendat of the provincial regimes from the troops
and officials of the imperial household.
Amongst the sarija and the sekban in Asia Minor the events of 1622
gave rise to a bitter reaction, soon to be expressed in the great revolt
(1622-8) of Abaza Mehemmed, the beglerbeg of Erzurum. Abaza Mehem-
med, in 1622, drove out the janissaries stationed at Erzurum and then,
with large numbers of the levendat, the 'feudal' sipahis and the nomadic
tribesmen gathering around his banners, reduced to his own control
much of eastern and central Asia Minor, killing off the 'men of the
Sultan' wherever he encountered them. Although defeated in 1624 not
far from Kayseri, Abaza Mehemmed was still able, in 1627, to repulse
the forces which the then grand vizier, Khalil Pasha, directed against him
at Erzurum. It was not until the following year that he surrendered at
1
See above, pp. 623-4.
629
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
last to the Grand Vizier Khusrew Pasha. Too powerful still amongst the
sarija and the sekban to be punished with death, Abaza Mehemmed was
sent to an appointment far from the region where his influence was so
strong—he became now the beglerbeg of Bosnia on the north-western
frontier of the empire. His removal to Europe did not mean that the
' time of troubles' in Asia Minor was over. The old grounds of disaffection
and tumult remained active. Their stubborn and enduring vigour would
be demonstrated on a number of occasions in the future—for instance,
the revolt, in 1647, of Varvar 'Ali Pasha; the career of Ibsir Mustafa
Pasha, a nephew of Abaza Mehemmed and, for a short interval,
grand vizier in 1654-5; and the insurrection of Abaza Hasan Pasha in
1658.
Of the difficulties facing the Ottoman government after 1617 not the
least onerous was a new war against Persia. Shah 'Abbas I (1587-1629),
in the years 1603-7, had recovered the territories ceded to the Ottomans
in 1590. A peace made in 1612 gave formal recognition to the success of
the Persians. Further hostilities in 1615-18 led to the confirmation of the
settlement reached in 1612. Conflict was to break out once more in 1623,
the main theatre of operations being now Iraq.
The northern and central regions of Iraq had been conquered from
Persia and incorporated into the Ottoman Empire during the years
1534-5; the southern areas, and in particular Basra, came under Otto-
man control in 1546-7. The population of Iraq was of mixed racial
origin, embracing elements of Arab, Persian, Turkish and Kurdish
descent. It was, moreover, a population divided in its religious allegiance.
Kurdistan and the northern territories followed, in large degree, the Sunni
or orthodox Muslim faith; central and southern Iraq contained numerous
adherents of the most notable of the Muslim heterodoxies, Shi'i Islam,
which was the official creed of Persia. Over some areas Ottoman rule
was precarious and uncertain—over Basra, vulnerable to attack from
Persia or from the marsh Arabs located in the Shatt al-'Arab; over the
desert lands, known as al-Ahsa, along the north-western shore of the
Persian Gulf; and over various border zones often in dispute with Persia—
in the regions of Khuzistan, Luristan and Shahrizur. The Ottomans had
also to deal with the Arab tribes inhabiting the deserts to the west of Iraq
—tribes able to threaten the caravan routes leading from Basra to Aleppo
and ever prone to encroach on the settled areas, whenever the admini-
stration at Baghdad was involved in difficulties or rested in the hands of
men not equal to the circumstances of the moment. Iraq was, in short, a
frontier province complex in character and troublesome to rule.
Ottoman control in Iraq began to weaken in the time of Mehemmed III
(1595-1603) and Ahmed I (1603-17). A little before or a little after 1600—
the exact date is not clear—Basra fell under the domination of local
dynasts known as the House of Afrasiyab. At Baghdad the Ottoman
630
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE OTTOMAN EMPIRE 1 6 1 7 - 4 8
garrison troops stationed there in the reign of Sultan Siileyman had evol-
ved into an entrenched social class composed mostly of local recruits and
responsive, above all, to the aspirations of its own dignitaries. One of
the regimental officers, a certain Muhammad ibn Ahmad al-Tawil, was
able to assert an effective control over Baghdad during the years 1604-7.
A situation much more dangerous for the Ottomans arose, however, in
1621-3.
An officer of the janissaries, by name Bakr Subashi [i.e. Bakr, the
chief of police] created for himself a faction so strong amongst the troops
of Baghdad that from about 1619 onwards he was the most important
figure in the town—far more influential, in fact, than the pasha. Opposed
to Bakr Subashi was the faction of Muhammad Qanbar, the officer
in charge of the soldiers called 'Azeban. In 1621 the strife between the
two factions broke out into violent conflict as a result of which Bakr
Subashi became the master of Baghdad, his rival Muhammad Qanbar
being now done to death. Bakr sought to obtain from Istanbul a formal
recognition of himself as pasha of Baghdad—but without success. The
Porte ordered Hafiz Ahmed, the governor of Diyar Bakr, to reduce
Baghdad to obedience. At this juncture of affairs Bakr Subashi turned
for aid to Shah 'Abbas of Persia. The shah at once sent a force to relieve
Baghdad. Hafiz Ahmed, with a Persian intervention imminent, acceded
to the demands of Bakr and withdrew his troops, while Bakr, having
secured recognition from the Ottoman authorities, renounced his now
unwelcome allies from Persia. The Persians, however, besieged Baghdad
and took it with the assistance of Muhammad, the son of Bakr, who
wanted to govern the town himself. Bakr Subashi was executed and the
Sunni Muslims of Baghdad subjected to a fierce persecution at the
hands of the Shi'i forces of the shah.
These events marked the beginning, in 1623, of a war which was to
last until 1639. Hafiz Ahmed Pasha, as grand vizier, made a determined
attempt to wrest Baghdad from the Persians in 1625-6. A lack of sufficient
artillery contributed much to the failure of his siege operations. Moreover,
an army of relief under the command of Shah 'Abbas beleaguered the
Ottomans in their own lines and entrenchments. Hafiz Ahmed, with his
situation precarious and with discontent rife amongst his men, was obliged
at last to raise the siege and withdraw to Mosul. Not until 1629 did the
Ottomans concentrate their forces for another major campaign in Iraq.
The winter of 1629-30 was, however, exceptionally long and severe.
Snow, rain and floods made operations in central Iraq almost impossible.
The Ottoman grand vizier, Khusrew Pasha, decided therefore to under-
take a campaign in the march-lands of Shahrizur. After routing the
Persians at the Battle of Mihriban, Khusrew Pasha took and sacked
Hamadan in the summer of 1630 and then, in the autumn of that year,
led his troops to a new siege of Baghdad—a siege abandoned in Novem-
631
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
ber 1630 after a fruitless assault, the Ottomans retiring once again to
Mosul.
The years following the campaign of 1630 witnessed a further out-break
of factional violence at Istanbul and, in 1632, the emergence of Murad IV
as sultan in fact as well as in name. Sultan Murad, before the renewal
of operations against Persia, resolved to eliminate a possible source of
danger in Syria. The Ottomans had never sought to exert a direct and
immediate control over the Lebanon—a region which afforded a sure
refuge in its mountain fastnesses to the ethnic and religious minorities
established there in earlier times—the Druzes and the Maronites. The
tribesmen of the Lebanon, after the Ottoman conquest of Syria in 1516,
remained free to pursue, high in the mountains, their own purposes and
feuds, provided that the Ottoman hold on the routes and cities of Syria
was not called into question.
One Druze chieftain, Fakhr al-Din II, of the House of Ma'n, began
in 1590 to consolidate and extend his influence—an endeavour so suc-
cessful that it was to make him the master of the Lebanon. His efforts to
win control over the northern reaches of the land, Kisrawan and the
adjacent littoral, brought him into conflict with the Ottoman admini-
stration at Tripoli, while his attempts to move southward into the areas
of Hawran, 'Ajlun and Nabulus threatened the pilgrimage route leading
to the Hijaz and alarmed the Ottoman authorities at Damascus. A number
of factors worked, however, in favour of Fakhr al-Din. At Istanbul his
agents used bribes to forestall measures hostile to him. Moreover, the
Ottoman officials in Syria had, in general, only a brief tenure of appoint-
ment—a fact which made it difficult for them to set in motion a long-term
resistance to the Druze amir.
In 1613 the local opponents of Fakhr al-Din aligned themselves with
Hafiz Ahmed Pasha, the beglerbeg of Damascus. Hafiz Ahmed, strength-
ened by reinforcements and by the co-operation of a naval squadron
sailing off the coast of the Lebanon, now moved against the Ma'nid
chieftain. Fakhr al-Din fled to Europe, where he remained for five years
under the protection of Cosimo II, the grand duke of Tuscany, and later
of Philip III, the king of Spain. He was able, in 1618, to secure from the
Ottomans permission to return to the Lebanon. Once more Fakhr al-
Din began to extend his influence both northward into Kisrawan and
southward to 'Ajlun, Nabulus and Safad, all of which the government at
Istanbul, in 1622, entrusted to his nominees. At 'Anjarr in 1625 the Druze
amir defeated his local enemies and the beglerbeg of Damascus, who
had made common cause against him. Fakhr al-Din was to dominate
the Lebanon thereafter for some ten years. His power rested on his Druze
adherents—but even more on a strong force of mercenaries. To support
these troops, to maintain the forts guarding his territories and to provide
the funds dispensed in his name at Istanbul Fakhr al-Din needed a large
632
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE OTTOMAN EMPIRE 1 6 1 7 - 4 8
revenue. He obtained it through the increase of the lands under his control,
but also through the efficient exploitation of the economic resources
available to him. His efforts to promote a new growth of trade at Beirut and
Sidon met with considerable success. An agreement that he made with
Cosimo II in 1608 brought into his service Italian merchants, engineers
and agricultural experts. At the same time he favoured the cause of
religious toleration, extending a welcome to Christian missionaries from
Europe, to Kurdish elements from the region of Aleppo and to the
Maronites, some of whom settled in the southern Lebanon and helped
to improve the condition of agriculture there.
The power of Fakhr al-Din rested, however, as much on the confusion
rife at Istanbul as on his own abilities. In 1632 Sultan Murad assumed
control of the imperial government. Murad IV was eager to launch a new
offensive against Persia and reluctant, therefore, to allow the continued
existence of a strong regime in the Lebanon—a regime which was of
doubtful allegiance and which might seek to turn to its further advantage
in Syria a renewed and major involvement of the Ottomans in the eastern
war. Kiicuk Ahmed Pasha, the beglerbeg of Damascus, strengthened
with large reinforcements, moved against Fakhr al-Din in 1634. The
Ma'nid amir, beaten in the field, was captured in 1635 and sent to
Istanbul where, in April of that year, he was executed on the suspicion
that his influence stood behind the still active unrest in the Lebanon.
The war with Persia now entered into its last phase. Sultan Murad
took the Persian fortress of Erivan after a short siege (July-August
1635) and then advanced towards Tabriz, which fell to him in September
1635. As on earlier campaigns into Adharbayjan, the Ottomans found
that the Persians had adhered to their usual tactics of retreat—harassing
the columns of the enemy, lengthening his lines of communication and
sweeping the land clean of supplies. The sultan, with no prospect of a
decisive result before him, abandoned Tabriz and retired westward into
Asia Minor. By December 1635 he was once more at Istanbul. It was at
the moment of his arrival there that the Persians appeared before the
walls of Erivan. After a stubborn resistance the Ottoman garrison
surrendered the fortress in April 1636. The events at Erivan in 1635-6
demonstrated a truth long since manifest—that, in war against Persia,
there would be no enduring success for the Ottomans save through
the permanent occupation of wide territories beyond their eastern
frontier, a solution which was difficult to achieve and expensive to maintain,
as the great conflict of 1578-90 had made clear.
Sultan Murad now turned his attention to Iraq. The years 1636-8
saw elaborate preparations in progress for a new campaign, this time
with Baghdad as the main objective. On 8 May 1638 the sultan left
Uskudar and, on 15 November, began the siege of Baghdad. A fierce
assault on 24 December was decisive. The Persian commander yielded
633
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
the town on the following day. Some of the garrison continued to resist,
however, despite the capitulation. A conflict of extreme violence ensued,
in the course of which most of the Persians lost their lives. Murad IV
set out on the return march to Istanbul in January 1639, leaving the
Grand Vizier, Kemankes Qara Mustafa Pasha, to conduct negotiations
with the representatives of Shah Safi. A settlement was reached at Zuhab,
near Qasr-i Sirin, in May 1639. This peace brought to an end the long
contention between the Ottomans and the Persians begun in the time of
Sultan Selim I (d. 1520) and Shah Isma'il (d.1524). Erivan and the
adjacent territories would remain under Persian control, while Iraq
was to be Ottoman. The peace terms also included measures for a de-
marcation of the frontier separating the Ottoman Empire from Persia—
and, in fact, along a line which, at least in relation to the modern states
of Iraq and Iran, has endured without serious modification until the
present day. Sultan Murad did not long survive his triumphant return to
Istanbul in June 1639. He died on 9 February 1640.
Amid the intrigue and violence surrounding the throne in the years
after 1617 there were men able and willing to exercise power in a respon-
sible manner, 'strong men' like Dilawar Pasha (d.1622) or Gurji Mehem-
med Pasha (d.1626). Influential, too, were those officials—for instance,
Kocu Beg, the author of the famous Risale [i.e. Treatise]—who analysed
the reasons and explained the remedies for the troubles which beset the
Ottoman state. 1 It is here among the dignitaries and soldiers intent on the
restoration of efficient rule that Murad IV must be numbered, above all
during the years (1632-40) of his personal control over the conduct of
affairs.
To the extirpation of disobedience and revolt within the empire Sultan
Murad brought a shrewd intelligence, an indefatigable resolution—and a
pitiless severity. The intrigue and violence encompassing his youth did
much to fashion the man that he was to become. All went down before
him in a ferocious and unending sequence of executions. Vengeance, he
is reputed to have said, never grows old, it only grows grey! 2 In the
judgement of the Venetian bailo at Istanbul, Alvise Contarini, no sultan
ever attained a more absolute domination of the empire. The great
physical strength of Murad, his skill in the use of arms and his vivid,
though sombre character made a deep—and, for his purposes, a valuable
—impression on the soldiers of the imperial household. These same
qualities won for him also much favour amongst the sarija and sekban
levies and, in addition, amongst the populace of Istanbul, that is, with
forces which might act as a counterpoise to the indiscipline hitherto so
frequent in the janissaries and the sipahis of the Porte. Contarini observed
1
Cf. Vol. m in this series, pp. 350-2.
* Cf. J. von Hammer, Histoire de VEmpire Ottoman, trans. J.-J. Hellert, Vol. IX (Paris,
1837), p. 389, note 3 : ' Solea dire che non invecchiano mai le vendette benche incanutissero'.
634
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE OTTOMAN EMPIRE 1 6 1 7 - 4 8
of the sultan that he was unwearied in his application to business and
eager to be well informed on all matters. 1 An elaborate 'espionage
system' gave him news about events and opinions both in the provinces
and amongst the people of Istanbul. It also enabled him to maintain
a close surveillance over the troops of the central regime. Of relevance
here are the measures that he took to restrict the use of tobacco,
coffee and wine —at the establishments selling these commodities the
soldiers often met and, in talk amongst themselves, magnified discontent
into sedition. Sultan Murad, through means of this kind and through
the fear that his implacable temper called forth, was able to restore
discipline and order in the regiments belonging to the imperial household
—able to reduce the troops in number, to eject the least welcome elements
among them and to eradicate some of the worst abuses. A similar pro-
gramme was carried out in the provinces, where much was done to
reorganize the 'feudal' system and to recover fiefs which had fallen into
illegal or incompetent hands. At the same time Murad IV set in train the
preparation of an i Adalet-name, a 'Book of Justice' containing measures
for the protection of the peasants.
The labour of reform was long, complicated—and also expensive.
Moreover, the war against Persia demanded a large expenditure of
revenue. It was not accidental that the sultan had, amongst his con-
temporaries, a reputation for excessive avarice—'avarizia per ecesso' in
the words of Alvise Contarini. 2 Of Murad IV it was said that what he did
not do for cash he would do neither for prayer nor intercession, neither
for justice nor law. 3 A verdict of this kind reflects the determination of
the sultan to fill the coffers of the state. An abundant treasure was one of
the surest means to the achievement of his aims. It was also a safeguard
for his own person, since he was able, with the ample funds at his com-
mand, to ensure the regular payment—and thus the allegiance—of his
armed forces. An efficient collection of revenue, measures to guide the
resulting yield into the hands of the government and out of the hands of
officials and tax-farmers, the use of confiscation as a further and rich
source of income—such methods led to a success so great that one
Venetian of this time, Pietro Foscarini, described Murad IV as the richest
of all the Ottoman Sultans. 4 The years of his effective rule, with their
remarkable combination of sober policy and wise management, of fierce
energy and also of signal cruelty, stemmed for a while the disorders
1
Cf. N. Barozzi and G. Berchet, Le Relazioni degli Stati Europei lette al Senato ml
secolo decimosettimo. Fifth Series: Turkey, Pt 1 (Venice, 1871), p. 368: 'applicatissimo al
governo, vago di saper tutto'.
2
Cf. Barozzi and Berchet, ibid. p. 367.
8
Cf. Hammer, Histoire . . ., Vol. ix, p. 421: 'quello che per il denaro non fa, non lo fa
per preghiere, non per intercessione, non per giustizia, non lo fa per legge'.
4
Cf. N. Jorga, Geschichte des osmanischen Reiches, Vol. in (Gotha, 1910), p. 463, note 2:
' £ il piu ricco di tutti i principi che sono stati delta Casa ottomana.'
635
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
within the empire. But their duration was all too brief and it was not long
before the work had to be done again.
The Ottomans, since the death of Ahmed I in 1617, had been involved
in no major conflict with the states of Christendom. There was, however,
a short war against Poland in 1620-1. Along the march-lands dividing
the Polish and the Ottoman territories the raiding of Cossacks from the
Ukraine and of Tatars from the Crimea was a source of continuing
friction. The Cossacks also sailed down the rivers, the Dnieper and the
Dniester for instance, and ventured out into the Black Sea, plundering
Sinope in 1614 and Anchialos in 1621. 1 A further cause of unrest was the
intervention of Poland, from time to time, in the affairs of Moldavia, seeking
to establish on the throne of this small Christian state dependent on the
sultan a vaivoda favourable to Polish interests. There had been in 1616
a brief outburst of hostilities, in the course of which the Ottoman frontier
begs of the Danube line inflicted a severe defeat on a Polish-Cossack
force operating in Moldavia. These hostilities ended in 1617 with the
Peace of Buzsa, which laid it down that Poland was not to interfere in
matters relating to the government of Moldavia and that measures
should be taken, on the one side as on the other, to hinder the incursions
of the Cossacks and the Tatars.
The peace was soon to be broken. Gratiani, the vaivoda of Moldavia,
being deposed from office in 1620 on the order of 'Osman II, sought and
secured aid from Poland. At Tu^ora, near Iasi, the Danube begs, rein-
forced by a numerous contingent of Tatars, routed the Polish-Moldavian
forces in September 1620. It was now that Sultan 'Osman resolved
to undertake a major offensive against Poland—and this in opposition
to the advice of the more moderate amongst the high dignitaries of the
Porte and in spite of the fact that a Polish ambassador was bringing
proposals for the renewal of the peace. The march northward to the Dan-
ube in the late spring of 1621 was slow and difficult because of the bad
weather. After crossing the Danube at Isaqga, the Ottomans moved
towards Chocim, which was not reached, however, until August 1621.
The Poles held a fortified encampment on the banks of the Dniester. A
first Ottoman attack met with some success, but the subsequent assaults,
five in number, ended in failure. The cold and the rain presaging the
onset of winter and the growing lack of supplies now brought the cam-
paign to a close. Sultan 'Osman was obliged to make peace with Poland
in October 1621, and on terms which constituted in fact a reaffirmation
of the agreement made in 1617.
As for relations between Vienna and Istanbul—the involvement of
Austria in the Thirty Years War (1618-48) and of the Ottoman Empire
1
The Cossacks even penetrated into the Bosphorus and, in 1625, plundered Yenikoy,
a suburb of Istanbul. In 1637 Azov, at the mouth of the River Don, fell to them and re-
mained in their hands until 1642, when the Ottomans sent a strong force to drive them
out of the town.
636
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE OTTOMAN EMPIRE 1 6 1 7 - 4 8
in the long conflict with Persia (1623-39) meant that neither side could
envisage a serious confrontation on the Danube. The kleinkrieg between
Christian marcher lord and Ottoman ghazi along the frontier continued
unabated as heretofore. None the less, the Peace of Zsitva-Torok, nego-
tiated in 1606, was confirmed, with some modification of detail, at
Neuhausel in 1608, at Vienna in 1615, at Gyarmath in 1625, at Szon in
1627 and again at Szon in 1642—confirmed after long discussion to
achieve the dismantling, in Hungary, of the small forts [palanka] some-
times erected in contravention of the articles of peace and to ascertain
the dependence—on the Christian or the Muslim state—and also the
taxation status of the villages adjacent to the great fortresses like Erlau,
Kanizsa or Stuhlweissenburg, which were now under Ottoman rule.
The old idea of the Crusade, though shorn of compulsive force, was
still not without effect in Europe. To the realization once more of this
idea the men of the Counter-Reformation gave much time and effort.
These years saw the unfolding of numerous designs for the invasion of
the Ottoman Empire—designs centred on such 'claimants' to the Otto-
man territories as the due de Nevers (descended from one of the last
Palaeologi) or the 'gran principe ottomano \ Yahya, reputed to be a son of
Sultan Mehemmed III (1595-1603). Numerous, too, were the schemes
for exploiting the possibilities of local resistance to Ottoman rule within
the Balkans, above all in regions which had never come under the full
and direct control of the Porte, for instance, the district of Maina in the
Morea and also.Albania and Montenegro. A good example of such
schemes can be found in a project submitted to the Diet of Ratisbon in
1640, envisaging an advance into Albania and the capture of important
fortresses like Kroja and Skutari, a mass rising of the Christians and the
occupation of the strategic routes through Serbia in order to hinder the
arrival of Ottoman relief forces from Bosnia and the lands along the
middle Danube, and then, to crown these efforts, a 'break-out' east-
wards and a rapid march on Istanbul. There was in fact small prospect
of success for an enterprise of this kind. The states of western and central
Europe, dedicated to the pursuit of their own ambitions and involved,
most of them, in the Thirty Years War, had neither the will nor the
means to embark on a design so grandiose and so dubious. As to the
'resistance' in the Balkans against Ottoman rule—the stress laid, in these
projects of invasion, on areas like Maina and Albania is sufficient to
underline the character and limitations of that 'resistance'. It reflected
far more a readiness to defend local traditions and modes of life than a
zeal for general insurrection in the name of a 'crusade'.
A more practical approach was available, however, to the forces of the
Counter-Reformation. The Peace of Vienna (1615) contained a clause
permitting the Jesuits to maintain their own establishments and churches
within the Ottoman Empire. A little later, in 1622, the foundation at
637
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Rome of the Congregatio de Propaganda Fide strengthened the activities
of the Catholic church in the eastern lands. Moreover, the interest which
Father Joseph, the agent of Cardinal'Richelieu, showed in the work of
the Congregatio led him to organize a Capuchin mission to Istanbul. The
Jesuits and the Capuchins had the support of the Catholic ambassadors
at the Porte—a fact which caused the Ottomans to view the two orders
with some suspicion and to see in their religious endeavours a cloak for
political ambitions emanating from Rome, Paris and Vienna. To the
dignitaries of the Greek Orthodox church the arrival of the Catholic
orders was unwelcome and resistance to them soon became concentrated
around the person of Lukaris, the patriarch of Constantinople, a known
and respected champion of the Greek religion, language and culture.
On the side of the patriarch and his adherents stood the ambassadors of
Protestant England and Holland, in opposition to the representatives of
Catholicism.
The Jesuits and the Capuchins, in pursuit of their religious calling,
devoted much time and effort to education. It was now that under the
guidance of the two orders young Greeks, usually of good birth, went in
considerable numbers to be educated at Catholic centres of learning in
Rome, Padua and Venice—now, too, that with the approval of the anti-
Catholic forces mustered around the patriarch young Greeks studied at
Protestant centres of learning in Germany and in England. The year
1627 saw the arrival in Istanbul, from London, of a printing press for the
publication of religious literature written in Greek and intended for
distribution amongst the adherents of the Orthodox faith. The Jesuits
induced the Ottomans to seize the press, whereupon the printer, Niko-
demos Metaxas, took refuge at the house of the English ambassador, Sir
Thomas Roe. A vigorous protest from Sir Thomas, who had much
influence at the Porte, led now to the banishment of the Jesuits from the
empire. After Roe's departure for England in 1628 the Jesuits returned
to Istanbul, careful henceforth to act with greater circumspection than
before and in directions less apt to awaken the distrust of the Ottoman
authorities.
The Peace of Zuhab in 1639* left the Porte free to turn its attention
elsewhere. Soon it became involved in a new and formidable war, this
time against Venice and for possession of the island of Crete. Along the
eastern shore of the Adriatic, on the borders of the enclaves still under
Venetian rule, there was often friction between the Ottoman frontier
warriors and the mercenaries—Albanian, Greek and Cretan—in the
service of the Signoria. At sea the situation was still more uncertain. Here
the maritime forces of Venice came into conflict with the corsairs of
Algiers, Tunis and Tripoli.
A moment of crisis had occurred in the summer of 1638, when a
1
See above, p. 634.
638
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE OTTOMAN EMPIRE 1 6 1 7 - 4 8
squadron from Tunis, commanded by a well-known renegade, 'Ali
Piccenino, sailed into the Straits of Otranto, raided the coast of Apulia
and then captured a Venetian ship off Cattaro. The Signoria ordered
Marino Capello, cruising at that time in the waters of Crete, to deal with
the corsairs. Piccenino found refuge under the guns of the Ottoman
fortress at Valona. Capello, after a blockade of Valona lasting about a
month, entered the harbour, bombarded the town and made off with
the corsair vessels. Murad IV, with the Persian war still in progress,
restrained his anger and agreed to negotiate. The affair ended peace-
fully when, in 1639, Venice paid 250,000 sequins as compensation for
the ships taken by Capello.
A further source of tension was to be found in the militant religious
Orders of Christendom—the Knights of Saint Stephen and the Knights
of Saint John at Malta. Around the orders there hung, in pious Christian
eyes, an aura of splendour deriving from long-maintained conflict with
the Muslim infidel. To the Muslims the Knights of Saint Stephen and
Saint John—not less than the corsairs of North Africa to the Christians—
were pirates greatly to be feared because of their raids at sea and along
the shores of the Levant. The activities of Malta, to an especial degree,
envenomed the relations existing between the Ottoman Empire and the
Christian states. Even in Europe itself, as a report from France written in
1627 made clear, the view was gaining ground that the orders had out-
lived their usefulness. Venice, in general, regarded with disfavour the
depredations of the knights, which were sometimes indiscriminate at the
expense of friend and foe alike, and discouraged her subjects from
serving with the orders. The Signoria found it impossible, however, to
close to the knights the harbours in Crete and in the other islands and
mainland territories under her control.
A Maltese squadron in September 1644, near Rhodes, encountered a
number of Ottoman vessels laden with a rich cargo. The knights captured
these ships after a stiff fight and then sailed with their plunder to Crete.
This episode sufficed to bring to the fore the faction hostile to Venice
amongst the dignitaries at the Porte. The winter of 1644-5 saw the
Ottomans engaged in elaborate preparations for war—preparations
which included the building of ships, the casting of guns and the
gathering of munitions and supplies in the harbours of the Morea
and along the western coast of Asia Minor. On 30 April 1645 the
Ottoman fleet sailed for Crete, moving first to Chios and then to
Navarino. Ottoman troops, transported from Navarino, landed in Crete
on 23-4 June 1645, some distance to the west of Canea.
The Porte had now committed itself to an arduous war—and against
no mean foe. Crete would not become Ottoman until 1669. The fact
that Venice was able to bear the expense of so long a conflict underlines
the richness of the resources still at her command. The decline of Venice
639
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
is not to be dated from the conquests of the Portuguese around the
shores of the Indian Ocean after 1498. Those conquests disrupted for a
time, but did not end the flow of spices and other eastern commodities
from India through the lands of Islam to the Mediterranean world. The
transit trade across Egypt and Syria soon recovered its former amplitude.
Not till the arrival in the Indian Ocean—and also in the Mediterranean—
of powers stronger than the Portuguese, i.e. the English and the Dutch,
was the balance altered decisively in favour of the sea route to Europe
via the Cape of Good Hope. By the second quarter of the seventeenth
century the two Protestant states had won a preponderance in the spice
trade from the East and a large share, too, in the local traffic of the
Mediterranean itself. Venice was able, none the less, to offset in no small
degree the consequences of this change in her situation. She strove,
and with success, to retain some of her commerce to and from the
Levant and to extend her trading activities in the regions behind the
eastern shore of the Adriatic. The readiness of the Signoria to grant
concessions in respect of tolls, customs and labour dues brought numerous
Dutch and English ships to Venice and thus enriched the finances of
the state. Moreover, the government and the citizens of Venice began
now to exploit more than ever before the abundant resources, agri-
cultural and industrial, of the Terra Firma, that is, of the north Italian
lands under their control. It was from measures of this order, much
more than from the expedients usual in a time of crisis (donations, the
sale of titles, new taxes and the like) that Venice drew the means to defend
Crete so well against the Ottomans.
The balance of success, during the first campaigns of the war, inclined
towards the armies of the sultan. The rule of the Signoria in Crete amoun-
ted to little more than the domination, often harsh and intolerant, of a
small class of soldiers, officials and administrators, Italian and Roman
Catholic in culture and religion, over a population Greek Orthodox in
faith and Greek in speech and tradition. There was no prospect that the
people of Crete would rise en masse in defence of Venetian rule over the
island. Canea fell to the Ottomans in August 1645. Retimo surrendered
to them in November 1646. The able soldier Hiiseyn Pasha, in com-
mand of the Ottoman forces since September 1646, blockaded Candia
in the summer of 1647 and began a formal siege of the fortress in April
1648. Of the naval operations in progress at this time it will suffice to
mention that the Venetians, in 1645, sailed from Zante to Patras,
bombarding and plundering the town; also that their fleet, in 1646-8,
penetrated deep into the Aegean Sea, but failed to achieve a major
success. There was fighting, too, in Dalmatia, where the Ottomans took
Novigrad in 1646. An Ottoman attempt, in 1647, to capture Sebenico
ended in defeat and the Venetians thereafter occupied a number of
important fortresses, including Dernis, Knin and Klis, in 1647-8.
640
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE OTTOMAN EMPIRE 1 6 1 7 - 4 8
By 1648 the main lines of the war had become clear. Some areas of
conflict would have only a local significance. On the Dalmatian front
Venice used her command of the sea to reinforce a stubborn defence
against Ottoman incursions into the Adriatic littoral. Moreover, the
attempts of the Signoria to awaken resistance to the Ottomans, for
instance amongst the Mainotes of the Morea in 1653 and in 1659,
achieved only a limited result.
The Ottomans had to overcome Venetian naval pressure in the waters
of the Aegean Sea. Of no less importance was their need to maintain as
an effective force the army fighting in Crete—a task which involved the
large-scale movement of men and supplies from southern Greece and
from Asia Minor. To meet this continuing need the Ottomans organized
'convoy campaigns' at sea, employed also numerous small vessels which
slipped out of the harbours in the Morea and on the coast of Asia Minor
and, in addition, hired or impressed into their service foreign ships,
notably of English and Dutch origin.
Venice was to centre her defensive effort in Crete on the maintenance
of one great fortified base, Candia—a course of action which enabled her
to concentrate her troops on the island in a manner at once economical
and effective and, through her fleet, to reinforce them at will. As long as
Candia remained unconquered, Crete was not yet Ottoman. The offensive
operations of Venice would be carried out at sea. To cut off the flow of
men and munitions to Hiiseyn Pasha was to reduce the Ottoman
army in Crete to desperation. The Venetians directed the most massive
of their naval campaigns to the fulfilment of this aim, that is, sought
to crush the Ottoman battle fleet in a major action or else to
blockade the mouth of the Dardanelles and even penetrate, if possible,
through the straits into the Sea of Marmara—a threat so dangerous
that the Ottomans, during the earlier years of the war, fortified the
Dardanelles anew. Although well and resolutely led by captains like
Lazaro Mocenigo and Francesco Morosini, the Venetian fleet was not
able to realize this programme. One reason for its failure to win a decisive
success was the fact that the Ottomans had an alternative concentration
area at their command—the 'canal of Chios', between that island and
the coast of Asia Minor, where ships, reinforcements and supplies could
be brought together for transport to Crete. The naval resources of the
Signoria did not suffice for a firm blockade both of the Dardanelles and
of the waters around Chios.
It was in 1654-6 that Venice made her supreme challenge at sea. A
great battle off the Dardanelles in June 1656 shattered the Ottoman fleet
and enabled the Venetians to seize the islands of Lemnos and Tenedos
close to the mouth of the straits. The Ottomans, with a rapid and astonish-
ing deployment of their rich resources, now built a new fleet and, in 1657,
used it to regain Tenedos in September and Lemnos in November of that
641
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
year. The war would in fact continue, with intervals of relative calm, until
at last the Porte, under the guidance of the Grand Vizier Ahmed Koprulii,
made a vast effort to bring the conflict to an end. Candia, in the course of
a long defence begun in 1648, had been transformed into an almost
impregnable fortress. Ahmed Kopriilu, after a siege which lasted more
than two and a quarter years and was perhaps the greatest feat of arms of
the age, took Candia in 1669. Venice now accepted the peace terms offered
to her. The war was over and Crete, henceforth, a province of the Otto-
man Empire.
The firm rule which Murad IV had achieved remained in force for a
little while after his death in 1640—that is, during the administration
of the last of his grand viziers, Kemankes Qara Mustafa Pasha, who was
to hold the office from 1638 to 1644. Qara Mustafa was faithful to the
precepts and practice of Sultan Murad. He sought to reduce in number
the janissaries and the sipahis of the Porte. At the same time he was
careful to ensure that the troops were paid well and regularly. He set
himself, therefore, to reform the coinage, to introduce a more effective
and just assessment of taxation and, by these means, to have at his
command a full treasury. Qara Mustafa, however, was a grand vizier
and not a sultan. Under the eccentric Ibrahim (1640-8) intrigue and
faction grew once again to formidable proportions. The rigorous control
of Qara Mustafa and his promptitude to punish wrong-doing awakened
resentments against him—of the Walide Sultan K6sem, the mother of
Ibrahim; of the vizier Sultanzade Mehemmed Pasha; also of the Silahdar
Yusuf, who was the favourite, and of Huseyn Efendi, who was the
khoja of Sultan Ibrahim. These powerful figures conspired successfully
to bring about the fall of the grand vizier. In 1644 the sultan gave the
order for the execution of Qara Mustafa.
The rule of courtiers and officials, faction around the throne, the mis-
management of the state revenues, renewed turbulence amongst the
troops of the central regime—all the evils so strong before 1632 now,
after 1644, dominated the scene once again and with undiminished force.
There was also a marked revival oijelali dissidence in Asia Minor under
such men as Varvar 'Ali Pasha, Ibsir Mustafa Pasha and Abaza Hasan
Pasha during the years 1644-58. 1 A revolt of the janissaries and the sipahis
of the Porte in August 1648 led to the deposition and death of Sultan
Ibrahim, whose ineptitudes and extravagance had earned for him the
distrust of the soldiers and dignitaries belonging to the imperial house-
hold. The rivalries between the old Walide Kosem, the mother of Ibrahim,
and the new Walide Turkhan, the mother of the young Mehemmed IV
(1648-87) and their respective adherents called forth, in 1651, a new
outburst of violence, in the course of which Kosem, a potent influence
behind the throne during the reign of her sons, Murad IV and Ibrahim,
1
See above, p. 630.
642
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE OTTOMAN EMPIRE 1 6 1 7 - 4 8
was done to death. An end had to be made to the sequence of intrigue,
rebellion and murder. The Venetians, now at the summit of their naval
offensive, were threatening in earnest a 'breakthrough' from the Aegean
Sea into the Sea of Marmara. With the destruction of the Ottoman
fleet in June 1656 a return to order was imperative. It was at this time of
crisis that Mehemmed Koprulii came to the grand vizierate. The restora-
tion of efficient rule was swift and sure. His tenure of office (1656-61) and
still more the tenure (1661-76) of his son Ahmed Koprulix gave to the
Ottoman Empire a further, though brief interval of glittering, but illusive
splendour.
643
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER XXI
EUROPE AND ASIA
A T the close of the sixteenth century the Portuguese Empire in Asia,
ZA the Estado da India, had reached a climax of prosperity. The state
1 \ . balance-sheet showed that expenditure upon the salaries of officials,
the stipends of the clergy and the upkeep of guard fleets and garrisons was
much more than met by income from customs dues and land revenues.
Everyone knew, moreover, that the recorded salaries of captains and
factors, weighmen and clerks were more than matched by their income
from perquisites, graft and extortion. For the soldier and the sailor life
between campaigns might be hard, but he could hope for a prize or sack
and, if deserving or fortunate, for a minor office or grant of land. The
state had encouraged European colonization by the grant of estates to the
casados, the married men available for local military service, in Goa, in
the new conquests northwards to Damao and now in Ceylon. Further-
more, everyone, high or low, lay or cleric, who could raise the capital
busily engaged in trade. The crown was only interested in a small number
of monopoly products, pepper, cinnamon and the finer spices, destined
for Europe and in such grand lines of trade as Goa to Mozambique, or to
Malacca and Macau. There was ample scope for local licensed trade and,
since control was lax, for infringement of monopoly too. Finally many
Portuguese merchants, shipmasters and soldiers of fortune, whose
activities might shade through commerce to piracy, were to be found in
parts of Asia not under jurisdiction of the crown. Western India was fully
administered, the east coast settlements of Negapatam and Sao Thome
were only loosely linked with Goa, but the rising settlements at Hugli in
Bengal, and in Arakan and further round the bay were quite independent.
Throughout Indonesia other pockets of Portuguese were to be found—
a handful at Grisee [Gresik] in Java, another twenty or thirty families in
Macassar, yet others, mercenaries and merchants on the south-east Asian
mainland and among the off-shore islands of the China coast. All these
contributed to the network of inter-Asian trade carried on by the Portu-
guese, often in close co-operation with Asian merchants and financiers. It
was the profits of their trade, together with the customs receipts of Ormuz,
Diu, Goa, Cochin and Malacca, the entrepdts whither the trade winds and
Portuguese naval power directed the movements of Asian merchants,
which ensured the continued prosperity of the Estado da India.
As the century ended the Malabar pepper lands were disturbed by a
rash war and an earlier successful revolt in the spice-providing Moluccas
had only partly been made good through the complex net of private trade.
644
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008EUROPE AND ASIA
But trade between Macau and Japan, with its offshoot of illegal trade to
Spanish Manila, continued to flourish. Customs receipts at Malacca were
rising and both its old enemies Johore and Achin were seeking peace. In
Ceylon, Portuguese control of the lowlands with their valuable cinnamon
and arecanut had been restored, and the captain-general Azevedo closely
besieged the last independent Sinhalese kingdom, inland Kandy. In
India the growth of the Mughal Empire, now advancing on the Deccan,
roused alarm, but the peace and unity it imposed on all north India from
Sind and Gujarat to Bengal were good for trade. There was a further
compensation, too, in better relations with Golkonda and Bijapur, two
kingdoms which as late as 1570 had come close to destroying Goa, but
which now sought a common front against the Mughal danger. West-
ward, in the Persian Gulf, three Portuguese victories had ended the Otto-
man naval threat from Basra and the Red Sea, a threat further diminished
by the rise of the Safavid dynasty in Persia. The energy and enterprise of
Shah Abbas might one day endanger Portuguese Ormuz, but for the
moment his fostering of trade was all to its advantage. Finally, in East
Africa Arab risings on the coast had been totally suppressed while inland
the decline of the Monomotapa Empire raised hopes of a Portuguese
advance up the Zambesi.
The crown trade between Asia and Europe, let out in contract to
various European consortia, had run into difficulties from the 1570s
onward. Antwerp was lost as a distribution centre; a revival of the old
Levant routes cut the profit margins on pepper and spices; there were
heavy losses of Indiamen to privateers and through poor fitting-out and
overloading. The link between Lisbon and Goa was thus weak, for there
were neither the funds nor the ships to permit any massive reinforcement
of the Estado da India. Much depended therefore upon the resources
which could be mustered and deployed within the Estado itself. Almost
to the end of the sixteenth century these seemed sufficient. The main bases
from East Africa to China, though manned by less than 7,000 native-born
Portuguese, held firm. Similarly a handful of carracks, supplemented by
smaller craft, were able to keep open the main lines of trade within the
area and in the Indian Ocean and Malacca Straits to impose a system of
cartazes or licences, which reduced competition, and compelled Asian
traders to pay toll at Portuguese ports. Even such powerful states as
Golkonda, Bijapur and the Mughal Empire submitted to the cartaz
system. The element of compulsion in such a licensing system and in the
fortification of the trading posts the Portuguese secured had been a new
phenomenon when they first reached Asia. By the end of the century,
however, the Portuguese had been absorbed into the state system of Asia.
Familiarity had lessened offence, and deft manipulation of Asian rivalries
prevented any united resistance. Moreover the Portuguese made no
serious attempt to exclude Asians from whole areas of trade, and even in
645
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
western India where they were strongest, infractions of the few monopolies
the crown asserted were regularly winked at. Portuguese individuals
actively co-operated with Asian merchants, entering into trading partner-
ships with them, giving out goods on commenda, either captaining or
freighting their ships. Indians carried Portuguese goods to hostile Aden,
Portuguese smuggled the goods of Indians into Cochin under cover of
their privileges. The Dutch governor-general van Diemen later com-
mented, 'Most of the Portuguese in India look upon this region as their
fatherland, and think no more about Portugal. They drive little or no
trade thither, but content themselves with the port-to-port trade of Asia,
just as if they were natives thereof and had no other country.' Perhaps for
this reason they were often received with more friendliness than later
European arrivals. The Portuguese alike because of their naval power and
their usefulness as trading partners had thus established a stable-seeming
position in Asia. And then, in 1596, the whole balance was radically dis-
turbed by the appearance of Dutch ships in Asian waters.
The Dutch role of distributors of Asian goods from Lisbon throughout
northern Europe—a role they were outgrowing—had for some years been
threatened by Spanish policy. They had therefore pushed their trade into
the Mediterranean and Levant, ventured to West Africa, and vainly
sought a northern route to China. Philip's seizure of all Dutch shipping in
Portuguese ports, and the ending of their connived-at commerce, led them
in 1595 to make their first voyage east round the Cape. Armed with West
African experience, and the detailed information about the Estado da
India secured from Goa and Lisbon by Linschoten and Houtman, they
struck out for the Sunda Straits and the Javanese port of Bantam. This
was an excellent base for the pepper and spice trades. Moreover, as
Brouwer discovered in 1611, by using the south-east trade winds from the
Cape it could be reached without touching the Portuguese strongholds
astride the monsoon sailing routes.
The first voyage established that the route east was feasible and safe,
a series of provincial companies quickly appeared to exploit the break-
through, and within seven years no less than sixty-five ships sailed east.
Initial instructions were to concentrate on profitable trade, to avoid
Portuguese territory, and to use force only in self-defence. However, the
Portuguese showed no intention of allowing the intruders to go un-
molested. The viceroy from Goa put diplomatic pressure on Asian rulers
to secure the closure of their ports to Dutch shipping. As a result Achin,
anxious for aid against Johore, rebuffed three successive Dutch fleets, the
Christian chiefs on Banda attacked them, and by 1601 both Bantam and
Ternate had been half persuaded to repel the rebel, piratical Dutch.
Nothing loth, Dutch commanders responded with counter-violence,
joining in an Amboinese attack upon Portuguese Lei Timor, besieging
646
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008EUROPE AND ASIA
their fort on Tidore, and in 1602 seizing the Santa Catarina, 'the greatest
and richest carrack which ever sailed from China'. The viceroy's reply
was to despatch all available forces under the veteran Andre Furtado da
Mendonca. He threatened Achin, besieged Bantam, and strengthened the
Portuguese garrison on Amboina, destroying the Dutch fort and visiting
with fire and sword such villages as had traded with the enemy. He went
on to reinforce Tidore, to drive the Dutch from Ternate and to install a
Portuguese garrison there.
Such Portuguese determination, the formation of an English East India
Company late in 1600, and the arrival of French ships in Asian waters
drove the Dutch to prepare more thoroughly for conflict by the creation
in 1602 of the United East India Company, the V.O.C. Three of the ten
Voor-Compagnie had already amalgamated, for the danger of forcing
prices up in the east and down in Europe was early apparent. But the
union of 1602 had a wider aim than the giving of central direction to
dispersed commercial effort: it was to create a military instrument with
which to counter Iberian hostility and to secure for the Dutch that mono-
poly of the spice trade without which the burden of military expenditure
could not be sustained. Oldenbarnevelt, the advocate of Holland, who
engineered the union, had toyed with the idea of a state system of forts
and fleets in the east. When instead a union of private companies was
formed it was armed with all the powers of a state—the right to make
treaties with native rulers, to build forts, to hold territory in full sover-
reignty, to raise troops and to appoint the necessary governors and
military and judicial officers. The structure of the United Company was
federal: the previously existing companies of Amsterdam, Hoorn, Enk-
huizen, Rotterdam, Delft and Middelburg were incorporated as chambers
of the new company, responsible for fitting out ships and financing indivi-
dual voyages. But the over-all direction of the company, entrusted to
seventeen delegates from the chambers, the famous 'Heeren XVII', was
nevertheless strongly centralized. The seventeen were responsible for the
size and distribution of the annual investment, for the sale of return car-
goes, and for supervising the raising of funds; the debts of the company
were a joint responsibility. The province of Holland, providing eight
directors and over half the capital, was able to give a strong lead within
the seventeen. Since the system of election to the directorate placed
authority permanently in the hands of men who were powers in then-
towns and provinces and closely linked with the government, the Heeren
XVII acquired such authority as enabled them to disregard the wishes of
shareholders and to make the company an arm of the state in the fight for
national independence. 1
1
In their struggle with King Philip, the Dutch shrewdly concentrated their attacks upon
the overseas possessions of his Portuguese rather than his Spanish crown. Their few assaults
on Spanish territories were singularly unsuccessful.
647
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
The United Company, commanding great resources, proceeded to
send out twenty-seven ships in its first two voyages, armed with instruc-
tions as much military as commercial. In view of the 'improper and
violent means' used by the Iberians, the fleets were to inflict all possible
damage on the enemy. Accordingly, offensive alliances were signed with
the zamorin of Calicut, the king of Kandy and the sultan of Johore.
Steven van der Hagen took the Portuguese base on Amboina, built a
Dutch fort, and secured from the Amboinese chiefs both an oath of
fealty to the States General and the monopoly of their cloves and then
followed up this blow to Portuguese prestige and authority by taking
their fort on Tidore. Dutch ships visited Sumatra, Java, Borneo and
Celebes as well as the Moluccas, everywhere furnishing arms and en-
couraging attack upon the Portuguese. As Matias de Nova mourned, 'In
less than a year was lost that which a century of Spanish and Portuguese
valour had conquered.'
The Dutch had swept the eastern seas, inflicting heavy losses on Portu-
guese shipping, but they lacked the strength to take a firm grip on land,
especially as officers and crews protested against the directors' secret orders
committing them to fighting ashore. This Dutch weakness was exploited
by the Spaniards in Manila who, having sought and received aid from New
Mexico, proceeded to occupy Ternate and retake Tidore. The Dutch
regained eastern Ternate and with difficulty held it, but they failed com-
pletely when they broadened their attack to include the main Portuguese
land bases. They had succeeded in Indonesian waters against Portuguese
private traders and their Asian partners, but Matelieff's four-month siege
of Malacca in 1605, Caerden's six-week siege of Mozambique in 1607, and
Verhoeven's cruise against Mozambique, Goa and Malacca in 1608 with
a particularly powerful fleet all failed. In each case heavy damage was
inflicted on the Portuguese at sea—Matelieff destroyed a fleet led by the
viceroy in person—but the fortresses held, a continuing threat to Dutch
achievements.
The wider attacks from 1605 onwards had been prompted by the desire
to snatch success before the Twelve Year Truce negotiated between Spain
and the Netherlands came into force in 1609. Since the truce was never
observed beyond the equator they served only to distract attention from
the main objective, the islands of Banda and the Moluccas. Verhoeven and
his successors, instructed 'to strive after winning these islands for the
Company either by treaty or by force', tried both methods. At Banda the
chiefs agreed to a trade monopoly but refused a fort, whereupon the
Dutch landed in force, built their fort and compelled the chiefs to swear
fealty and sign away the monopoly of their mace and nutmeg production.
In Amboina the similar agreement, signed in 1603, was renewed. In Ter-
nate a new treaty was concluded with the king, two new forts were built
and the Spanish fort on Batjan was taken. By the end of 1609 the Dutch
648
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008EUROPE AND ASIA
had established trade from Bantam to the Moluccas and northwards to
Achin, Siam and Borneo and to Japan, where two ships despatched to
Nagasaki were well received, the Dutch being granted imperial protection
and freedom of trade.
The Dutch by treaty or force laid claim to a monopoly of cloves,
nutmeg and mace, and looked forward hopefully to an eventual pepper
monopoly. But before such monopolies could be made effective several
problems had still to be solved. First a more stable, effective administra-
tion was needed than that which government by the annual fleet com-
manders supplied. Secondly, though organized Portuguese resistance in
Indonesia had been broken and the Spanish counter-thrust contained,
there were still the English and many Asian competitors to be eliminated
before prices could be controlled. And thirdly, trade must be diversified.
The Dutch had begun by following Lisbon's example of sending out large
consignments of silver. But what was appropriate to trade in India, the
sink of precious metals, was much less suitable for trade in Java and the
Moluccas where Indian cottons and foodstuffs formed the most profitable
media of exchange; moreover, as trade expanded sufficient European
silver became harder to secure. The Dutch and English had both to learn
what the Portuguese had earlier discovered, that Asian trade must be
driven with the profits of inter-Asian trade, and European silver supple-
mented with Asian gold and silver.
The administrative problem was tackled by the appointment in 1609
of Pieter Both not as admiral responsible for one voyage only, but as
governor-general in charge of all the company's possessions in the East,
supported by a council of five. Here was the answer to the complaints of
such allies as Johore that Dutch commanders, after persuading them into
alliances against the Portuguese, sailed away leaving them to their fate.
But the Dutch, having appointed their viceroy, still lacked a Goa. Pieter
Both, constantly on the move in the Moluccas, could draw little support
from his widely scattered council. A permanent base was sought there-
fore, either at Johore or Malacca which commanded the Coromandel
cloth trade, the pepper of east Sumatra and the China trade, or at
Bantam or Jakarta, the supply points for the Moluccas. Jan Pietersz
Coen, director of Bantam and Jakarta, was left to choose. While still
undecided, he was driven to fortify the Jakarta factory by clashes with the
English in Bantam, the growing hostility of its regent and rumours of a
general Javanese conspiracy. When in 1618 the new fortifications success-
fully resisted attack by the English and the regents of Bantam and Jakarta,
it was decided that the long-sought headquarters had been found. Jakarta,
rechristened Batavia, became thenceforth the focus of all Dutch trade and
administration.
The elimination of competitors was not so quickly achieved. It was one
thing for the seventeen to instruct their governor-general that 'the com-
22
649
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
MHFDECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
merce of the Moluccas, Amboina and Banda should belong to the Com-
pany, and that no other nation in the world should have the least part',
but quite another, with overstrained forces, to achieve that happy end.
The Spanish were contained in Ternate, and since there was little demand
for spices in the Philippines and Americas and no profit in shipping them
to Europe, it was only as suppliers to Macau and Malacca that they
proved a nuisance. The English, however, were more serious rivals. After
the collapse of Antwerp, English merchants had pushed further afield
in search of spices and eastern commodities, first in the Russia Company
with its Volga voyages to Persia and then in the Levant Company,
tapping at Aleppo the large supplies which escaped Portuguese control.
But by 1599 Dutch activities were threatening these Levant supplies: 'if
our spices be not brought from Aleppo as in time past, into England . . .
our Company shall not be able to defray half of their charges'. The
answer was to form the East India Company in 1600 as the spice arm
of the Levant Company. The first two English fleets went straight for
Indonesia, and if subsequent voyages included the Red Sea and India
this was initially only to secure cottons for the purchase of spices at
Bantam. Throughout the first half of the seventeenth century pepper
and spices were to be much the largest item in the English Company's
sales.
However, by the time the English reached Banda and Amboina in
search of nutmeg and cloves the Dutch had already made fifteen voyages
and secured an exclusive treaty with the Amboinese. Shortly after Henry
Middleton reached Banda in 1605, the Dutch arrived, took the Portuguese
fort and stopped English trade. Middleton sailed on to Tidore and was
well received—and again the Dutch arrived, ousted the Portuguese and
by agreement with the sultan excluded the English. Only with the islanders
of Ai and Run were the English able to secure a trade agreement, else-
where though the people wished to trade the English were excluded. The
English reply was to encourage smuggling and to foment and support
native resistance to the Dutch. Conferences at London and The Hague in
1613 and 1615 failed to ease the tension and meanwhile in Asia the
English had extended their bitter competition by opening factories in
Sumatra, Java, Borneo and Macassar, and in Siam and Japan. By 1615
open conflict had developed between the two companies in the East. In
1615-16 the Dutch, ignoring English rights, took the factory and island
of Pulo Ai; in 1617 they attacked Run; in 1618 Coen, newly appointed
governor-general, prepared to crush the English before their support
could lead to any general native rising against the scattered Dutch forces.
He was backed by the express orders of Prince Maurice and the seventeen
to expel all foreigners, friends or foes in Europe, from the Spice Islands.
In November 1618, however, Jourdain, the English president at Bantam
struck first, attacking Dutch shipping at Jakarta and besieging their new
650
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008EUROPE AND ASIA
fortifications in co-operation with the Bantam regent. But distrust
between the allies saved the garrison and Jourdain dispersed his fleet to
collect cargoes. Coen, returning from the Moluccas with sixteen ships,
snapped up the English in detail; his elimination of the English seemed
achieved.
Then came news of an agreement in Europe between King James and
the States General for co-operation between the two companies. Both
would supply ten warships for attacks upon the Portuguese and Spaniards,
both would share the spices, half the pepper and one-third the finer spices
going to the English. Coen and his council were furious at this respite to
the English and proceeded to ignore its provisions by conquering the
Bandas and Run. The English also failed to fulfil their commitments:
their total profits between 1613 and 1621 had been less than 90 per cent,
they had lost eleven ships to the Dutch in one year, and now they were
dragged into costly operations against Spanish and Portuguese posses-
sions, in Dutch interests rather than their own. By 1622 it was clear that
their share in a spice trade cut back by war would not cover their expen-
diture under the agreement. In 1622 President Fursland closed the fac-
tories on Ternate, and in January 1623 his orders went out, on Dutch
ships, to abandon the Bandas and Amboina. Then on 27 February 1623
occurred the still inexplicable 'Massacre of Amboina' when Towerson
and nine other Englishmen were beheaded on Amboina, charged with
plotting to overthrow the Dutch garrison. The massacre marked the end
of any Anglo-Dutch co-operation and any English attempt to enter
directly into the spice trade.
Coen could now turn to two other aspects of his monopoly policy, the
regulation of spice production and the elimination of all those Asian
intermediaries who competed in the port-to-port trade and acted as
suppliers of spices to the English, Portuguese and Danes. The Dutch had
repeated the early Portuguese error of trying not only to monopolize
purchases but to push prices down. The producers, tied by forced agree-
ments to the Dutch, either rebelled or turned to wholesale smuggling.
The seventeen insisted on buying spices cheap and selling cottons and
rice dear. And when Councillor Steven van der Hagen pointed out that
the Portuguese, paying more for cloves and permitting free trade in
foodstuffs, had made handsomer profits than the company, they replied
by issuing instructions for rooting out Asian traders, and when spice
production fell heavily, for exterminating the recalcitrant growers. Coen
actively supported their views. In 1621 he sailed to crush the Bandanese,
long in revolt against Dutch demands. Hundreds were shipped as slaves
to Batavia, thousands starved to death in the mountains, while the men
of Run were rounded up and killed. Ceram suffered a like fate. The nut-
meg lands were then parcelled out to Dutch settlers—Coen approved of
Portuguese colonizing methods—to be worked by slaves. For cloves
65I
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
32-3DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Amboina and the Uliassers were later chosen as the sole producing areas,
and control was sought through the destruction of unwanted plantations,
enforcement of low-price delivery contracts and naval patrols against
smugglers. From 1636 there were serious insurrections until opposition
was cowed by laying waste most of Hitu. The pursuit of similar policies
in the more powerful kingdoms of the northern Moluccas led to a mass
rising in 1646 which endangered the whole Dutch position, but this too
was quelled by mass destruction of clove and sago plantations and the
deportation of populations.
Forcible control of production was supplemented by action against
Asian competitors. When the Dutch reached Indonesia they found, for
example, an active trade at the port of Grisee in Java, with some sixty
junks a year sailing with food to Banda and returning with nutmeg and
mace. Chinese junks also called to revictual and to exchange silks and
porcelains for sandalwood and deerskins. There were also many resident
Portuguese and Chinese merchants giving out cottons and copper cash in
commenda to Grisee junk masters sailing to the Spice Islands, and a busy
trade with Malacca either in Portuguese craft or on junks hired from the
king himself. This trade the Dutch destroyed, first by seizing Portuguese
shipping, then by demanding that the Malacca trade be abandoned. The
king was ordered to abandon his trade with Banda, and when he refused
both the Grisee and Chinese junks were seized.
As Portuguese control of the Moluccas weakened in the late sixteenth
century, the kingdom of Macassar in Celebes had become another im-
portant market for spices and the source of food supplies to the Portu-
guese in Solor and Timor. After the early Dutch successes many Portu-
guese settled in Macassar, selling cottons against nutmeg and cloves
brought in by Bandanese, Javans and Malays. Both they and the sultan
regularly sent junks to Malacca. After 1624 the English used Macassar as
their main source of smuggled spices, particularly cloves from Amboina
and Ceram where the sultan's influence was strong. The Danish Company,
established in 1616, also conducted an active trade between their Tran-
quebar settlement in eastern India and Macassar. In 1635 the Danes and
English shipped some 400,000 lb. of cloves to Europe, nearly three times
as much as the Dutch secured, while in eastern India the Danish com-
petition drove prices down from twenty pagodas a maund in 1631 to four
in 1639. From 1616 therefore the Dutch were at open war with Macassar,
seizing their junks in the Moluccas while Macassar supported the people's
opposition in Amboina and Solor. In 1641, however, the conquest of
Malacca released Dutch forces for the Moluccas and in 1642 a large
Macassar fleet sailing to aid a revolt in Ceram was destroyed. The back of
Macassar's resistance was broken, though conflict dragged on until 1669,
and the Dutch monopoly of the finer spices was largely achieved. The
immediate cost of monopoly had been extremely high. War had absorbed
652
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008EUROPE AND ASIA
capital urgently needed for the expansion and diversification of Dutch
Asian trade. In the 1620s the Moluccas lost a hundred thousand florins a
year, and in the 1630s the loss in Amboina and Banda was little less. The
reward came in the 1670s when spices yielded a steady profit of over
1,000 per cent.
The Dutch also vigorously attempted to master the trade in Indonesian
pepper. The pepper which had reached Europe before 1600, either via
the Levant or round the Cape, was mainly Indian, from the Malabar
coast. Indonesian pepper, though widely grown, went to Asian markets.
It was this pepper which the Dutch put on the European market as much
the largest item in their exports from Batavia and their sales in the
Netherlands.
Their main competitors in Indonesia were the English, whose early
voyages were directed to the pepper ports of Achin, Jambi and Bantam
and whose first returns included over 1,000,000 lb of pepper. They could not
be driven out by force, for the powerful rulers of Java and Sumatra would
not brook violence in their ports. The Dutch therefore tried to break the
less heavily capitalized English by underselling them. The first decade was
indeed difficult for London because the combined Dutch and English
supplies, plus the traditional Portuguese imports, glutted Europe. But in
1609 King James forbade any pepper imports but the company's, recog-
nizing that 'a free and generall libertie.. .would be an occasion to overlay
the trade, and strangers would of purpose vent their spices at small rates,
thereby to enforce our owne subjects to desist from trading'. With their
home market thus secured the London Company was able to go ahead
with the creation of a network of export centres at Hamburg, Danzig,
Amsterdam and Lisbon, at Leghorn, Venice, Naples and Constantinople.
By 1615 prices had recovered and imports were reaching 1,500,000 lb. a
year, and the offspring of the Levant Company was selling pepper worth
£209,623 in Italy and Turkey. The naval disasters of 1618 in Indonesian
waters, the general depression of 1620 and the burden of joint operations
with the Dutch until 1623 caused a temporary financial crisis, but this
storm once weathered pepper exports again rose sharply. After 1626 ex-
ports to the Levant in several years topped the million mark, while in the
late forties when profit margins were narrowing, total English imports
reached a record 3,000,000 lb a year. 1
The Dutch, though dominant in the European pepper markets, thus
signally failed to break their English rivals. Against their Asian competi-
tors, however, they were more successful. When they first reached Bantam
they found that this Muslim sultanate had a growing population of foreign
traders, Gujarati, Arab and Chinese with Portuguese and Japanese from
Malacca. The Gujaratis brought cottons to trade for pepper, some of
which was then sold to Chinese junks for Chinese wares. Though their
1
See K. N. Chaudhuri, The English East India Company (Cass, 1965).
653
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
trade was not large they had the support of the port master and admiral,
both Indians. The Malacca and Malay merchants brought in more cottons
for sale against pepper and supplies for Malacca. The Chinese were re-
presented both by resident merchants, important middlemen in the pepper
and cloth trades, and by those who came yearly from China to exchange
silks, porcelain, musk and copper cash for pepper, spices and sandalwood.
When the Europeans arrived with silver they increased their silk imports.
They too were well represented in the sultan's council and administration.
In 1598 when the Gujaratis shipped 3,000 and the Dutch 9,000 bags of
pepper they snipped 18,000.
Dutch attempts to secure the bulk of the Bantam pepper were resisted,
both by the port master who sought to safeguard Gujarati interests and
by the Chinese who won the sultan's support. The Dutch complained
bitterly about such curbs upon their purchases, coupled as they were to
rising prices. The regent complained equally of Dutch and English gang-
warfare in Bantam and of the forcible exclusion of two French ships by
the Dutch in 1617. Coen, then director, replied first by attempting to bribe
the port master and then by seizing pepper from Chinese junks, on the
grounds that his advances to the resident Chinese had not been repaid in
the promised pepper, which they assembled. Though censured by the
seventeen for actions 'beyond all the limits of justice', Coen repeated his
seizures in 1619. Riots followed in Bantam, the regent forbade advances
to the Chinese, and when Coen persisted in violence he banned all sales
to the Dutch. The Dutch then withdrew to Batavia, fortified it, beat off a
joint English-Bantamese attack as already recounted, and proceeded to
blockade Bantam. Pepper prices there tumbled, the Chinese deserted the
port, and Bantam never fully recovered.
The Chinese and other traders then moved to Jambi, a rising pepper
port in eastern Sumatra. Here again resident Chinese acted as assemblers
of the pepper brought down from the interior, and overseas Chinese
became its principal purchasers. Both the Dutch and English established
factories at Jambi. When the Chinese middlemen, though working on
Dutch advances, refused to accept prices lower than their compatriots
offered, the Dutch again resorted to violence. The Chinese junks aban-
doned the trade. Similar violence was used at Japara in Java. Coen's
demand for a monopoly of trade here led to an attack on the Dutch fac-
tory in 1618. In 1620 Coen sacked Japara, destroyed the English factory,
ordered all Gujaratis to be killed, and carried off many Chinese to Batavia.
Before the end of the decade the only pepper port at which the Chinese
could still freely trade was Banjarmasin in Borneo.
The Dutch by their strength at sea, by the magnitude of their purchases
of pepper—perhaps half to two-thirds of the Indonesian crop—and of
rice, and by manipulation of local rivalries, imposed their terms on the
smaller coastal trading kingdoms in Java and Sumatra. But there were
654
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008EUROPE AND ASIA
larger Powers, themselves expansionist, which refused to be so used. They
were strengthened in their resistance by the ties of a common religion,
Islam. Through Achin, the chief port for trade or pilgrimage to the Red
Sea, political ties were maintained with Ottoman Turkey, Mecca and the
Muslim powers in India, and through Achin Muslim scholars and mystics
passed to Java and beyond. Their influence can be seen in the preaching
of Islam with which Macassar coupled its expansion in the Lesser Sundas,
in the jihad waged by Mataram against Hindu Bali, in the Bantam regent's
refusal to sign a truce with kafir Batavia, and their anti-European propa-
ganda throughout the archipelago. Macassar, as has been seen, was a
dangerous commercial threat. Mataram, in central Java, became a
military danger. Sultan Agung took Tuban in 1619, Grisee in 1622,
Sukadana in Borneo and Surabaya in 1625. He then assumed the title of
Susuhunan and demanded Dutch recognition of his suzerainty of all
Java. When this was refused two heavy attacks were launched against
Batavia in 1628 and 1629. Both failed for lack of supplies, but the in-
fluence of Mataram still spread: Palambang in Sumatra paid homage, the
independence of Jambi was threatened, closer relations were cultivated
with the Portuguese. Only on the fall of Malacca, the alternative to Batavia
as an outlet for Mataram rice, and the death of Sultan Agung in 1646 did
the Dutch secure a peace treaty with Mataram.
With Achin, the dominant power in north Sumatra, relations were
even trickier, for while the sultan was a bitter enemy to Portuguese
Malacca, he was also expanding his control over pepper-producing areas
in a way scarcely palatable to the Dutch and was at war with their ally
Johore. When the Dutch first arrived a weakened Achin was seeking a
rapprochement with Malacca and the Dutch were rebuffed. But the
Portuguese overplayed their hand and Achin turned to the Dutch.
Achinese envoys went to Holland and in 1607 the sultan entered into an
offensive alliance and granted the Dutch freedom from customs dues and
the exclusion of other Europeans.
Meanwhile the Dutch had also responded to the appeals of Johore for
common action against Malacca, and in 1606 the two mounted the great
siege which was only broken by the arrival of the Viceroy D. Martim
Afonso de Castro. But the alliance proved less rewarding than expected,
for since the annual fleets of the Dutch could not give sustained protec-
tion, the Johore sultan in 1609 made peace with Malacca, though con-
tinuing trade with the Dutch. The alliance also became embarrassing
when Sultan Iskandar Muda of Achin set about expanding his kingdom
at the expense of Johore, and the other Malay kingdoms in eastern
Sumatra. The pepper country of west Sumatra was already his, and by
1623 he had crossed the Malay Straits and taken Quedda, Perak and
Johore, and had pushed down eastern Sumatra and threatened Jambi.
Achin was within sight of mastery of the Malacca Straits and the pepper
655
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
trade of Sumatra, to which it allowed European access only under licence.
When the Malay rulers of eastern Sumatra led by Jambi now united their
forces, the Dutch decided to join them in opposing any further Achinese
advance.
The decision was a delicate one, for in safeguarding their trade in
Jambi, Indragiri and Palembang of Coromandel cloth against pepper,
benzoin, wax and honey, they risked losing the pepper trade with Achin.
Indeed, when an Achinese fleet appeared off Jambi in 1624 the Dutch
broke their promise of aid to Jambi rather than incur the enmity of Achin.
This double-dealing, repeated in 1627, led the Jambi sultan to raise duties
on Dutch pepper to 22^%. The Dutch thereupon shifted to Indragiri,
which was attacked in 1632 by Achin, and to Palembang where they did
little better since it was closely tied to Mataram and Malacca by the trade
in rice against cottons. The awkward balancing act continued, the Dutch
trading at both Achinese and Malay pepper ports, half-heartedly en-
couraging Achinese assaults on Malacca, while seeking to maintain in
existence the balancing power of Johore. The problem was only solved by
the death of Iskandar Muda in 1639 and the accession of weak successors.
In 1641 the Dutch took Malacca, and in 1649 by treaty incorporated
Achin and its pepper ports in their monopoly system.
The intense effort to master the pepper and spice trade merely reflects
the overriding importance of these commodities in the pattern of Dutch
trade. In the years 1619-21 on the books of Batavia they formed 74% by
value of the cargoes shipped home, and in 1648-50 some 68% and, though
these last three years had seen pepper prices falling, some 57% of the sale
proceeds in the Netherlands. It must be remembered also that pepper and
spices were a major commodity in Dutch inter-Asian trade, and equally
that much of that trade was developed to sustain and facilitate the trade in
spices. If Dutch factors were sent in 1601 to Gujarat and in 1605 to Coro-
mandel, it was because the one was the main source of cottons for
Sumatra and the other for Java and the Spice Islands, cottons with which
pepper and spices could most easily be obtained.
The first Dutch Coromandel settlements were made at Masulipatam
and Petapoli, under agreements of 1606 with the sultanate of Golkonda,
these being areas noted for printed cloth for the Moluccas. In 1608
further factories were opened to the south in the territory of the Hindu
ruler of Gingi and in 1610 at Pulicat in the Vijayanagar kingdom. For
some years, however, trade was hampered by the Portuguese at Negapa-
tam and Sao Thome, well-established customers in treaty relation with
Golkonda, and able to bring considerable diplomatic pressure to bear at
the various courts. The Dutch were welcome customers, but their attacks
on Portuguese shipping in which Indian interests were often involved,
their inadequate capital, and their failure to provide European and Asian
goods of the quality supplied by the experienced Portuguese caused con-
656
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008EUROPE AND ASIA
siderable difficulty. Nevertheless these troubles, and the sack of Pulicat
by the Portuguese in 1612, when a great effort was made to prevent the
Dutch establishing themselves in the vital trade in cottons, were weathered.
In 1613 some 17,000 pieces of Coromandel cloth were shipped to In-
donesia, in 1619 some 83,000, and as Dutch control of the Spice Islands
grew and the order was issued to buy spices only with cottons and rice
so as to conserve silver for other markets, purchases increased still
further. In the 1630s, when a regular blockade of Malacca was instituted,
more markets once occupied by the Portuguese were absorbed, com-
pletely so when the fortress fell in 1641. Dutch purchases were now
impressive, for cotton piece-goods had become the most important item
in their inter-Asian trade, while smaller supplies of coarser fabrics were
sent to Europe for re-export to the West Indies. Of the later 8,000 pieces
were purchased in 1620 and 40,000 or more in 1650.
The Dutch would have liked to monopolize the Coromandel cloth
market, but cottons had always been the staple of what van Leur 1 has
called the 'peddling trade' of Asia, and in many areas the Dutch could not
compete with small Indian merchants working on low margins. In
Arakan, Burma, Achin and the overland trade to Siam the Dutch aban-
doned the attempt, nor could they prevent Indian trade with Malacca,
Jambi, Bantam and Macassar. From the 1630s the Dutch did attempt to
impose a cartaz system, but under the stimulus of increasing European
demand and rising prices many powerful Coromandel officials such as
Mir Jumla entered the trade on a large scale—as did several Malay rulers
and the sultan of Achin. When in 1647 Batavia refused cartazes to Achin,
Malaya and further east in an attempt to exclude competition, the Bijapur,
Golkonda and Tanjore rulers reacted so threateningly and many great
nobles so openly flouted Dutch authority that the measure had hurriedly
to be abandoned. The attempt to pre-empt supplies by doubling pur-
chases in the 1630s and redoubling them in 1640s also failed. Despite
striking increases in the capital furnished to the Coromandel factories,
control of the market continued to elude the Dutch.
The second centre for Indian cottons was Gujarat, but though their
merchants had reached Surat by 1602 the Dutch decided to buy Gujarati
cottons at higher prices in Achin rather than face a major clash with the
entrenched Portuguese. 2 In 1614, however, an invitation from the
Mughal emperor, at war with the Portuguese, led them to open a factory
at Surat. In the twenties, as more capital became available, new factories
were opened inland and cottons were shipped in useful but never large
quantities to Sumatra and by way of Europe to Brazil and the West
1
J. C. van Leur, Indonesian Trade and European Influence in the Indonesian Archipelago
between 7500 and about 1630 (The Hague, 1962).
1
The Portuguese had an active trade with Mughal Gujarat and commanded the seaward
approaches with forts at Diu and Damao.
657
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Indies. In Gujarat and Coromandel the cottons bought for the Spice
Islands were paid for partly with spices, though in both areas demand
proved inelastic and on Coromandel the Danes from Macassar offered
sharp competition. Pricing the spices needed nice judgement; in Surat the
demand for cloves fell by two-thirds because of the high prices fixed by
the Dutch, and smuggling by Indian merchants increased. On the other
hand, when mace was offered cheaply in 1653 Asian and European rivals
bought it at Surat and shipped it to the Levant and Europe, undercutting
Dutch consignments to Europe.
Dutch participation in the trade in Indian cottons strengthened their
control over Indonesian trade and yielded steady and useful profits. But
to Coen this was only a beginning. His vision was of a Dutch commercial
empire, as wide as the Estado da India, using Dutch settlers like the Portu-
guese casados to conduct the port-to-port trade, self-sustaining so that the
trade to Europe might be driven with the gains of trade and the ordinary
revenues of the Dutch possessions. Indian cottons, Persian silk, Japanese
copper and from China gold, silks and porcelain—all should be welded
into one system of trade with Batavia as its hub. He pressed continuously
for more money to prosecute these designs and to match the capital
deployed by the Iberian Powers. He campaigned again on his return to
the Netherlands in 1623: if the seventeen could not furnish the capital
required, then open the Dutch East to private enterprise, to the capital of
free merchants who should manage the inter-Asian trade and open trade
with China, the richest mine the Iberians possessed.
The use of colonists, free merchants, was tried. But when they were
given land they proved unenterprising; when allowed to trade they became
embarrassing competitors of the company and a cover for the private
trade of the company's officials. Since the company would not surrender
the whole port-to-port trade to them it was driven by stages so to circum-
scribe the goods in which they might trade as to make nonsense of Coen's
vision. The attempt to open trade with China also failed. Dutch seizure
of the Macau-Nagasaki carrack in 1603 confirmed Portuguese statements
that the newcomers were pirates, so that approaches to the Canton and
Chincheo authorities were rejected. The Dutch intimidation of Chinese
junks trading for pepper in Bantam, Jambi and Japara was followed from
1618 by persistent attacks upon Chinese shipping to Manila, designed to
break Spanish powers of resistance in the Philippines. Conditions were
therefore scarcely auspicious when in 1621 the seventeen ordered Coen to
try trade with China again. In 1622 Coen duly sent eleven heavily manned
ships against Macau, still an open city. The crushing defeat inflicted on
the expedition by the Portuguese citizens and their slaves was followed by
Chinese imperial orders to Canton to exclude the Dutch and aid the
Portuguese. The Dutch thereupon tried to force the door open, seizing
some sixty junks and blockading the coast. 'This trade has been sought
658
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008EUROPE AND ASIA
with friendship for too long', Coen wrote: but neither his efforts, nor
those of Brouwer in 1633 to compel trade succeeded. Driven from the
coast and then from the Pescadores by the Chinese, a Dutch base was at
last found in south-west Formosa, whence a flourishing trade with Amoy
was built up. Spanish expeditions from Manila which established two
forts on Formosa never proved a serious danger, and in 1642 both forts
were taken by the Dutch. From Formosa a flourishing trade was built up
in Chinese sugar. Shipments rose to over a 1,000,000 lb. a year in the
1630s, declined in the 1640s under competition from Dutch Brazil, but
flared up again when the Portuguese revolted in Pernambuco in 1645,
disrupting Brazilian supplies. There was also a trade in silks, porcelain
and cinnamon, much of it directed, as was sugar, to the Asian port-to-port
trade.
Once the Dutch had established their indirect trade with China from
Formosa they were in a position to supplant the Portuguese in the
extremely valuable trade with Japan. The latter had long enjoyed some-
thing of a monopoly of the trade between Japan and China, though under
the Shogun Tokugawa Iyeyasu (1600-16), there was encouragement of
Japanese merchant shipping and a renewal of Chinese traffic with Japan.
But the Portuguese had been missionaries as well as merchants and their
success in securing converts, welcome while the shoguns were breaking
the political power of the Japanese Buddhist orders, came to be looked
upon with suspicion thereafter. Their converts, some 300,000 by 1600, were
mainly made in feudal lordships of suspect loyalty. The arrival of Spanish
missionaries increased distrust, for accusations were rashly flung between
the orders and the known political function of conversion in the Philippines
led to fear of subversion in Japan. When the Dutch offered to take over
the Portuguese role of intermediaries in the China trade, the shoguns were
ready to expel the Portuguese and suppress Japanese Christianity. The
Dutch reached Japan in 1601 and were welcomed. But they failed to live
up to their promise to supply all the goods brought by the Portuguese and
in their attacks upon Portuguese and native shipping seemed pirates
rather than merchants. Only after their establishment on Formosa were
they able to procure Chinese silks and gold to add to Coromandel ray
skins, Siam deer skins, and pepper and spices. When in 1637 a peasant
revolt in Shimambara turned into a Christian rising against the shogun
the Portuguese were expelled. (This despite the fact that the great merchant
and banking families of Kyushu had invested heavily in the Macau trade.)
The Dutch now stepped into the Portuguese shoes. Through Formosa
they shipped Japanese silver and Chinese gold to the whole of Dutch Asia.
From 1640 to 1649 no less than 15,000,000 florins-worth of silver was
exported from Japan, very much more than shipments from the Nether-
lands. Since silver was also remitted to Batavia from Persia and Surat and
gold from Macassar, the Moluccas and Jambi, it is clear that by 1650 that
659
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Asiatic self-sufficiency of which Coen had dreamed was approaching
realization, in respect of the precious metals at least.
The English East India Company may be thought of as the poor man's
version of the Dutch United Company, starting with the same plans, but
diverging from them under pressure from its wealthier, state-backed rival
and the pinch of poverty. Its first objective had been the spices formerly
secured by the Levant Company but now threatened by Dutch trade
round the Cape. As has been seen, the already established Dutch were
able to maintain their commercial lead, and by political manoeuvre and
straightforward violence to exclude the English from direct trade to the
Spice Islands by 1619. The experience of 1619-23, when co-operation
with the Dutch was tried, merely confirmed that the London Company
lacked the financial resources and quality of organization needed to
break into the Far East against well-entrenched Dutch and Iberian com-
petition. In 1623 the English factories in Japan, Siam and the Spice Islands
were all abandoned. 1 In the pepper trade, however, the English were able
to maintain an important share, sufficient to prevent Dutch control of
European markets. 8 Pepper remained the largest single item in their
returns, a staple commodity for which a network of outlets was created in
northern Europe, the Mediterranean and the Levant, from the firm base
of a protected home market.
The company soon realized that a direct trade for pepper with bullion
and a singularly inappropriate supply of English goods was inefficient,
and that for a glutted European market more diversified returns were
needed. The third fleet, of 1607, was directed, therefore, to the Red Sea
and Gujarat to procure cottons and was supplied with a pinnace to
explore Coromandel, where the Dutch were known to be trading. In
1608 the Hector reached Surat where Hawkins, a Levant merchant who
spoke Turki, was put ashore to seek from the Mughals capitulations such
as the Ottomans granted. He achieved some personal success at court, but
the Jesuits there denounced the English as pirates, while Gujarat officials
afraid of interruption to the extensive Portuguese trade and of reprisals at
sea also opposed admission of the English. Unsupported by any further
English fleet Hawkins left in 1611. Merchant envoys sent to court by the
fleets of 1612, 1613 and 1614 made little better impression and the
Emperor Jahangir prepared to exclude the English altogether. Then the
Portuguese, seeking to force the pace, seized Mughal shipping. A savage
war followed. While it was in progress, four English ships at Surat were
attacked by the Viceroy D. Jeronimo de Azevedo—and completely
1
During their ten years in Japan the English never opened a trade with China. They were
thus denied access to the lucrative bullion trade between Japan and China, to their great
disadvantage.
2
After a truce in Asia had been negotiated in 1635 between the English president and
Portuguese viceroy, the English also had access to Goa and the Malabar pepper markets.
660
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008EUROPE AND ASIA
defeated him. Sir Thomas Roe, arriving at this juncture as a properly
accredited English ambassador, was able to exploit the Mughal reaction
against the Portuguese and the English naval victory to secure adequate
terms for a permanent English trade in Gujarat. From Surat a net of inland
factories was quickly thrown out and the trade in cottons for Sumatra, to
which the main pepper trade shifted, was opened up. The value of cotton
piece-goods was soon experienced—at Tiku and Priaman in 1612 the
English factors had found it paid to buy cottons from Gujarati merchants
there rather than buy pepper directly with reals—and as late as 1627 the
president in Batavia was still rubbing in the lesson that throughout
Indonesia cloth was wanted, not coin,' clothing being of use but coin, save
a little for ornaments, being buried in the ground... '.The varietiesof cotton
had to be right of course, Surat goods for Achin, Broach for Priaman.
The Gujarat factors also experimented with various goods for Europe.
Indigo was known from the Levant trade to be a prime commodity,
whether the fine quality Biana indigo from the Punjab or the coarser,
cheaper Gujarat indigo, and until the 1620s indigo formed as much as
seven-eighths of some homeward cargoes. (Coromandel indigo was tried
but thought inferior, though the Dutch shipped it in quantity.) English
shipments reached 150 to 200 tons a year, and large-scale re-exporting
was soon under way, notably to the Levant. In the 1630s the trade levelled
off, for the Dutch bought largely and once the change from woad and
American logwood had taken place demand proved inelastic. The
Gujarat famine of 1630 also damaged the trade, while in the late 1640s
West Indian all but ousted Indian indigo.
Two other introductions, saltpetre and sugar, provided helpful but
marginal additions to English cargoes, saltpetre being useful as ballast;
neither grew to any great importance until Bengal and Bihar were tapped
in the 1650s. A far more important innovation was the creation of a
market for Indian cottons in Europe. Cottons overland had never com-
peted with European linen, while Portuguese and Dutch shipments had
mainly been re-exported to Africa and Brazil. In 1609 the Surat factors
suggested calicoes for sheets and Coromandel dyed cloths for quilts and
hangings. Soon sample consignments were on the way, and a very
deliberate effort was made to create a market in Europe: as the directors
said in 1623, 'calicoes are a commodity whereof the use is not generally
known, the vent must be forced and trial made into all parts'. The 5,000
pieces of 1613 became 100,000 by 1620 and 221,500 in 1625, say two and a
half million yards. Advance was then checked by the Gujarat famine, for
the inefficient Coromandel factories could not make good the loss, and
up-country purchases at Agra and even Lucknow, and in Sind did not
entirely restore the situation. At the end of the period, however, Coro-
mandel supplies did become important, and with the opening of Bengal
in the 1650s the advance was vigorously resumed.
661
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
The English also had high hopes of one other commodity, Persian silk.
This was a royal monopoly, and the shah had for some years been
considering a diversion of the trade from the Ottoman-held Levant
routes to the Portuguese at Ormuz. The Spanish authorities exchanged
several embassies with Persia, whom they were anxious to embroil with
the Ottoman enemy, but they showed little enthusiasm for the silk trade,
too vast for their merchants to conduct. But the arrival of the English
opened another possibility to the shah. In 1617 a first English voyage was
made from Surat to the Persian Gulf and by 1619 a factory was fully
established at Jask. The factors were soon planning to divert the whole
silk trade through the Gulf: after spices, indigo and cotton, now silk
would pass from being a Levant to an East India Company trade. In 1619,
on receiving a letter from King James, the shah finally made up his mind.
In 1622 the Persians besieged the Portuguese fort on Kishin. Joined there
by an English fleet, they moved on to tackle Ormuz which fell to the
allies on 3 May 1623. This was a major disaster for the Portuguese. Des-
pite savage raiding up and down the Gulf, and notable naval battles with
both English and Dutch in the 1630s, they never restored their dominance,
though they continued to trade at Muscat and Basra.
The English discussed with the Dutch plans for diverting the whole silk
output, 6,000 bales a year, round the Cape. This was beyond their
resources for it would have required an annual investment of over half a
million sterling. But from the fall of Ormuz both companies were suffi-
ciently active to damage seriously the old Levant trade in silk. The Dutch
with their greater capital resources and ready supply of spices secured the
larger share of the silk (they were probably better served by their agents
with the shah too), for the English had some difficulty in finding cargoes
for Persia. But though once Portuguese pressure had eased the Dutch
tried to drive the English out by heavy buying, the English held on. When
the 1630 Gujarat famine reduced indigo and cotton supplies they too
increased their purchases, and by 1640 English shipments of Persian silk
exceeded those of the Dutch who, being on strained terms with the shah,
switched to Chinese silk. The silk trade did not answer all English hopes,
but it filled an awkward gap after 1630—in 1641 half the cargo from Surat
consisted of Persian silk—and Persia also proved the most useful Asian
market for the sale of English goods. The Persian trade had another,
incidental value; ships waiting at Surat or on the Coromandel coast for
cargoes to be assembled for Europe were able to carry Indian goods and
merchants to the Gulf and back, earning both freight and local goodwill.
Russia also conducted an active trade in Persian silk. Direct trade across
the Caspian to the silk province of Gilan began after Ivan IV's conquest
of Astrakhan in 1555, and was fostered by both tsar and shah, united in
their enmity to the Ottomans. It began as an aside to diplomatic missions
and developed into a regular caravan trade conducted by the treasury to
662
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008EUROPE AND ASIA
the exclusion of private merchants. Raw and boiled silk, damasks, satins
and velvets formed the bulk of the imports by the state, while Indian and
Persian merchants brought in silk sashes and handkerchiefs and carpets.
Indian cottons found no market by this route, however, for the Dutch
brought them more cheaply by sea to the Netherlands and so to Russia by
the White Sea route. There was also some trade with Khiva and Bukhara
and after 1646 there were Russian efforts to open direct trade with India.
The principal Russian export to Persia and central Asia was furs,
handled like the silk by a state department in Moscow. The furs were
obtained as tribute from the tribes of Siberia, as tithe from private fur
traders and, in the case of the valuable sables and black fox, by purchase.
At the opening of the seventeenth century they were collected between the
Urals and the Ob and Irtysh rivers, but as these hunting grounds were
exhausted new territories were opened to the east. By 1628 the Yenisey
and Tunguska basins had been reached, by 1640 the Lena, and in 1643
prospectors reached the Amur and travelled down it to the Pacific. The
advance of nearly 3,000 miles had taken only fifty years, for the pattern of
great rivers linked by easy portages made it simpler to press east than to
work the headwaters of the rivers. With the arrival at the Amur, rich in
furs and grain, the stage was set for Russian conflict with China, the first
major power encountered in the whole landward sweep across Asia.
The advance was initially made by Cossacks and infantry under state
direction, and thereafter by trappers and traders pushing out into the
wilds like Canadian coureurs des bois. Behind the trappers and Cossacks
came the state, demarcating tribal districts, and setting up fortified head-
quarter towns under voyevodas charged with collecting the fur tribute from
the tribes. In the wilder areas subordinate blockhouses were established
where hostages were held and furs assembled. A separate body of customs
officials collected the tithe from private trappers and issued the tax
certificates which passed the consignments through the posts westwards
to Moscow. The tribute and tithe furs were despatched annually from
district headquarters to Moscow where the treasury merchants sorted
them and arranged for their sale, either retail or wholesale. Some of the
furs were used in payment of salaries, the Russian economy being only
partially monetized, others as gifts to embassies and to church dignitaries,
and others in the silk trade with Persia. Other furs were exported by the
Dutch and English trading via Archangel, a rapidly growing port,
through the Swedish staples on the Baltic, and by the highland route
through Smolensk to the fur centre of Leipzig.
During the first half of the seventeenth century Russia had come to
control all northern Asia and the Dutch, from Batavia and Malacca, to
control the trade of the Indonesian Archipelago and the sea routes east-
wards to Japan. The English Company, though under-capitalized and
still without any permanent jointstock, without steady state support and
663
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
even exposed by royal action to the licensed rivalry of Courteen's Associa-
tion, had nevertheless created a viable trading system centred upon India.
The Spaniards in the Philippines had successfully held their ground there
and in Ternate. Even the Danish trade between Tranquebar and Macassar
survived. The one Power which steadily and irretrievably lost ground
was the Portuguese.
For the Portuguese the half century was one of desperate expedients
and agonizing choices as they sought to defend the whole sprawling
territorial and commercial structure of the Estado da India. Against
Asiatic rivals they had with some difficulty held their own, but for dealing
with European opponents, whose coming also activated latent Asian
enmities, their resources were inadequate. They could expect few rein-
forcements of men, money or ships from Europe, for Portugal had to
produce cannon fodder for Spanish armies, try vainly to hold West Africa,
and at great cost defend the line of coastal settlements in Brazil. 1 In the
East they had to make do with existing and local resources, improving
their organization and choosing how best to deploy them.
At home, the creation in 1604 of a Council of India, headed by an
ex-viceroy, with responsibility for all Indian affairs except the despatch of
fleets and purchase of pepper which remained with the Treasury Council,
did much to speed and invigorate decision, notably in the timely prepara-
tion of fleets. It was a misfortune that the jealousy of the duke of Lerma
and the Treasury Council led to its dissolution of 1614. There was also an
overhaul of the administration and personnel of the India House. In
India the independent powers of the Goa municipality were curbed, and
the conde de Redondo, going out in 1618, carried lengthy instructions for
tightening administration and streamlining correspondence. In both Goa
and Ceylon elaborate new land registers were prepared so as to maximize
revenues and steps were taken to ensure that casados maintained the
required cavalry and musketeers. In such ways administrative efficiency
was improved.
In the military field the most important reforms were the raising of a
militia in 1622, captains being appointed to train both the European and
native inhabitants, and to exercise them regularly. The regular troops
were also organized on the lines of the Spanish tercios. A serious effort was
made to provide for the scientific fortification of the main settlements by
the grant of profits from crown voyages, a tax upon cities, and the
despatch of a trained engineer with Flanders experience, Antonio Pinto
da Fonseca. Some care was also taken to ensure that commands, granted
as reward, were occupied by competent rather than merely deserving men,
1
It is noteworthy that whereas in 1638 a fleet of 41 ships with 5,000 troops was assembled
for the relief of Brazil, only a handful of ships and 500 men were sent to hard-pressed India
during the viceroyalty of Pero da Silva, 1636-9.
664
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008EUROPE AND ASIA
though reliance was still placed on noble blood rather than sheer technical
skill.
These, however, were defensive measures; to expel the Dutch and Eng-
lish intruders ships were needed capable of hunting theirs down. Initially
shipbuilding and repair was left to contractors whose interest it was to
build a few, over-large, under-gunned merchantmen rather than larger
numbers of easily manned, easily handled 450-tonners capable of facing
Dutch ships which were, as Queyroz put it. 'suitable for the purpose of
trade, pillage or war'. The reform came, thanks to the representations of
Joao Pereira Corte Real and Viceroy Linhares, but came too late. The
fleets from Lisbon were too small, and mainly intended for a round
voyage, to permit the building-up of a fighting force at Malacca. Some
galleons were built in western India, admirable ships, but Lisbon's orders
to build more were never accompanied by funds, and those of the Estado
being based on customs dues steadily dwindled. The imposition of special
taxes, borrowings from the charitable foundation, the Misericordia, the
auction of public offices in 1614, the creation of a new monopoly of Ceylon
cinnamon never supplied funds adequate to the need. Moreover there was
divided counsel about whether to use available funds on galleons or upon
the undecked, oared vessels long successfully used against Asian enemies.
Even so experienced a commander as Andre Furtado da Mendonca
plumped for oared ships; it was years before disastrous experience
showed the folly of pitting such ships and boarding tactics against the
heavy Dutch artillery. A temporary answer was found in abandoning the
carrack for routes east of Goa in favour of swift, light-draught galliots.
From 1618 this saved the Macau-Nagasaki trade, but the Dutch were
soon building pinnaces to counter such tactics, while their tall ships
blockaded Goa from 1621 to 1623, in conjunction with the English;
sealed off the Malacca Straits from 1630 to 1641; and from 1636 for eight
seasons blockaded Goa again—'a grip upon the heart itself.
Meagre resources of men and material were misspent on technically
inefficient instruments. They were also wasted by being spent in driblets
in the attempt to hold everything Portuguese. This was partly a matter
of pride, but the fact that the Portuguese were settlers, not temporary
company employees, also made it more difficult to accept the loss of
territory which had become an Asian home. Money continued to be
spent therefore on numerous forts and settlements, often of little military
value and profitable to individuals rather than to the state. 'Experience
has shown us', wrote Ribeiro, 'that these three colonies (Ormuz, Goa
and Malacca) should suffice us, and all the forts and settlements that we
make we draw from these strong points . . .' Nevertheless the Indian
authorities continued to prepare to seize Dutch Pulicat, to engage in war
with the petty rulers of Malabar, even to launch plans for new conquests
up the Zambesi. Strategic indecision is seen most clearly, however, in the
665
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
failure to choose between the defence of Malacca and the south and the
conquest of Ceylon. By 1601 the Portuguese were masters of the Ceylon
lowlands and poised for the clinching blow against Kandy; they were also
preparing to deal with Achin and to despatch a fleet capable of expelling
the Dutch from the south. A choice was required, but none was made.
The request that one carrack of Lisbon troops be earmarked for Ceylon
was refused, only 340 Portuguese were sent from Goa, and in 1603, when
a bare ten miles from Kandy, Azevedo's 800 Portuguese and 300 topazes
were driven into disastrous retreat. The half-measure was enough, how-
ever, to starve the fleet sent to Malacca of reinforcements so that, unsup-
ported for three years, it fell back exhausted from the defences of Ternate.
In 1611, 1617, 1627 and 1638 Portuguese forces reached Kandy, a noose
of forts was drawn round the kingdom, its territories were devastated by
raids, its eastern seaboard was occupied and fortified. But at no time
were sufficient troops supplied from Lisbon or Goa to hold what had
been won, nor sufficient resources made available to ensure the loyalty
of the Sinhalese troops. Meanwhile Malacca, its trade and revenues
dwindling, received sufficient reinforcements to survive Achinese attack
and Dutch blockade, but never enough to reimpose control upon the
Straits and the sea routes eastward. 1 This Portuguese dilemma was
exploited to the end by the Dutch. While already blockading Goa, van
Diemen in 1637 ordered an attack on Ceylon in alliance with the Kandian
ruler as preparation for a final push against Malacca. The move provoked
a forestalling attack on Kandy by Diego de Melo which ended at Ganno-
ruwa in the destruction of the whole Portuguese force. Batticaloa, Trinco-
malee and Negombo fell to the Dutch in 1639 and 1640, but more impor-
tant still Malacca fell after a five-month siege in January 1641. Despite the
respite given by the ill-observed ten-year truce signed in 1641 between the
Netherlands and D. Joao IV of Portugal, the Portuguese were unable to
prevent the loss of Ceylon in 1656—and of their Malabar settlements in the
following decade. By grasping at too much they lost all.
Within some sixty years the Estado da India was thus destroyed as an
imperial structure, reduced to some East African footholds, Goa and the
western Indian settlements, Timor and Macau. The Spanish Philippines
fared better, retaining their outlying position in the Moluccas and
decisively throwing back Dutch attacks on the Philippines themselves.
But for Portuguese and Spaniards alike the first half of the seventeenth
century had involved an immense, unproductive outpouring of men and
materials, which failed nevertheless to prevent loss of trade and territory.
Yet throughout the period the Iberians continued to devote a considerable
1
It is to be remembered, of course, that the choice was not limited to either Ceylon or
Malacca. There was also the Persian and English threat to Ormuz to be coped with. Here
also, too little and too late led to disaster, with the fall of Ormuz in 1623.
666
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008EUROPE AND ASIA
proportion of their manpower and resources, not to defence but to mis-
sionary endeavour. Chaunu has persuasively argued that Don Quixote
and Saint Teresa were of more account to the Spanish crown than the
balance of payments of the Philippines, upon whose maintenance perhaps
15 per cent of Spanish American revenues were expended. 1 Expenditure
on the church in the Estado was equally heavy. Foreign observers were
always struck by the number of clergy and churches in Portuguese India,
while officials, notably the Viceroy Linhares, became increasingly critical
of the burden. Complaint brought no change of policy, however, and as
Iberian power declined the claim to rights of patronage became the more
jealous in face of papal pressure to deploy French, Italian or German
missionaries in Asia.
The best defence of such claims to patronage was that missionary
success was still being achieved. In the early seventeenth century mission
stations were pushed up the Zambesi from Mozambique, one Jesuit
became patriarch of Abyssinia and another archbishop of the Syrian
Christian church in India. In north India Jahangir succeeded Akbar as
Mughal emperor without any diminution of support for the Jesuit mis-
sion at his court, while in China the year 1600 saw the establishment of the
first Christian missionaries at Peking. Two years earlier, in Japan, the
death of Hideyoshi had ended a burst of persecution, and permitted an
active resumption of missionary work which was to carry the number of
converts made towards the 300,000 mark. Not all these achievements
proved lasting. Over-zealousness brought failure in Abyssinia and south
India, while in the Mughal north, despite Jahangir's intellectual and aes-
thetic interest, the Jesuits achieved no imperial conversion and had to be
content with a diplomatic role. In Japan, too, the change of ruler brought
no lasting relief. The shoguns, having broken the independent power of
the great Buddhist sects, were unwilling to allow the development of
Christian communities, strong particularly in the lands of the Outside
Lords, and looking for leadership beyond Japan. They were increasingly
suspicious of the political designs of the Spaniards, and after the coming
of the Dutch and English were less commercially dependent on Macau
and Manila, the more so as there was a vigorous state-sponsored expan-
sion of Japanese shipping throughout south-east Asia under Iyeyasu and
his immediate successors. In 1616 a new ban was placed upon mission-
aries, and there was increasingly severe and brutal persecution of them
and their flocks from the Nagasaki martyrdoms in 1622 until the crushing
of the popular revolt at Shimambara in Kyushu in 1638. The Christian
community under Japanese leadership proved remarkably tenacious, but
the closing of Japan in 1639 made any further European aid impossible.
In China hope remained, for at Peking the learning of the Jesuits
secured their official recognition and the conversion of important scholars
1
P. Chaunu, Les Philippines et le Pacifique des lb&riques, pp. 267-8.
667
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
and officials. And while the family of the last Ming emperor, driven into
exile, was being baptized, other Jesuits were obtaining office under the
incoming Manchu dynasty. The cultural importance of this post at court
has been widely noted, but it also provided the prestige under cover of
which Portuguese and other Jesuits, and Dominicans and Franciscans
from the Philippines were able to make widespread gains in the provinces.
The Jesuit mission in China was also responsible for a major experiment
in mission methods, the presentation of Christianity without a European
garb. Ricci, the first head of the Peking mission, literally shed his black
habit in favour of a Confucian scholar's robes, he would have adapted the
pagoda to Christian uses, he allowed his converts to share in family
worship of their ancestors and public honouring of Confucius, he used
terms taken from the Chinese classics as names for God. In Japan, that
most sympathetic of all provinces, the Jesuits adopted a similar approach,
making use of Buddhist terms for God, heaven and religion. And drawing
upon the Chinese model, the Jesuit Roberto de Nobili at Madura, in the
heart of south India, made the still greater experiment of presenting him-
self as a sannyasi and Christianity in a Hindu dress. He lived austerely,
a vegetarian dressed in the ochre robes of an ascetic, teaching in Tamil,
drawing his illustrations from the classic Sanscrit texts, keeping company
with Brahmins, avoiding both outcastes and Europeans. All three experi-
ments, the Chinese and Indian especially, were responses to the problem of
making Christianity acceptable to people with high cultures of their own,
and without benefit of either the bribery of commerce or the coercive
force of arms. The experiments had but a limited success, though they
caused immense controversy within the missionary orders and the church.
There was considerable doubt even among the Jesuits in China, not
resolved by a conference in 1628, while Dominicans and Franciscans
from the Philippines secured the condemnation of Jesuit accommodation
first in Manila, and then in 1643 in Rome. In India Nobili's provincial
and the archbishop of the newly created south Indian see were both ready
to approve of the experiment and to defend it from the early missionary
experience of the church in Europe, but many Portuguese Jesuits, who
combined patriotism with faith, denounced conversion which was
religious but not political. The Jesuit visitor Pimenta condemned Nobili
in 1610, and the primate de Sa secured a further condemnation in 1619
at a conference in Goa. Ultimately, however, explanation directed to
Rome secured guarded papal approval which allowed both experiments
to continue until the end of the century. 1
The importance of the Madura or Chinese missions was intellectual,
for the problem they raised is still perhaps unsolved. Their rewards more-
over were not in numbers, but in an understanding which permitted an
exposition to Europe of the main elements of great Asian civilizations.
1
See Vol. v in this series, Chapter x v n .
668
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008EUROPE AND ASIA
There were three mission fields, however, which yielded more conven-
tional triumphs. In Portuguese India, though a decline in church building
reflected the straitened circumstances of the state, and some of the older
orders like the Franciscans were accused of greed and disciplinary dis-
orders, new missions, Augustinian, Theatine, Oratorian and Carmelite
injected fresh vigour, while increased concern for language, with the
production of grammars, dictionaries, catechisms and devotional works
made teaching more effective. In Ceylon as in India the power of the state
was used to harass the unbeliever and reward the convert. But the resis-
tance of the strong Catholic communities from Galle to Negombo and in
the Jaffna peninsula to Dutch attempts at conversion in the second half
of the century testifies to the quality of Portuguese mission work, espe-
cially in the education of the young, to their zeal and numbers, and to the
continuing pastoral care of the Goan clergy. To similar factors must
likewise be ascribed the rapid progress in the Philippines. By the beginning
of the period nearly 500 missionaries had entered the Philippines, and the
assignment of particular regions to the various orders encouraged the
learning of the local dialects. Schools were started early, followed by
colleges for higher studies, both for boys and girls, and Dominican and
Jesuit universities in 1611 and 1623, together with printing presses. Though
the Dutch blockade between 1618 and 1628 and renewed attacks after their
conquest of Malacca imposed a heavy burden on the Filipinos, the pro-
cess of Christianization continued and by 1650 had reached virtually the
whole lowland population.
Against these missionary efforts and results of the Iberian Powers,
the English in this period could set nothing and the Dutch but scant
success. At home Protestantism was still engaged in arduous combat with
domestic Catholicism and the forces of the Counter-Reformation. There
were few men to spare for overseas endeavour, and as yet no missionary
instruments comparable to the Jesuits or the Propaganda. Where Spain
and Portugal sent out hundreds, the Dutch sent out tens, the English ones
and twos. Moreover, where the Portuguese took all Ceylon, the Spaniards
the Philippines as their field, the English looked no further than to the
spiritual needs of their ships and factories, and the Dutch in the main to
the basically political task of turning their Asian Catholic subjects into
loyal members of the Reformed Church. Their predikants were servants
of the company, posted where it chose and accorded only a very modest
status—the lay readers were positively despised—yet expected to make
head against powerful orders of dedicated men permanently supported
in the mission field. Only on the animists of Formosa and the completely
isolated Roman Catholics of Amboina was any wide or lasting impact
made. 1
As is perhaps to be expected the influence of the Dutch in Asia was
1
See C. R. Boxer, The Dutch Seaborne Empire, 1600-1800 (London, 1965), pp. 132-54.
669
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
political and commercial, not religious—except in the negative sense that
they inspired a vigorous Islamic reaction in the Indonesian world, and
undid the work of Catholic missionaries. The Portuguese discovery of the
Cape route initially reduced the prosperity of Egypt and Venice, their
fleets and cartaz system displaced some Muslim merchant-shipmasters of
the Indian Ocean, though not the Muslim traders ashore who assembled
goods for shipment, their customs houses laid new tolls upon the tradi-
tional monsoon routes of Asia: they modified but did not overthrow. The
Spaniards with their majestic Pacific voyages opened a New World route
and a new trade in American silver against Chinese silks and porcelain.
The Dutch achievement lay somewhere in between. With the English they
certainly ended the Levant trade in pepper, spices and indigo, and directed
to the Cape route some of the cottons and silks which had passed by
Aleppo and Alexandria. Revolts in Ottoman Syria, Baghdad and the
Yemen mark the impoverishment this caused. The Dutch discovery of the
'roaring forties' route to the Sunda Straits likewise by-passed older mon-
soon entrepots, cut costs, and incidentally revealed the existence of
Australia and New Guinea. But their most drastic innovation was cer-
tainly the imposition of an absolute monopoly of Moluccan spices with a
consequent disruption of the whole pattern of Indonesian seaborne trade.
The political readjustments the Portuguese imposed on Malabar were
here repeated on a far larger scale.
More generally the coming of new European Powers, itself the sign of
economic expansion and vigour, enlarged markets in the West for old
staples like pepper and spices, so that Sumatran pepper was added to the
traditional supplies from Malabar. There was also a notable increase in
the export of coarse cottons for Africa and Brazil, 'nigger cloths' and
slave clouts, while the English pioneered quite new markets for finer
cottons to be used in European dress. This was paralleled by the growth of
the trade in silk, not only traditional Persian and Chinese but also, after
the 1640s, Bengali too. These were positive gains though they involved no
radical change in the mode of production. The creation of a more unified
world economy did bring losses and readjustments—Indian indigo suc-
cumbed to West Indian, Japanese had to struggle with Swedish copper for
markets, or Bengal and Chinese sugar with the produce of Javanese
plantations—but increased demand and competition raised payments to
the Asian producer while lowering prices to European and Near Eastern
consumers. There are some signs, too, of changes in Asian commercial
organization, as in the emergence of rudimentary joint-stock forms in
India.
Lastly the northern Europeans initiated a change in attitude towards
Asian peoples and states of some significance. The Portugese began from
the position that to those outside the Christian fold no duties were owed,
and that with Muslims the natural relationship was war. They early
670
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008EUROPE AND ASIA
accepted, however, that trade agreements with Muslims were licit, and
by the seventeenth century had long been in regular political relationship
with Muslim Golkonda and Bijapur as with Hindu Vijayanagar too.
Historians like Couto and Bocarro made clear their acceptance of Asian
kingdoms into the comity of nations. Ecclesiastical councils in Goa and
Manila denounced any attempt at forcible conversion and demanded
good treatment of subject people. The crown also made it clear that in the
state's eyes the convert enjoyed full citizenship, whatever social colour bar
might operate. And though most regular orders, however zealous for
Asian souls, recruited only Europeans, the Jesuits at least admitted both
Japanese and Chinese and, late and reluctantly, Indians, too.
The Dutch and English began with a pragmatic acceptance of the full
sovereignty of Asian kingdoms and sought formal relations with the
Achinese or Mughals on the lines of the capitulation system of the Porte.
Hugo Grotius writing as counsel to the V.O.C. stressed in his Mare
Librum, published in 1608, that Asian states 'now have, and always have
had their own Kings, their own governments, their own laws and their
own legal systems'. It was on their sovereignty that he rested his rejection
of Portuguese claims based on papal decrees, arguing from Aquinas that
' Christians... cannot deprive infidels of their civil power and sovereignty
merely on the grounds that they are infidels'. 1 As late as 1650 the seven-
teen were still stressing that here in Asia were 'free nations, where we find
laws and do not have to bring them'. But whereas experience had mel-
lowed the Portuguese it harshened the Dutch. Their predikants came to
abominate the blackhearted Muslim, their merchants any who would not
sell cheap and buy dear. The Dutch attempted therefore not only to secure
a monopoly of spices, but to secure it at low prices fixed by themselves.
To achieve this the seventeen in 1612 accepted Brouwer's memorandum on
the destruction of Asian shipping and trade, and in 1613 ordered Reynst
to curb Dutch private trade. When Reael and his council argued that
Asian traders had a part to play, and that the spice producers must have
their share of profit too, he was removed and Coen installed. His mas-
sacres of the islanders, his violence against Chinese and Gujarati traders,
his battles with the English made them blench, but not draw back. To
English queries about Mare Librum in the Moluccas Grotius could only
reply that 'contract extinguished the liberty of the law of nations'. If
predikants demurred at the uprooting of peoples they were sharply called
to heel. Liberal voices such as Read's or Steven van der Hagen's went
unheeded. The new colonial era was ushered in to Coen's dictum: 'There
is nothing in the world that gives one a better right than power and force
added to right. ' a
1
See C. H. Alexandrowicz, An Introduction to the Law of Nations in the East Indies
(Oxford, 1967), Chapter i n .
1
Boxer, The Dutch Seaborne Empire, pp. 98-9.
671
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER XXII
THE EUROPEAN NATIONS AND
THE ATLANTIC
INETY years after the discovery of America 'we of England could
never have the grace to set fast footing in such fertill and temperate
places, as are left as yet unpossessed' by the 'Spaniards and Por-
tingales'. The Dutch too, still absorbed in their struggle for independence,
had got no further than organized defiance of the Spanish trade monopoly.
Their East India Company in 1609, as Pieter Both was ordered to acquire
'a convenient place and, for our contentment, a fort which shall serve as a
rendezvous for our whole Indian Navigation', was still feeling its way
towards unified control. More intent on trade than on possession of land,
they had not yet staked a claim in the West. The French also, seeking
fish and furs rather than colonies, had as yet but the most tenuous hold
even on the lower St Lawrence. No country's colonies bore comparison
with the Spanish settlements in the Caribbean and on the Spanish Main,
or the Portuguese in the Atlantic islands and Brazil; and though the
English and Dutch controlled an increasing share of the East Indies trade,
and the English and French maintained two or three hundred ships on the
Grand Banks of Newfoundland, Habsburg predominance had not been
seriously challenged. But a challenging thesis had been formulated.
England had taken formal possession of 'Virginia'—the whole of
eastern America from 30 0 northwards—and Raleigh's Roanoke voyage
had also seen the use of a jointstock organization which distributed the
costs of establishing colonies among merchants and speculators. The
Roanoke venture, moreover, was a definite attempt at settlement,
and that purpose was then transferred from Virginia to Guiana (as it had
previously been transferred from 'Norumbega' to Virginia). True,
Raleigh's voyages of 1595 and 1596, and even of 1617, made little mark;
but a formal English title was established when in 1609 Robert Harcourt
annexed all of Guiana between the Orinoco and the Amazon, and Thomas
Roe's settlers in the Amazon delta survived from 1611 to 1617. The
Elizabethans had 'disputed the Atlantic with Spain' and had won their
place in it. In so doing, they stated, and vindicated, a claim that 'prescrip-
tion without possession availeth nothing'. Where the Spaniards had not
actually settled, the English (or any other power) might claim by right of
first discovery or of actual possession. Though not accepted in the treaty
with Spain of 1604, the English case was strongly put; and it was not
withdrawn.
French and Dutch rebuttals of the Habsburg claim were equally clear;
672
N
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN NATIONS AND THE ATLANTIC
but the lead lay with the English, and their interest was turning to the
central coastal area of the vast district which the Elizabethans had called
Virginia. In 1603 Bartholomew Gilbert, searching for survivors from
Roanoke, landed in Chesapeake Bay; and though he was killed there,
in 1605 an expedition sponsored by the earl of Southampton 'happened
into' Pemaquid River and was delighted at the fertility of the land. At
the same time Bartholomew Gosnold coasted down from Newfoundland,
naming Cape Cod as he came, the Bristol Merchant Venturers sent two
voyages under Martin Pring, and the East India Company sent to
Greenland and (probably) to Labrador in search of a Northwest Passage.
In 1606 these interests resulted in a royal charter for a Virginia Company.
This grant, covering the whole area from 34 0 to 45 0 , gave all the land
between 34 0 and 41 ° to a London 'colony' while the land between 38 0
and 45 0 went to a 'colony' to be organized in Plymouth and other
western cities. The land between 38 0 and 41 0 , common to both of these
'colonies', was to be a neutral zone and neither company (for that was
what the 'colonies' in the grant were) was to establish a colony within a
hundred miles of any settlement by the other. Both Virginia companies
were to be under a Council of Virginia, resident in England, with subor-
dinate councils to manage separate colonies as these were created.
The purpose was clearly to establish colonies; but the petitioners who
had secured the charter included a group of London merchants and several
bodies of West Country merchants, as well as nobles and gentry who were
primarily anxious to colonize. So trade was closely regulated. The
settlers were to be supplied with necessities from England by a series of
joint-stock voyages, the goods to be kept in a common warehouse and
then distributed by a 'cape-merchant' acting on behalf of the investors;
and (as in all such companies in England) the investors alone were called
'adventurers', the emigrants being 'planters'. For return cargoes the
process would work in reverse, the cape-merchant shipping the colonial
produce to England, to be disposed of for the adventurers.
The business of finding settlers remained with the Council for Vir-
ginia, which accomplished little; and the merchants profited so little that
by 1609 a new charter, and a new approach to Virginia, was demanded.
Something had indeed been accomplished. The Plymouth Company had
sent out Henry Challons in 1606; designed for north Virginia, he was
captured by Spaniards in the West Indies. The Bristol merchants then
organized a survey of the coast, and in 1607 Sir Ferdinando Gorges set
up a short-lived colony on Kennebec River. But the West Country
merchants then turned to the Newfoundland fisheries rather than to
Virginia. The London Company, in the meantime, had sent out Christo-
pher Newport, who in April 1607 established Jamestown in Chesapeake
Bay—the first enduring British settlement in Virginia. But the site was
low-lying and malarial; disease, starvation and Indian raids reduced
673
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
the settlers to about fifty by September 1607, and the council was at odds
with the settlers. Jamestown was saved by John Smith, a soldier of
fortune who had even been imprisoned by the first president, Edward
Wingfield, but who was made president in September 1608. Smith
curbed the settlers' obsession with gold-seeking, started voyages to
explore inland, made peace with the Indians, and organized the con-
struction and defence of Jamestown. But despite reinforcements only
about fifty people remained by the autumn of 1608.
At this juncture James I, and Sir Edwin Sandys at court and in parlia-
ment, stood good friends to the Virginia Company. A new charter,
granted in May 1609, defined Virginia as lying two hundred miles north
and south from Point Comfort and extending 'from Sea to Sea', and
granted all this land and the islands off the coast to a unified London
Company on a joint-stock basis. Shares, valued at £12 10s. each, were
bought enthusiastically. Planters were to receive one share for each per-
son whom they transported, but control lay in London, where the
council of the company appointed Lord Delaware 'absolute governor'
and sent nine ships under Sir George Somers and Sir Thomas Gates to
reinforce Jamestown. This expedition gave Britain her claim to the
Bermudas, where Gates and Somers were wrecked; it also finally estab-
lished the colony at Jamestown, for seven of the ships brought about
four hundred new settlers in August 1609. Yet while Gates and Somers
were wintering in Bermuda Jamestown was going through its 'starving
time' and the sixty survivors who welcomed Gates in May 1610 insisted
on embarking for England. John Smith, hurt in an explosion, had gone
home already and the colony was only continued because the homeward-
bound ships met Delaware in the mouth of James River, bringing his
commission as governor, three ships, and supplies and reinforcements.
Delaware returned to England in 1611, but he held his position as
governor until 1618. His deputies, Sir Thomas Dale and Sir Thomas
Gates, ably managed the colony, while another charter, of 1612, granted
the Bermuda islands and gave the stockholders power to appoint the
governor and council of Virginia and to make laws provided they were
not contrary to those of England. The laws already promulgated were
then codified (known henceforth as 'Dale's Laws'), with strict regulation
of economic and social life, including a veto on trade with Indians.
Farming for the common stock gave place to individual land-holding in
1614, and the resultant industry and enterprise stabilized and invigorated
the whole colony.
The Dutch and French were as convinced as the English that the power
of Spain depended on wealth got from the New World; and to challenge
that power both were ready to defy Spanish ownership. In fact, the Dutch
had won away the wealth of the East Indies trade both from the Portu-
674
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN NATIONS AND THE ATLANTIC
guese discoverers and from their Habsburg successors; for when the spices
had been brought home 'the great rich purses of the Antwerpians . . .
ingrossed them all into their own hands'. Similarly, Spain was equally
powerless to prevent the wealth in American gold and silver from creating
inflation at home, and to forbid its transfer to other lands.
But though the wealth of the New World may indeed have been no
source of strength for Spain, other powers found Spain's strength always
formidable, and their own efforts at trade and settlement always in
danger. The Dutch in particular, dependent on their entrepdt trade,
were seriously threatened when they were excluded from the Iberian
ports to which the eastern spices were brought. They moved into the
eastern trade themselves, and having co-ordinated their local Direkties
into a comprehensive state-sponsored Dutch East India Company in
1601, they sent the Londoner Henry Hudson on an exploring voyage in
1609. His object in 1609, as in two previous voyages in the service of the
English Muscovy Company, was to find a passage to the East by way of
Greenland and the north-west. But when baffled by ice off Nova Zembla
he crossed the Atlantic to seek the passage along the American coast.
Working on a report, derived from Verezzano, of a great western sea
close behind the coast of Virginia, Hudson also knew that John Smith
(with whom he was in correspondence) had proved that no passage
existed near Jamestown. Hudson worked south from Penobscot Bay to
Delaware River, whose volume showed that the western sea could not
lie near the coast; so he turned north, and then north-west up Hudson
River until stopped by shoal water in the Catskill mountains. The land
was 'the finest for cultivation that I ever in my life set foot upon'; but the
passage to the East was as remote as ever.
The Dutch therefore planned a further voyage in which Hudson might
discover the passage, leaving on one side the possibilities of colonization
which he had revealed. The English also were avidly interested in eastern
trade and a Northwest Passage. So, when Hudson had landed at Dart-
mouth on his return from America, the English forbade him to depart
for Holland, and in 1610 some members of the English Muscovy Company
sent him on his last tragic voyage, to Hudson Bay. Though Hudson's
voyage of 1609 was not followed up, the Dutch had nevertheless acquired
a claim to a central part of the north American Atlantic coast and its
hinterland.
The French also maintained that effective occupation was necessary
to give title to lands in the New World, and their constant voyages to the
Grand Banks of Newfoundland trained numbers of seamen who accepted
the crossing of the Atlantic as a commonplace, to be undertaken without
any particular preparation or acclaim. Moreover Tadoussac, at the mouth
of the Saguenay River, had early become a rendezvous at which French
fisherman and traders met Indians (especially the Montagnais from the
675
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
north) and got furs in great quantities. Such furs made the younger
Hakluyt's mouth water, and he included a fur trade among the benefits
to be secured by colonization.
By 1609 Samuel de Champlain had voyaged up the St Lawrence to the
Lachine Rapids above Montreal, he had collected Indian tales of the
Western Sea (Lake Huron), of Lake Erie and Lake Ontario, he had
tried settlement on the coast of Maine and in Acadia, and had explored
down the coast to Massachusetts Bay and Cape Cod. Always seeking a
route to the west, he devoted himself to the St Lawrence, and in 1608 he
and his patron de Monts secured a fur monopoly for a single year on
condition of establishing a colony inland. Prudently fraternizing with the
traders at Tadoussac, they pushed on up river, built their small fort at
Quebec, and spent the winter there, troubled with scurvy. Then, journeying
further up river in the summer of 1609, perhaps in search of the Western
Sea, perhaps to offset the end of his brief monopoly by taking trade to the
Indians 'in their habitations', Champlain met the Hurons, a great trading
tribe of Iroquois origin but committed to endless war with the Iroquois
confederacy of the Five Nations. With the Hurons, as previously with the
Algonquins, Champlain concluded an alliance; and as they set out on the
warpath he and two more Frenchmen went with them, by Richelieu
River to Lake Champlain and so south to Lake George. There at a point
near the site of the future Fort Ticonderoga, they met the Mohawks, one
of the Iroquois nations, and the Frenchmen intervened in the battle with
their arquebuses and, against all the odds, brought victory to the Hurons,
a notable victory, which hardened the pattern of French Indian alliances,
by shedding of blood and attendance at tortures, into hostility to the
Iroquois.
Though Quebec in 1609 was indeed a minute post, and there were
only about a hundred settlers in all Canada, Frenchmen were already
familiar with the land, their policy was clear, and their ambitions had
been aroused. Champlain had journeyed south by inland waterways to
the back of the New England coast, and Frenchmen had spread west-
wards and southwards from the St Lawrence in swift forays. Travelling
in company with Indians, they sought the Western Sea—and furs and
fur-trading Indians—and their voyages were bound to cut across English
moves westwards from the coast. The English, moreover, had just
entered into an alliance with the Iroquois Confederacy to whose defeat
Champlain had so markedly contributed; for as the reinforcements of
1609 came to Jamestown John Smith was peacefully buying land from
the Iroquois.
Although in the period 1609-10 English, French, and Dutch appeared
equally alive to the possibilities of North America, with Champlain at the
back of the Adirondacks, Hudson in Dutch employ sailing up to the
676
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN NATIONS AND THE ATLANTIC
Catskills, and the newly charted Virginia Company stabilizing Jamestown
and exploring Chesapeake Bay, it was the English who first moved for-
ward with serious purpose. In the colonies of Iberian origin which had
arisen in the century and a half since the Age of the Discoveries, the
heavy work of agriculture was not performed by Europeans, and trade
was not the business of the settlers but was in the hands of great corpora-
tions. Representative cross-sections of the European countries had not
moved overseas until England began the emigration of balanced com-
munities, of both men and women, who intended to work for their livings,
clearly distinct from the earlier shipments of unaccompanied males, unused
to work because they were gentry, or malefactors, or soldiery.
Virginia set the pattern; so vigorous was Virginia by 1613 that the
colonists sent their ships north under Samuel Argall to destroy the
French settlement at Port Royal. He took many of the settlers and their
priests prisoners, and on his way back to the Chesapeake he also com-
pelled the Dutch on Manhattan Island to haul down their flag. By the
time Argall became governor (in 1617) Virginia boasted 350 inhabitants,
including sixty women and children—a small but balanced community
spreading north from Jamestown to York River, with tobacco grown for
export, and with mixed crops grown for consumption. Stockholders,
however, were getting little profit, and the company was by 1616 split
into a 'court party' which favoured royal supremacy and authoritative
government, and a 'country party' which favoured the extension of
democracy. Sir Edwin Sandys and the earl of Southampton in 1618
secured control for the 'country party' advocating emigration, land
grants for subsistence crops, less tobacco, and legislation by consent.
A 'great charter of privileges, orders, and Lawes', granted in 1618, gave
the settlers a right to elect the first colonial legislature, which met, on a
single-chamber basis, in 1619. Local matters, relations with the Indians,
religious observances, decorous conduct, and subsistence crops were
discussed, and Dale's Laws were revoked, settlers were given the freedoms
which they would have enjoyed in England, and a hundred acres were
granted to each freeman who had paid his own passage out, with a second
hundred acres if he was also a stockholder in the company. Other
grants of land were made to individuals and syndicates within the com-
pany, which thus became something of a land-development corporation
though it still had the duty of stimulating emigration. The balance of
the community was levelled to some extent when in 1619 the company
shipped out ninety maidens as wives for the bachelor colonists; and a
new feature was introduced when Dutch shippers brought negroes in the
same year.
Virginia was far from completely democratic; grants of private land
stimulated enterprise but exaggerated inequalities, and tobacco as an
export crop upset its economic balance. Between 1617 and 1619 tobacco
677
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
exports rose from 20,000 lb. to over 60,000 lb, and the colonists, despite
an import duty, flooded the English market and provoked a quota limit
of 50,000 lb.—which drove them to ship to Holland. The 'Tobacco
contract' then ordered Virginia's tobacco to be shipped to England only,
gave a monopoly of the English market, and thus restricted both colony
and metropolis so that each should supply the needs of the other within
an imperial economy.
Notwithstanding the tobacco crisis of 1619-21, emigration to Virginia
continued, stimulated by uneasy conditions in England and diversifying
society as occasional artisans and merchants emigrated. Tobacco remained
the great attraction, land the measure of social status. Though by 1629
tobacco did not normally pay production costs, the quantity steadily
increased, from 500,000 lb. exported in 1628 to 4,000,000 in 1640. The
immigrants did not all prosper, or remain in Virginia; and many died.
Though 3,000 arrived in the period between 1621 and 1624, population
only totalled 1,275 in 1624. Yet the colony was on its feet, immigrants
arrived steadily, and about 1,000 a year came as indentured servants,
contracted to serve from four to seven years under the plantation-owner
who paid their passage. Vagrants, convicts, and sometimes 'naughty
women' were also shipped out, and Virginian society early began to
develop along 'plantation' lines, with considerable estates worked by
hired or compulsory labour as the basis for an oligarchic community
dependent on a single export staple.
Though malaria and mismanagement retarded growth, virgin soil was
in demand and plantations spread through the tidewater area and then
slowly inland, with small planters and time-expired servants dependent
on wealthy planters in many ways, often for the use of stages and quays
to load tobacco, or as middlemen to market or purchase the crop. The
resultant encroachments on Indian lands almost brought ruin when in
1622 the Indians attacked the settlements along James River, killing the
cattle, destroying a new ironworks, and killing about 350 settlers. The
colonists adopted a policy of destroying the Indians' corn and driving
them away from the settlements; and they still pushed outwards in search
of good tobacco land, maintaining an uneasy peace until 1644, when
again the Indians rose, and again were severely defeated.
Though Virginia survived, and even flourished, feuds, and dissatis-
faction with the company, made royal intervention easy, and after a
judicial enquiry the charter was annulled in 1624. The company was in
fact almost insolvent and could not properly support the colony; and
though the royal government which followed, from 1624 to 1642, had
many defects, at least it left the company to act merely as a trading
concern, without responsibility for government. Lands not yet granted
away were given out on generous terms, and abolition of the cape-mer-
chant and company-supplies brought new vigour to the economic life
678
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN NATIONS AND THE ATLANTIC
of the colony. With prosperity went constitutional development, and as
their governor became a royal nominee, with a nominated council, the
Virginians in 1629 again secured the grant of their General Assembly.
This, with adult male franchise for elections to the lower House of Bur-
gesses (soon modified by a property qualification), was a great vindica-
tion of democracy. It was secured at the cost of a tobacco monopoly,
granted by the Virginia assembly, which gave Charles I revenue for his
impending war with France. Here was a colony which could make a
significant contribution to war expenses and to the economic and political
balance of the mother-country. The colony, rising to about 5,000 people
by 1635, was largely oligarchic; but it was neither royalist nor aristocratic;
it would make its contribution on its own terms.
The annulment of the Virginia Company's charter made possible the
establishment of Maryland, a proprietary colony owned by Lord Balti-
more. George Calvert, first holder of that title, after earlier experiments
tried to establish a colony at Avalon in Newfoundland in 1623; but French
opposition, religious difficulties consequent on his conversion to Roman
Catholicism in 1625, and the raw climate led him to seek some 'warmer
climate of this New World'. Virginia attracted him, and despite opposi-
tion he secured the unoccupied land between Chesapeake and Delaware
Bays by royal grant in 1632. But George Calvert having died, the second
lord was given propriety of the soil, with the right to govern modelled
on the palatinate jurisdiction of the bishop of Durham. He had power
to make laws, appoint officials, coin money, grant titles of nobility,
exercise jurisdiction and make war and peace. The token payment to
the crown of two Indian arrows was supplemented by a fifth of any gold
or silver ores, settlers were always to be guaranteed the same rights as
Englishmen, laws must be consistent with those of England, and the
proprietor must owe allegiance to the king.
Though the western boundary of Maryland was fixed, from the sources
of the Potomac to the Atlantic, and Maryland clearly had no sea-to-sea
claim, the other boundaries were uncertain, and disputes with Virginia
soon developed, beginning with that over Kent Island in Chesapeake
Bay. But much careful thought went into this colony. Religious disputes
were to be avoided, good relations were to be maintained with Virginia,
1,000 acres were to be given to anyone who brought out five working
men, with less in proportion down to heads of families who got a hundred
acres for themselves and their wives and fifty for each child. Provisions
and implements were supplied, trained artificers were attracted, and the
first two ships, arriving in 1634, brought some twenty gentlemen, mostly
Roman Catholics, over two hundred artisans, mostly Protestants, and
three Jesuits priests. After a first settlement on an island in the river,
the colony moved to the well-chosen site of St Mary's, overlooking the
Potomac. But the proprietor's plans were not all fulfilled. Religious
679
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
toleration in itself roused opposition; for the Jesuits took offence when
in 1637 Baltimore declared that the Roman Catholic church must be
subject to the law; they began to plan for a separate regime, bought land
eagerly, and were forbidden to hold more land than was necessary for
their support. Puritans, in the meantime, had entered Maryland in con-
siderable numbers, often by re-migration from Virginia, and finding
the Roman Catholic bias unacceptable, had begun to work for a more
popular constitution. The charter to Baltimore provided for legislation
with the advice, consent and approbation, of the freemen or their deputies,
but the exact status of the freemen in the legislative process was vague,
and the first assemblies in 1635 and 1638 were small and appointed by
the proprietor; they nevertheless rejected a code of laws proposed by
Baltimore and, fortified by popular election in 1639, vindicated their
right to initiate laws instead of merely 'passing upon them'. Thereafter
assemblies were sometimes elective, sometimes not; but the governor and
his council, nominated by Baltimore, sat with the freemen and dominated
them.
In 1644 the Maryland Puritans, assisted from Virginia, broke into open
revolt, drove their governor into exile and secured the appointment of a
recent immigrant from Virginia, William Stone. Helped by Virginian
Royalists, Baltimore reasserted his authority, but he accepted the Puritan
regime and even made half the members of the governor's council
Protestants. Religious toleration was nevertheless maintained, and in
1649 Baltimore secured a Toleration Act which, while forbidding blas-
phemy and maintaining the divinity of Jesus Christ, granted free exercise
of all forms of Christian worship. But religious persecution continued in
Maryland despite the Toleration Act; and in 1650 Baltimore was forced
to accept a bicameral legislature in which the popular representatives
were separate from his nominees.
Yet Protestant sectarians could find a refuge there, and the soil and
climate gave them many advantages. Navigable water in the tidewater
area made transport to Europe cheap and easy, wheat and subsistence
farming soon gave way to tobacco, the early semi-feudal manors were
replaced by plantations, and the free householders yielded to indentured
servants, and then to negro slaves, on the plantations. When in the 1640s
grants of free land to immigrants were diminished, and the tidewater
lands were taken up by large estates, small men and time-expired servants
spread into the hinterland, where good land was still to be got. The new
pattern of settlement reflected religious cleavages with the Roman Catho-
lics making St Mary's their centre and the Protestants concentrating
round Annapolis. But, subject to the limitations of its proprietary
constitution, Maryland offered a unique blend of economic prospects
and religious freedom. So by 1650 the colony was firmly rooted and
boasted a population of about 8,000, most of them prosperous agriculturists.
680
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN NATIONS AND THE ATLANTIC
While tobacco culture gave Virginia and Maryland an export staple,
many hoped that furs and fish would provide a basis for settlement to the
north. From such hopes sprang the New England colonies. The name had
come into use when in 1614 John Smith, sent back to America by Sir
Ferdinando Gorges, surveyed the coast from Penobscot River to Cape
Cod; he described the area a s ' New England', and returned with a reliable
map and reports of the fertility of the territory which led Gorges to secure
the foundation of a 'Council for New England', established at Plymouth
in 1620. This was a joint-stock company for colonizing, its members
mostly aristocratic adventurers who had no intention of emigrating,
or even of financing and organizing settlement. Having secured the grant
of all lands, from sea to sea, with a monopoly of trade and fishing,
between 40 0 and 48 0 North, they sub-allocated these rights on condition
of the setting up of colonies. Surveys were non-existent and the same land
was sometimes granted several times; the grants included the allocation
to a New England Company of a considerable area in the locality of the
later state of Massachusetts, and of what was later to be Maine and New
Hampshire (the land between the Kennebec and Merrimac) to Ferdinando
Gorges and John Mason, who in 1629 allocated the land to the south
and west (New Hampshire) to Mason and that from the Kennebec to the
Piscataqua (Maine) to Gorges. Their boundaries with the New England
Company's grant were uncertain, but their two territories were sparsely
settled, so no great problem arose. Poor soil and long winters contributed
to the slow development of these lands, but uncertainty of title and the
attractions of Massachusetts were at least equally important.
Massachusetts owed much to the example of Virginia, and to the
existence of organizations for government, finance and even of shipping,
which facilitated the mechanics of emigration. But it revealed a new and
compelling desire to emigrate. The Thirty Years War undoubtedly upset
the export-market for English woollens; but that market had already
been uncertain for over a century. The constitutional struggle in England,
also, without doubt made men seek a quiet home elsewhere—and
Englishmen habitually moved in search of work and of land in a way
which made them a far from static population. These things, though not
new, achieved a new importance as the state churches of the seventeenth
century became increasingly intolerant. True, there was an air of tolerance
abroad. But it was a tolerance enshrined in cujius regio eijus religio, the
tolerance of Sully as he wrote that 'there is nothing in all respects so
pernicious as a liberty in belief... and there would be no hardship in
obliging all [a state's] inhabitants, either to conform—or quit the country'.
This doctrine brought numbers of Dutch, and later Huguenot, refugees
to England; and in 1608-9 it carried from Scrooby and Austerfield some
three or four hundred English Separatists to reside, first at Amsterdam
and then at Leiden. Small farmers and artisans for the most part, they
23
68l
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
MHFDECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
found that to join the Dutch gilds they must first 'lose their name of
English'; and, nationalism apart, there was a strong corporate spirit in
them. Having migrated as a body, with their pastor, they did not wish to
merge with their Dutch neighbours; but it was difficult to preserve their
identity, especially as their children grew up. America seemed to offer a
home where they might preserve both their English character and their
independent churchmanship, and by 1617 the decision to cross the
Atlantic had been taken. Having explored the possibilities of settling
in the lands claimed as New Netherland, the Separatists eventually
agreed with the holder of a grant of land under the English Virginia
Company. They secured a grant of land south of the fortieth parallel
but at such distance from Jamestown that they should form a distinct
body, and accepting James' vague statement that he would not molest
them as adequate guarantee for freedom of worship, they organized a
joint-stock company to finance their voyage. The 'planters' were to get
one £10 share each, while 'adventurers' promised to raise £7,000, to be
repaid from the common stock into which all produce from the colony
was to be paid, the common stock to be dissolved after seven years. After
much hard bargaining, during which many withdrew, the Separatists
then chartered a small ship to bring them to England, and then on to
America. The adventurers were also concerned to transport another,
larger, group of English dissidents, and their agreements almost amounted
to an arrangement to transport a couple of shiploads of indentured
servants to America, bound for seven years in return for their passages.
Events emphasized this aspect when in September 1620 the Mayflower
sailed from Plymouth with a mere thirty-five Separatists from Leiden,
but with sixty-six emigrants (not all of them 'Saints') from London
and Southampton. She made land in late November at Cape Cod, far
north of any land ascribed to the Virginia Company and in territory
allocated to the Council for New England. Since that council habitually
sub-allocated its lands, this mattered little; but the 'Pilgrim Fathers'
had no title to their soil. The Leiden contingent, however, had a strong
corporate spirit, and the Pilgrims forthwith combined into a body politic,
to make laws and constitutions for a colony. Landing on the heels of a
smallpox outbreak which had decimated the Indians, they found stores
of corn on which they subsisted while they explored the Cape Cod area
and decided to remove across Stuart Bay to Plymouth. There they built
a common house and divided the town land by lot, each householder
building his own house and bachelors being required to live with some
family. Agricultural land was farmed in common and, helped by friendly
Indians, the Pilgrims got through their first winter. But their strong
individualism, the vigour of their family lives, and shortage of food,
soon led to the abandonment of common landholding.
This change was put in hand by Governor Bradford against the advice
682
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN NATIONS AND THE ATLANTIC
of the London adventurers; it produced greatly improved work, but in
1624 the adventurers withdrew their support, though they still had claims
on the trade of the settlement, which was beginning to prosper, with furs
to supplement its agriculture. Accordingly in 1627 a syndicate of settlers,
led by their governor, undertook to buy out the adventurers, paying
£1,800 by annual instalments of £200 and recompensing themselves by a
monopoly of the fur trade for six years. The communal system was then
completely abolished, cattle were imported, trade begun with other
settlements, and there was even a corn surplus for export to England. Popu-
lation grew from 300 in 1630 to 3,000 in 1640, new towns sprang up, and
as the Pilgrims secured a grant of their land from the Council for New
England (at first, in general terms, in 1621, and then with specific boun-
daries, giving title north to the Kennebec River, in 1639) the colony
expanded. By 1637 it had outrun the Mayflower Compact with its General
Court where all freemen assented to laws, and elected the governor and
his councillors. So the practice of sending representatives from outlying
districts, adopted in 1636, was confirmed in the 'Fundamentals of
Plymouth' in 1639.
The Pilgrims had shown that the New England area could trade furs,
and could support an agricultural population in much the same conditions
as those of northern Europe. They had shown too that North America
could offer a refuge for dissenters. Plymouth was therefore followed by
several attempts to establish colonies, including two expeditions to Wey-
mouth (one under Sir Ferdinando Gorges' son) and one ribald attempt
at a refuge from the restraints of English life, at Mount Wollaston. Little
was accomplished, but New England was becoming better known and
better appreciated.
Among others, a group of merchants from Dorchester in 1623 set up a
small fishing post at St Ann, which later moved to Salem. The Dorchester
merchants sought a grant from the Council for New England but that
body, in 1628, sent John Endecott, an intransigent dissenter, to take over
the post; and Endecott concluded that a satisfactory settlement needed
an autonomous grant. Accordingly, in March 1629, Endecott and twenty-
five others, probably supported by the earl of Warwick, were incorpora-
ted by royal charter as the ' Governor and Company of Massachusetts-
bay in New England' and given all the land, from sea to sea, within a
line running from just north of the Merrimac River and a line running
three miles south of Charles River—land which had already been granted
to the Council for New England. Although the Massachusetts Bay Com-
pany's charter contained no special religious clauses, it did not specify that
control must rest with the adventurers (or their committee) in England.
Consequently the company could take power to control its affairs to
America, and this possibility was developed when a predominantly Puritan
group bought control and, in 1629, elected John Winthrop as governor.
683
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
23-3DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Winthrop, lord of the manor of Groton, Suffolk, a graduate of Cam-
bridge University, was a considerable man in his locality, but by 1629 was
oppressed both by his own debts and by certainty that the wrath of God
must fall on England. New England would offer means to depart from the
corruptions of the English church without separating from that church;
the 'elect', destined for salvation, could there find a refuge. So in 1629
Winthrop and other educated and respected eastern counties Puritans
formulated the 'Cambridge Agreement', promising to take themselves
and their whole families to New England provided they were able to take
with them 'the whole Government, together with the patent' for their
colony, 'to remain with us and others which shall inhabit upon the said
Plantation'. These were men of substance, planning to take their servants
with them and help neighbouring yeomen and artisans, determined to
set up a community in which the same sort of educational opportunities
as they had enjoyed should be available, in which trade as well as agri-
culture should flourish, and in which they might possess civic rights which
England denied them, without interference in their religious lives. The
charter of the Massachusetts Bay Company was ideal for their purpose,
and was in fact taken to America by the first emigrants, organized by the
company.
Winthrop himself led the first convoy of four ships in March 1630;
by the end of the year seventeen ships had sailed, carrying over 2,000
emigrants. Such a movement by men who had capital equipment for
settlement (stock, ploughs, seed and labour) naturally spread rapidly over
the land. The settlers took over Salem and spread through the Boston
area, setting up subsidiary communities. But although there were wealthy
men among them, the Massachusetts settlers did not develop anything
like plantation agriculture. Their model was the English mixed farm,
and the soil of New England lent itself to this purpose, and to the develop-
ment of urban and trading communities as counterparts to such an agri-
culture. The rivers were comparatively short, of little value as highways
to transport the settlers' produce to the coast if they spread out in the
hinterland; and excellent harbours gave access to ocean-going shipping
and encouraged a commercial and industrial development which was
alien to Virginia and which made towns and township meetings vitally
important in New England. So, although the Massachusetts settlers
rapidly covered the land in and around Boston, they did not penetrate
westwards; rather, they faced to the sea and developed shipbuilding,
lumbering, sea-fishing, and maritime trade as essential parts of their
economy.
After a setback caused by hardships and high mortality, the 'Great
Migration' of English Puritans gathered way in 1633 and continued for a
decade during which about 20,000 people sailed for Massachusetts. By
the time the Civil War broke out, despite deaths, re-emigration, and
684
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN NATIONS AND THE ATLANTIC
further emigration to other colonies, twenty-two towns had been estab-
lished, and the population of Massachusetts was about 16,000. By that
time at least sixty-five preachers had moved into the colony, many of them
graduates of Cambridge, all imbued with some form of Calvinism,
accepting the clergy as the authority from whom the civil officers should
take their tone, and ultimately their instructions. Under John Cotton, a
former Fellow of Emmanuel College, Cambridge, the 'Puritan Pope of
the Massachusetts commonwealth', convinced that God had never
ordained democracy as a fit government for either church or common-
wealth, Massachusetts turned its back on democracy and became a
theocratic oligarchy. First, however, the colony had to secure its position,
and when Charles obtained a court order quashing the charter he met
delays and defiance, which caused him to let things be. So the colony
survived both the challenge of royal authority and a challenge in 1639 by
Sir Ferdinando Gorges and the Council for New England. Rule apparently
rested with a General Court, consisting of the 'freemen' of the colony
and empowered to elect the governor and his assistants. But the 'free-
men' were the stockholders of the company, and in 1630 these numbered
only twelve; and they soon dropped to eight. The unenfranchised in 1631
secured a compromise by which citizenship rested, not on stock in the
company, but on church membership. Yet the governor and his assistants
had still to be elected from among the stockholders, assistants were
elected for life, and they and the governor alone could make laws. The
triumph of oligarchy was mitigated by the admission of over a hundred
new freemen, but the great majority of the settlers were left outside the
franchise and were not even admitted to the electoral roll because they
were not (and for the most part did not wish to be) members of the
Puritan congregations. For, of the 20,000 who migrated to Massachusetts
during the first decade, less than 4,000 were members of a congregation.
In theory the churches were merely purified versions of the established
church of England, but in practice they were congregations of the 'elect'
and each member must give some proof that he was among those who
would be saved. Church membership became a privilege bestowed by
priest and congregation, and the resultant oligarchy led both to a reform
movement within Massachusetts and to re-emigration from that colony.
A tax for the fortification of Boston soon evoked protests from Water-
town and other outlying settlements, who vindicated their right to send
deputies to consult about taxation. Then, in 1634, Winthrop was forced
to produce the charter, which revealed that the assistants should be
elected annually and had no power to make laws; the towns asserted a
claim to send deputies to the General Court, the right of all freemen to
attend, or even to send proxies to, the meetings in May at which elections
were made, to the ballot and annual elections. But although many small
victories were gained over the oligarchy, there were still only 300 freemen
685
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
in 1640 and the oligarchy had ensured that within the General Court all
measures must have a majority both of the deputies from the towns and
of the assistants, considered as separate bodies. In effect this gave a
bicameral General Court and gave the assistants a veto over the deputies.
Matters came to a head in 1644 when the legislature was formally split
into two Houses, each with a veto over the other. This left the way open
for power to pass either to the deputies or to the assistants; and Massachu-
setts remained in the grip of a small minority of clergy and conservative
laymen. In church affairs each congregation managed itself and elected its
own pastor; but admission to a congregation was highly selective, and
from 1634 onwards no new congregation could be formed without approval
of both church and state.
Town meetings, however, admitted many to the franchise who were
not entitled to vote in the General Court of the colony: even 'cottagers'
who were not landowners attended meetings although they could not
vote, and management of local affairs soon slipped into the hands of these
meetings, where local officials were elected (including justices of the peace
and constables) and a body of overseers developed to manage the day-to-
day affairs of the towns. Massachusetts, even so, was unacceptable to
many. The powers of the assistants were too great; and since the only law
administered was the common law of England, as adapted to circumstances
by the magistrates, the deputies demanded a written code in 1636, and
again in 1637. But they were unsuccessful until 1641, when the Body of
Liberties was adopted, with trial by jury, and punishment only according
to the law. But the death penalty might still be inflicted for blasphemy
and witchcraft, and the liberties ensured guaranteed freedom from
arbitrary punishment rather than active participation in government.
When the Body of Liberties was revised in 1648, to become the Laws and
Liberties of Massachusetts, the new code gave non-freemen the right to
attend town meetings, courts and councils, and to present petitions; but
they still could not vote, and although Massachusetts had a vigorous
coherence as a colonial society, self-supporting and self-reliant, it clearly
had grave limitations and was subject to ever-growing criticism.
Among the critics stood Roger Williams, once of Pembroke College,
Cambridge, a man of sound scholarship, blameless life and uncompro-
mising views. He had emigrated in 1631, and since Massachusetts insisted
that its church was not separated from the church of England and
Williams refused to officiate to 'an unseparated people', he moved from
Boston to Salem, then to the Pilgrims at Plymouth, and then back to
Salem despite protests from the General Court of Massachusetts. For
him, church and state should be separate, each with its own tasks and
discipline. He supported private judgement in religion, and legal equality
for all sects, but he rejected that union of church and state upon which
the establishment of Massachusetts was based. He was on even more
686
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN NATIONS AND THE ATLANTIC
tender ground in denouncing the Massachusetts Company's claim to
lands which, he maintained, belonged to the Indians. Williams was in-
evitably censured, and being unrepentant was required to leave the colony
in October 1635. In England his doctrines would have cost him dear, but
before he could be shipped home he fled from Salem, tried to found a com-
munity on Naragansett Bay and then bought from the Naragansett
Indians the land on which, in 1636, he founded the town of Providence,
based on a covenant in which religious liberty was accepted and church
and state were separate. Providence had no charter, and no legal title to
its territory. Yet it soon grew into a community of hardworking agri-
culturists who produced surpluses for sale, and attracted others who
sought a like freedom.
By 1644 there were four separate communities at Naragansett Bay, on
Rhode Island, all with different beliefs but all determined on a liberty of
conscience which Massachusetts denied, and all bound to the separation
of church and state. First came Anne Hutchinson from Boston, banished
because, being a woman, she meddled with religious matters, teaching that
personal belief was more important than formalized observances, and
grace than good works. Despite the friendly atmosphere of Boston her
banishment was inevitable after she had admitted that her only justifica-
tion was direct revelation from God; and she, her husband and their
supporters, followed Williams to Rhode Island in 1639, to buy land from
the Indians and found the community of Portsmouth. Within a year her
strongest supporter, William Coddington, seceded and set up a rival
community at Newport, at the southern end of Rhode Island. Then, in
1643, another principal supporter of the Hutchinsons, Samuel Gorton,
set up his independent community at Warwick. Anne Hutchinson left
Portsmouth in that year on the death of her husband, going to Long
Island and then to Eastchester (where she was murdered by Indians). But
the three early settlements of Providence, Portsmouth and Newport had
already drawn together, in fear of Massachusetts, fear of Indians, and
broad tolerance and sympathy; and Williams had gone to England, to
secure a parliamentary charter in 1644 for the 'Providence Plantations'.
Empowered to set up a civil government, they agreed in 1647 that repre-
sentatives from the towns should form a General Court, but the town
meetings could initiate legislation, and referendum could veto proposals
from the General Court.
Much more truly democratic than Massachusetts, this federation (to
which Warwick was speedily admitted) was too individualistic to be
stable, even with Roger Williams as its first governor. Harried by both
Massachusetts and Plymouth, each claiming its lands despite the purchase
from Indians, Rhode Island was known as 'Rogue's Island', for not all
religious refugees proved reliable citizens. But it was tolerant and pros-
perous, it survived the Civil War and got its charter renewed at the
687
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Restoration, and it retained a homogeneous urban character and expanded
slowly since most of the citizens were city-bred and the great harbours of
Naragansett Bay helped commerce grow.
While Massachusetts had thrown off the Rhode Island towns as a
democratic offshoot, the Pilgrim Fathers had sent an expedition in 1632
to explore Connecticut River and set up a trading post in 1633 on the site
of the later town of Windsor. A fur trade was their object, but the soil
proved fertile, and a group of English gentry claimed the land under the
grant to the Council for New England and in 1635 sent John Winthrop
Junior to set up Saybrook on Long Island Sound—for Lord Saye and
Sele, and Lord Brooke, were the chief backers. Massachusetts, also
interested, only set up a minute outpost at Wethersfield until in 1636 the
congregation of Newtown secured permission from the General Court
to move to the valley of the Connecticut since land for cattle was already
scarce. But the Newtown pastor, Thomas Hooker, though an orthodox
Puritan, was opposed to the Massachusetts oligarchy and sought govern-
ment by consent of the governed. The Newtown congregation moved
to Hartford, Connecticut, over a hundred strong, with their cattle and
their household goods, other congregations followed their example,
and within a year Watertown had sponsored Wethersfield, Dorchester
had set up Windsor despite the claims of Plymouth, and Roxbury was
responsible for Springfield. The General Court of Massachusetts insisted
that the Connecticut congregations must continue under that colony, but
a compromise was reached in which Massachusetts was only to appoint
commissioners for the new towns for one year. By May 1637 there were
some 400 citizens in the four 'river towns', and though Springfield
turned out to be within the rightful bounds of Massachusetts, Windsor,
Hartford and Wethersfield united to convene a General Court to carry
on a provisional government which lasted until in 1639 the Fundamental
Orders of Connecticut were drawn up, with a governor and a General
Court on the normal colonial model, but with no criterion of church
membership in the franchise, and no reference to the king. Authority
came only from the people, and there was a limit on the tenure of the
governor; but he had to belong to an approved congregation, the fran-
chise was limited to 'all that are admitted Inhabitants of the severall
Townes', and even under Hooker not half the men were admitted as
freemen. Connecticut was no extreme democracy. It was, however, far
less oligarchic than Massachusetts and, with its fertile land and with
Long Island Sound at its disposal, it throve with both agriculture and trade
to attract settlers.
The numbers in Connecticut are not quite certain, but it is clear that
the towns were growing fast. Despite divergencies they were dominated
by a common Puritanism, and they were tied to Massachusetts by a com-
mon frontier against the Indians. Official English policy was 'not to drive
688
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN NATIONS AND THE ATLANTIC
the Indians from their habitations by violence... but to harbour our
people so neere to them in places where they inhabitt that they may
teach them by their Christian and civill conversation how to live holyly
towards God and wisely according to reason and justice', and migrants
were instructed to ingratiate themselves with the Indians, and in parti-
cular not to abuse their women or mock at their nakedness. Consequently
Indian relations in the northern colonies had on the whole been satis-
factory and there had been no great movement to drive out the settlers.
But in 1636 the Naragansetts murdered a Massachusetts trader, and
Massachusetts ordered the notorious John Endecott to slaughter the
Naragansetts on Block Island, bring the women and children to Boston,
and go on to avenge a Virginian trader who had been killed by the
Pequots. Endecott destroyed the Naragansett villages, disregarded the
protests of the governor of Saybrook, and sailed up Thames River to
slaughter the Pequots. He then returned to Boston, leaving the Pequots
united in anger with the Naragansetts. Only Roger Williams preserved
the Connecticut settlers; he persuaded the Naragansetts to make their
peace, to send an embassy to Boston, and to desert the Pequots, who
attacked Saybrook and ravaged Connecticut. Massachusetts standing
aloof, in May 1638 Connecticut organized its own militia; then Plymouth,
and even Massachusetts, sent to help against the common danger. Under
John Mason and John Underhill, with Naragansett allies, the colonists'
force surrounded the great Pequot village on what is now Pequot Hill
and burned it and all in it, shooting down those who tried to escape.
About 400 Pequots fell in this 'sweet sacrifice', which was followed by
other overwhelming victories. The Mohawks, like the Naragansetts,
turned against the Pequots, and while the men were killed, the boys
were taken as slaves to the West Indies and the women and girls as slaves
to Massachusetts—for Indians captured in a just war were deemed
forfeit in their lives and persons.
The savage Pequot War enabled Connecticut to expand more rapidly
than might otherwise have been possible, and it gave the diverse English
colonies an uneasy unity. John Mason, who led the Connecticut troops,
for example, had claims to land which later came to be New Hampshire,
where settlement was slow until in 1637-8 the intolerance in Massachusetts
which had led to settlement in Rhode Island and Connecticut drove John
Wheelwright and over thirty supporters of Anne Hutchinson to set up
the town of Exeter. Other settlements followed; and the Massachusetts
Bay Company maintained its claims and took over the territories in 1641
(to rule them until 1679, when New Hampshire became a separate and
royal colony). The New Hampshire settlements did not federate, largely
because they were under no great threat from Indians, yet they felt in-
volved in the Indian relations of other colonies, and John Mason's
activities in Connecticut revealed the common problems of the English
689
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
colonies and gave an appearance of unity which affected other European
powers at least as much as it impressed the Indians.
In the meantime, in Maine, small fanning and fishing villages had
indeed arisen, but no self-governing community was founded before
1649. But two extreme Puritans, Theophilus Eaton and John Davenport,
brought a community of prosperous trading-folk, chiefly from London,
to Boston in 1637 and, deciding that even Massachusetts showed laxity
in doctrine, removed to Long Island Sound. There, in 1638, they founded
New Haven. Buying land from the Indians, they set up a Bible Common-
wealth which in adherence to the scriptures, subordination to the clergy,
and oligarchic intolerance, outran even Massachusetts. Eaton held office
till his death in 1658, and his followers led the advance of the English
into Long Island and southern Connecticut. Over a dozen towns sprang
up—Guildford, Milford, Stamford, Southwold, Fairfield, Greenwich,
Southampton, Easthampton, Gravesend, Westchester and Hempstead—
and in 1643 New Haven, Guildford, Stamford and Milford formed a
federal government, tied to the scriptures and to church membership
but with a general court of representatives from the towns. The magi-
strates were required to observe 'the judicial laws of God' as delivered to
Moses. New Haven had no charter, and no title to lands by allocation
from any company or colony. Its neighbours claimed its lands, and it was
especially at feud with Connecticut (which secured its annexation in 1662,
when Connecticut got a charter from Charles II); but it enjoyed quiet
development, and it was among the four colonies which formed the New
England Confederation in 1643.
The formation of the 'United Colonies of New England' derived from
Connecticut's fears of Pequot vengeance and from realization that
England, distracted by the Civil War, could neither discipline nor protect
the colonies. But Indians were not the only danger; the Dutch and French
were equally menacing. 'The French continually encroach and arm the
natives for civil war, who kill and steal when they can', wrote the governor
of Massachusetts in 1636. But the Dutch possessed the rivers, and the
harbours at the mouths of the Hudson and Connecticut, which were the
keys to English trade, co-ordination and expansion. After Henry Hud-
son's voyage of 1609 the trade in furs had attracted a few Dutch adven-
turers to Manhattan but such attention as the republican party, dominant
in Holland, could give to colonial rivalry went to the East India Company.
Agricultural settlement in America found few supporters, and the claim
which Hudson had conferred on the Dutch was neglected. William
Usselincx however, a refugee from Flanders and one of the greatest
merchants of Amsterdam, in 1614 came forward with proposals for a
West India Company. Dutch merchants on Manhattan were still few in
numbers but they were driving a lucrative trade, and when Samuel Argall
690
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN NATIONS AND THE ATLANTIC
on his return from Acadia in 1613 made them haul down the Dutch flag
he stimulated them to secure from the Estates General the Ordinance of
1614, which gave a monopoly for six years of new trades to be opened
up by discovery. Definite proposals for a West India Company were
again defeated, largely because they entailed hostilities with Spain; but
Dutch explorers sailed through Long Island Sound, on north to Cape
Cod, up Connecticut River to the site of Hartford, and past the south
shore of Long Island to Delaware River and so inland.
This exploration was followed by a charter to the United New Nether-
land Company, conferring ownership of all land between the North River
(the Hudson) at 45 0 and the South River (the Delaware). Seeking furs
rather than agricultural land, the New Netherland Company pushed in-
land, set up its small Fort Nassau, moved the site to Albany and there, in
1618, agreed to supply arms to the Iroquois (who still smarted from their
experience with Champlain), in return for which the Iroquois would bring
their fur trade to the Dutch. The New Netherland Company failed to get
its monopoly of trade renewed, but the Iroquois alliance brought so
much peltry that ideas of settlement developed, and the round-the-world
voyage of Lemaire, coinciding with the predominance of Maurice of
Nassau and the Orange party, brought willingness to create a West
India Company, and to challenge Spain if necessary. At one time there
seemed to be a probability that the Pilgrims might settle under the New
Netherland Company, but while the Estates General were working out
details for a company which would be responsible for a colony the Pil-
grims sailed under English auspices.
To complicate matters, the Virginia Company also claimed Manhattan
and the Hudson River territory. Since war with Spain seemed imminent,
the Dutch were not anxious to quarrel with England, yet the Dutch West
India Company, chartered in June 1621, with control over Dutch naviga-
tion and trade on the coasts of America between the Straits of Magellan
and Newfoundland, was given power to appoint governors and other
officials, to administer justice, build forts, and make treaties with bar-
barous chiefs. It also had to defend its territories and to maintain (though
not to provide) twenty warships. Control lay in the College of Nineteen,
which ostensibly collated the views of five local Direkties but in fact soon
came to be dominated by Amsterdam. On a joint-stock basis the company
was ready for action by June 1623. In the meantime the Englishman
Thomas Dermer, sent by the Plymouth Virginia Company, had in 1620
called and told the Dutchmen that Manhattan belonged to England. Then,
in 1621, when James had granted all land between the 40th and the 48th
parallels to the Council for New England, the English ambassador at
The Hague informed the Dutch that they were trespassing on English land
at the mouth of the Hudson River.
As diplomatic discussions continued, Dutch traders spread from Man-
691
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
hattan to Connecticut River and Naragansett Bay, and their West India
Company, appointing a director for 'New Belgium', turned to settlement
with a shipload of emigrants in 1623. A French ship, about to set up a post
on Manhattan, was sent away (without bloodshed), the Dutch put a few
men ashore there, and then, with the rest, reinforced their post at Albany,
then called Fort Orange. Other parties went to Delaware River, to build
near the site of the present city of Philadelphia, others built Fort Good
Hope near the site of Hartford on the Connecticut, and others settled at
Wallabout Bay on Long Island. The West India Company had taken
effective possession of its lands; and the English appeared to accept the
position when in 1625 one of the ships taking reinforcements was stopped
in Plymouth until the privy council declared that she might proceed. The
threat of war with Spain again produced settlement; in fact Charles even
made a Dutch alliance despite the treatment of the English East India
Company at Amboyna and elsewhere.
New Netherland was therefore safe from English molestation, and so
remained until England had gone through her Civil War; and when Peter
Minuit became governor in 1626 the Dutch colony began to consolidate
itself. First came the formal purchase of Manhattan from the Indians,
and New Amsterdam arose as a city centred round a fort, with about 300
inhabitants by 1628, but with no town meeting or anything comparable;
laws were made in Amsterdam and administered by a council nominated
from Amsterdam and empowered also to make local regulations. The
governor's authority, however, did not extend to the outposts, and in
1626 the garrison at Fort Orange took the war-path with the Mohegans
against the Mohawks. This almost wrecked Dutch policy, but the Mo-
hawks were nevertheless persuaded to renew their alliance, and Minuit
called in the garrisons at Fort Orange, at Fort Nassau on the Delaware,
and on the Connecticut. But although Dutch settlers were concentrated,
traders continued to roam, using their ships to search the coast and to
penetrate up rivers in search of furs. So doing, they came in contact with
the Pilgrims of Plymouth. Yet once more common hostility to Spain kept
the rivalry peaceful, for Spain's treasure-fleets were being disrupted and
her commerce destroyed by the ships of the West India Company under
the command of Piet Heyn. The Dutch moreover could legally trade with
England and her dependencies under the Treaty of Southampton, and the
New England colonies found a market for their agricultural surpluses
among the Dutch settlers and traders.
But Dutch agriculturists were not emigrating. To encourage them, in
1629 the West India Company issued its charter of 'Privileges and
Exemptions' by which any patroon, who within four years took fifty
emigrants to New Netherland, should receive a grant of land which would
make him virtually a lord of the manor, with jurisdiction and a lien on the
labour of his men. In return for providing stock and implements he was
692
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN NATIONS AND THE ATLANTIC
entitled to a proportion of the increase of their farms. All trade to Europe
must go through New Amsterdam and pay dues there; but except for furs
the patroons were free to buy and sell in America, and even to trade with
the English and French colonies. New Amsterdam was to be reinforced
and made defensible, and provision was made for a pastor and a school-
master. Although there was still little peasant emigration, would-be
landed gentry found this charter attractive, and shiploads of cattle and of
indentured servants arrived as the patroons spread to Hoboken and
Staten Island and up the Hudson; attempts on the Delaware were ill-
supported, and none was made at this time on the Connecticut. Even so,
the patroons were more interested in trade than in farming and they turned
to the fur trade, and sometimes to whaling, so easily that in 1632 Governor
Minuit was recalled for partiality to them. His ship was driven into an
English port by bad weather and was there seized for trading against the
charter of the Council for New England—an incident which emphasized
the contradictory English and Dutch claims but which brought no solution
since the two governments were still anxious to maintain friendly
relations.
Minuit's successor, Van Twiller, was not a man of great purpose;
but at the start of his regime the Dutch, buying lands on both sides of
Connecticut River, completed their Fort Good Hope on the site of the
present city of Hartford despite protests from Massachusetts and from
Plymouth. The Pilgrims established a fort in the Windsor area and rein-
stated in their lands a band of Indians who had been expelled by the
Pequots, and so set the Pequots murdering and robbing till the Dutch
intervened, when the Pequots sought alliance with Boston, surrendering
their Connecticut lands to the English! Dutch and English were then
near to blows in America, but the English were too numerous, and the
Estates General and the West India Company were too heavily com-
mitted elsewhere. So the English pushed into Connecticut, Saybrook
guarded the mouth of Connecticut River and cut off Fort Good Hope
from New Amsterdam, the English built Hartford alongside Fort Good
Hope, and the Pilgrims' post near Windsor was strengthened and taken
over by Dorchester.
Apart from other considerations which forbade an outright clash, the
Dutch were still traders rather than settlers, not greatly concerned with
title to lands though in 1639 they opposed an English grant to the earl of
Stirling of Long Island, rich in small shells for making wampum, the
currency of the fur trade, and drove the English to the eastern part of the
island where they built the small town of Southampton. They also
prevented a Virginian attempt to take over their Fort Nassau on the
Delaware. Despite such incidents New Amsterdam became the entrepdt
for much of the trade of the New England colonies; cattle and supplies
came from Holland for English purchasers, and a lively trade in local
693
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
produce, in salt, tobacco and grain, also ran from Manhattan to Boston,
Salem and other New England ports. Dutch merchants throve; but,
while the English colonies steadily increased, the population of Manhat-
tan slightly declined in the period 1633-8. The Estates General therefore
pressed the West India Company to stabilize its colony, and in 1638
William Kieft arrived to supersede Van Twiller as governor.
Kieft, a man of restless energy, reduced his council to one nominee
(a Huguenot refugee) and ruled absolutely, proscribing the illicit fur trade
and uttering a series of proclamations against evil conduct. But so far was
he from inducing immigration that the patroons even sought convicts and
vagabonds as indentured labourers. The Estates General offered the
alternative bait of greater freedom; in 1638 the West India Company's
monopoly of trade was abandoned, manufactures were set free, and the
same rights were accorded to aliens as to Dutchmen. Free transport and
generous land-grants were designed to attract immigrants, who were to
get land, stocked by the company, on arrival. After six years they were
to return the equivalent of the stock provided, keeping the increase and
paying, throughout, a reasonable rent.
Under these incentives New Netherland saw a great growth in num-
bers; and the immigrants included Huguenots and Englishmen, and
English colonists from Virginia and Massachusetts. All must take an
oath of loyalty, but no distinction was made against aliens. Even so, the
Dutch colony showed no growth comparable to the English colonies,
and New Haven and Connecticut between them seemed likely to take
possession of Long Island under the noses of the Dutch.
The two regimes were brought into contact when Kieft, alarmed at
the spread of the English settlements, bought land near Greenwich from
the Indians and made the English settlers acknowledge Dutch sovereignty.
Despite their alliance with the Iroquois, the Dutch had hitherto managed
to maintain friendly relations with the Algonquins, to which tribe the
Indians of the Connecticut and Delaware valleys belonged, though they
went by a variety of names such as Raritans, Manhattans, or Tappans.
But expansion, under the patroons, embittered Indian relations. Within
range of their main posts the West India Company forbade the trade of
firearms to Indians; consequently the near-at-hands Algonquins could
not get arms whereas the more distant Mohawks and other Iroquois
secured a steady supply. Hostility burst into flame in 1641; petty pilfering
led to murder of the Staten Island Indians, who retaliated in a bloodthirsty
massacre. A vengeance-murder of a Dutch trader at New Amsterdam
then brought outright war; and in order to get co-operation Kieft accep-
ted an elected Council of Twelve Men—a concession soon evaded.
Nevertheless population increased, and English refugees from Massa-
chusetts (including Anne Hutchinson) came in such numbers that an
English secretary was appointed; pressure upon Indian lands, disputes,
694
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN NATIONS AND THE ATLANTIC
even murders, followed, and in 1643 the Dutch massacred over a hundred
Algonquins seeking refuge on their lands from the Mohawks. A general
Indian rising threatened, and not until John Underhill came from
Massachusetts to repeat his tactics of the Pequot War, surrounding and
exterminating the Indian warriors in night attacks, was a sort of peace
restored to the Dutch frontier in 1644.
These troubles forced Director Kieft to call a Council of Eight Men in
1643; five were Dutch, one German and two English; but real authority
remained centred in Europe although the West India Company, fully
extended in Brazil, was unable to help New Netherland. In his need the
director overruled the eight men and set excise duties on beer and spirits,
provoking argument as to whether he derived his authority from the
company or from the Estates General, whether the settlers were respon-
sible for defence and administration, whether they should pay taxes or
could, in fact, afford to pay. The eight men eventually appealed to the
Estates General and succeeded in getting the arbitrary Kieft replaced by
Pieter Stuyvesant, former governor of Curasao. Stuyvesant was instructed
to work with a vice-director and a treasurer to help him. But it was May
1647 before he arrived in Manhattan, and in the meantime the settlers
concluded a solemn peace with the Algonquins, while Kieft quarrelled
endlessly with the leaders of both church and populace. Stuyvesant
intended to govern 'as a father his children, for the advantage of the
chartered West India Company, and these burghers, and this land',
and he vetoed an inquest into the conduct of Kieft, continued the un-
popular duties on wines and spirits, and even laid taxes on the fur trade.
To win over the settlers he in 1647 set up a Board of Nine Men. But they
were to be chosen by the director and his council, albeit from a panel
elected by popular vote, they were only to act when called upon, and
after the first election subsequent appointments would be by co-optation.
Stuyvesant was therefore able to maintain power in his own hands, at
least in New Amsterdam and on Long Island.
But further afield the patroons were able to defy him. In particular
Killian Van Rensselaer, patroon of Rensselaerwyck, far up the Hudson
River, with a fur trade to supplement agricultural wealth, defied Stuyve-
sant's ban on trading arms to Indians, and even controlled other traders
to Fort Orange. As young Johannes Van Rensselaer succeeded in 1646,
Stuyvesant sent troops to destroy houses outside the fortifications of
Orange, and by 1650 he forced the patroon to renounce his claims to
independence. This, however, merely added to Stuyvesant's troubles; for
the Nine Men, despite Stuyvesant's manipulations, retained their demo-
cratic character, and now found a redoubtable leader in Adrian Van der
Donck, who came from Rensselaerwyck and, buying an estate, made
himself a 'young lord' (a Jonkheer, hence his estate was called 'Jonkers').
An advocate of the Supreme Court of Holland and a doctor of laws of
695
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Leiden University, Van der Donck organized an appeal to Holland by the
Nine Men with such effect that Stuyvesant was compelled to allow him to
take home the petition, asking for the end of company rule, a municipal
government for New Amsterdam, and settled boundaries with Indians
and with white neighbours. Though Van der Donck stirred up a new
enthusiasm when he presented his petition at The Hague, by 1650 the
total population of New Netherland was still but 2,000, of whom over
800 lived in New Amsterdam; moreover the West India Company was
too highly privileged for the settlers to assume self-government as the
English colonies had done, and the polyglot population of the colony
showed a stronger trading element and a correspondingly weaker attach-
ment to the soil than the English did.
Yet the Dutch were fully exploiting the weaknesses of Spain, moving
steadily forward to an independence finally vindicated at Westphalia
while the Dutch East India Company took the trade of the East in
possession, and the West India Company won universal respect both by
plundering the Spanish and Portuguese colonies and by diverting the
produce of English and French settlements to Amsterdam. This was
achieved by commercial and maritime competence rather than by open
warfare (though periods of war gave additional opportunities), but it
roused the other powers to conscious imitation of Dutch methods, and
conscious denial of their claims. They moulded their policies with the
deliberate intent to keep Dutch merchants from carrying off the profits,
and strength, which could be got from colonial development. Hence the
Navigation Policy into which the mercantilists of the next generation fell,
on the basis of exclusive trade—the pacte coloniale.
Its great achievements did not prevent the West India Company from
failing as the costs of war in Brazil outran even its enormous revenues.
For New Netherland was so sited that it incurred hostility from English
and French neighbours. English hostility, inevitable since control over the
maritime trade of the English colonies was impossible as long as ship-
masters from New Amsterdam would help Boston, Philadelphia, or
Charlestown to evade the rules, did not emerge until the second half of the
seventeenth century. But the fur trade, the Indian alliances and the river
system by which the fur trade worked, entailed early rivalry between
Dutch and French. It was fortunate for the Dutch that the English colonies
then stood neutral, for the English were stronger and more numerous
while the French in Canada were if anything weaker in numbers than the
Dutch, and they were if anything less purposefully supported from
Europe.
The French nevertheless showed vigour and imagination, and their
leaders almost compensated for their small numbers. It was certainly im-
possible for New Netherland to expect French support, example, or even
696
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN NATIONS AND THE ATLANTIC
tolerance, for French projects made this impracticable. In France also
the urge to exploit North America had come from merchants, rather than
from settlers seeking homesteads. But whereas Dutch, and much of
English, settlement was confined to the Atlantic seaboard, the French
pressed constantly inland. Their Atlantic colony of Acadia continued
small and impoverished, for though it was refounded in 1614 the English
granted the land to Sir William Alexander, later earl of Stirling, in 1622,
and sent an expedition to found a colony of Nova Scotia there; this failed
in 1623. But Quebec and Trois Rivieres absorbed such enterprise as
France, emerging from her Wars of Religion, could spare. For although
Champlain could win support at court, the merchants of La Rochelle,
Brest and the Breton ports, exploiting the fur trade of the lower St
Lawrence, resented a company, with its monopoly, its noble patronage
and its plans for emigration. Under Sully's influence, moreover, attention
was directed to France's internal economy and to the Mediterranean and
Levant trades; lands north of 40 0 offered little hope of profit, and though
grants of privilege could indeed be got, there was little genuine support.
Yet Champlain was geographer royal, encouraged by powerful nobles;
his constant companion was the Breton merchant Francois du Pont-
grave, and the great merchant William de Caen was tempted by a mono-
poly of the fur trade. Moreover, Champlain's search for the 'western sea'
accorded well with that' greedy penetration of the continent in pursuit of
beaver' which led the French so far and so fast into the interior of
Canada.
Until 1613 Champlain, with no monopoly of the fur trade, and beset
by rivals who traded at Tadoussac, had not yet gone west of the rapids at
Lachine, above Montreal. But then, inspired by a spurious account of
Hudson Bay (where Henry Hudson was, nevertheless, engaged on his
last voyage of discovery), and backed by the powerful prince de Conde, he
set off by canoe up the Ottawa River, through Lac des Chats, to the Algon-
quins' encampments near Lac des Alumettes. Frustrated in his major
purpose, Champlain had yet opened up the Ottawa River route, leading
westwards without the southern dip by way of Lake Ontario, Niagara
Falls and Lake Erie, bordering on hostile Iroquois territories. Reports of
his discoveries secured a renewal of Conde's monopoly, reorganization of
their company, and reinforcement in 1615 by four members of the re-
formed Franciscan Recollect order whom Champlain had interested in
Canada.
The Iroquois, by 1615, acting as the outriders of the Dutch traders at
Manhattan and Orange, were even ambushing the Algonquins up the
Ottawa River. In face of such a threat Champlain was cautious; but the
missionaries hardly paused at Quebec before embarking on a mission to
the Hurons, and Champlain followed, by Ottawa River and Mattawa
River to Lake Nipissing and then down French River to the Huron settle-
697
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
ments on Georgian Bay. There he spent the winter, after an abortive
attack on an Iroquois post at Lake Onondaga, south-east of Lake
Ontario. His journey to Huronia was in itself a great achievement, but
Champlain was unable to explore northwards to get accurate information
about Lake Superior, Lake Michigan and their outlets, or to follow the
Lake Erie and Lake Ontario route back to Lachine. The assassination
of Henri IV, and renewed civil war, cut off help from France, and by 1622
there were still only about a hundred Frenchmen in Canada, and Quebec
was but a fortified outpost of sixty-five men. In 1614 Champlain had
formed his own group to sub-let the fur trade from Conde, and this con-
tinued when Conde's charter was withdrawn in 1620; and when the due de
Montmorenci secured a new patent, with the duty of maintaining the
Recollect missions and encouraging emigration, Champlain settled at
Quebec as a benevolent and experienced governor. Richelieu then, in
1627, cancelled all previous grants and set up a comprehensive Compagnie
de la Nouvelle France (organized and known as the Compagnie des Cent
Associes) with a perpetual monopoly of the fur trade, full sovereignty
over the territory, and a monopoly of all trade save fishing for the next
fifteen years, with the duty of organizing settlement so long as only French
Roman Catholics were admitted.
It was unfortunate for Canada that at this juncture the three brothers
David, Lewis and Thomas Kirke, supported by London merchants,
secured a charter as a Canada Company, in 1627, to take possession of
Canada and the St Lawrence fur trade, while Charles also renewed the
charter to the earl of Stirling's Nova Scotia Company. The first reinforce-
ments sent to Canada by Richelieu in 1628 were captured at sea by David
Kirke, and in 1629 he took Quebec itself, made Champlain a prisoner and
brought the furs to England. Meanwhile the Nova Scotia Company,
working with the Kirkes, planted an English colony of about seventy men
in Acadia.
The Compagnie de la Nouvelle France, incapable of defending its
possessions, was strongly opposed by the traders whom it dispossessed,
especially by William de Caen, who had bought the fur concession from
the Compagnie de Montmorenci, bought it again from the Compagnie
de la Nouvelle France, and who sued in England for the furs which Kirke
had brought to London. So, even when the Treaty of St Germain, in 1632,
restored the captured territories to France, and Champlain took office in
Quebec again, the Cent Associes who ran the Compagnie de la Nouvelle
France could not re-establish the trade, or organize emigration in ade-
quate numbers. Yet such colonists as came were mostly sturdy peasants,
and by Richelieu's death, in 1635, Trois Rivieres was a township, Fort
Richelieu had been built, and something of genuine agricultural settle-
ment had been achieved by a system of seigneurage. Land-hungry and
would-be-noble immigrants could secure a seigneurie, lying back from the
698
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN NATIONS AND THE ATLANTIC
river in strip cultivation, with a title of nobility, in return for bringing the
land into cultivation and shipping out a quota of labour. Even this bait,
reminiscent of the Dutch patroons and of the baronetcies offered in Nova
Scotia, was inadequate. By 1643 the French colony still had no more than
300 settlers, dependent on the fur trade and on European food and
supplies, at the mercy of their Indian allies and enemies, dreading the
long Canadian winter, and dominated by the Compagnie de la Nouvelle
France.
The seigneurs had failed to bring out the colonists. But the French
colony received a great impetus when in 1625 an intrepid band of Jesuit
missionaries arrived. The Jesuits found both an ally and an enemy in the
fur trader; for the fur trade condemned the Indian to a wandering life
in which Christian habits were sure to lapse, while the arms, the spirits,
and the finery brought by trade made the Indian dangerous and irres-
ponsible. Yet in the coureurs de bois, the traders capable of travelling and
living with Indians, the missionaries found guides, companions and
interpreters, who greatly assisted them in their work. One of Champlain's
coureurs, Etienne Brule, had already travelled along the north shore of
Lake Huron towards Sault Ste Marie and the entrance to Lake Superior;
he perhaps actually travelled on Lake Superior and he certainly brought
back accounts of it. The route from Lake Ontario to Lake Huron by way
of Niagara Falls, Lake Erie, and Lake St Clair had also been probed,
and the French knew that this route went through lands dominated by
the Iroquois and increasingly subject to the Iroquois desire to drain furs
down to the Dutch and British traders of the Hudson and the Delaware.
Huronia, the area south from Ottawa River, was the focus of this trade
rivalry, as of French plans for western exploration; it was also the great
field for Jesuit endeavour. There, remote from the Atlantic, Indians
might be converted and even segregated from the vices brought by con-
tact with Europeans.
French attachment to the Hurons, partly economic, partly missionary,
and partly personal, necessarily challenged the Iroquois policy of
dominating the approaches to Huronia, a policy which would starve
Canada's fur trade and would counteract Jesuit influence. The Jesuits
went so far as to conduct missions to the Iroquois; they thereby embarked
on an adventure of travel, suffering, torture and martyrdom, unequalled
in modern history. But they accomplished little, though they even pene-
trated to the Iroquois villages on Hudson River. Of the coureurs one at
least, Jean Nicolet, penetrated from Lake Huron through the Straits of
Mackinac into Lake Michigan, then westwards to Green Bay and out
towards the upper waters of the Mississippi, and gathered rumours of a
great lake and of rivers running north from that lake to the sea. Yet the
fur-route by Lake Ontario and the upper St Lawrence remained under
threat. By 1637 the Iroquois were astride the St Lawrence, raiding the
699
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Huron canoes as they took furs to Quebec. They could only be overcome
by depriving them of Dutch help.
Richelieu therefore, in allocating men and money in 1641 to fight the
Iroquois, accepted the necessity to drive the Dutch from the valley of the
Hudson, and even from Manhattan itself. He died at the end of 1642, and
Canada never got the support necessary for such a policy. Yet enthusiasm
in France was real, and when in 1641 the Society of Notre Dame de Mon-
treal was formed it was inspired by both religious and secular desire to
reinforce Quebec and Trois Rivieres by a third city, sixty miles up-river
from Quebec, in the heart of the Indian country. There, in May 1642,
Montreal was established with sixty settlers on an island in the St Law-
rence. The island had been granted to the Seminary of St Sulpicius,
and the priests even nominated the governor. This was a 'holy city',
communal in its life, a Christian bulwark against Indian savagery. But
it marked the renewal of Iroquois attacks, which rose to a peak by
1648.
In the early stages the Iroquois' threat gave an impetus towards self-
dependence and self-rule. Despite Iroquois interruptions the annual
fur-returns increased, so that it seemed that if the incubus of a great
company were removed local dealers might drive a profitable trade; and
their incentive would be great since their furs must pay for their annual
shipments of supplies. Accordingly in 1645 a group of colonists formed a
Compagnie des Habitants, sub-contracted the fur trade from the Com-
pagnie de la Nouvelle France, and made such profits that in 1647 the
generality of the habitants protested against the monopoly and secured
freedom to trade with Indians. But all still had to bring their furs to the
company's warehouse within specified times, to sell them there at specified
prices for the company to ship to Europe and to bring back the European
goods which were needed.
The company was therefore in much the same position as the 'cape-
merchant' in the early English experiments, particularly in the Plymouth
colony. The habitants, moreover, had attained self-government in ways
which were reminiscent of developments elsewhere. In 1647 the authority
of the governor was delegated to a council of three, of whom the other
members would be the governor of Montreal and the superior of the
Jesuits (or the bishop if one should be appointed); and in 1648 this council
was extended to include two or three syndics from Quebec, Montreal and
Trois Rivieres. This advance was offset by half of the furs being taken to
pay for administration and defence; and the Iroquois intensified their
ambushes of the fur-laden canoes going down to the French settlements,
raiding in 1648 into the Huron villages near Georgian Bay, completing
the dispersal of the Hurons, torturing to death their Jesuit missionaries
in 1649, and closing in round Montreal and Quebec. By 1652 the French
fur trade was at a standstill.
700
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN NATIONS AND THE ATLANTIC
The Beavers are left in peace and in the place of their repose; the Huron fleets no
longer come down to trade; the Algonquins are depopulated; and the more distant
nations are withdrawing still farther, fearing the fire of the Iroquois. For a year,
the warehouse at Montreal has not bought a single Beaver-skin from the savages.
At Three Rivers, the little revenue that has accrued has been used to fortify the place,
the enemy being expected there. In Quebec warehouse there is nothing but poverty.
The French colony did not founder, for the habitants had already
developed virtues all their own. They seemed little likely to achieve
primacy in North America, but they were, in their own way, more at
home in the north than were the English, settled, prosperous and almost
independent though the English were. Between English and French,
dominated by neither, in 1648 the Dutch still held New Amsterdam and
Hudson River, strong in the alliance of the Iroquois, who in a very real
sense still controlled the destinies of the European colonies.
In north America the Iberian Powers had done nothing to substantiate
their claims, and were not concerned to vindicate them. In the West
Indian islands also there were valuable areas in which the Spaniards had
attempted little or nothing, but there a challenge could not go unan-
swered, for to Spain, as to her enemies, the West Indies lay 'in the very
belly of all commerce'. Yet Spain left unoccupied a fringe of outer
islands (the Lesser Antilles) from which English, French, and Dutch
ships conducted trade with the Spanish colonists in spite of regulations.
In particular the Dutch began to exploit the vast salt-pans of Venezuela
and to bring out cargoes of European goods in the ships which carried
home the salt. English settlements on the mainland came to nothing al-
though much interest was aroused; Charles Leigh failed in Guiana in
1604-6—his survivors were rescued by Dutch shippers—and Robert
Harcourt failed in 1609-18—his survivors joined the Dutch to settle
at Essequibo. North's Amazon Company in 1620, and Raleigh's attempt
of 1617-19, both suffered because James I withdrew support in deference
to Spain, and movements from these areas to St Lucia and Grenada also
failed.
The interloping powers were little concerned to set up colonies in the
Caribbean; their approach was still that of Hawkins and Drake, aimed
at trade. But trade in defiance of Spain easily developed into piraterie a
Vaimable, and the bullion collected at the focal points of Cartagena,
Nombre de Dios and Panama was vulnerable both before it was shipped
and as it went for Spain, convoyed though it was in powerful flotas. For
the flota must break from the Caribbean into the Atlantic either north-
wards through the Florida Channel, or southwards through the Windward
Isles, or perhaps by a middle course through the Windward Passage
between Puerto Rico and Haiti. So the Bahamas were well sited to prey on
the Florida Channel, the little island of Tortuga off the north coast of
701
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Haiti threatened the Windward Passage; and Tobago and Trinidad in the
Windward Isles channel, and Curacao commanding the approach to that
channel, also had great value.
Easily though the Caribbean lent itself to buccaneering, yet year after
year the great flota made its way safely out into the Atlantic. But along-
side buccaneering went a series of plans to settle in the West Indies in
spite of Spain. When Thomas Warner, on a return voyage from North's
dwindling colony on the Amazon, in 1622 touched at St Christopher in
the Leeward Isles, he noted that it had a good soil for tobacco and,
having secured financial support in London, returned in 1624 to make a
plantation with about seventeen settlers. Warner's position was compli-
cated by the need to fight the Caribs, by the arrival of the French privateer
D'Esnambuc, and by an English company for the settlement of Barbados.
That fertile and attractive island may well have been known to English
sailors, but it was uninhabited when in 1624, or early 1625, a ship belong-
ing to Sir William Courteen (a London merchant with Dutch connections)
called there on a return voyage from Brazil. Courteen's captain forthwith
annexed the island, and on his way back to England called at St Christo-
pher. Warner, probably moved by the captain's report, in 1625 secured a
royal grant making him governor of the four islands which he was alleged
to have discovered—St Christopher, Nevis, Monserrat, and Barbados.
But Warner had in fact no hold on Barbados while Courteen had formed
a syndicate, sent out eighty men, and followed up with a hundred men and
women, and with Indians, corn, tobacco and other plants, from the
mainland.
With capital available from the capture of Spanish shipping, Courteen's
plantation flourished so that by 1628 Barbados numbered 1,850 inhabi-
tants. Warner, anxious to push his claim, made alliance with James Hay,
earl of Carlisle, to whom Charles I granted both the Windward and the
Leeward groups—all islands lying between io° and 20° north of the
equator—including Barbados. Courteen thereupon turned to the earl of
Pembroke, who obtained a similar grant, conferring Trinidad and Tobago,
an imaginary island called Fonseca, and again Barbados! Carlisle in turn
secured a reaffirmation of his grant, clearly specifying Barbados. Thus
strengthened, he sent out two parties of settlers in 1628 and virtually took
over Barbados from Courteen's men, who were naturally confused by
the irreconcilable grants but who recovered their position in 1629 when
an expedition sent by Pembroke overthrew Carlisle's supporters, cap-
tured over £30,000 of tobacco, and brought the governor of the island in
irons to London. The conflict of claims never came before a court of law,
but after an investigation Lord Keeper Coventry issued a verdict against
Pembroke and Courteen. The settlers seem to have been content, and
Barbados moved into a period of prosperity, and of increase in population,
based on tobacco.
702
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN NATIONS AND THE ATLANTIC
Tobacco had also brought prosperity to St Christopher. Population had
reached 3,000 by 1629, and some settlers were wealthy enough to charter
their own shipping to take tobacco to the London market; but most were
small men, dependent on the grantees or on their more wealthy neigh-
bours. Great or small, they created such a demand for land that expansion
to other islands soon followed, especially when, in 1626, D'Esnambuc
induced Richelieu to set up a Compagnie de St Christophe, to develop
unoccupied islands between n ° and 18 0 —which included all the Lesser
Antilles so long as they were unoccupied. D'Esnambuc arranged an
amicable partition of St Christopher with the English in 1627, the English
taking the central area (to be known henceforth as St Kitts) and the French
the two extremities. Though dispersed by a Spanish attack in 1629, the
English returned and entered on a period of such continuous prosperity
that population reached something like 20,000 in 1640. This included the
neighbouring island of Nevis, to which they spread in 1628, and which
had also recovered from the Spanish raid of 1629.
While the English took possession of the Leeward Islands, spreading from
St Christopher to Nevis, to Antigua and Montserrat in 1632, and then
attempting Tobago and St Lucia, the French concentrated on the Wind-
ward group. There also the Spaniards offered no opposition; but resistance
from the Caribs was serious, and little was achieved until in 1635 Riche-
lieu again stepped in, urged by a concept of a French Empire in which
possessions in the West Indies would balance with tropical produce the
northern colony of Canada. To the Compagnie des Isles d'Amerique he
granted St Christopher, and encouraged the company to begin settlement
in other Leeward islands. On St Christopher the French continued their
arrangement with the English, but they immediately and successfully
colonized Martinique and Guadeloupe, overcoming Carib resistance
there. When de Poincy was appointed governor-general in 1638 he rapidly
organized the defence of his islands and established French control in
St Croix, Martinique, Marie Galante, the Saints and Guadeloupe.
Grenada, Dominica and St Lucia he left, but he asserted French authority
over the buccaneers who were making Tortuga their headquarters and by
1642 he had established French settlements in fourteen islands. French
population amounted to about 7,000, in addition there were numbers of
slaves, and the wealth of the governor^and the greater planters called for
an enquiry on behalf of the company, which in 1646 ordered its governor
to resign. This de Poincy refused to do, and he drove his successor-
designate from St Christopher to Guadeloupe.
The struggle which ensued brought the company to the verge of ruin
by 1647, when Mazarin decided to end the company and to distribute its
possessions between the proprietors. Of these the greatest was the Order
of the Knights of St John of Malta, for whom de Poincy acted. They now
secured the French parts of St Christopher, and St Martin, Tortuga,
703
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
St Croix and St Bartholomew (a small island which, like Tortuga, was
no more than a buccaneering stronghold). The French West Indies thus
fell under the control of a group of wealthy proprietors, most of whom
had no interest in their islands beyond their personal gain.
While the French West Indies had built up a greater European popula-
tion than Canada, the English had over-ridden the confusion over pro-
prietary patents, and had emigrated to the West Indies in considerable
numbers. In some ways this movement resembled the Puritan emigration
to North America, but it was controlled by proprietors rather than by
companies, and it brought out many indentured labourers, men without
sufficient capital for independent emigration, occasionally with an
agricultural background, who engaged to serve for a period (usually from
five to seven years) in return for their passage. Though then free to seek
their fortunes, they often lacked capital and remained either as servants
or share-croppers. Tobacco lent itself equally to growth on large or small
plantations and was the basis of the small freeholds which grew up under
this system as well as of the great estates. Maize was grown for food, salt
fish was imported from New England and Newfoundland; and despite
hardships and disappointments population soared. By 1643 the white
population of Barbados was reckoned to be over 37,000 while that of St
Kitts and Nevis together reached over 20,000.
These figures proved to be the highest ever reached for white settlement
in the English islands. Not only had the emigrant tide turned strongly
towards North America but by the middle years of the century sugar
had replaced tobacco as the staple crop of the West Indies; and large
plantations, worked by slave labour, proved the best units for the new
crop. The sugar, the negro slave labour which went with it, and some of
the capital for mills, as well as much of the shipping which transported
the product, derived from the Dutch.
The Dutch West India Company's preoccupation with Brazil was
part of a determined effort to take over the principal colony of settlement
which existed in the first decade of the seventeenth century. The West
India Company wished to establish a Dutch agricultural colony, to
control the slave trade from the West African coast, and to undermine the
Portuguese in the West as in the East. Brazil was therefore the company's
first concern; but Brazil did not completely predominate. The West India
Company organized raids on Spanish shipping so effectively that this was
the chief source of its dividends and even offset the costs of the Brazilian
war. Its efforts reached their climax when in 1628 Piet Heyn at last inter-
cepted the great flota itself; in that year the West India Company paid a
dividend of 50 per cent! Many of the buccaneers who 'swarmed on the
rotting carcase of the Spanish empire' were Dutch; most of them had
some sort of Protestantism at the back of their minds. But the Dutch
formed the spearhead; they took the flota, and though 'more eager for
704
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008THE EUROPEAN NATIONS AND THE ATLANTIC
conquest than for commerce' they carried much of the trade of the
French and the English islands with the same disregard for prohibitions
as they showed towards the Spaniards. There was indeed a Dutch settle-
ment on the Essequibo, established in 1616, and on the Berbice, estab-
lished in 1624; small colonies were set up in Tobago and Cayenne only
to be destroyed by the Spaniards, and the Dutch settled on Curacao in
1634 and on St Eustatius and St Martin in 1641. But though the Treaty
of Munster in 1648 confirmed these colonies to the Dutch they were
important as entrepdts rather than as colonies of settlement; for the Dutch
were in the West Indies to trade rather than to farm.
The Dutch approach was all the more important because in the English
islands, in a period when royal authority was under dispute, proprietors
and planters sought their profit without regard to the regulations by which
the home government tried to constrain them within a single economic
system. Neither the English nor the French government could enforce
its regulations, for both were embroiled in European wars and both had
neglected their navies. Moreover the Dutch, valuable to both powers,
would not accept any policy of exclusive trade and in 1625, in the Treaty
of Southampton, they had won free access to all English possessions. In
English and French colonies alike they assumed by treaty, or by right of
commercial competence, that control of trade and shipping for which
they had been prepared to fight the Portuguese and the Spaniards; and
for which they would fight the English and the French also.
So, while the Dutch West India Company fought for Brazil and its
sugar plantations it also captured the slave posts which were the comple-
ments of the Brazilian economy, taking in turn Arguin, Goree, Sao Thome,
Loanda and Elmina, and developing a slave-trade both to Brazil and to
the English and French colonies. Little profit would be got from the
West Indies unless the Dutch could be driven out and the products of the
islands shipped under compulsion to the mother countries in their nat-
ional-owned vessels. At Providence, for example, the Dutch were so
strongly entrenched that in 1632 they offered to buy any crop produced,
in 1638 the proprietors complained that only Dutch shipping served them,
and in 1639 the Dutch even offered to buy the whole island. This was
exceptional, but after the Spanish raid of 1629 St Kitts was to a large
extent set going again by the Dutch, who brought a supply of slaves,
and by 1659 the planters were complaining that the Dutch engrossed the
whole trade of this important island. At Barbados too a new prosperity
came with sugar and slavery. In 1640 'the Dutch came and taught the
art of making sugar, and having free trade and plentiful supplies' firmly
established the trade. The change was continuous; in 1636 Barbados
had a white population of 6,000, in 1643 this had increased to 37,200
whites and there were 6,400 Negro slaves; and by 1660 the Negroes had
risen to over 50,000. By 1654 the customs on the produce of Barbados
705
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
came to £12,930 a year, there were usually sixty or seventy ships at anchor
there, while the trade of the island was reported to occupy about 400
ships and about 10,000 seamen.
Before this increasingly important trade could profit either England or
France the Dutch had to be driven out. Their great harbour at New
Amsterdam made them able to control shipping from the mainland col-
onies while their possessions on the West African coast made them able
to supply the West Indies. In the negotiations at The Hague which follow-
ed on the execution of Charles I they maintained their right to 'trade to
all our Countries and plantations in America, and elsewhere, without any
difference of people'. To this the English answer was equally direct:
'The Dutch cannot trade to the English islands and plantations out of
Europe, nor can the English trade to theirs.' For the Dutch, it was said,
'prohibit the English to traffique in their Colonies in the East Indyes,
or other parts, save in Europe. They exercise absolute dominion in
India; where they are strongest at sea they search our ships... and
confiscate not only contraband goods but all others'.
The period to the middle of the seventeenth century, therefore, had
seen the establishment of permanent colonies of settlement in North
America, the revelation of long-term rivalries there and of clearly de-
fined national patterns of colonial government, with parallel but distinct
and different settlement in the West Indies. It had also seen the Dutch
mount to the position of 'most envied nation', succeeding Spain in that
respect and working to a pattern of Atlantic and colonial trade which
forced other colonial nations to adopt imperial policies, dominated by
Navigation Acts, which set the mould in which the great period of
European imperialism was shaped.
706
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008CHAPTER XXIII
LATIN AMERICA 1610-60
N 16io Philip III, Rex Hispaniarum et Indiarum, claimed sovereignty
over two great empires in America, one governed from Madrid as part
of his crown of Castile, the other governed from Lisbon as part of his
crown of Portugal. Together the claimed dominions of the two empires
covered all of America, stretching from the yet unknown lands that lay
between the Gulf of Mexico and the mysterious Arctic, southward to the
equally unknown lands of Tierra del Fuego on the far side of the Straits
of Magellan. The territories of the crown of Castile were divided into two
viceroyalties: that of New Spain, with its capital at Mexico City, com-
prised all of the Iberian possessions to the north of Panama, including
the islands of the Caribbean and the territory of present-day Venezuela;
that of Peru, with its capital at Lima, governed the Castilian possessions
from Panama to Chile and Buenos Aires. The American Empire of the
crown of Portugal was Brazil, then defined as all land east of the north-
south Une of demarcation set by the Treaty of Tordesillas, running from
the eastern stretches of the Amazon delta to the Island of Santa Catarina
on the coast of the present-day Brazilian state of Santa Catarina. This
territory was governed by a captain-general at Bahia.
Effective occupation in the form of domination of the native population
or direct settlement by Iberian subjects fell far short of Iberian claims,
as other European governments did not fail to point out. Nevertheless,
the area under effective occupation constituted immense territories. In
North America, Spanish dominion touched the present areas of the
United States and Canada at two points. In Florida, a small settlement
at St Augustine, refounded permanently in 1597, attempted to keep
foreign intruders away from the Bahama Channel and the return route
of the Spanish fleets, and served as a base for missionary work among the
Indians of Florida and Georgia. In the upper valley of the Rio Grande a
new settlement, centred around the city of Santa Fe founded in 1609,
constituted the most northward extension of Spanish settlement to be
made during the next century and a half. The colonists and missions of
New Mexico were separated from the settled area of Mexico by a long
stretch of arid, relatively unpopulated country, and had to be supplied
by great wagon trains. Of the islands of the Caribbean, the Greater An-
tilles were held by a thin population of Spaniards, Negroes, and various
mixtures of races in settlements which exported sugar, hides, and cassia
to Spain. The aboriginal population had been almost completely wiped
out by the early decades of the sixteenth century. The fortified city of
I
707
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
Havana, with its excellent harbour, provided the gathering point for the
fleets for the return voyage to Spain although the administrative seat for
the Caribbean and Venezuela was Santo Domingo. The Lesser Antilles
were largely unpopulated by the Spanish; they were left to such Indian
remnants as survived a century of European proximity, and to the occa-
sional fugitive use of non-Iberian Europeans. The major Spanish occupa-
tion—the core of the territories of Castile in the New World—covered the
long western mountain backbone of North and South America from a
line drawn between Sinaloa and southern Tamaulipas in Mexico to
the Bio-Bio River in southern Chile. An eastward extension of Spanish
occupation in northern South America followed the Andes into New
Granada and Venezuela; and another thin eastward extension in southern
South America crossed the continent through Tucuman, Paraguay, and the
pampas to the sea at Buenos Aires. The mountains of middle America
had been the seats of the most highly developed Indian civilizations at
the time of the discovery of America, and their conquest placed at the
disposal of the Spaniards organized societies that could be adapted to
providing foodstuffs, labour, and services, the Europeans constituting
a new upper stratum. The great cities, including the imperial city of
Potosi at the foot of its mountain of silver, the mines that made Spanish
America the source of Europe's specie, the bulk of Spanish agriculture,
and the overwhelming majority of both Spanish and Indian population
were in this zone. The dependence of Spanish settlement on the Indians
was such that the former tended to be most dense where the native
population was largest and sparse where it was small. In general, the
coasts were held only by a thin settlement because of malaria and yellow
fever, except for a relatively dense population raising cacao on the
Sonsonate coast of Central America and the viceregal capital of Lima on
the coast of Peru. The tropical rain forests also remained virtually un-
touched because of their impenetrability and lack of value relative to
other regions. The largest area thus left vacant in 1610 lay in South
America to the east of the great arc of the Pacific highlands, and included
the immense valleys of the Amazon and upper Orinoco and the coast of
the Guianas. It was a vast ill-known region, merging on the south into
thorn thickets and highlands covered with scrub, with a thin population
of nomadic and semi-nomadic tribes. It was assigned to the crown of
Castile by the Treaty of Tordesillas.
On the Atlantic coast of South America, forming yet another arc of
settlement on the eastward margin of the continent beyond the relatively
vacant central area, lay the Portuguese territory of Brazil. In 1610 the
area of effective occupation stretched approximately from Cape Sao
Roque at the bulge of Brazil southward along the coast to the southern
coast of Sao Paulo. Settlement was discontinuous, in small towns and
plantations, farms, and ranches scattered along the coast on numerous
708
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008LATIN AMERICA l 6 l O - 6 o
small inland waterways that afforded easy transportation. Only on the
uplands of Sao Paulo, in the valley of the Sao Francisco River, and at a
few points in the north-eastern bulge had European occupation moved
inland beyond the narrow coastal plain. The whole of Brazil was a small
series of weak settlements compared to the wealth and power of New
Spain and Peru, yet it already was the chief supplier of sugar to Europe.
In 1610 there were almost no permanent settlements of other European
powers in America although a number had been attempted.
The half-century between 1610 and 1660 witnessed relatively little
change in the area of effective Spanish occupation and a very consider-
able extension of the Portuguese area as the Brazilians made ample use
of the opportunity provided by the union of 1580-1640. Such change as
there was in the Spanish territories took place at the northern and south-
ern peripheries. From St Augustine, the Franciscans, continuing their
missionary activity along the coast, by 1615 held more than twenty stations
extending as far north as South Carolina. That was high water, soon to
ebb as the English settlers farther north encouraged the tribes of the coast
to resist. In northern Mexico, settlers and Jesuit missionaries continued
a slow movement northward along the Pacific coast and inland into the
ranges of the Sierra Madre Occidental, the rugged topography of which
made the Indians difficult to reach so that there were relatively large
pockets of independent aborigines in the Spanish rear as far south as
Nayarit. In 1614 the Jesuits founded their first mission among the Tara-
humara. Then in 1616 the great Tepehuan revolt forced retreat until
resistance was crushed in 1622. In 1638 the Jesuits were able to move
farther north among the Tarahumara and found their first mission in the
mountains of Sonora. Their efforts were a precarious venture, backed by a
few troops, with frequent setbacks. Yet farther north in the isolated
settlements of New Mexico, Franciscan missionaries pressed work among
the pueblo Indians of the United States south-west. By 1630 there were
fifty friars at work. They had twenty-five missions, which included
ninety pueblos and perhaps 50,000 converts. As was true of virtually all
missions, each mission had a church, a school, workshops, dwellings,
and fields. The neophytes were taught manual arts, and such accom-
plishments as were necessary for church services.
The most ambitious attempts to extend the area of Spanish occupation,
as well as the most serious threats to Spanish dominion, took place in
southern South America. In the vast plains extending from Mato Grosso
to Patagonia and from Paraguay to the coast, the Jesuit missionaries
found themselves at open warfare with the Brazilian subjects of the
common king. In the southern part of the central valley of Chile,
the long-existing Araucanian War continued its uncertain and bloody
course.
In 1610 the Spanish in Chile were still attempting to cope with a re-
709
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
organized Araucanian societyable to send forth large war parties equipped
with horses, long lances, and even some firearms, and trained to deal with
European soldiers. Of the eight cities founded in the sixteenth century
between the Bio-Bio River and the Gulf of Reloncavi, the heavy Arau-
canian onslaughts of the years 1598-1605 had forced abandonment of
seven. Araucanian successes also had forced abandonment of the militia
system based on service by encomenderos and auxiliaries from the Indians
around Santiago in favour of a professional army supplied and reinforced
from Spain and Peru. The official strength of this army varied in this
period from 1,500 to 2,500 men, but so many plazas were vacant or held
by men old, sick or otherwise unfit for active service that the effective
strength seldom exceeded 1,000. The most that the new army was able
to do was to prevent the Araucanians from occupying land north of the
Bio-Bio although their raiding parties crossed the river each year and
sometimes penetrated as far as the Maule. The Spanish army, in turn,
conducted annual raids that netted a valuable booty in slaves, who were
sold in the Central Valley or shipped to Peru.
How to end the Araucanian raids and the heavy expenses of the War
of Chile gave rise to prolonged debates in Santiago and Madrid. The
Jesuits, who saw the Spanish part of the problem clearly, favoured
establishment of a defensive line of posts along the Bio-Bio, an end
to slaving raids, and pacification of the Araucanians through mis-
sionary activity. The colonial government, members of which derived
substantial personal profits from slaving, favoured unrelenting prosecu-
tion of the war. A trial of the Jesuit plan, begun in 1611, failed when one
group of Araucanians massacred the missionaries. Finally, in 1625 the
crown ordered resumption of active prosecution of the war and formally
renewed permission to enslave prisoners. In 1630 a new governor, Lazo
de la Vega, having reinstituted military service for the male population
of Santiago, was able to inflict a substantial series of defeats upon the
Araucanians, who had been seriously weakened by murderous epidemics
of smallpox and measles. But the incursions of the Spaniards aroused all
of Araucania to resistance and led to a revival of Indian successes. In
1641, by the treaty of Quillen, the royal government recognized the in-
dependence of the Indians south of the Bio-Bio. The treaty could not
put an end to raids on both sides, nor could new treaties, a second one of
Quillen in 1647 and the Peace of Boroa in 1651. The profits of raids to
Spanish soldiers and their commanders made the royal army a potent
force against any policy aimed at peace. At the same time the peculiarly
loose structure of Araucanian society, without any central authority, and
the premium placed upon exhibitions of prowess in raids made it virtually
impossible for the Indians to observe any agreements for a cessation of
hostilities. In 1655 a concerted Araucanian effort, using the Andean
passes to circle through Argentine territory and take the Spanish by
710
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008LATIN AMERICA l 6 l O - 6 O
surprise, threatened all Spanish settlements south of the Maule. The line
of the Bio-Bio was not recovered by the Spanish until 1661 when a new
governor, Porter Casanate, defeated the Indians in pitched battle at
Curanilahue. Throughout this period the Spanish settlements in the
Central Valley steadily increased in strength, while epidemics and losses
through war and slaving slowly but steadily reduced the power of the
Araucanians who, however, were able to redress the balance in part by
recruiting among the Pehuelche tribes on the eastern slopes of the Andes.
Meantime, the war required a heavy subsidy from the Peruvian treasury
to meet the annual cost of over 200,000 ducats and helped to drain away
treasure that the Spanish monarchy urgently needed in Europe.
On the Atlantic side of the Cordillera, in the broad band of territory
stretching from Paraguay to the Atlantic, there took place the foundation
of the so-called Jesuit state of Paraguay, which was to set the boundary
in that area between Spanish and Portuguese America. There were already
three small Spanish settlements in the upper valley of the Parana, in the
region of Guaira, and a few Franciscan missionaries in the upper valley
of the Uruguay, but the major work was Jesuit. In 1604 the Jesuit general
authorized the formation of a separate Jesuit province of Paraguay, and
in 1607-8 missionary work was actually begun by sending pairs of mis-
sionaries to the Guaycuru Indians of the Chaco and to the semi-sedentary
Indians of the upper and middle valleys of the Parana. Under concessions
embodied in the Ordinances of Governor Alfaro (1611), Indians in the
missions, or reductions, were to be free from encomienda, from labour
to private Spaniards, and for ten years even from payment of tribute to
the crown. The missionaries sent to the Chaco were soon forced to leave,
but those sent to the Guarani were unusually successful. In 1610 the first
permanent mission, San Ignacio Guazii, was founded in the middle
Parana Valley. Shortly thereafter two missions were founded on the Rio
Paranapanema in Guaira, north of two of the small Spanish settlements.
The plan of the Spanish Jesuits and the civil government of Paraguay
was to use the missions for ensuring Spanish control of all territory to
the line of demarcation. Accordingly, in 1627 the mission of Yapeyu was
founded on the Uruguay River as the first of a line that was to be extended
to the ocean near Santa Catarina. By 1628 there were eleven Jesuit re-
ductions in Guaira and ten in the area of the middle Parana and Uruguay.
But the very presence of these masses of manpower, temptingly presented
in permanent reservations, brought attack from the mestizo slave hunters
of the Sao Paulo. The first Paulista attack upon a Spanish Jesuit mission
took place in 1611. In the 1620s, when the Portuguese slave trade with
Angola was almost cut off by the Dutch, the raids became formidable
military operations. Those of 1628-9 were carried out by four expeditions
numbering perhaps 900 Paulistas and 2,000 Tupi Indian allies. In the
years 1629-32 the Paulistas seized tens of thousands of Indiana in Guaira
711
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
from reductions and independent bands. The Jesuits could get little help
from Spanish provincial authorities or the inhabitants of the small Spanish
towns in the area. The latter were bitterly resentful of the exemption of the
Indians from encomienda and service, while the provincial government
resented the exemption of the Indians from tribute and the virtual auto-
nomy of the missions. A new governor, Luis de Cespedes Jeria, who took
office in 1628, actually attempted to make sure that the mission Indians
remained unarmed. In 1630 the Jesuits decided upon the desperate
measure of evacuating all mission Indians. Carried through despite oppo-
sition from the governor and civil population, the evacuation required
nearly two years and entailed great loss of life; nearly half of the Indians
died before they could be settled on the middle Parana, south of the great
Iguazu Falls, which interposed a long stretch of unnavigable river between
the Paulistas and the missions. With the missions gone, the Spanish
towns also had to be abandoned, so that in 1632 the uppermost Parana
Valley was left to unreduced Indians and the Paulista bandeiras.
After the great evacuation, the Jesuits continued successfully to expand
their missions in the valleys of the middle Parana and Uruguay rivers, and
even began work in the region of Itatim, now in southernmost Mato
Grosso. Since the Paulista raids did not stop, they used their salaries as
curates and some of the proceeds of the sale of surplus crops for arms to
train an Indian militia. In 1636 they were able to offer a Paulista raid
heavy resistance even though the raiders made off with thousands of
prisoners. The decisive success of the mission defence occurred in March
1641 when a large force of mission Indians, with perhaps 200 muskets,
ambushed a bandeira on the Rio Mborore, a tributary of the Uruguay,
and drove it back through the forests with very severe loss. Thereafter the
raids became much less serious. The Jesuits received unexpected relief
when the Brazilian war against the Dutch drew off many Paulistas to the
north, including Antonio Raposo Tavares, the most active and formid-
able leader of bandeiras.
By the early 1640s, when the major expansive impulse was spent, the
Jesuits had approximately twenty missions, or reductions, in the valleys of
the middle Parana and Uruguay rivers, most of them in the region of the
present Argentine province of Misiones. The organization of the missions
became the model for later ones elsewhere. Each mission had two Jesuits
attached to it, one with the formal title of curate. The Indians were
governed by a town government patterned after the Spanish: a town
council, which chose a corregidor to preside over it and serve as military
commander. The selection of corregidor had to be confirmed by the
Spanish provincial governor. Real control, of course, rested with the
missionaries. The towns were laid out in rectangular patterns, with
church, official buildings, and storehouses in the centre and the fields and
pastures on the outskirts. One crop, usually yerba mate or Paraguay tea,
712
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008LATIN AMERICA l 6 l O - 6 o
was raised for sale to buy items that could not be produced locally. The
Indians, who had known a rudimentary, shifting agriculture, were taught
the use of the plough and European techniques, crops, and stock-raising.
The livestock multiplied especially rapidly. The very prosperity of the
missions, their existence under Jesuit control, and an unwise resistance
by the Jesuits to payment of tribute excited jealousy on the part of the
Spanish population and the civil and ecclesiastical authorities, so that the
Jesuits were under a steady stream of criticism only partly countered by
their influence at court. In 1657 a judge of the Audiencia of Charcas
carried out an official investigation. He upheld the Jesuits as able and
loyal servants of the crown, and found with approval that the missions
had 800 firearms for defence. He also determined that the population
contained 7,500 males who should have been paying tribute and recom-
mended that tribute be levied on them. A settlement of this troublesome
dispute was not reached until 1667.
In contrast to Spanish America, the years 1610-60 were a period of
active exploration and territorial expansion for the American dominions
of the Portuguese crown. This process was aided by the Dutch, who drove
part of the Portuguese population inland and forced development of inland
routes of communication. The exploration and expansion were carried out
especially by bandeiras, a term derived from the reformed Spanish army,
where it was applied to subdivisions of the tercios, the major tactical group-
ings of various arms. In Brazil the term came to mean a semi-military ex-
pedition of Portuguese settlers, with Tupi auxiliaries, which set out on a long,
wandering trek that might last for years and had as its purpose trade,
hunting for deposits of precious metals (not found in this period), slaving,
or colonization. The members of such a band were called bandeiiantes.
The most famous bandeirante centre was Sao Paulo, then a small mestizo
settlement on the plateau, which found'sugar unprofitable and turned to
supplying the southern coastal plantations around Santos and Rio de
Janeiro with Indian slaves. Indian slaves, although less efficient and
shorter-lived than Negroes, sold for approximately a fifth as much and
provided labour for the less flourishing sugar plantations of the south.
Sao Paulo was on the edge of the Parana drainage, with easy access to the
excellent river communications of the Rio de la Plata. Portages gave
access also to the northward-flowing rivers of the Amazon system and
enabled the bandeirantes to penetrate deep into the continent. In a famous
three-year expedition Antonio Raposo Tavares led a bandeira from Sao
Paulo to the territory of Itatim in southern Mato Grosso, up the Paraguay
River, and by portage into the Guapore in the Amazon system. The band
drifted down the Guapore to its confluence with the Mamore, followed
the Mamore into the Madeira, and the latter to the Amazon. Coasting
down the Amazon it finally arrived in 1651 at the outermost Portuguese
post of Gurupa, at the confluence of the Xingu and the Amazon, com-
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
pleting a vast semi-circle through the heart of South America. Other
notable bandeirante centres were Bahia and Pernambuco in the north,
and the new settlements in Maranhao.
We have already mentioned the abandonment of Guaira and adjacent
areas by Spanish settlers and missions under the pressure of Paulista
bandeiras. The bandeiras also explored a broad band of territory inland
from the Brazilian coast, carrying off or driving back the Indian popula-
tion, the survivors of which fled hundreds of miles westward. Extensive,
upland areas of the north-east bulge, beyond the Sao Francisco Valley,
inland from Bahia and Pernambuco, and northward to Ceara, were thus
opened for cattle-raising by a sparse settlement of ranchers, who supplied
hides and meat to the plantations on the coast. Farther north, Portuguese
penetration wrested the delta and lower valley of the Amazon from the
crown of Castile. The French and English established small trading posts
in the Amazon delta in the opening years of the seventeenth century;
these were driven out in 1613-15 by expeditions sent from north-east
Brazil with the consent of the crown of Castile. In 1616 a settlement was
founded near the present site of Belem do Para on the Spanish side of
the line by the reckoning of the time. Thereafter a small number of
Portuguese spread through the region as far as Gurupa, founded in 1623.
Because the prevailing winds along the coast made communication with
the rest of Brazil more difficult than direct communication with Portugal,
the territory was organized in 1621 as a separate state of Maranhao,
directly dependent upon Lisbon. In default of any other good economic
possibility, the settlers turned to slaving and soon devastated the lower
Amazon. One bandeira, sent out specially by the governor of Maranhao,
explored the Amazon upstream to the Spanish outposts in the Andes of
Quito and returned in 1639, claiming all of the intervening land for the
crown of Portugal.
The bandeirantes were undoubtedly a tough, cruel, lawless lot. Although
they could cloak their destruction of the Spanish missions as patriotic
resistance to the hated Castilians, they showed an equal lack of mercy for
missions founded by Portuguese Jesuits. Even the great Portuguese Jesuit,
Father Antonio Vieira, who had approved the destruction of the Spanish
missions, was arrested and sent back to Portugal with his companions,
when in 1652-61 he attempted to set up a similar system of reservations in
Maranhao and end slaving. But the operations of the bandeirantes did
explore much of the continent and bent the line of demarcation far
westward. The greatest losses of territory by the crown of Castile were
to the Portuguese and, aside from Jamaica and Curacao, were in this
period the only permanent losses of territory under actual control.
The more important development of European settlement, even in
Brazil, however, was not extension of the area of occupation but the
steady increase of European and Europeanized populations—the non-
714
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008LATIN AMERICA l 6 l O - 6 o
Indians—in the older areas. Immigration from the Iberian Peninsula con-
tinued in considerable volume, perhaps an average of two to three
thousand a year, although that estimate is pure guess since the records of
official licences have not been found, and if found, would be no real clue
because many immigrants crossed without official leave. Migration from
Spain was characterized by a growing proportion of men from the north,
the so-called vascongados, actually from Galicia as well as the Basque
Provinces. Rivalry between them and the andaluces, or immigrants from
southern Spain, became an important element of politics in mining camps,
and in Potosi gave rise to a prolonged riot in 1624. Migration from Por-
tugal was characterized, as earlier, by a relatively large proportion of
Christianized Jews, seeking in the New World respite from persecution by
the Inquisition. Numbers of New Christians filtered across the Rio de la
Plata to the wealthy centres of Peru by the routes of illegal trade. Small
numbers of Europeans from outside the Iberian Peninsula were also able,
as before, to settle in the New World under the thin disguise of an Iberian
surname. They were seldom disturbed unless heretics or New Christians,
and were usually able to legitimize their stay by suitable monetary pay-
ment to the crown. Most of the European immigrants were men, who
married local women and merged easily into the community. The major
increase of white population, of course, was through the natural increase
of whites and mixed bloods considered to be whites. Families were large
and households abounded in servants so that, although the death rate was
high, the number of native-born whites or Creoles rose very rapidly. By
1650 there were in Spanish and Portuguese America perhaps 600,000
people considered to be whites, both European-born and Creoles. Over
a quarter were in Mexico, which steadily received the greater share of
immigration from Europe; perhaps 100,000 were in Lower and Upper Peru
(present-day Peru and Bolivia); and 70,000 in Brazil.
The emergence of the Creoles as the overwhelming element in the white
population had a number of consequences that became manifest in the
first half of the seventeenth century. One of the most important was the
growth of a bitter rivalry for social and economic position between the
Creoles and people of European birth, the latter dubbed disparagingly
gachupines and chapetones, for the newcomers tended to enter at the top
of the social pyramid and the crown continued to prefer European-born
for higher official posts. In the Mexican and Peruvian church, where
there was a substantial Creole clergy by the beginning of the seventeenth
century, the rivalry between Creoles and Spanish-born led in most of the
monastic orders to the adoption of the alternativa, a scheme by which
the important posts were held alternately by members of one group
and then the other. In some instances, the rotation was threefold: between
Creoles, Spanish-born who had taken their vows in the colonies, and
Spanish-born who had taken their vows in Europe. The development of a
715
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
84-2DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
substantial secular clergy, heavily Creole in its lower ranks, led also to
demands that the missionary orders turn over the older Indian parishes for
administration by secular priests under normal diocesan jurisdiction.
These demands flared into especially bitter strife in the disputes between
Bishop Palafox of Puebla and the Jesuits in the 1640s. The increase in
number of secular clergy also gave greater acrimony to the dispute be-
tween secular and regular clergy over payment of tithes by Indians and on
properties of regular clergy since tithes were the mainstay of the seculars.
The increase of the whites was paralleled by an equally rapid increase
among the Negroes and mixed bloods. Demand for labour on the plan-
tations and ranches of the Caribbean and of the Brazilian coast led to
continued heavy importation of Negro slaves, which was favoured on the
whole rather than hindered when the Dutch used their seizure of Angola
to enter the slave trade. Even though most of the involuntary immigrants
were male and disease and hard labour in the tropics took heavy toll,
the number of blacks steadily increased. By 1650 there were nearly
as many of them in Spanish and Portuguese America as whites. Perhaps
half of the total were on the Caribbean islands and coasts, and perhaps
100,000 in Brazil. Such estimates, of course, are mere guesses. Mestizos,
mulattoes, and other mixed bloods became a major element of the popula-
tion in America in the first half of the seventeenth century. In 1650 they
were approximately equal in number in Spanish and Portuguese America
to either the whites or the Negroes, the mulattoes tending to be con-
centrated on the islands and coasts where there were most Negroes, the
mestizos tending to be concentrated on the uplands and in the temperate
zone, where most of the Indians lived. Many of the mixed bloods were
able farmers and artisans, who swelled the Europeanized segments of the
population and gave able militia service in defence against foreign in-
truders. But many moved into the cities, where they formed the lowest
element of the urban population, a new class of leperos, making a pre-
carious living supplemented and enlivened by crime and brawling. They
were disliked and feared by the magistrates, who never had sufficient
force available to repress disorder and quell popular tumult.
In marked contrast to the increase among the non-Indian elements of
Iberian America was the steady decrease in the number of Indians as
wars, enslavement, the destruction of native systems and enforced change
to new ones, and most deadly of all, diseases from Europe and Africa
continued the attrition which began with the appearance of the white man
in America. The destruction was not confined to the areas of white pene-
tration but reached far beyond because of the flight of tribes, consequent
wars for territory, and the spread of the new diseases. Unfortunately,
the movement of Indian population in this period still remains to be
studied in detail for most areas so that only very general statements
can be made and statistics are very much subject to dispute. In the
716
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008LATIN AMERICA l 6 l O - 6 O
Caribbean islands, where most of the Indians had vanished long before
the seventeenth century, the destruction of the sparse native population
of the Lesser Antilles was the work of the new English, Dutch, and French
settlers. In Mexico and Central America, where the aboriginal population
suffered very heavy loss in the sixteenth century, it may have reached
demographic bottom early in the seventeenth century, have remained
there for a number of decades, and by 1640 may have begun a very slow
and halting recovery. In the Andean regions of the former Incan Empire,
the native population slowly but steadily decreased throughout the
seventeenth century. In Venezuela, Paraguay, Chile and north-western
Argentina, decrease was more rapid. In 1633, for example, the bishop of
Santiago, Chile, reported that his diocese, essentially the core of Spanish
Chile, had more Negroes and mulattoes than Indians. By the middle of
the century the majority of encomiendas in Venezuela and north-west
Argentina, which began as relatively ample grants, had fewer than twenty
adult Indian males and many had shrunk to five or six—far too few to
support a Spanish family. The destruction of Indian population in Brazil
has already been mentioned.
General decrease among the Indians, combined with increase in the
strata of population dependent upon them for supplies and services,
meant a steadily deepening shortage of labour in most of Spanish America.
The Antilles, which had long since turned to Negro slaves, and Brazil,
which either used Negro slaves or devastated large areas to secure Indian
slaves, were exempt except for the difficulties of procurement and high
costs of their form of labour. Elsewhere, the last decades of the sixteenth
century and most of the seventeenth century, but especially the decades
1610-60, were notable for the failure of older forms of deriving labour
from the Indians and the development of new forms. The oldest Spanish
device, the encomienda, had lost importance by the middle of the sixteenth
century in Mexico and by the end of the sixteenth century in Upper and
Lower Peru; by the end of the sixteenth century most encomiendas in
these areas had escheated to the crown. But the encomienda continued
to be important in the marginal areas such as Venezuela, Chile, and the
rest of southern South America, where Indian tributaries continued to
pay all or part of their tribute in labour, the legal maximum varying from
one to three months a year in the various regions. During the first half
of the seventeenth century, as encomienda populations shrank, encomienda
labour became unimportant even in these outlying areas. A second device
for securing labour, the mita, repartimiento, tanda or rueda had become
important in Spanish America during the second half of the sixteenth
century. Under it the Indian towns were called upon to make available a
fixed proportion of their adult males for wage labour in fields and mines.
In Mexico, the quota was set in agriculture at 4 per cent in ordinary
times and 10 per cent during the two peak agricultural seasons of weeding
717
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008D E C L I N E OF S P A I N A N D THE T H I R T Y YEARS WAR
and harvest, in mining at three weeks' work a year for married men and
four for unmarried adolescents. The quotas made available approximately
6 per cent of the Indian men as an annual average. In the viceroyalty of
Peru the mita varied from region to region, but may be illustrated by the
instance of the quota set for the sixteen provinces assigned to the service
of the mines of Potosi, the famous mita de Potosi. The Indian towns had
to provide workmen for periods of service of four months at a time.
The quota is usually stated to have been a seventh but was actually a
seventh for the three turnos of a year, so that the proportion was slightly
under 5 per cent on annual average. The service was regarded as es­
pecially onerous because the workmen were kept from their families for
such long periods and were forced to work under especially trying con­
ditions at very high altitudes. It became even more hated in the first half
of the seventeenth century as the miners began to require delivery of a
fixed quota of ore for each day's work and the Indians had to work far
beyond the legal day to meet the requirement. The mita de Potosi became
steadily less effective as a means of supplying labour. In 1610 the number
of workmen could still be set at 4,413 and in 1633 at 4,115, the latter
quota presupposing a population of 86,415 tributaries in the sixteen pro­
vinces. But by the mid-century the mita yielded approximately half the
quota, and by 1662 the sixteen provinces were estimated to have a popu­
lation of only 16,000 tributaries. The Indian towns were required to make
up the deficit by forcing their men to additional turns of service, some­
times as frequently as every two years instead of the legal seven, or had
to provide money for hiring substitutes at the very much higher wage rate
of free labour. The Potosi mita was so deeply hated that flight was more
important than death in depleting the sixteen provinces. Elsewhere, in
the viceroyalty of Peru, the mita had a less unfortunate history but also
became less efficient as a form of deriving labour. A third device, which
began early in the sixteenth century, was so-called free wage labour.
Actually the workmen were bound to the employer by advances of money
and goods and could not leave until they had cleared the debt. By renew­
ing the advances, through force if necessary, the employer saw to it
there was always a debt. The workmen were withdrawn from Indian towns
and were settled either in Spanish towns or near the mines or on the
farms and ranches where they worked. The device had the additional
advantage that it could be used to secure labour from the mestizos and
mixed-bloods. Free wage labour, with its concomitant device of debt
peonage, was already prominent in Mexico by the end of the sixteenth
century as large settlements of free labourers grew up around such mining
camps as Zacatecas. During the first decades of the seventeenth century
it was resorted to increasingly in Mexico and became the most important
form of labour procurement. It was sufficiently successful for the viceroy
of New Spain, in 1632, to order abandonment of the repartimiento in
718
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008LATIN AMERICA l 6 l O - 6 o
agriculture, although not in mining, which needed all labour that could
be secured by whatever means. In the viceroyalty of Peru labour of the
same kind became important in mining in the seventeenth century, and
around such centres as Potosi there grew up substantial communities of
Indians and mixed-bloods. The increase in the number of yanaconas, a
term which earlier meant serfs, in the seventeenth century probably
meant increase in debt peons bound to the estates and workshops. For
the employer, wage labour, with or without debt peonage, had the great
advantage that he secured all the working time of his employees and had
a stable labour force. For the workmen, although they entered a form of
bondage, there was at least the advantage that it was often relatively
benign since the employer protected his workmen from the frequently
much more merciless exploitation of the native nobility, the church, and
civil officials. For the Indian towns, the device meant the steady loss of
members to meet demands for labour and taxes and to maintain com-
munity services. The wage labourers seldom returned to their native
towns and in new settlements took on European customs and mixed
freely with other groups to swell the Hispanized mestizo element. As a
labour device, wage labour and debt peonage were sufficiently successful
for slavery to be able to compete only on the tropical coasts and on
sugar plantations with their special needs. Nevertheless, the colonies
passed through trying times, perhaps at their worst between 1620 and
1660.
It was shortage of labour, with its attendant factors of abandonment of
agricultural land by the Indians and lessened production of food for the
cities, that was perhaps most important in producing the economic strin-
gency and depression that characterized the last quarter of the sixteenth
century and much of the seventeenth century in the greater part of Iberian
America. There were, of course, other factors increasingly operative in
the seventeenth century that accentuated the depressive effects of labour
shortage: the movement of the European economy, which entered a
downward phase between 1630 and 1640 and the growing financial de-
mands of the Spanish crown because of its participation in the Thirty
Years' War. In addition, the entrance of non-Iberian nations into American
trade on an increasing scale greatly affected established systems of trade.
All factors combined to speed up a series of complex economic and social
changes already under way. The net result, in the end, as in the solutions
for labour, was greatly to strengthen the Europeanized segments of
colonial society. Unfortunately, few studies have yet been made of most
aspects of these changes for the various regions of Ibero-America so
that our information is scanty and most statements, except those on the
legal Atlantic trade, are largely conjecture. Our information is best for
Mexico and Brazil.
In agriculture, the continued abandonment of land as the Indian popu-
719
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
lation shrank led to continued and accelerating growth of large European
landholdings. Such a growth would have taken place in any event because
of the limited number of fields of economic activity open to an upper class
in the seventeenth century and the economic security and social prestige
attached to ownership of land, but it would have taken place much more
slowly had the native population continued to occupy most of the land.
In Mexico, where the phenomenon was well under way in the latter half
of the sixteenth century, the bulk of land available for royal grant was
given away or sold by the crown by the early decades of the seventeenth
century. The largest number of grants was made between 1580 and 1610.
Thereafter the formation of great estates took place by purchase and by
the procedure of composition. The landholder who had occupied land
secured a legal title through a compromise payment to the crown. In 1631
the crown, spurred on by its financial difficulties, ordered a general sur-
vey of land titles in the Spanish Indies in order to force such payments.
As the surveys were carried out during the next twenty years, landholders
were able to secure legal title to the large irregular tracts between former
grants and to legitimize seizures from the Indians. Many of the new lati-
fundia were owned by the clergy so that in 1631 the Mexico City council
complained that a third of the land in Mexico was in mortmain. In Chile,
where the development of large estates was equally rapid in this period,
a survey carried out in 1604, ostensibly to protect the Indians in their
lands, actually served to disclose the existence of large vacated tracts,
all of which were occupied through grant or seizure by 1620. Throughout
Iberian America, including Brazil, there was a similar development of
large estates although at varying rate. The estates were kept intact by
entail or by the custom of giving shares in common ownership to heirs
rather than divide the inheritance. Much of the capital for the develop-
ment of the estates in Spanish America came from the profits of office-
holding and mining or from the very rapid development in this period of
censos, funds put out on mortgage either for stipulated periods or perma-
nently. Charitable and religious endowments consisted largely of funds
invested in this way.
Many, perhaps most of the large estates, were devoted to stock-
raising, which expanded very greatly in this period. It had the very impor-
tant advantage of requiring little capital and labour and of being
especially well suited for exploitation of large areas. We have already
mentioned the great growth of stock-raising in Brazil and the Jesuit
missions of the Rio de la Plata. It was also true in Chile, which became
a series of great cattle estates, in Cuba, northern Mexico, and in other
areas. Stock-raising meant primarily cattle, although by no means ex-
clusively so, and was characterized by a peculiar rhythm at its beginning.
In the first years, the cattle increased very rapidly to such vast numbers
that they passed the carrying capacity of the land. There was then a
720
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008LATIN AMERICA l 6 l O - 6 o
sharp contraction during which thousands and even millions of animals
died, and the cattle came to balance at much lower numbers with the
long-term carrying capacity of the land. In central Mexico the contraction
was already evident by the end of the sixteenth century so that the great
increase of the period 1610-60 took place on the new ranches of Sinaloa,
Durango, Chihuahua and Coahuila. Throughout America, in general,
there was little market for the meat; the major products were hides and
tallow, which were exported or were used in large quantities by the mines.
The ranches also supplied horses and mules for traction, and large quan-
tities of wool for local production of coarser cloths.
The expansion of large European estates also made possible increased
production of wheat, wine, and other foodstuffs for the cities and mines,
taking advantage of the growing market left vacant by the decline in
Indian production and enabling the Europeans to meet serious, and at
times critical, problems of supply. Many of the large estates were devoted
to sugar cane, the cultivation of which expanded greatly in the first half of
the seventeenth century although profits fell off sharply after perhaps 1620.
Brazil, already prominent in European supply of sugar at the opening of
the century, increased deliveries rather steadily, the difficulties of the
Portuguese after 1620 being more than made good through the expansion
and reorganization of plantations by the Dutch. There was also a rapid
expansion of sugar-cane-raising and extracting and processing mills in the
Spanish Indies—in Santo Domingo, the Atlantic and Pacific coasts, and
tropical mountain areas up to elevations of 1,500 metres. The very sub-
stantial production of Mexico and Peru was used locally; that of the
Caribbean islands was exported to Spain. Sugar plantations were large
industrial establishments requiring considerable amounts of capital if the
owners controlled all processes. They needed large tracts of land for cane,
pasture, and food; a heavy investment in expensive Negro slaves; com-
plicated machinery for grinding the cane, concentrating the juice, and
purifying it; and the hiring of skilled workmen to supervise the operations.
In Brazil, much cane was raised by smaller planters, dependent on credit,
who delivered their cane to the owner of the grinding mill for a percentage
of the sugar. Other estates were self-contained enterprises. In general,
the latter were the rule in the Spanish Indies. The Jesuits did much to
develop sugar-raising in Mexico and Peru, and owned a number of
unusually well-organized and eventually profitable plantations.
Another development in agriculture of the years 1610-60 was the ex-
tension of cacao-raising in the Spanish Indies. Aside from local pro-
duction, the major source of supply during the sixteenth century was the
Sonsonate area of Central America, which shipped to both Mexico and
Peru. Shortly after the beginning of the seventeenth century, the vice-
royalty of Peru developed its own supply on the coast around Guayaquil.
At the same time, the low-lying areas of Venezuela finally found a pro-
721
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
fitable crop in cacao and opened an expanding export trade to Mexico.
During this period the taste for drinking chocolate was still confined to
America and to Spain so that there was relatively little shipment to
Europe.
The course of mining is perhaps the most difficult to assess of all areas
of economic activity. Mining in seventeenth-century America meant silver
mining. It was regarded as the key industry since it furnished specie for
exchange against imports and for remittances and the expenses of the
Iberian crown in Europe. Receipts of treasure in Spain, for which ex-
cellent estimates are available to 1650, reached a peak in the decade
1591-1600, remained at a high level until 1630, and then fell off sharply.
But, by the middle decades of the seventeenth century, shipments to
Spain were no longer a clear indication of production. The increasing
needs of the American colonies for circulating medium meant that much
larger quantities of silver were retained there. Very large amounts of
specie also reached Europe through illegal channels, either unregistered
in Spanish shipping, or through trade with Portuguese and non-Iberian
shipping. Buenos Aires and Brazil were especially important in siphoning
off silver. Furthermore, the entire process of production and taxation was
attended by a series of frauds that had become custom. In many districts
of Peru, for example, it was customary to declare bars of newly processed
silver at a fraction of their real value, as low as half, for purposes of
assessment of the royal fifth. It is thus very difficult to determine the
movement of silver production in this period. On the whole, it seems
likely that production at least remained stationary and may well have
declined in Mexico, especially in the 1640s and 1650s when many miners
moved into stock-raising, and that production declined in Peru. It cer-
tainly did not expand greatly anywhere in America as it had done in
the sixteenth century although there were still profitable new finds—in
Mexico, the mines of the Parral district of Chihuahua 1631-4; in Peru,
those of Pasco in 1630 and of Laicacota in 1657. The relatively static
condition of the industry was brought about in part by the serious labour
shortages already mentioned but also by the operation of an especially
complex series of other factors: costs, taxes, credit, and technology in-
adequate for the problems encountered. The fundamental problem was
that American mining was based upon quantity processing of ores of low
grade. For a few years after each find, the miners worked in the weathered
and relatively concentrated surface ores, which were easily dug and pro-
cessed, with high yield. They soon reached water level, below which lay
unweathered lodes with abundant supplies of ore of low concentration
of metal. Excavating the ore involved extensive tunnelling and the diffi-
cult problem of drainage without pumps. Neither blasting by gunpowder
nor drainage by horse-drawn whim was widely used until the beginning
of the eighteenth century. The most effective solution known at this time
722
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008LATIN AMERICA l 6 l O - 6 O
was drainage by a tunnel driven below the level of the mine, an expensive
and arduous undertaking but one carried out in Potosi in the great
tunnel completed in 1636. The ore was usually carried on the backs of
Indian workmen, who climbed series of ladders to reach the mouth of the
shaft. Processing the ore was mostly by the patio process introduced
and improved in the sixteenth century. The ore was ground, mixed
with mercury, salt, and at times iron and copper pyrites, and at length
the silver was extracted. Such treatment required a large investment in
grinding and processing plants, and paid heavy tribute to the crown
through the royal monopolies of mercury and salt. Few men were able
to control the mining through the series of operations from extraction to
processing. Usually, the miners who extracted ore sold it to middlemen,
who in turn sold it to processing plants. At each link in the chain, the
men were bound by advances of credit, without which they could not
continue work, even to the owners of processing mills, who were usually
heavily in debt to the crown for supplies of mercury and salt. The entire
industry, furthermore, suffered from the rising prices of the sixteenth and
early seventeenth centuries, which steadily drove up costs at the same time
that output was sold for a fixed value of one peso (piece of eight reals or
silver dollar) an ounce. When the financial needs of the crown led it to
attempt to raise the price of mercury or to order early payment of the
millions of pesos owing it, as happened in this period, the industry was
threatened with ruin. In seventeenth-century Mexico, the term miner be-
came synonymous with respectable poverty.
The greatest decay of production was at Potosi in Peru, whose mountain
of silver earlier had provided the overwhelming proportion of Peruvian
specie and rather more than half of American output. There the decline
was bound up with the peculiar arrangement by which Indian towns made
up shortages in their mita quotas through payment of the wages of a sub-
stitute at the rate of seven to seven and a half pesos a week. The arrange-
ment was accepted by many towns as preferable to the hardships of work
in the mines. The miners of Potosi accordingly were afforded the attrac-
tive prospect of having their labour supplied free or of simply pocketing
the payments. A miner or processer with an allotment of forty mitayos
(the average) could pay the royal taxes on a non-existent production and
live on the remainder. The decay of the Potosi mines affected the extensive
zones in Lower and Upper Peru and the Rio de la Plata which supplied
manufactures, foodstuffs, and animals, as indeed the decline of mining
throughout America affected the workshops, farms, and ranches that had
developed to supply the mines.
In trade, the period was marked by the increasingly static quality and
eventual decline of the legal trade to Spanish America in the annual
fleets. The system was cumbersome, monopolistic, and burdened with
heavy taxes and the costs of defence. The merchant gild of Seville operated
723
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
in collusion with the merchant gilds of Mexico City and Lima to keep
prices high by storing merchandise and deliberately creating scarcity. As a
defensive measure against foreign attack the fleets proved successful since,
despite many attempts, only two were seized, one in 1628 by the Dutch
and another in 1656-7 by the English; but as a commercial system they
were increasingly unable to compete in greatly changed conditions. The
largest fleet shipment of wares from Spain took place in 1608, with an
estimated 45,000 maritime tons of approximately 54 cubic feet each. The
average annual tonnage, calculated by five-year periods, continued to rise
until 1616-20, largely through greater shipments to Mexico. From 1621
to 1650 there was a slow but rather steady decline in tonnage shipped, and
after 1651 a precipitous drop. In the composition of the fleets themselves,
there was a decrease in the number of ships, large numbers of which were
lost in storms, but until the mid-century the decrease in number was made
good in large part by the greater size of the new vessels built. In general,
the fleets were able to sail each year until 1654 when the wars and lessened
ability of defraying costs from the shipments led to suspension of the
sailings in many years. The crown of Portugal did not have a fleet system
for Brazil and permitted free sailings from all Portuguese ports. Only for
a short period beginning in 1649 did it set up a semi-monopolistic com-
pany in order to ensure protection from Dutch attack.
The decline in the legal trade to Spanish America coincided in general
with the downward movement of the European economy in the middle
decades of the century. It was therefore due to many factors, of which
two seem especially important: the growth of local manufactures and
intercolonial trade and a vast increase in interloping or foreign contra-
band. There had been steady development of local agriculture and simpler
manufactures during the sixteenth century in most of the colonies, many
of which soon became self-sufficient or even developed surpluses for ex-
port to other colonies in wheat, olive oil, wine, and the coarser varieties
of woollens. Chile and Mexico, for example, developed export trades in
wheat and Peru one in wine, all to the detriment of fleet shipments from
Spain. The Chinese trade via Manila also provided silks and finer wares
for Mexico, and through transhipment at Acapulco for Peru and other
colonies. As early as the 1590s the crown of Castile tried to protect the
fleets, which were vital in imperial communication and finance, by limiting
the Philippine trade, forbidding transhipment of Chinese wares, and
ordering discouragement of competing colonial production of such items
as silk, olive oil, and wine. When the early measures proved inadequate,
the crown issued more stringent orders, such as forbidding Peruvian
shipments of olive oil and wine to Panama and Guatemala (1614-15)
and of wheat flour to Panama (1630). In 1634 it took the drastic step of
prohibiting all trade between the viceroyalties of Mexico and Peru in an
effort to cut off transhipment of Chinese wares. Evasion was widespread,
724
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008LATIN AMERICA l 6 l O - 6 O
however, and intercolonial trade prospered under a series of devices with
the collusion of colonial administrators.
Foreign interloping or contraband also became very extensive in this
period. The major centres were the Caribbean, which provided innumer-
able islands and inlets for illicit landings, and the Rio de la Plata area with
its excellent port at Buenos Aires and easy access by river and land to the
great mining centres of Upper and Lower Peru. The principal interlopers
at first were the Portuguese who, with the advantage of being common
subjects during the crown union, made use of contracts for supplying
Negro slaves for introduction of other wares and further built up a flourish-
ing entrepot trade through which wares of all European countries were
shipped from Portugal to Brazil and then passed through the Rio de la
Plata. After the rupture of the crown union in 1640, the Portuguese were
careful to avoid all hostilities with the Rio de la Plata. The other major
interlopers were the Dutch, who took the place of the Portuguese in the
slave trade once they seized control of the African posts and early in the
century engrossed a substantial part of Caribbean trade. Their seizure
and settlement of islands in the Caribbean in the 1630s and occupation
of part of Brazil 1624-54 gave them bases from which to carry on a
trade in which the colonists enthusiastically participated. The French and
English were of lesser importance in direct contraband trade in America
although the French supplied an increasing proportion of the wares
shipped in the legal trade from Seville.
The decline of the fleet shipments and the parallel decrease in receipts
of American treasure in Spain indicated in general the growing failure
of the crown of Castile to secure revenue from America in precisely the
period when its needs became greater because of the Thirty Years War.
This failure occurred despite strenuous efforts to increase fiscal yields,
and was made worse by resort to whole or partial seizures of private
shipments of treasure six times between 1621 and 1649. The reign of
Philip IV was marked by repeated appeals to the generosity of his Ameri-
can subjects for voluntary contributions, there being ten such appeals
in the years 1621-65; by the imposition of a series of new taxes; and by
the sale of many of the higher offices in the colonies, such as accounting
and treasury posts, which had hitherto been reserved from sale to ensure
more honest administration and firmer royal control. The composiciones
generates, introduced in the 1630s, granted royal consent or pardon for
seizures of land, maintenance of illegal liquor shops, and for a series of
other infractions of laws. The net result of all these fiscal measures was
increasing loss of royal control over colonial administrators, an even
greater rapacity on the part of provincial and district governors, and the
increasing absorption of the revenues of the empire through peculation,
evasion, and smuggling. The profits of the Spanish Empire passed in-
creasingly into the hands of colonial administrators in alliance with
725
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008DECLINE OF SPAIN AND THE THIRTY YEARS WAR
local magnates. In a somewhat parallel development in Brazil, where
central control was weaker from the beginning, resistance to rule by the
unpopular Habsburgs and the successful expulsion of the Dutch by the
colonists, over initial opposition of Joao IV of the Braganza dynasty,
created an especially vigorous, self-reliant, and defiant local spirit centred
in the town councils. As in the expulsion of the Jesuits, they did not
hesitate to over-ride royal command. In both Spanish and Portuguese
America at the mid-century, impoverished and weakened central govern-
ments faced resistant, tenacious, and deep-rooted local interests.
726
Cambridge Histories Online © Cambridge University Press, 2008
